Wife Can'T Escape
=======================
=============== Chapter 1
Though it has been a whole day, Song Luan's mind was still muddleheaded.
The day before, she stayed up late to read a novel called "The Powerful Minister" that was published on the website. This made the novel's success and swept the women's daily charts.
Song Luan read more than two million words in that book with great interest. After reading half of them, her upper and lower eyelids were fighting to stay awake. When she couldn't bare it anymore, she went to sleep.
When she woke up, she found that she transmigrated in that book as the man's wife.
The original owner of the body did not have much details in the book. She only appeared a few =============== Chapters, and even faced a tragic ending. She was burned to death by a fire set off by her husband while her son locked the door.
When Song Luan thought of this, her mood was not good.
"Madam, it's time" The servant girl spoke carefully and bowed her body with her head down. She was afraid of her.
Song Luan sighed heavily and cleared her throat. She said, "Go out first, you don't have to wait for me"
The two servant girls that were told to go out, bent over and quickly retreated out of the room.
Song Luan knew why they were afraid of her. The original owner deserved to end up with a terrible death.
Her father was a powerful man in front of the emperor. He is highly favored prime minister. Although the original owner's mother was a concubine, she was pampered and raised since she was young.
She learned a lot of spoiled traits from her mother. She treated people harshly, was snobbish to make friends, and often insulted women in the circle with her beauty.
However, the original owner is quite beautiful with white skin and big chest, that even all the nobles want to marry her.
At that time, the male lead had just won the imperial examination and visited the Hanlin Academy, and came to visit the Song family.
The original owner was plotted by her sister, and the two were drugged to stay in the same bed. This kind of scandal would damage the reputation of the two families. Since they have no choice, the two families had to get married.
She was already dissatisfied with this marriage, and after being mocked by the sisters she had bullied before, she was even more dissatisfied!
After she got married, she grew more angry towards the Zhao's family. She scolded her servants at will, and disliked her husband, Zhao Nanyu. But soon after, she was pregnant with a child.
Of course, the woman can only see money in her eyes. She was extremely displeased with her son. As long as Zhao Nanyu is not at home, she scolds her child whenever she's in a bad mood. She can still choke him with anger.
The original owner was bold enough to hook up with the royal family. Zhao Nanyu ignored her words and deeds, and this made her even more unscrupulous.
After thinking of these things, Song Luan's brow wrinkled tightly.
She got out of bed and dressed, went outside to wash herself. Sitting in front of the bronze mirror, Song Luan was still in a trance. Her face was the same as the female character in the book. When she read the book, she felt very happy when the original owner died. But now, she couldn't laugh anymore.
Speaking of Zhao Nanyu, although he was still a nameless man. This made him no choice but to be humble. His lifestyle is low-key and gentle, and he is kind and gentle to everyone.
But in reality, he is a vicious character.
Hiding a knife in his smile, he gradually removes obstacles in his career. He smiles right after killing them personally. Everyone who humiliated and insulted him had to die.
Zhao Nanyu is also extremely vengeful. At the age of five or six, he did not let go of his servants who bullied him.
Such a vengeful man who can't kill without blood naturally won't give a good end to the original owner who betrayed him and nearly made him wear a green hat.
He rose to the top, controlling the regime and covering the world with his hands.
The servants buried their heads and started to prepare the dishes. It's time for lunch. Song Luan glanced at the dishes on the table. There were several kinds of light vegetables, a crystal clear elbow, and a bowl of west lake beef soup, which makes people hungry.
Song Luan swallowed her breath and gradually felt hungry.
She sat on the chair, picked up the chopsticks and took a bite of her favorite spring bamboo shoots, which tasted delicious that she unconsciously ate two more bites.
The servant girl standing on the side was quavering. After a long internal struggle, she stood out and said, "Madam, I'm afraid the young master is too weak to eat two meals."
Song Luan was shocked, "What?"
Seeing that her face was fair, the servant girl boldly continue, "Have you forgotten? yesterday morning, you fined young master not to eat for a day. Last night, he was hungry. I'm afraid he can't be hungry again this morning."
Afraid that she would not agree, the servant girl moved closer, "I'm afraid master will lose his temper if he hears about this."
Zhao Nanyu loved this child so much.
Song Luan didn't know about this! Needless to say, before she transmigrated, it is certain that the original owner already did petty things, not even sparing her own biological son.
Glossary:
Shi Ge – Referring to Zhao Zhi (The original owner and Zhao Nanyu's child). It means the eldest born-child of the family.
✯¸.•'*¨'*•✿ ✿•*'¨*'•.¸✯
The child born by the original owner and Zhao Nanyu is called Zhao Shi. He is four years old. Most of the time, he lives in the front yard with his father. Only when Zhao Nanyu is away from home will he be sent to the backyard.
Song Luan suddenly lost her appetite and put down her chopsticks, "Go and bring my son"
The servant girl was surprised and pleased, but for fear that she would change her mind, "Yes, I will go"
Zhao Nanyu was sent out to leave Beijing a few days ago, and spent more than a half a month away. As a matter of fact, he was coming back in two days. Thinking that she was about to meet the man, Song Luan's heart is still shaking when she thinks of meeting him soon. She doesn't know if it's too late to please him now. After all, he would be a very powerful man in the future.
If she can't please him, at least she should not offend him.
The servant soon led a little boy to the inner room. The spring was cold, but Shi Ge's clothes were very thin. He was wearing a red round-neck shirt, and also had a pair of red boots under his feet. His skin was white as now, his eyes were dark and deep. By the time he arrived in the room, he released the servant's hand expressionlessly and refused to let her hold it again.
Shi Ge lowered his eyebrows and walked to Song Luan respectfully, paying his respect, "Mother is well."
Zhao Shi's facial features follow his parents. There is no flaw in them. He's beautiful just like the ice and snow. Song Luan has never seen a better looking child in her life. Perhaps since he is still young and has some flesh on his cheeks that it made him look especially cute and lovely.
It's just that his body and bones look thinner than those of his age, making people want to love and cuddle him.
Song Luan looked as if she wanted to reach out for a hug, but was afraid that she would scare the child, so she tried to pull up a gentle smile and said to him, "Are you hungry? would you like to eat together?"
He seemed to be stunned for awhile, his mouth was stretched tightly and his brow furrowed. After a while, he replied politely, "Yes."
Song Luan, as a single young woman in her youth, had no experience with children or how to get along with them, but she still understands the principle of step-by-step. She stretched out her chopsticks to pick up a crystal elbow for Shi ge, "This is delicious"
Then she looked at him with bright eyes.
Shi Ge felt strange for awhile. He felt that his mother today was different. He lowered his head, "Thank you, mother"
The mother and son sat at the table in silence. After Song Luan was full, she quietly looked at him and found that the crystal elbow in his bowl remain untouched.
Song Luan was discouraged. It seems that their mother-child relationship is worse than she thought.
After eating enough, servants immediately pulled out the dishes and chopsticks on the table. The three-year old son sat down on the spot with a straight-face and said nothing.
Song Luan sighed in her heart. She suddenly reached out to him, this action scared Shi Ge. He leaned back and almost fell to the ground. Fortunately, Song Luan caught him quickly.
She hugged the child in her arms and caressed his back with her delicate hands. "It's okay, don't be afraid."
Zhao Shi twisted his eyebrows and looked serious. At first, he thought he would hate the light fragrance on her. Unexpectedly, he found that the smell of his mother was a little pleasant and warm, as if it could make people feel at ease.
Song Luan didn't get a response. She looked up and down at him, and found that there was a wound on his arm and a small scratch on his forehead. She estimated that these were all the things that the original owner did.
She really can't figure out how could the original owner treat such a lovely child like this? Starving him? Blistering his son?
She opened her mouth and was about to say something when a servant came from outside and said, "Madam, the little master's teacher is here. It's time to practice."
Shi Ge returned to his senses and freed himself from her arms, "Mother, I'll go to my uncle first."
His teacher is his uncle.
Song Luan couldn't stop him. She lowered her body and poked his cheeks with her finger, "Go!"
Shi Ge's face turned red, then returned to normal, and he retired from the room.
After waiting for a long time, the young man picked him up and touched his head. He glanced at Huai Shui residence with cold eyes. He asked, "Did your mother hit you today?"
Shi Ge put his head on his shoulder and shook his head, "No"
His face was a little childish, and his voice was not as cold as before, "Uncle, I think she is different today."
She smiled at him, gave him food, and even hugged him.
The man sneered, "She must be thinking of doing something bad again."
When Shi Ge heard the words, he lost a little bit in his eyes. He looked down, and his hands tied tightly around his neck. "I miss my father"
"He will come back tonight."
In Zhao's residence, not only Shi Ge thought of his father, Zhao Nanyu
But Song Luan also thought of this man. At first, after she was full, she laid on the soft bed to rest when she suddenly sat up like a fish and said, "It's over"
Song Luan suddenly remembered that the original owner in the book was not only burned to death, but Zhao Nanyu quietly began to give her chronic poison/medicine in the second year after their marriage, preparing to kill her.
It's been three years since she was poisoned with drugs. She doesn't know if it's too late to save herself now.
=============== Chapter 2
In fact, Song Luan doesn't remember the plot clearly even though the writing of the book was good. She even read half of it without paying attention to these details.
Although there is not much description of the original owner in the book, but the nature of this person was thoroughly described as vicious, rebellious, and unrestrained. Song Luan remembers that the original owner's body will get worse after a year, presumably related to the poison that the male lead fed her.
After the original owner was sick for many years, the male lead's rank rose in court. He eventually controlled the affairs of the state, settling accounts one by one. The original owner was burned to death among the fate of others who had also insulted the male lead.
Song Luan heard from the servant that the body fainted that day, and when she woke up, she became the owner of this body.
She leaned against the soft cushion, the light of the noon fell on her cheek. She was white and translucent, her long eyelashes flickered a little, her red lips were glamorous. She was truly a beauty.
Song Luan has a good figure—small waist, long legs, and big chest. She was wearing a red tunic jacket with a full grip on the waist. Her watery eyes flow like the waves. She has the physical attributes to captivate people.
However, the man was not moved by such beauty, he still killed her in the end.
Song Luan thought about it for an afternoon but was not able to come up with a plan to deal with it. Later, she went to sleep slowly in the warm sun. The sun fell on her appropriately, and it made her look so peaceful.
But she had a nightmare. In the dream, there was a man in black. His temperament was cold and his eyes were sharp as knives. There was a shallow smile on the extremely beautiful face. The curved peach blossom eyes narrowed slightly. The man held a dagger in his hands and walked closer to her step by step with his black boots.
The man raised his hand and brutally stabbed the dagger in her heart by pressing his finger on her thin shoulder, pinning her to death on the wall. Soon after, he moved the knife and turned it all around, Song Luan could almost hear the splashing sound of blood on her flesh, and after a moment, her face turned white and the pain stopped.
Then Song Luan woke up...
When she woke up, she found that it was almost dark and her forehead was sweating. She covered her chest and felt a little pain. Song Luan remembered that what she had just dreamed about was the scene before the death of the original owner that was described in the book. It was the man who stabbed her with the knife. It was so terrible.
The original owner pleased the male lead after he gained power. After he failed, she became angry and lost her mind. She shouted at him, saying all kinds of ugly words.
However, she shouldn't have scolded him with, "You are just a son of a lowly slut! You were just in a moment of power. You dare to give me that face!"
It's true that the mother of the male lead was born in a humble background. She died of depression without even entering the Zhao family.
The male lead stabbed the original owner and threw her into the fire.
Song Luan secretly made a decision. She would never do anything to offend the male lead, and would not say anything that should not be said, and even would not dare to think about hooking up or attracting other men for him to not wear a green hat.
In the end, the reason why the male lead used fire was because he thought the original owner was dirty. As the male lead in a novel with a female audience, overbearing is an attitude they have. Not just that, but they need to have both strong possessiveness and obsessive cleanliness. What belongs to him should not be touched and tainted by outsiders.
At this time, she doesn't know how many men the original owner had ties with. She felt her eyes were stained at a glance. Only when these ashes are blown away by the wind could she be clean.
As she was thinking about something, a servant girl came in and asked, "Madam, do you want the meal to be set up?"
Song Luan's face was white, and now she looked haggard. She was hungry, and so she nodded, "Set the meal."
After a pause, she suddenly stopped two servant girls and asked, "Did master ever say when he'd come back?"
She had to be ready to deal with the man.
The servant girl was shocked, and then she said, "I don't know."
Afraid that she would be angry, she immediately added, "but this servant heard from the housekeepers that he will probably arrive in Beijing tonight."
Song Luan: "...."
This headache is getting worse...
There is no other way but to be a good person in front of Zhao Nanyu tonight. Otherwise, she'll die.
"I see." Song Luan decided to tear this one by one. The older one was not easy to fool, but the four-year-old Zhao Shi should be very easy to coax. Suddenly, she said, "Go to the front yard and bring the young master over for dinner."
...
"Yes"
"Forget it. I'll go by myself."
I'm familiar with the layout of the residence.
Zhao Nanyu's yard is not big, but his taste is not bad, which is better than any other artistic concept and layout out there. Through a path and a round door, she arrived at the front yard.
The four-year old Zhao Shi was practicing calligraphy in the study room. As for his uncle, he left long ago. He was standing on a chair, holding a writing brush with a very professional posture. He writes decisively. His words are not beautiful, but they can also be described as neat and clear.
Although his father dotes on him, he still has high requirements for the young master. He has to practice calligraphy and study every day. Zhao Shi has no friends to play with in the residence. His several cousins didn't like to play with him.
Even his mother didn't like him. From her memory, she just beat or scolded this child. Zhao Shi never resisted. At the beginning, he was expecting his mother, but gradually, his heart became cold.
Song Luan gently pushed the door open, and a smell of ink came into her nose, which made her feel relaxed and happy. She softly paced, and walked over. "Is my son still practicing calligraphy?"
The brush in Shi Ge's hand shook, the black ink stained the white paper, and the expression on his face was not natural, "Mother"
Song Luan cheekily walked to him, bent over and looked at the words he wrote, and praised sincerely, "The writing is really good."
He was uncomfortable, and the small hands in his sleeves were tightly held together. This was the first time his mother praised him. It had never happened before. There was a strange feeling of sweetness and sourness in her heart.
Song Luan's eyes gazed at him with a gentle look, and after being watched for awhile, his face gradually rose red, and he asked, "How did my mother come?"
The more Song Luan saw Shi Ge, the more she liked him. White, tender, and lovely. Even if the corners of his mouth were raised because of unhappiness, he was still cute. She reached out her hand and held him in her arms. "It's time to eat. I'll take you there"
Shi Ge's body was stiff all over. His hands were too stiff that he doesn't know where to put them. He didn't dare to hold her clothes. He was even more afraid to hug her. He just felt her mother was fragrant and soft.
It turned out that being held in the arms by his mother was comfortable, but he still didn't forget what uncle said to him in the afternoon. Uncle said that his mother was thinking about something bad again.
"I can walk by myself, mother."
Song Luan hugged the small bun, she was not willing to let go, so she smiled and patted his head affectionately, "Don't move around, put your arms around your mother's neck. The child should listen to what the mother says."
He was forced to bury his face in her chest. Five little fingers opened and closed, closed and opened. Finally, he couldn't keep up with his inner emotions, he carefully grasped her coat.
Although his face was still very cold, but his pair of small ears had a tinge of light pink.
Song Luan took Shi Ge back to the Huai Shui Residence. Fearing that the child was cold, she specially found him a coat to wear, with a collar covered with soft, warm fox fur. Most of the child's face was tucked inside, revealing only a pair of dark eyes, clear and bright.
Zhao Shi felt that he was dreaming. His mother treated him too well today. She used to look at him full of disgust. Today, she does not, as if she really liked him.
Even though this was a dream, Zhao Shi was still very happy.
When the mother and son sat at the table, Song Luan realized that she didn't know what he liked to eat. This time, she didn't immediately take the food to his bowl, instead she asked, "What do you like to eat? Tomorrow, I'll let them cook it for you"
Zhao Shi was still very restrained, lowering his head, "I can eat anything."
Song Luan also saw that his defense was still high, so she did not force him to give an answer. With a gentle smile, she said, "Okay"
She wanted to say that she would cook pastries for him tomorrow, but the next day after, she didn't dare to collapse her character so much that someone would notice. It would be difficult if that happens.
At night, after Song Luan finished washing, she dressed in a white long dress, her dark hair casually draped over her back. Her face looked at the night sky—she was more exquisite than gorgeous.
Zhao Shi had already gone to sleep in his room, he curled up while sleeping in the corner of the bed. Song Luan covered the quilt for him and stepped out the room.
At this time, she was now tired physically and mentally. Just when she turned off the light to go to bed, the servant girl outside the room hurriedly came in and said, "Madam, the master is back. He is coming here."
Song Luan's drowsiness immediately died down. She was full awake.
=============== Chapter 3
TL NOTE: Song Luan was scared the whole time...uhh I can't wait for the yandere male lead...I can almost see the potential just from this =============== Chapter.... (~˘▾˘)~
Also, I decided to refer to Shi Ge as "Son or Eldest Son" when he is being talked about.
For example:
Before: "Where is Shi Ge?"
After: "Where is my son?"
✯¸.•'*¨'*•✿ ✿•*'¨*'•.¸✯
Translated by: Tinker
In the book, "The Powerful Minister", It's not hard to see that the relationship between the original owner and the male lead is not good. The male lead almost never set foot in the original owner's residence. If it's not necessary, he won't even appear in front of the original owner.
Song Luan never thought that the male lead would come to her directly after coming back home. To be honest, she was a little nervous.
Zhao Nanyu came back to his house, drank some water to moisten his throat. Then he went to his room to see his son. The room in the front yard was empty, and his eyes were cold. "Where is my son?"
The young man replied trembling, "Your wife took him this evening."
Zhao Nanyu's face was even colder, and he took large steps towards the Huai Shui Residence. His anger was so strong that his heart felt crushed. His eyes darkened. She better not seek death.
Song Luan thought about how to face him. Suddenly, the room was pushed open. She was shocked. She sat up from the bed and raised her eyes. The man in front of her was dressed in white, with a jade pendant hanging on his waist and a cloud pattern embroidered on his belt. Her eyes gradually moved up and looked at his face directly.
The face was very delicate as if they had been carefully carved, with eyes that at first glance, looks like it was painted. The peach-blossom eyes seem to contain clear water. The corner of the eyes are slightly raised, and the casual glance at her added to the emotion.
There was a faint light in his light-colored pupil. His eyes were deep, his skin was fair and the light of the candle fell on his elegant face like a painting.
Song Luan swallowed her breath. This male lead is so beautiful.
Zhao Nanny looked around slowly, chuckled and said, "Where is our eldest son?"
He pretended to be such a good-tempered man.
Song Luan was a little nervous and said, "In the room.."
Zhao Nanyu's eyes narrowed slightly. It seemed that today she is different from the ordinary times. This person seemed to be soft and quiet. Her eyes are clean and her expression is ignorant.
He raised his eyebrows and remembered to ask the servant tomorrow about what happened while he was away.
Song Luan was even more nervous when he didn't talk for a long time. Even though Zhao Nanyu was smiling, she could not smile back. After all, the nightmare left a big impression on her—Zhao Nanyu was smiling as he inserted a dagger in her heart, which hurt her chest while thinking about it.
She is frightened.
Zhao Nanyu stared at her quietly, as if he found something interesting. The fragile and weak woman was afraid of him.
She lightly bit her lips with her teeth, and her brows that furrowed were covered with fear while her eyes were overflowing with water. Zhao Nanyu doesn't know why but when he looked at her weak appearance, his eyes became dark.
"You don't have to worry, son is sleeping well in that room."
Zhao Nanyu removed his inquiry look and didn't ask her why she suddenly became nice to their son. He knew that Song Luan didn't like her child since the day she born him.
Usually she wouldn't want to touch her child. How could she even let the son sleep in the same room as her?
Zhao Nanyu usually takes care of their child to avoid the child from suffering.
He sat down, took the cup on the table and didn't mind the cold tea at all. He took a sip and ordered the servant waiting outside, "Go make a bowl of calming soup."
"Yes."
Song Luan was about to open her mouth to say something when Zhao Nanyu smiled and said to her, "You can't sleep well night. It's good for your health to drink a bowl of calming soup." He put down the tea cup, and then said softly, "Your body is always weak so drink the medicine for your health before sleeping."
Now she couldn't even refuse.
Song Luan was actually very depressed. Although she almost finished the book, "The Powerful Minister", there are a few descriptions about the the cannon fodder—original owner. The author never wrote about how she got along with the male lead, or what kind of life she had lead in the Zhao's residence.
It was just a rough summary of the evil things she did and the result after.
After a while, the servant girls brought up the medicine soup. The medicine in the bowl was black and still had a strange smell. Song Luan immediately frowned.
This smells bad. She doesn't want to drink. She doesn't want to drink it at all.
Seeing her thoughts, Zhao Nanyu took the medicine bowl himself, held the spoon handle, and delivered it to her mouth. While she was stunned, he gently wiped the corner of her mouth and smiled.
His smile was almost fascinating.
Under the swaying of the candle light, the beautiful smile was too frightening.
Song Luan opened her mouth and swallowed a spoonful of the bitter medicine. Almost at the same time, a sentence from the book jumped to her head.
【Zhao Nanyu clasped her chin and forced her to opened her mouth. He mercilessly pours in the black medicine. His lips sneered, and his hoarse voice was like the fierce ghost and like an evil spirit who climbed out of hell, "Go and die."】
This is the only sentence in "The Powerful Minister" that mentioned poison. In this way, even if she has read the book, she has no idea why Zhao Nanyu started poisoning, nor where he poisoned or what he used for poison.
Glossary:
Yu Ge – informal way to call Zhao Nanyu. This word meant like "Zhao Nanyu Brother"
✯¸.•'*¨'*•✿ ✿•*'¨*'•.¸✯
Translated by: Tinker
Zhao Nanyu found that the woman in front of him was shaking and her shoulders were trembling slightly. Although she was afraid of this, she still obediently drank the medicine that he fed.
Song Luan shuddered. The more she thought about it, the colder she became. However, the medicine was boiled by the servant girl in her room. It should not be poisonous.
Thinking about it, she gradually stopped shaking.
Song Luan's eyes widened, and her watery eyes looked at him pitifully. Her desire to survive was greater than that of others, "I'm very obedient."
So, Yu Ge, just spare me a little...
Zhao Nanyu was stunned for a moment. Looking at the empty bowl, he lightly smiled, "Well, it is indeed obedient."
The medicine was bitter, and she swallowed it all. She didn't lose her temper. She didn't sound like her usual self.
Song Luan's mouth was full of bitterness, but now she didn't dare ask for a candied fruit, for fear that Zhao Nanyu would think that she was planning many things, and would then think of the mischievous things she had done before, and would hate her even more.
In fact, she actually thought very clearly that she doesn't intend to be his wife, nor did she expect Zhao Nanyu to fall in love with her.
Moreover, it's not good to have a man who's possessive.
Song Luan only begged Zhao Nanyu to see her as obedient, sensible, and not evil, so she could keep her life. She doesn't want the experience of being burned to death, Okay?!!
She decided to start a low-key life and do good job. Now that the original owner has not yet betrayed him, nor has she neglected her son when he had high fever just to meet her lover. All solutions are still available.
It mentioned in the book that the son has a lame leg. When he tried to prevent the mother from meeting with her lover, the child was pushed away by the original owner. He rolled down the stairs while he had a high fever, and broke his leg.
At that time, the male lead must have wanted to tear the original owner into pieces.
Fortunately, none of this happened before she came. Otherwise, she can just find a rope to hang herself.
Zhao Nanyu saw her finish the medicine with his own eyes, and then stood up. "I'll go to the room to see our eldest son."
Song Luan didn't dare to stop him, and even wished that he would go away quickly. After he disappeared, the stone in her heart fell down steadily.
He saw that his son is sleeping very well. The little bun was surprisingly well-behaved, did not move or kick the quilt. Zhao Nanyu carefully examined his body and found no scars. The cold in his eyes gradually subsided.
He quietly went out of the room and found that Song Luan was still sitting beside the bed, with a thin clothe that covered her lightly, revealing her collarbone and a small part of porcelain white skin.
Zhao Nanyu looked at it silently for a while, then retracted his eyes and said to the servants, "Go fetch some water. I want to bathe."
"Yes."
Song Luan was already sleepy, but she dared not sleep first in front of Zhao Nanyu. She was somewhat surprised that he would stay.
When Zhao Nanyu bathed behind the screen, Song Luan sat beside the bed, dazed, listening to the sound of the water inside. She was on pins and needles, and wished she could get out of her way. She was afraid that something would happen tonight.
The more she thought about it, the more she was afraid.
Instead, she recalled the major events that had happened to Zhao Nanyu this year.
This year, his life was not very good. The emperor blatantly disliked him to make it difficult for him to walk in the court. And people in the Zhao family were quite disrespectful of him and often sneered at him.
The Song family didn't like their son-in-law who didn't make any achievements. When the original owner returned to her mother's house during the Dragon Boat Festival, her mother began to urge her to steal Zhao Nanyu's money and treasures.
On the Mid-Autumn Festival, Zhao Nanyu was sent to Huangzhou for a month. A group of people in black rushed and tried to kill him on the way. As a male lead, he certainly would not die, even if he was stabbed twice. He was then rescued.
The one who saved him was the legendary female lead. Song Luan doesn't intend to take the credit of the female lead. When the time comes, she will remind Zhao Nanyu to be careful on the road! This would be a good thing.
As she was thinking, the man behind the screen came out in his sleeping clothes, his dark hair was slightly wet. This scene was bright as the moon. Song Luan looked at his face, her throat tightened, and she swallowed.
His appearance was indeed very tempting. The bright moonlight outside the window sprinkled on his shoulder. He asked, "Why didn't you sleep yet?"
Zhao Nanyu's observation is excellent and meticulous. Since he stepped into the room, he immediately realized her mistake. In the past, Song Luan never waited for him to sleep together.
Song Luan immediately took off her shoes and climbed up the bed. She shrank in the quilt, only revealing her head and trying to keep calm. "I'm asleep"
Zhao Nanyu suddenly chuckled and looked at the two white tender feet stretching out from the quilt. He stepped forward and held her ankle with his cold fingers. Song Luan felt cold sweat on her back. Even though Zhao Nanyu was very gentle on the surface at the moment, she still felt the cold feeling come out of him.
Zhao Nanyu grabbed her ankle and gently stuffed her foot inside the quilt, laughing, "Isn't it cold?"
Song Luan avoided his eyes and whispered, "Thank you."
Zhao Nanyu turned off the light, and the bedroom was plunged into darkness. The faint white moonlight came in through the window. He lay down beside her.
Song Luan gripped the quilt nervously, and her whole body was tensed.
Zhao Nanyu seemed to smile faintly. His long and delicate knuckles suddenly touched her cheek. His hands touched her belly, and she felt cold.
His voice was hoarse, "Go to sleep."
=============== Chapter 4
Before dawn, Zhao Nanyu opened his eyes and frowned slightly. He raised his hand and silently removed the hand that was on his chest.
A light of disgust flashed in his eyes.
He slowly sat up, leaning against the pear-carved wood bed. He was wearing thin clothes. His collar was slightly open, showing his white chest. He propped his head and casually looked at the sleeping woman beside him.
The woman on the bed slept badly. She was lying on her back, almost occupying most of the bed. Her hands and feet were still restless, and her legs were rubbing against him all the time.
Song Luan's clothes were messy at the moment, and her long dark hair covered half of her small face. Her eyelashes were thick, and her skin was delicate. Zhao Nanyu's sight gradually went down. He looked at her exposed waist with interest, her quilt was long ago kicked into the corner. Her thin waist gave people unlimited imagination.
Zhao Nanyu watched for a long time, and then the light in his eyes sank. The sky outside the window gradually grew bright, turning from dark to light.
Song Luan had a nightmare. In the dream she ran barefoot in the forest. Behind her, a wolf was chasing her. She was out of breath. As she was panting, she fell down, but before she got up, the wolf had already come to her, staring at her with fierce eyes. And finally, she opened her mouth wide and bit her lip with her teeth.
Then, Song Luan woke up in pain. She didn't know if it was psychological but she felt that there was a light pain somewhere in her body.
As soon as she opened her eyes, she had faced Zhao Nanyu's eyes. His eyes were as clear as last night's, and she could not see the slightest emotion.
The morning sun fell on his side face through the window pane. He looked gentle, and elegant. Zhao Nanyu raised his eyebrows slightly, "Awake?"
Song Luan silently pulled the quilt to cover her exposed skin, with a heavy sound, "Uh.."
Zhao Nanyu didn't have to get up early for bathing today. He got out of bed and didn't call the servant girls to come in. Instead, he took off his clothes in front of her and slowly changed into a white-crescent clothe. Then he said to her, "Today, let's visit grandmother's place to say our greetings"
Song Luan nodded, "Okay."
Zhaon Nayu's eyes light up, and the corners of his mouth crossed with a meaninful smile. In the past, Song Luan would not talk kindly, so he just dealed with it.
The original owner and the grandmother don't get along. 9 out of the 10 times they went, she was angry at the grandmother the whole time. Of course, her life won't get easy after behaving like that.
Therefore, on the first day of the year, Song Luan would always throw a fit and would make vicious remarks. She would not go to the main house with him until he had been scolded enough. It's interesting. He doesn't know what happened in the days when he was away.
So much so that a woman like Song Loan had changed dramatically.
Song Luan couldn't see what he was thinking. She looked at Zhao Nanyu with tearful eyes and longed for him to understand the meaning in her eyes. She didn't want to change clothes in front of him.
Fortunately, Zhao Nanyu was not interested at seeing her dress. He didn't say anything. He took a deep look at her and then moved to the other room.
Song Luan finally didn't have to worry. She got out of the quilt and found a set of pomegranate red underskirt. She didn't hurry or slowed herself on changing.
While changing, she realized that it was not an illusion that she felt some pain in her body before.
There were several obvious pinch marks on her waist. The porcelain and delicate skin could easily be left with marks. It was very obvious. The blue and purple pigment looked painful.
She wondered in her heart that she didn't even know how she got this injury? When did it happen?
When she bathe last night, the skin was still fine. How could she wake up with more pinches? Song Luan didn't think about it. She thought it might be that the wolf in the nightmare was too scary. In the dream, she must have pinched herself severely.
After she finished dressing, Zhao Nanyu walked out of the room holding their son's hand. The father and son looked alike. They have the same temperament, releasing the same feeling of cold aura.
But Zhao Shi got the same eyes from her mother—big crystal clear eyes that can pierce people's hearts.
The servant girls came in and quickly made breakfast. There were light dishes and a porridge.
Song Luan is from Sichuan Province. She is not happy if the food is not spicy. She looked at the clear porridge on the table. Her mouth unconsciously grunted. She was a little unhappy.
Shi Ge was very obedient. He let go of his father's hand and sat on the chair. He straightened his back and waited for all the food to be placed on the table. In end, he was too young that even if his thoughts are limited, he still can't control his eyes.
Little bun secretly looked at his mother. Last night was the first time he lived in his mother's residence. Although he was separated by a thin wall, he could still smell his mother's fragnance when he slept.
During the meal, the atmosphere was very dull. The father and son had a gentle and elegant dining posture, and no unecessary sounds were emitted. They didn't say a word. Naturally, Song Luan could also not speak.
The food on the table didn't suit her taste very much. Song Luan felt that she was chewing wax. She put down her chopstick after eating a little. Zhao Nanyu took a silent look and didn't say anything.
This hasn't changed much. In order to maintain her slender figure, she eats very little.
Zhao Shi wanted to speak to tell his mother that she should eat more, but he didn't open his mouth. Everything that happened yesterday was like a dream for him.
Zhao Nanyu turned sideways and said softly, "Are you full?"
Zhao Shi nodded. "Father, I'm full."
Zhao Nanyu got up and hugged the little bun in his arms. Shi Ge hugged his father's neck then softly put his small head on his father's shoulder.
He said to Song Luan lightly, "I will take him back to the front yard first."
Song Luan also understood what he meant by this sentence. He was not assured if the child will stay with her. In fact, no one could question him if he thinks like that. After all, the original owner was very mean to her child.
Although she wanted to know her son and wants to treat him well, she was still afraid to ask Zhao Nanyu.
"Well....Okay."
There was cobblestone path leading to the front yard. Zhao Nanyu hugged the little bun. The child in his arms suddenly tightened and burried his face on his father's clothes, and said, "Mother hugged me yesterday."
Zhao Nanyu footsteps stopped for a moment, "Is it?"
He was very indifferent.
Zhao Shi has some grievances. He was afraid of hating his mother. Just because she suddenly treated him better yesterday, his heart was shaken. However, he didn't think that his mother was pretending, or that he had ulterior motives.
He went on to say, "Uncle said my mother's mind is not pure, but I.." He stammered, "I...don't think so. I like her smell."
Zhao Nanyu's eyes finally had some movement. He patted his head gently, "You are too young."
He still didn't believe that a woman like Song Luan would change. In the past four years, she has been intensifying her efforts. She is vicious that she has done countless evil things. Thinking of this, Zhao Nanyu's eyes went cold.
Although Zhao Shi is only four years old, the homework should be done every day. Zhao Nanyu took him to the study. His words was not strict but the firm instruction was there, "Write carefully and fill ten sheets."
"Yes."
Knowing that his son has been a very good boy, rarely crying or asking him for things, he didn't have to worry about him. He doesn't seem to be a four-year-old child. "If the result is satisfactory, I will take you to the horse farm in two days and let you pick your own pony."
"Thank you, father."
Zhao Nanyu left the study and did not immediately return to Huai Shui residence, but called the people who were responsible in the courtyard. He stood under the magnolia tree in the courtyard, and the mottled light and shadow sprinkled on his handsome face. The crescent-white clothes made a kind of elegant temperament. From a distance, he looked like a refined gentleman.
He put his hand on his back, opened his lips, and asked lightly, "What has my wife done in the days when I was away? Did someone came to see her? Or did something strange happened to her?"
The servant girl stood in front of him, daring not to look and whispered back, "Madam hasn't done anything nor has anyone come to look for her." She recalled it carefully and went on to say, "Just two days ago, Madam suddenly fell ill. Before she fell into coma, she said that she had chest pain and woke up after a days sleep."
After hearing this, Zhao Nanyu was silent for a moment, his eyes were calm...He did not continue to ask, and waved his hand to indicate that she could withdraw.
Sick? That's not surprising.
The corner of his lips rose a few arcs, and stepped towards Huai Shui Residence. Song Luan thought he would not come for a while, so she took of her socks and was lying on the soft mattress while reading a book.
When Zhao Nanyu entered, he saw a pair of white and tender feet shaking in the air.
His eyes dimmed, and he raised his eyebrows. He appeared quietly behind her, "I heard people say that you were sick a few days ago?"
Song Luan heard his voice, which scared her that even the seven souls and six souls* were sent into flying.
The sudden appearance of Zhao Nanyu frightened her so much.
=============== Chapter 5
Song Luan still remembered that when she first transmigrated, there was a pain in her chest, and the face in the bronze mirror at that time was very pale. For two days, she continued to take medicine. She hid her thought and her face was not normal, "It's Okay."
The breeze blowing in the gap between the window panes eased the dullness of the room.
Zhao Nanyu looked at her quietly and pursed his lips, "Is it? That's good."
Song Luan gave him a half-smile, and didn't know what to say.
Zhao Nanyu looked at her with a smile. Suddenly, he reached out and quickly took out the book behind her. After turning over two pages , he knew what was said in the book.
It's nothing more than a love story between a poor scholar and a rich lady. He had no interest in this kind of stories. Seeing Song Luan's eager eyes, he suddenly didn't want to return it.
He put away the book as if nothing happened, and said softly, "Let's go to my grandmother's place."
Song Luan was ready to come down from the soft mattress only to remember that she didn't wear socks.
Zhao Nanyu glanced at her, did not say anything, and stood up quietly, "I'll wait for you outside."
As soon as he left, Song Luan became more comfortable. She stepped barefoot on the blanket and rushed to the closet to find socks and shoes to put on. Before long, she appeared in front of Zhao Nanyu.
He looked at her silently for a while. The pomegrenate skirt was very beautiful on her body. The delicate belt outlined her figure. A golden ornament was inserted in her hair bun that also fell between her eyebrows. It can be seen that she was dressed carefully.
It has to be said that Song Luan stood out from the crows and was very eye-catching.
Zhao Nanyu raised his hand and moved the ornament on her head, explaining in his dazed look, "It's crooked."
Song Luan was scared, "Thank you."
He didn't make a sound. He raised his steps and walked forward. He didn't hold her hand. Song Luan didn't care. She followed him quietly.
Each time Song Luan went to this Old lady Zhao's place dressed up in extravagant fashion, she was often scolded. Song Luan's beautiful face that was heavily covered with makeup was not liked by the old lady. She instead liked a woman with good virtue, contrary to the appearance of Song Luan.
However, she didn't know the reason why the original owner was scolded and punished for this stupid reason every time. She just felt that this Old lady Zhao didn't like her.
Zhao Nanyu didn't intend to remind her, nor did he intend to tell her something.
Zhao family is famous. Although he has no official position in the court now, he still held a certain status. He was the teacher of the former emperor and later taught the new emperor. In addition, several sons in the family were very competitive. The eldest son is on duty in the court. The secon son is in Dali temple, and even the third son, who was the least accomplished, was also an official.
The third son was Zhao Nanyu's father.
The whole family did not like Zhao Nanyu very much, including his father. When he was young, Zhao Sanye liked to go out to drink wine in the flower house. At that time when he saw the beauty (Zhao Nanyu's mother), he lied that he was single to her.
Zhao Nanyu's mother didn't sell herself, he was cheated by Zhao Sanye, and soon they had him.
As soon as the child was born, Zhao Sanye wouldn't recognize the mother and son. It would be impossible for the Zhao family to agree to take a prostitute into the house. He wouldn't see the child not until he was hammered with a cane by grandfather Zhao.
After a few years, the third lady (Zhao Sanye's official wife) also gave birth to a son, which made Zhao Sanye looked down on Zhao Nanyu.
Several magnolia trees were planted in main courtyard. The flowers were about to bloom this season and the buds would be beautiful.
Crossing the small stone path in the garden and through a vermillion courtyard door, they arrived at the grandmother's door. Several servants gave notice that they had come. After a while, someone came out and invited them in.
Song Luan was very clever throughout the whole process. She decided not to show off or make trouble for the male lead. Only by keeping a low profile could she keep peace.
When she entered the room, the smell of temple incense rushed into her nose. In the middle of the room was grandmother Zhao, she was wearing a purple Beizi with a pair of small sleeves. Her clothes were embroidered with peony patterns.
Although the old lady is not young, her eyes were still sharp. She looked at them with a little contempt which made Song Luan uncomfortable.
Song Luan was sullen. She didn't know how Zhao Nanyu endured these for many years?
It seemed that it's not easy to be a male lead. He would have to bear the humiliation and heavy burden, and even stick to it all the time.
After drinking half a cup of tea, the old lady seemed to remember the two people standing in front of her. She said faintly, "I know you don't want to see me, but even if you don't want to come again on the first day of each month, you still follow the rules."
Zhao Nanyu lowered his eyes. "Grandma misundertood."
When the old lady him, she had a headache. She was bias. What kind of fun could she have? Moreover, Zhao Nanyu is far less pleasant than his younger brother.
"Misunderstanding? Do you know how long you are late? Half an hour. Your brother's tea is almost over and yet you haven't come yet! So uneducated!" She didn't think it was enough to scold Zhao Nanyu. She caught a glimpse of Song Luan, who was dressed like a flower beside him, and scolded her, "And you! I'm also an in-law! Why don't you just make a fuss? What's on your face? Why do you dressed like that at home?"
Song Luan told herself over and over in heart that she could not get angry, that she should be kind and calm.
But she should not apologize and admit her mistake, that's not something the original owner would do.
She was afraid of retribution for the severity of her OOC, so she pretended not to hear anything.
As this happened, her disinterest look made the old lady mistakenly thought that she was provoking her.
The more the old lady looked, the more angry she was. She got up from her chair and came to her. She almost pointed to her forehead. She said angrily, "You really don't pay attention to this grandmother. You dare not speak talk back."
"Concubines shouldn't be shown to the public"
(Since song luan was dressed beautifully–like a flower, like a concubine. The old lady was insulting Song Luan that a concubine shouldn't show herself...)
Song Luan held her breath, and the rage around her chest made her feel uneven. This old lady Zhao was unreasonable and too shrewd.
She continued to swallow her breath.
"Mute?!" The old lady Zhao's angry face was green, "The whole family is not allowed in public"
(Then the whole family of Song Luan shouldn't show themselves since she was dressed as a concubine..the Old lady insulted her and included her family in this all because Song Luan was not talking back to her lol it infuriated her)
Screw the buddhist teachings! Song Luan couldn't stand it any longer. She raised her head and opened her mouth. "Grandma, the family includes yourself."
(Song Luan retorted that the old lady was included in the family because Song Luan was already married to Zhao Nanyu, meaning old lady was her in-law hahaha)
The old lady's face changed from green to white.
The two million word count of the book "The Powerful Minister" does not require logic. Everyone is made built for the male lead. The old lady's malice against her grandson can raise his blackening value well.
Suddenly, Song Luan's wrist tightened. Zhao Nanyu grabbed her and pulled her behind him, then he lowered his eyes, as if he was letting the old lady scold him, 'Grandma, don't be angry. It's all grandson's fault."
When the old lady saw him being submissive, the look on her face slightly slowed down, "Forget it."
She was not in a good mood whenever she sees this grandson. He was gloomy whenever she saw him. It was not that he just looked gloomy, but that there was a sharp edge in his eyes, which made her uncomfortable whenever she saw him.
Like a wolf, his eyes were full of evil light. One of the reasons why the old lady didn't like him was that she always felt that the Zhao family would be played under his hands..
"Go back." Her face was normal, but her tone was little impatient. She didn't want these two people to upset her.
She's just gonna leave it as it is.
Old lady Zhao never left any snacks for Zhao Nanyu to eat in the main courtyard. She rarely urged him to take care during the holidays. She hardly cared about this grandson. Although he was beautiful, he looked too much like his prostitute mother. At that time, the Zhao family suffered a lot of ridicule because of his mother. She was scolded by the old man Zhao. It was because she didn't teach her son well that she provoked such humiliation.
The old lady had always hated Zhao Nanyu's mother, and now she passed all her grievances to him.
Zhao Nanyu lowered his eyes, stood near the door frame, his lean body seemed to be a little lonely in the sun. He opened his lips and whispered, "Grandson is leaving."
After bidding farewell, Song Luan went out with him. She felt from the bottom of her heart that Zhao Nanyu would be in a bad mood at the moment. She was sensible so she did not disturb him.
He was sure to be suspicious if she talked too much and would make too many mistakes.
The two people walked together in silence.
Zhao Nanyu glanced over her lightly, and saw the blank look on her face. The corners of his lips slightly raised, he smiled coldy. As expected, she didn't care about him at all. She even made trivial gestures.
It didn't take long for him to retract his glance. He walked forward, regardless of whether the person behind him could catch up.
Song Luan had to improve her speed and followed him closely like a small tail. Zhao Nanyu suddenly stopped, and inevitably hit his back. The man's back was as hard as stone, so her nose became a bit red.
She touched her nose. She unconsciously softly said, "It hurts.."
The voice of Song Luan fell on Zhao Nanyu's heart with a strange sweetness.
The girl's complaint had a natural coquettish tone.
Zhao Nanyu turned around and stared at her red nose with calm eyes. He held out his fingers, grabbed her chin and raised it up.
"Does it hurt?" It's just three words but it felt like he's collecting debts.
Song Luan avoided his eyes, "It's not the chin, it's the nose. It hurts. I'm not lying to you."
Her glistening, tearful eyes, made her look like she was bullied. She looked weak and fragile, it's as if he could break her with just one hand.
Surprisingly, Zhao Nanyu actually liked looking at her pitiful look full of grievances.
Zhao Nanyu unconsciously strengthened his hand.
Song Luan mentally took a breath of cool air and frowned. Her eyes were slightly red but she did not dare cry for pain. She was holding back from his provoking actions.
Damn it! It hurts!
Zhao Nanyu naturally saw her unwilling expression on her face. He suddenly felt that bullying her seemed very enjoyable.
=============== Chapter 6
When Song Luan looked in the mirror at night, she found that her chin still had red marks. It's no wonder she was about to cry out of pain. She was afraid that Zhao Nanyu used so much strength. Her body was like tender tofu, she could pinch out marks and it would be hard to get ride of them.
Before going to sleep, Song Luan called the servant girl who was at the door to come into the room, and asked, "Did master say when he'll come?"
Although the servant girl didn't face her in panic for the first time, she was still cautious and respectful for fear that she would be beaten if she said something wrong, "Master wouldn't come over without notice."
The servant didn't know what happened with Madam. Master almost never come at night. There were only two times in every month. And in these two times, the lady was always impatient and disgusted. Why did she suddenly ask tonight?
Song Luan didn't know that their husband and wife relationship was so cold. Unless she made trouble again or that she would beat Zhao Shi to educate him, would he come and set food in her yard.
She sighed, "I see. You can go out."
"Yes" After a pause, the servant girl buried her head and said in a low voice, "I will bring you the calming soup."
Song Luan really didn't want to drink the bitter medicine soup. She opened her mouth and refused. The servant girl seemed to be in panic, "But if you don't drink it, you can't sleep well at night."
She changed her mind and said, "Then you can bring it."
The bowl of medicine didn't fall into Song Luan's stomach. She did not forget the poisoning! Since it's not written in the book of "The Powerful Minister", she can only find it by herself.
After the servant girl went out, she poured the medicine soup into the bonsai plant beside the window. If it's really poisonous, the bonsai plant would surely die.
Zhao Nanyu didn't come at night. If he didn't come, it would be good. Song Luan would rather he didn't come. Her chin still hurt.
When she woke up the next, the sky was already bright. The jade hall was full of light fragrance.
After Song Luan combed and washed, someone brought in breakfast. It was the usual light porridge. She ate two small bowls of porridge with pickles. She was in a good mood after filling her stomach.
For several days, Song Luan lived such a peaceful life in Huai Shui. Zhao Nanyu didn't come or even sent someone to deliver the words. Naturally, she didn't take the initiative to approach him. The only pity was that her son was was also guarded tightly in the front yard, and she had no chance to meet to him.
A few days later, Song Luan found that the bonsai plant that she threw the medicine soup with was still alive and well. She was relieved for the most part. It seemed that the medicine soup was okay.
On the day of spring break, Zhao Nanyu finally appeared before her, holding the four-year old son. The lovely bun was held by him. The expression of the father and son were the same.
Song Luan wore a crimson skirt today, her collar was white. The waist was slender, and the eyes were bright and shining.
Shi Ge called out, "Mother"
She liked this cute and soft child very much from the bottom of her heart. She could not help and touched his head, but soon took back her hand.
She could even detect the cold eyes of Zhao Nanyu on her. She felt a bit chilly. Song Luan didn't dare look at him. She was afraid of the look in Zhao Nanyu's eyes. They were gentle on the surface, but in fact, they were cold and sharp.
During lunch, she could only hear the sound of moving chopsticks. Song Luan wanted to cry. She didn't dare stretch her chopsticks to him to get more vegetables. This meal time felt like being torture.
Zhao Nanyu halted moving his chopsticks first, and stared at her in a relaxed manner, "Does your chin still hurt?"
Now I'm asking what you've been doing all this time!!! At that time, it hurt! How many days have passed!!! Don't you think it's too late?!
She roared wildly in her heart, but she did not dare say it. Song Luan shook her head, "It doesn't hurt anymore."
He nodded, and then he said nothing.
Shi Ge suddenly said, "I'm finished eating."
Song Luan sighed once when saw this little bun. The child was so lovely. Maybe it was because of their blood relationship, the more she saw this son, the more she liked him. She wanted to rub his head and play with him.
"Can you go back to the front yard by yourself?" Zhao Nanyu asked. He was unwilling for Song Luan and his son to stay together.
Zhao Shi lowered his head and unexpectedly replied, "Father, I wanted to stay here a little longer."
Zhao Nanyu's smile dropped for a minute. He looked at Song Luan with calculated look.
She felt an ominous feeling from Zhao Nanyu's smile. Honestly, she didn't expect this son to like her quickly. Just once she treated him well, the child now wanted to stay with her.
(￣ ^ ￣) ゞ I can endure this!
"Okay."
Zhao Nanyu himself didn't stay much, and went to the study in the front yard.
Zhao Shi sat very upright, hands on his legs, his small back was straight. His white delicate cheeks were slightly bulging, and he had on a serious look. Song Luan wanted to go up to tease him.
She went over and sat beside him. His body seemed to be stiff for a moment, and his fingers tightened. He didn't know why he wanted to stay, but maybe because he hadn't seen his mother for half a month.
In fact, Zhao Shi knew that he missed the feeling of being held last time in his mother's arms. When he closed his eyes, he could still smell his mother's fragrance. She would care about him and ask him of his calligraphy, or if he was tired or not?
"Do you want to eat?" Song Luan wanted to beat herself after asking. He had just finished lunch. He must no be hungry.
Sure enough, the little bun shook his head. "Not hungry."
Song Luan seemed to be at a loss. It was also her first time to be a mother! Because she was in a hurry to think of topics, she blurted, "Can you play chess?"
After hesitating for a while, he nodded, "Yes."
She's ashamed to say that, as a modern person, she only knows the rules of chest, but can't play it. In short, she can understand it but can't play it. She smiles, "We won't play chess today. I'll teach you a new way to play it."
Shi Ge has never heard that there are other ways to play chess. The big bright grape-like eyes looked at her for a moment. They were obedient, "Okay."
Song Luan found a set of good chess piece from the cabinet. She sat cross-legged and her son was sitting on small cushion. There was only a low table between them. She explained the rules of to her son.
The child is also very smart. He can understand just by listening.
The light in the afternoon was more gentle in other days. The lazy golden light shines in the room through the window pane. It was warm and bright.
The mother and son were stitting quietly. Song Luan held the white piece in her hand, and the brother held the black piece.
Song Luan concentrated on playing chess and was not affected by the outside world at all. She held the white piece while supporting her chin with the other hand. She stared at the chess game for a long time before slowly placing it on the board. It was a very cautious move. After all, she didn't want to lose to a child.
In fact, the son had deliberately let his mother won several times. It seems that she didn't see that he always placed the piece in the wrong place so his mother would win.
Unconsciously, an hour has already passed.
Song Luan yawned and said, "Are you sleepy? Do you want to take a break?"
Shi Ge put down his chess piece wisely though he was reluctant to give up, "I'm a bit sleepy, so I'll go back first."
He returned to his stiff tone.
Song Luan reached out her hand and pinched the small face that she long-coveted. She smiled and said, "Sleep here. I also want to have a break anyways, so let's do it together."
He was stunned for a long time. The place she pinched was red and hot. The temperature on his face also rose. He thought his mother was impatient with him and wanted to drive him away.
His voice was small, it seemed like he was embarassed, "Okay."
Song Luan let his little hand into the room. The four-year-old child seemed to be able to do everything by himself. After taking off his shoes, he took off his outer garment, and put himself in a good position. He didn't dare move around. He was lying in the innermost place.
She got into the bed and covered the little bun, "Go to sleep."
After a while, Song Luan leaned on him and let him sleep in her arms.
The little bun in her arms didn't move. He didn't dare to sleep, so his eyes were open. He's afraid that once he wakes up, the bed will be empty.
After a while, the little bun didn't stay awake for too long, and fell asleep in her arms. The sky outside the window gradually darkened, and the light turned a little dark.
When the sun had set, the door creaked and was pushed open from outside. Zhao Nanyu stepped inside with his black boots. He was wearing dark clothes, and his whole body was filled with killing aura. The boots fell on the blanket quietly.
He walked into the inner room, stood in front of the bed and looked at the two people sleeping on the bed. Those eyes, which were usually gentle like water faded off its disguise, and in turn exposed deep anger and a terrible desire for control.
The woman in the bed, with her collar slightly open, exposed white and delicate collarbones in front of his eyes.
Zhao Nanyu lowered his eyes to cover the dark light in them.
=============== Chapter 7
Outside the window pane, the afterglow in the sky was deep that it radiated a faint golden light.
Song Luan woke up, but the little bun sleeping beside her was nowhere to be found. She put on her shoes and walked out. Zhao Nanyu sat by the window with a cup of tea in his hand. His back was facing her, and when he heard her footsteps, he said, "You're awake."
Song Luan's throat was dry, and she said in a hoarse voice, "Well."
Zhao Nanyu put down the teacup in his hand, turned around to look at her and explained, "The child is with his grandmother"
"Oh." She whispered back. Every time she was alone with him, she was uncomfortable. She was still afraid of him.
Zhao Nanyu stood up, walked over, and stood in front of her. His tall body covered the sun light. He was much taller than her. He lowered his eyes and looked at her carefully. He pursed his lips and said, "It's very cold, you should wear more clothes."
Since she just woke up, she was only wearing a set of thin bedclothes. Her face was plain and her face was muddleheaded. It seemed that she was not yet fully awake.
Song Luan was still in a trance. When she woke up, she felt sleepy and lost her ability to think. She went back to the inner room and put on some more clothes before she came out. Her black hair was still messy, so she just put on a hair pin and didn't care much about it.
She thought Zhao Nanyu wouldn't come here tonight. After all, he had never stepped into her house twice a day. So what attracted him to come here!? She can't figure it out!
Zhao Nanyu looked at her thoughtfully and smiled, "What are you thinking?"
"Nothing." Song Luan quickly returned to her senses and responded very quickly.
The edge in his eyes was dark, and he stroked the finger on his thumb unconsciously. He suddenly smiled and said, "By the way, I almost forgot to tell you that the kid likes you very much. I didn't bring him here for how many days and yet he kept thinking about you. He implicitly told me that he wanted to see you. Sure enough, there's a connection between mother and son."
Just giving her son a little sweetness, even when she used to be bad with him, the child still turned to like her.
Zhao Nanyu's words were mostly to test her, or maybe to trap her.
Song Luan clenched her hand, and her palms were already sweating. When he looked at her so attentively, she couldn't help but be nervous. Her scalp became numb and she raised her face and gave a cute and pleasant smile, "Before, I didn't find the kid as cute as now. It's unusual. I couldn't help but be very nice to him."
"Really?" Zhao Nanyu looked uncertain, and could not believe her words.
In fact, he was suspicious of her and didn't believe half of what she said. Of course, it would be good if that was the truth.
Song Luan's face was a little hot, hanging her head, and softly said, "Hmm". It sounded like a mosquito.
Zhao Nanyu didn't ask any further, as if he had just let her go. He said slowly, "Are you hungry?"
"A little bit."
In fact, Song Luan was reluctant to eat at the same table as him. Every meal time, she only dared to stare at the dish in front of her eyes, and did not eat more. She was stiff and could not move her back, for fear that he might find something wrong.
Zhao Nanyu nodded and then asked the servant girl to set up the meal.
Tonight's dishes are especially luxurious. There was a jar of sake on the table. The wine jar was fragnant. Song Luan looked at it several times and licked her lips. The gluttony in her heart is about to break out.
She liked fruit wine very much. The ancient wine smell more fragrant than the modern times. She was really greedy. But Song Luan's tolerance to liquior was not very good, so it's not good if she drank too much.
She sat on the edge of Zhao Nanyu, and did not touch the glass he was holding. She bowed her head and ate silently.
Zhao Nanyu, who was meticulous and perceptive, had a first-class ability of observing people. It was easy to see what she thinking just from her face. With a raised eyebrow, he asked, "Would you like to have a drink together?"
Song Luan did not resist the temptation. She nodded her head, but her heart was cautious. On the surface, she had to pretend to be strong and she spat the word coldly, "Well."
Zhao Nanyu poured half a glass of wine for her and gave it to her, "Drink it."
He looked at her with great interest and wanted to see some hints from her face. Zhao Nanyu was not unaware that when he went out for a trip, Song Luan changed a lot. He wanted to know whether she was pretending or not.
Song Luan felt relieved and boldly sipped the wine. It tasted sweet. It was much better than what she thought. She drank half of the wine unconsciously after taking a sip.
The candlelight was dim and shone on her delicate face. The white face that was originally fair and radiant slowly rose to a touch of red, adding to her beautiful appearance.
Zhao Nanyu silently filled her glass with wine. Song Luan didn't realize it as he poured another glass. After taking a sip, she whispered something that the fruit wine was delicious.
She didn't feel anything at first after a few glasses, but later, she found that her head became heavier and her face was hot. In front of her, Zhao Nanyu's figure seemed to double. She tried to widen her eyes and looked at it carefully.
Song Luan was also confused and realized that she might be drunk. She stood up and held her hands on the table but she could barely stand. Her upper body was shaking as if she would fall down at any time.
She hiccuped. She had too much of alcohol.
Song Luan did not move. She stared at him with wide eyes. Her eyes were slightly red and her brows were frowning. She was thinking.
Zhao Nanyu was stared at by her like this, but he didn't get angry. He chuckled, "Drunk?"
Song Luan shook her head unconsciously. She looked a little silly, "No."
Other than being dizzy, she didn't feel any discomfort, and her brain was clear.
She looked up at him with ripples in her eyes. Song Luan still remembered that he was the male lead and would become powerful in the future, so she praised him sincerely "You are so beautiful."
Zhao Nanyu was stunned. Suddenly, she threw herself at him and put her hands around his neck. Her delicate body was close to him. Her lips were slightly opened. She said again, "It's beautiful."
The faces of two people were close to each other. Zhao Nanyu lowered his eyes. Her face was puffed, her skin delicate and smooth. He stretched out his hand and rubbed his fingertips on her cheeks. It felt good.
Song Luan's courage grew when she was drunk. She was as soft as a bone. She was not afraid of him at all. She hugged and touched him. Her beautiful eyes were like the crescent moon.
Zhao Nanyu was dumbfounded for a moment, but he immediately recovered. The head sticking in his arms fell on him, as if she had fallen asleep.
He always felt that Song Luan had changed. After a moment of silence, Zhao Nanyu, for the first time, picked up the woman and carried into the inner room. She was very comfortable. She was laid on the bed and was covered with the quilt. She kicked away the quilt with both feet. She was discontent and muttered, as if she was losing her temper, "I am so hot that I don't want the quilt."
Zhao Nanyu was about to leave. After seeing this, he frowned and paused for a moment. He turned around and went back. Silently, he covered the quilt for her again.
Song Luan pushed off the quilt again. She felt that it was not enough so she tried to take off her clothes with her hands. However, the ancient clothes were too complicated. She could not solve it for a while and she hurriedly said, "I'm so hot, I'm so hot..It's annoying."
Zhao Nanyu stood quietly and looked at her for a long time. He sat beside the bed, untied her dress belt, took off her garments, and her skin was exposed. It became more white in the moonlight.
Zhao Nanyu did not squint, and there were no slightest waves in his dark eyes, as if he hadn't seen anything. His expression was cold, Song Luan seemed to be dreaming. She was sleeping soundly and her mouth moved as if she was talking in her dreams.
Her voice was too light. Zhao Nanyu didn't hear it clearly at first. He leaned down and listened carefully before he finally heard what she said in her dream.
"Don't kill me."
These four words fell in Zhao Nanyu's ear, and he was surprised for a moment. The woman in front of him was pitiful. She tightened the quilt with her small hand. The expression on her delicate face was pitiful. She looked so weak that he could cut her neck with his hand.
Zhao Nanyu gently put his palm on her neck and pinched it a little, forcing her to raise her head, Song Luan was hurt by this pinch that she was frightened in her dream. Her eyes gleamed with tears. A few drops of crystal clear tears slipped down. This scene fell in his eyes and only thought that it was extremely beautiful.
Zhao Nanyu smiled softly. Feeling as if he was in a good mood, his lips were slightly raised.
He suddenly lowered his head, and the cold lips and teeth slowly licked the tears on her face. In a rare moment, he didn't have that deep dislike for her. The corner of his lips gradually fell down. His eyes were red, and he took a fierce bite on the corners of her mouth. Only when he tasted the rustiness of blood did he stop. Song Luan in her sleep seemed to know that she was afraid and her fragile body trembled.
Zhao Nanyu gently stroke her back and slowly calmed down. He did not stay overnight. Before he stepped out of the Huai Shui, he cut off the wick.
Song Luan didn't sleep very well that night. She had a strange dream the whole time. In the middle of the night, she woke up thirsty. Her throat was dry and her mouth hurt.
She was still half awake when she left left the bed and went to the table. She felt it with both hand before she finally touched the tea cup. She raised her head and gulped down the tea.
She did not expect that those two cups of liquior were so powerful. She almost gone unconscious! She couldn't remember clearly what she did and what she said when she was drunk. She couldn't be unruly.
Otherwise, it's not good to sit here and drink tea.
It wasn't until Song Luan's mouth became more painful that she discovered the small wound on it. She touched it with her fingertips and she immediately retracted her finger when it stung.
Oh, it really hurt.
Who did it? Anway, Song Luan didn't think it was her own doing. She thought about it carefully and the hand holding the water cup was frozen in place. Couldn't it be that it was the man who bit it?
The more she pondered about it, the more she thought that Zhao Nanyu really was a little beast.
=============== Chapter 8
After the spring break, the weather gradually heat up. All kinds of flowers planted in the courtyard bloomed, and the fragrance filled the yard.
Zhao Nanyu has been transferred from the Imperial Academy to Dali temple for duty. He deosn't have much leisure but is also not very busy. The students who took part in the imperial examination together with him were now living in the court. It seems that only he hadn't been so popular in the past two years.
There were many snobbish eyes in the court. Seeing that he was neither favored nor liked by the emperor, they seldom talk to him. Some young noblemen in the family often treated him as a joke.
Zhao Nanyu often heard people ridicule him. It looked like he didn't care.
When Zhao Nanyu came home early morning, Shi Ge had just read two pages of the book. When he saw him, the child cried out, "Father."
Zhao Nanyu stepped forward and touched his head. "Do you understand?"
The child nodded, "I can understand. Uncle taught me."
"Did your uncle come?"
"Well, I'm waiting for you."
Zhao Nanyu's brother was the only one who had a good relationship with him. Zhao Chao was born by an aunt of Zhao Erye. He was also a commoner in the Zhao family, but Zhao Erye treated him well.
Zhao Nanyu saw him in the study, and Zhao Chao smiled at him, "Second Brother"
He said softly, "Well." After a paused, he asked, "What can I do for you?"
There were major events to be discussed. Today happens to be the first day. Every month on the first day of the month, Zhao family must hold a banquet. Everyone must go to the main yard to feast together. This rule was set by the head of the Zhao. No one dares to disobey it.
Of course, Zhao Nanyu, the son whom was hated by his father, was not paid much attention on this on occasion. He even heard several other cousins talking about him from time to time.
In the family, everyone except Zhao Chao, despised his birth and regarded him as a disgrace.
Zhao Chao said with a smile, "It's okay. I just happened to come here and teach Shi Ge the lessons. I thought I should wait for you so we can go to dinner together."
He didn'tt like family banquet either.
Zhao Nanyu was silent for a moment, his thin lips pressed in a straight line, and he said slowly, "I'm afraid I can't. I'll wait for your second sister-in-law to finish dressing before I go to the main courtyard. You don't have to worry about me. Go first."
Zhao Chao was shocked, and the smile on his face gradually subsided. He said, "Sister-in-law?"
Does that woman deserve to be called second sister-in-law? She was cruel to his second brother. He didn't know how much face his second brother lost. The most annoying was that she went to the bank to borrow money privately in the Zhao's bank account under the name of his second brother. This action was directly stabbing the head of the Zhao.
That time, old man Zhao disciplined Zhao Nanyu.
Zhao Nanyu understood what he was surprised about. He didn't explain, but said, "Go ahead."
Of course, Zhao Chao refused to leave. He had to know for himself since Shi Ge said that she had changed. At that time, he was not concerned about it. How could a woman's evil scorpion heart suddenly be better? He didn't believe it.
"Second brother, can't you see what kind of person she is? You musn't let her cheat you."
Zhao Nanyu gave a slight smile. His eyes looked like it was smiling but it was not sincere. His voice laced with sarcasm, "I know."
Zhao Chao calmed down. His second brother was much smarter than him, and his thinking was above him. He knew he wasn't blinded by that woman.
"Then I'll go first."
"Okay."
After Zhao Chao left, Zhao Nanyu stayed in the study quietly for a while, meditated under the fragrance of , and then went to Huai Shui residence.
If you guys can't google translate the page once you click the meaning of Ban Zhu, I'll just explain it here: this Ban Zhu is a chinese medicine that is used for clearing away heat and detoxifying; dampness and itching; swelling and pain relief. Main dysentery; sores; eczema; itchy skin; caterpillar puncture; bruises. 
Song Luan just learned that she was going to the main court to have dinner tonight. Many of the things about Zhao family in the book of 'The Powerful Minister' were just taken in one stroke without detailed writing. This kind of trivial things were not written.
She knew the fate of the Zhao family. Zhao relatives and servants who bad mouthed Zhao Nanyu fell into ruins, and Zhao Nanyu's father was deprived of his rights.
These people were not very close to her. They didn't collude with each other. What made her worried was Zhao Nanyu's brother, Zhao Wenyan, a 17-year-old, who had an affair with Song Luan!
In the book of 'The Powerful Minister', it was written that Zhao Wenyan fell in love with Song Luan after passing the imperial exam. For his lifetime, he stayed single. He rescued her several times she was in trouble. In the days when the original owner was dying of poison and laid in bed, he was the only one who sought medicine for her.
After she died, he was never able to recover, and soon lost his life.
Zhao Wenyan was a very good person. He was devoted to the original owner. But now, she was completely afraid to be involved with him.
Fortunately, Zhao Wenyan was still studying and would not take part in the imperial examination until next year. Song Loan didn't how Zhao Wenyan fell in love with the original owner. For tonight, she could only avoid him and not let him fall in love with her. This would be a good thing for him.
Zhao Nanyu entered the room after a while. He walked quietly and stood at the door. The golden afterglow sprinkled on his shoulder. He looked at her with quiet eyes.
Song Luan was contemplating and seemed to have no awareness of his arrival. She sat in front of the vanity mirror, holding her cheeks in both hands, and her pink mouth grunted unhappily. She seemed to be talking to herself as she pulled her hair. She knocked her head on the vanity table right after. Zhao Nanyu looked at her and realized she was a little cute.
Zhao Nanyu finally came out and asked, "Ready? It's time to go."
Song Luan was startled by the sudden voice. Almost immediately, she sobered up and raised her head, her round eyes looked dumbfounded. She didn't even know when he came.
The man stood under the window kilt. He was dressed in green shirt, and he looked gentle and elegant. Half of his body bathed in the sun, shining with holiness. He was sacred and could pass as a high-ranking official.
Song Luan replied, "Okay."
Zhao Nanyu nodded to her. "Now that we are ready, let's go together."
In the past, they never went to the main courtyard together. The original owner was extremely disgusted with him and only wanted to come after him.
Song Luan was dressed very beautiful tonight. She had on bright clothes, lotus-colored tulle skirts, red embroidered shoes, and wore exquisite makeup. It magnified her facial features even more. Her eyes were bright and her smile was sincere.
They walked side by side. Song Luan did not dare to lean too close to him, for fear that he would be annoyed. They had nothing to say along the way.
They first went to pick up their son. Zhao Nanyu didn't ask her to lead the child, but it was the child who walked beside her. The awkward family of three went to the main courtyard together.
They arrived on time, but most of the relatives were already there.
The old lady Zhao told him to bring their son into her room first. It seemed that she hadn't seen this great grandson for a long time. She wanted to see and talk to him.
Zhao Nanyu didn't stop him, just told him to listen.
After hearing this, Song Luan glanced at him and found that he was the most obedient child she had ever seen.
The decoration of the main courtyard is better than that of the small courtyard where they live. There was a small pond in the middle of the courtyard with liod heads inlaid on the stone pillars.
They younger generation of the Zhao family stood by the pond. Their cousins were all about the same age, all of them were gorgeous. They talked and laughed together.
No one knew who saw Zhao Nanyu first. He raised the fan in his hand and the words he uttered were not respectful. He called out, "Second brother, how did you come?"
Song Luan looked over where the voice was. The face was just barely handsome. His laugh was a little vicious.
It was Zhao Bao, the youngest son of uncle Zhao, whose qualifications were quite ordinary. He failed in the imperial examination the year before. Since he was a child, he didn't like this talented and bright second brother. He was the eldest son of the extended family. He had a noble status. He doesn't think Zhao Nanyu, whose mother was a prositutre, was not worthy of being his second brother. For this reason, he didn't talk about his wrong doings in private. In front of him, he was always sarcastic of Zhao Nanyu.
"Not yet."
The implication was that he was not too late.
Zhao Bao's mouth drooped down, as if he was not very happy. "That's the same. It's impossible for you to meet grandmother."
The whole family knew that Old lady Zhao didn't like Zhao Nanyu. Meeting once in a year, of course, there were no good words between them.
Song Luan stood beside him like a wooden man, pretending that she could not hear anything that had nothing to do with her. She lowered her eyes and stared at the tip of her shoes.
Her mind had drifted away.
She's so hungry. She's really hungry. She's starving to death.
Zhao Nanyu's thin lips slightly pursed, without a squeak.
Zhao Bao didn't reap the benefits of his insults. He snorted, glanced at him with so much contempt, and turned to enter the room.
Song Luan didn't know that there was someone at their back. The lean figure was standing five steps away from her. He frowned and looked at her. He was disgusted from the bottom of his eyes. Then he raised his eyes to Zhao Nanyu. His tone was impatient, "Second brother, why are you coming with her?"
Almost at the same time, Song Luan noticed that Zhao Nanyu's mood on her side suddenly fell to a freezing point, a sign before a storm.
Her wrist was held tightly and she was pulled behind him. Zhao Nanyu bit his words and asked in a cold voice, "What about father?"
Song Luan's heart was startled. She raised her eyes in surprise and stared at the young man in front of her. This was Zhao Wenyan who was going to die for the original owner??? Why was he so disrespectful??
She cried in a low voice. The man who held her wrist used his strength. It hurt.
Song Luan's eyes turned to Zhao Nanyu and asked him to stop holding her hand with so much strength. She didn't know what she had done to make him angry. She was really wronged.
The man was fierce. Suddenly, he became even fiercer.
She's a little scared.
=============== Chapter 9
GLOSSARY:
· Zhao Sanye – Zhao Nanyu's father
· Zhao Wenyan – Zhao Nanyu's younger brother. His mother is Zhao Sanye's official and current wife.
✯¸.•'*¨'*•✿ ✿•*'¨*'•.¸✯
Translated by: Tinker
Even though Zhao Wenyan was still only 16 years old, he already had a bad temper. His face was still tender, eyes were bright and his expression was impatient. Although he and Zhao Nanyu were not were not born of the same mother, they had similarities in appearance. Standing together, anyone can see that they were brothers.
He looked at Song Luan with disdain, as if he was looking at something dirty. He was afraid of getting too close to a disgusting thing, "Father will come later."
Zhao Nanyu nodded. "I see."
Zhao Wenyan was more and more angry. He didn't like his second brother very much, but he didn't want to see him being gossiped around in the family. After the second sister-in-law who didn't know how to behave entered their family, the gossiping became even more intense!
Song Luan was a beautiful woman, but her mind was too poisonous. She had a lot of mistakes and made second brother lose his face.
"It's almost time. Come in."
A large number of people came except for the eldest son of uncle Zhao, who was sent to Beijing and still hadn't returned. Everyone sat on the chair in their order.
Old man Zhao sat in the middle. He was over sixty-years-old, and still in good spirits. He stroked his white beard, glanced at all the people on the table, and said, "Eat."
Although it's a family dinner, Song Luan still felt that the atmosphere was very stiff. She held her chopsticks and didn't dare to move around. She was very smart and sensible. She would like it if no one noticed her, but she still felt that there were several pairs of eyes watching her move, as if she was the main character of this family dinner.
Her eyes were only glued on the food while chewing the meal that taste like wax. It was almost an hour and most of the people had already put down their chopsticks one by one.
Old man Zhao valued every grandson very much. Those who didn't have reputation would ask lessons one by one. Those who had reputation would ask about things in the court. In short, they were very attentive.
After the meal, Old man Zhao took a step away from the grandsons, and told them they were not allowed to follow him. Old man Zhao looked at Zhao Nanyu deeply, and said, "Yu Er, stay with me for a game of chess and then you can go."
Zhao Nanyu said, "Yes."
The Old man took out his best white jade chessboard. When the two people played chess, the others stood by and watched.
Zhao Nanyu's chess skill was not inferior than his grandfather's, and he didn't plan to let Old man Zhao win the chess. Every step was critical. After a long time of playing, the old man gradually fell behind.
This made other relatives look both jealous and funny. They were jealous because he had the ability to compete with his grandfather in chess. The funny thing was that he would not let his grandfather rile him in chess.
"Yu Er's chess skill is quite advanced."
"Grandfather's praise is too much."
The Old man pud down his chess pieces. He didn't seem to be angry about losing, but he was very happy. This was the reason why he only let Zhao Nanyu play chess with him every time. He won't let him win just so he can play happily.
After playing chess, the old man let them go with a wave of his hand.
Just after leaving the main court, Zhao Sanye said to Zhao Nanyu behind him with a cold face, "Come with me. I have something to say to you."
Zhao Nanyu lowered his head, so no one could see the expression on his face.
Song Luan was standing not far from them with her sleeping son. Zhao Sanye's face was dark and ugly. His face was full of unhappiness.
Zhao Sanye was in a bad mood at the moment. He had a lot of complains about his son, even some disgust. He was even more disgusted with his mother who was born in a lower class family. He didn't make any achievements in the court, so he couldn't be pleased by the old man. However, the son he didn't look forward to was more popular with the old man than him, which made him feel uneasy.
"Your mother's relative is also on duty in Dali temple, right?" Asked Zhao Sanye.
The 'mother' in his mouth was not Zhao Nanyu's biological mother, but Zhao Sanye's current wife.
"Yes."
There was a flash of fierceness in Zhao Sanye's eyes, pointing to him with angry voice, saying, "Your mother told you to take care of her relatives more. Why did you turn a deaf ear? Not only did you not take care of him, you also did not help him when he's in trouble."
Zhao Nanyu smiled. Not only did he not help, but even the man was dismissed.
"My father looks up to me too much." The light sarcasm in his tone was like a slap to Zhao Sanye's face.
Zhao Sanye was beaten back by him. He couldn't exhale in one breath. He was chocked in his chest. He pointed to him and opened his mouth. "How could an evil son come from me?"
Zhao Sanye's face was red with anger. He was too angry.
It was not the first time that Zhao Nanyu has been scolded by him. When he listens to a word like 'evil son', his heart would still be calm.
He bowed his hand and there was no fault in his respect, "If father had nothing else to say, I will go back first."
In the quiet night, Zhao Sanye's angry voice raised several toes. Song Luan was not far form them. It was difficult for her not to hear anything.
To be reasonable, Song Luan was very reluctant to see Zhao Nanyu being scolded by his father. Zhao Nanyu must not want her to see such a shameful scene.
In other words, she actually felt that Zhao Nanyu was a little pitiful. Now he had no power. He was looked down upon by other and despised by her own father. But thinking of her death in the future, she felt more pitiful than him.
She was sighing when Zhao Nanyu had come to her. The moonlight lengthened his figure, and a pair of black eyes looked at her coldly. "Let's go."
After holding her son for a period of time, Song Luan's hands were aching. Her son was a little heavy. She blinked and summoned up her courage to sell her cuteness towards the man, "My hands are sour."
Her son hugged her neck without any care, buried his face in her neck, and was sleeping quietly.
Zhao Nanyu silently took the little bun from her arms, and went straight to the backyard.
Song Luan followed him, and when he was about to enter the room, she carefully opened her mouth and asked, "Where are you sleeping tonight?"
Zhao Nanyu seldom sleeps on her side in the past few days. He only slept twice and never touched her. Song Luan thought that he really hated her.
So she naively thought that Zhao Nanyu was just visiting the house and then would leave after.
Zhao Nanyu lifted his eyelids and asked, "What do you think?"
"......"
Zhao Nanyu saw enough of the wonderful colors on her face, and he mercifully gave his reply, "I'll sleep here."
Song Luan hung her head, "Oh."
She hasn't forgotten the last time she was drunk and was bitten by Zhao Nanyu in the corner of her mouth. And everytime she was alone with him, Song Luan was naturally afraid. His eyes were deep as if he wanted to eat people.
Zhao Nanyu laid his son on the bed of the side room, covered the quilt and walked out. The servants just prepared the hot water. Song Luan sat at the table in a hurry. When she saw him, she tood up. "Go to the bath first. I'll first take off the makeup on my face."
He nodded and began to undress in front of her. After leaving a covering, he walked to the screen. Song Luan's face was not hot, but the sound of the water made the temperature on her rise.
After a while, the sound of the water stopped.
Zhao Nanyu's voice came to her through a screen. "Bring clean clothes for me."
Song Luan had only two sets of his clothes in this room. She soon found them from the closet. Her hands began to sweat. She closed her eyes tightly and did not dare take a look at him.
Zhao Nanyu was lying in the tub with his upper body naked. His delicate face was hidden in the misty water. He suddenly pulled her close to him into the water.
Song Luan called out in a low voice. She was terrified. She fell into the water, her thin clothes were almost imeddiately wet by the warm water.
Zhao Nanyu's burning eyes fell on her slightly wet neckline. He stood up, wiped the water off his body and put on his clothes. Then he looked at her still lying in the bucket, with a smile on his eyes, "You should wash too."
He found that every time he saw Song Luan's sad and weak appearance, his heart seemed to be more joyful.
Song Luan reluctantly washed herself with the water he used, and then climbed to bed in a strict manner. She slept inside the quilt, her limbs were tight, and she didn't dare to occupy more space and even breathe heavily.
Zhao Nanyu, as usual, put out the light and covered himself with the quilt without doing anything. Even his hands did not touch her, so Song Luan's sitff body gradually relaxed.
In the dark, Zhao Nanyu moved for a moment, and his palm suddenly fell on her waist, pinching the flesh on her skin intentionally. Song Luan closed her eyes and pretended to sleep, tolerating his actions.
Zhao Nanyu was a scholar, but his strength was strong, so everytime he pinches her, it hurts to death.
His lips gradually came close to her neck. When he was about to bite them, Song Luan could not longer hold herself, and opened her eyes.
Zhao was not surprised at all. His lips hooked, and his smile was as fresh and beautiful as the green mountain after the rain. He said, "Awake?"
Seeing that Song Luan's eyes were moist, his lips began to smile, but his eyes were still cold. "It's my fault that you woke up."
When Zhao Nanyu used to look at her before, he would only feel sick, let alone touch her. But recently, he not only didn't resent her, but also bit her. He could also laugh when he's with her. Seeing her tearful eyes that were pleading for him like she was wronged, he felt that she was very charming.
Although he said that, Song Luan didn't see any guilt in his eyes.
The hyprocrisy!
=============== Chapter 10
Glossary:
· Zhao Bo – Maybe he is the brother of Zhao Bao–cousin of Zhao Nanyu who finds pleasure in mocking him. (See Ch. 8 part 2). Nevertheless, just think of them as Zhao Nanyu's cousins whichever name it was haha.
✯¸.•'*¨'*•✿ ✿•*'¨*'•.¸✯
Translated by: Tinker
Song Luan stood still and didn't go any further. She straightened her back and nodded as if she had courage, "Ah."
Zhao Nanyu narrowed his eyes and smiled deeper. "Where have you been?"
This question was obviously unneeded. This yard was full of his people. She can't hide what she had done or said from him.
It's just that Song Luan hadn't realized it.
Song Luan said to him, "I walked around the house."
Zhao Nanyu seemed to believe her words and didn't go on asking. When he came back from the court just now, he heard that the servant girl said that she had turned to the east courtyard. At that moment, the violence in his heart suddenly rose.
Before, she didn't turn around blindly in the house, but every time she carried a plan, she turned towards his eldest brother.
His eldest brother was the eldest uncle's son. He was doted on since he was a child. In the past two years, he had been working in the court. With his good looks, it was no surprise that Song Luan would pick him, like .
(Metaphorically, it means to get a person who fits in well with you, or a suitable environment as yours.) Zhao Nanyu is hinting that since his eldest brother had good looks and was doted on, Song Luan wouldn't hesitate to pick him since she fits in well with a person like his eldest brother.
Now that the eldest brother was not in the house, she still went there. He guessed that she was there for someone else.
Thinking of this, Zhao Nanyu's eyes gradually became cold.
Song Luan suddenly felt that atmosphere became cold. She looked up at him and swallowed. She didn't understand how the man became so sullen?
She coughed twice, "I didn't run around. I just wanted to see if the flowers in the back garden were blooming."
Zhao Nanyu followed her words and asked, "Are they blooming?"
She nodded honestly, "They're blooming"
Peony flowers in April were the best.
"Our son was called by the Old lady this morning. Let's go and pick up the child in the main court."
Song Luan naturally followed him, "Oh."
The Old lady was very strange. She had a bad temper, but she was good to the younger generation. She was only critical towards Zhao Nanyu. If they didn't get the child back by themselves today, the Old lady might not return the child back.
The husband and wife walked together one by one, the tall man and the petite woman, their backs looked like a matching pair. Walking along the corridors and then at the back of the garden, they arrived at the main courtyard.
At a distance, Song Luan heard several familiar voices, which sounded like a mocking laughter.
"Really? My third uncle really scolded my second brother?" Zhao Bo asked.
"Why will I lie to you? Don't mind which occasion he was scolded or the look on Zhao Nanyu's face. This time, second brother didn't know what made third uncle unhappy. Third uncle even pointed at his nose."
Zhao Bo was very interested in listening to this, "What made third uncle so angry?"
" 'Evil Son! You don't listen to your father's words. Like your mother, you're espcially deaf.' " The man repeated in the tone of Zhao Sanye. There were even more unpleasant words he didn't say.
Zhao Bo laughed even louder. He even fell into the rock, "To tell you the truth, his mother couldn't get on the stage. I heard that she wanted to enter the door." At this point, he sneered, "She didn't think of her identiy and still want to enter the door of Zhao family. She thought that giving birth to a son will solve it. It's a joke."
"Not really."
The two people talked more and more. Their topic were almost endless.
Song Luan was frightened and looked up at the man beside her. She found that his face was neutral, as if he hadn't heard them. He was calm.
A voice not far away was heard again. It was bitter and harsh.
"My second brother is like a joke. His wife was not a fuel efficient lamp. She was restless to death. She already had a baby and still loves to come to my eldest brother's side. Really, we can see where her heart is." Zhao Bo said.
Song Luan: What's this situation? She doesn't remember!
When she stomped her feet and was about to explain to Zhao Nanyu, the voice continued to talk, "Just now I head that she came to the east courtyard for a walk. She must have come to hook up with someone else again! My second brother's life is really sad."
Song Luan was anxious after listening to it, hurriedly pulling Zhao Nanyu's sleeves, and angrily said, "He's talking nonsense!"
As soon as the words came out, Zhao Nanyu was dumbfounded and Song Luan herself turned red. Her words were really not elegant.
She yelled three times, "I didn't mean to."
Zhao Nanyu's dark eyes turned towards her. He fixated his gaze on her. Her scalp was numbed and she said subconsciously, "I don't know! I don't know! I don't know!"
Zhao Nanyu's eyes were still cold.
As soon as Song Luan clenched her teeth, she burst out, threw herself into his arms, embracing him, and sobbed, "I really don't have any! He lied! He wants to hurt me! Husband, you must believe me! Wuwuwuwuwuwuwuwu I'm so pitiful wuwu"
Song Luan was afraid that he would not believe it. She continued, "Husband, my feelings for you are very sincere."
Zhao Nanyu's stiff hands slowly fell on her back, stroked her gently, and when he heard the words, he gave no face and smiled softly.
Song Luan is so cute.
So cute that he held her and wanted to hide her.
Would it still be possible not to wake up after being pinched so hard by him? She thought but didn't dare voiced it out in front of Zhao Nanyu.
She swallowed her saliva, shrank inside the quilt, and smiled, "I'm a light sleeper. It was not your fault."
She couldn't blame him.
Zhao Nanyu was startled and murmured lowly. Song Luan's face was burned by his deep eyes. After a while, his eyes flickered away from her.
The mooonlight was bright and the atmosphere was ambiguous.
Zhao Nanyu suddenly leaned over and snuggled her, leaning on her ears with one hand, and looked down at her deeply for a while. He lowered his face slowly, and his lips almost touching her cheeks.
Song Luan's pale fingers clenched the bed sheet and her whole body softened by his burning eyes. Her face and ears became redder as time goes by.
The change on her expression naturally didn't escape Zhao Nanyu.
He thought it was quite interesting. Song Luan, a woman who had never blushed in front of him before–let alone was shy, was acting the opposite.
The bright moonlight shone on her delicate face. Her skin was as smooth and delicate as a flower. This aroused Zhao Nanyu's inner thirst. There was a little desire to torture her.
Song Luan panicked and pulled the quilt up, "I'm going to sleep."
Zhao Nanyu suddenly reached out and clasped her back neck. His reddish eyes flashed like a wolf, and his thin lips moved slowly over her chin. When Song Luan thought he was going to do something to her, Zhao Nanyu retracted and let go of his hands.
"Okay, sleep." He said in a light voice.
Song Luan laid beside him. Her brain was about to explode. Zhao Nanyu seemed to be very close to her, in fact, she could see that he didn't have those usual cold eyes. She didn't know what she did tonight for him to look at her like that.
But this was still a good thing. Song Luan felt that his eyes tonight was much better than the first time she saw him.
It's just that he pinched her back neck.
It still hurts. Her mouth hurts and her back neck now hurts too.
Zhao Nanyu's work and rest were extremely balanced. No matter how late he rested the night before, he would wake up on time the next day.
When he opened his eyes, it was no surprise that Song Luan's legs were all over him. Her delicate wrist were tightly lock around his waist, and she was cuddled in his arms, like a newborn cat without protection.
Zhao Nanyu looked at her and sighed. He didn't know whether he was sighing because of her kindness or her ignorance. In fact, he didn't dislike her very much compared to before. Song Luan had a sweet frarance on her body, and it was very soft to hold her in his arms. It was very comfortable.
After he got up, he washed and changed clothes. After eating breakfast, the woman on the bed was still sleeping very well. He didn't want to wake her up, so he went to court.
Song Luan slept so steadily that she woke up at noon. When she opened her eyes, she didn't see Zhao Nanyu. She was in a better mood. She got up from the bed humming and began to wear clothes slowly.
She felt that Zhao Nanyu didn't look as cruel as he was written. He looked beautiful and delicate. Although his heart was a little bit evil, as long as you didn't offend him, he wouldn't treat you bad in his heart.
Song Luan had calculated the time line. She hadn't put on a green hat for him. Although the original owner had touched Zhao Nanyu's anger, as long as she takes the time to remedy it, although she couldn't say that she would became a rich and powerful lady in the future, but her life would surely be saved. Even if her faith was death, she wouldn't die.
Thinking this way, the fog hovering Song Luan's head swept away. The world was bright and the spring was beautiful.
The weather today was also very good. It was cloudless and sunny.
The warmth of early spring shone onto people's hearts. The branches outside the window swung with the wind, the small buds bloomed one after another, and the whole yard was full of the fragrance of Magnolia.
The smell of Magnolia made people happy.
Song Luan stayed in the yard for most of the time. She didn't go out much. Taking advantage of the weather, she planned to walk around the house.
No one dared to stop her when she turned around to leave Huai Shui residence. The people who saw her could only hide one by one. They lowered their heads and pretended they didn't see her.
Song Luan was angry. It must be that that original owner was too fierce with people in this household. She was famous for being unreasonable and vicious. People were afraid that she was still the same vicious woman so she couldn't blame them.
Zhao family's reputation went over and beyond as this family was passed down from generation to generation. A powerful family with a good background naturally had a huge mansion.
The hudge mansion consists of both East and the West. The East had five rooms. Among the younger generation, only Zhao Nanyu lived in the West. The only advantage was the quietness.
After half a turn, Song Luan felt a little tired. The original owner was person with poor physique. She sat in the pavilion to enjoy the coolness. After she had enough rest, she felt that there wasn't anything to look at anymore, so she went back to Huai Shui residence.
When she went back, Zhao Nanyu had just finished the affairs of Dali temple and went straight to the yard. Song Luan was shocked when she saw him. Zhao Nanyu would only visit when he had something to do, and in the recent days, he already appeared many times in front of her which was strange.
Zhao Nanyu stood in the sun, with his elegant eyebrows and smooth eyes. His light pupil seemed to be soft under the sun.
His eyes were slightly curved and his smile was shallow, "I'm back."
It was clearly three simple words, but Song Luan felt unusual deep inside.
=============== Chapter 11
Song Luan also knew that her performance was not on par with the original owner, but what could she do?! Knowing the ending, should she just continue to wait until the male lead kills her? Was she desperate?
She can be domineering, but in front of Zhao Nanyu, she was absolutely afraid.
Her husband's voice was very natural, and his movements were as smooth as clouds and flowing water, no flaws were seen. Zhao Nanyu knew but had not exposed her in her little performance. He casually grasped her wrist, pulled her to his side, and asked with interest, "?"
Mostly used to prove the solemnity of an oath.
Song Luan knew just how false her promised was, and how guilty she was! She hugged him and refused to let go. She clenched her teeth and pretended not to hear him.
Seeing that she didn't answer for a long time, Zhao Nanyu's tone was not as calm as it was in the beginning. He sneered, "Speak."
Song Luan had a bitter face and flashed all kinds of emotions in her eyes. She sniffed and stuttered, "People change... I have only recently realized these thoughts. I... I.. I didn't lie to you anyway."
Zhao Nanyu said to her, "What do you think of me?"
She said with a smile, "I admire you."
It's not a lie. She really admired Zhao Nanyu because although he was ruthless, he still shows affections towards his child.
Song Luan tugged the corner of his clothes and looked up at him. "Let's go. We need to wait for our son."
She was anxious to leave this place. Who knows what more will Zhao Bo say to slander her?
Zhao Nanyu stroked her back with his fingers. He looked at Zhao Bo indifferently and smiled, "Don't worry. Let's listen to it again."
Oh! Song Luan gave him a thumbs on her heart. His tolerance capacity was really strong.
Zhao Bo chattered over and over about Zhao Nanyu's mother, and mocked his origin.
Song Luan discovered a terrible thing. Even when he was humiliated by his relatives behind his back, he still had a shallow smile on his face. She could not see what he was thinking.
After listening enough, Zhao Nanyu lead Song Luan's hand out of the back garden. When they got to the main courtyard, he released her hand.
Song Luan looked at his back and frowned, unable to restrain her curiosity. She boldly called him, "Zhao Nanyu"
The man was standing in the sun, looking fare and transparent. When he turned around, his dark eyes were fixed on her, waiting for her next words.
Song Luan asked, "Are you not angry?"
He must have known that Zhao Bo had said a lot of bad things about him before. Today, he ran into Zhao Bo and didn't tear him. He was exposed yet he was indifferent. It's a pity to think about it.
Zhao Nanyu's pupils seemed to ripple with layers of water that could not be seen through. She felt flustered when she saw them, and he smiled back, "Not angry."
Song Luan shuddered inexplicably. His aura was so cold. She really admired his ability to tell lies without his eyes wavering. Who believes? She doesn't believe him anyway.
At the moment, she felt that the smile on the corner of his mouth was really piercing.
In the evening of that day, Song Luan heard the news that, Zhao Bo, who mocked Zhao Nanyu this afternoon, was beaten by the Old man with a crutch. Now, he was still kneeling in the ancestral hall and still didn't come out.
She thought to herself that most of this was done by Zhao Nanyu. This man's mouth was full of tricks, and he was not willing to be the one losing.
Obviously, she didn't have the capablities to set up Zhao Bo to be punished.
However, from what she heard, Zhao Nanyu didn't get any benefits out of it. She didn't know what he had done. Zhao Nanyu was punished by the Old man to copy the family law ten times. Song Luan had the honor to see the law of Zhao family once. It was a long volume which was enough to be copied once. If he copied it ten times, she felt distressed for Zhao Nanyu's hand.
Song Luan had no opinion towards Zhao Nanyu. His means were not too bright and showy. Afterall, he couldn't help himself, his father and his stepmother didn't love him. He could only use dirty tricks since he didn't have any power.
She was more worried about her own situation. Although Zhao Nanyu was friendly to her and sleeps beside her, most of those times were not sincere. They were all pretend. It was no use sitting and waiting for her to die like before. She still had to take the initiative and win back Zhao Nanyu's affection.
Song Luan still remembered that in the later period of the book 'The Powerful Minister', the author described Zhao Zhi's value for Zhao Nanyu with great detail.
It was only in his first years of power that he began to show his ruthless side. He was only three points gentle in front of his own son. He hated the original owner, yet very good towards his son.
Three points gentle means he's very gentle!
He loved his son so much that even in the end of the book, he did not have any other children.
So, Song Luan decided to do a good job in her relationship with her son, Zhao Zhi. Even without her motive, she sincerely wanted to know her son better. The blood relationship was so magical. It's as if she really experienced the period of carrying Zhao Zhi in her stomach before.
It was getting late. The sunset glow in the distant sky was visibly bright red.
Song Luan stretched out her waist, stood under the corrider, and casually asked the servant girl beside her, "Where is the kitchen?"
The servant girl was stunned. She didn't understand what the Madam wanted to do. After a few seconds, she came back and said, "It's on the west side of the house."
Song Luan nodded, "Take me there."
As a young woman who lived for a long time, the only think she can do was cooking. It especially ranged from sweet to spicy flavors. She was self-taught.
The servant girl timidly led her to the kitchen door, and Song Luan went inside by herself. The people in the kitchen were shocked when they saw her. The cook didn't like very much. In the past, the original owner was picky to the point that he had to toss away people just so he could satisfy her tastes.
Song Luan coughed twice, trying to keep calm, and said slowly, "Is there a vacant stove? I want to use it."
The cook laughed with a snort. Does she know how to cook? Was she not afraid that she'll be laughed at?
Song Luan was not upset. Instead, she patiently waited for a reply.
"Young madam, of course there's a stove."
Cook Fu pointed to the one beside him, his face expresionless, "You can use it."
The people in the kitchen were glad that they had just cooked their dinner. Otherwise, the unreasonable second young lady would bring trouble for them.
Song Luan rolled up her sleeves, told people to prepare the ingredients and stood in front of the stove to start working.. She feels that her little bun likes to eat sweet and delicious pastries. This time, she planned to make some for him.
Osmanthus, sugar, and flour were in front of her.
Song Luan skillfully mixed the flour and cut it into small pieces of dough. Then, she kneaded it into the shape of a small flower and animal with her hands. It looked very lovely.
The smooth movement was noticeable. Even the cook stopped his work and watched her. His eyes were shocked. He can't believe that she can really make it well. The way of kneading the shapes didn't seem to be to new to her.
Some groups of people were thinking that they have seen a ghost.
After steaming the sweet osmanthus cake, Song Luan did not bring trouble to the kitchen. She said politely, "You are all busy. I will go first."
She went straight to the front yard with her food box in her hand, while humming a small tune.
In fact, it was very pitiful that her son could only sit in Zhao Nanyu's study and play with dull toys without any company. Fortunately, he was sensible enough to not feel bored even if he only plays with those things. He was patient, just like his father.
The window pane in the study was facing the desk. Zhao Nanyu was standing at the desk with a brush in his hand. He was copying ever word. After copying the whole afternoon, he didn't feel pain in his hand, or even thought of stopping.
[Knock Knock Knock] Song Luan knocked politely before entering.
"Who?" The word was so cold that it hit her head on like a stone wrapped in ice.
Song Luan was stunned. She felt strange. Is Zhao Nanyu here? She thought only her son was practicing his own handwriting. If she knew he was here, she wouldn't have come.
"It's me."
"Come in." The tone of these words were not gentle.
She opened the door and smelt a sharp fragrance, which appearead to be coming from the small incense burner on the table.
Her son was sitting on the soft couch, holding a small wooden toy in his hand. His expression was simple with his delicate face full of innocence. The big black eyes looked straight at her.
Song Luan's heart would always sprout every time she saw her little bun.
"Why are you here?" Zhao Nanyu put down his brush and walked straight to her.
Song Luan raised the food box in her hand. "I made cakes for little Zhao and brought them for him to eat."
She looked like a fox who came to ask for credit. She was a little silly in her playfulness.
Zhao Nanyu's eyes were dark, with a deep smile on the corner of his eyes. He asked slowly, "Did you do it yourself?"
"Why don't I remember that you can cook?"
"When did you learn how to cook?"
In fact, Zhao Nanyu didn't doubt anything. He only guessed that Song Luan took the cakes made by others, and did these to please him.
The series of questions smashed Song Luan. In the face of Zhao Nanyu's deep eyes, her knee suddenly felt a little soft.
She wanted to run.
=============== Chapter 12
            Although Song Luan was only an ordinary woman at home, her life was still refined, and so she was no different from those charming young ladies.
Song Luan shuddered all over. No one could keep calm in the calculating eyes of Zhao Nanyu. For a moment, she thought Zhao Nanyu saw through her. Her fingers that hid in her sleeves could not control the shudder. Her scalp was numb under his dark eyes.
Zhao Nanyu saw that her face was pale and her limbs were trembling. He restrained his cold aura and became intrigued by her action. After observing her these days, Song Luan seemed to show fear towards him. She was not pretending to be afraid. She was really afraid.
He couldn't help thinking, what did she find out?
Obviously she had always been domineering.
This is really interesting.
Song Luan felt that she was going to faint, and her chest was stuffy, and was short of breath. She couldn't breathe. She must have been frightened by Zhao Nanyu. She managed to keep her mind steady. She squeezed the food box handle with her hands and felt cold from the bottom of her feet.
Song Luan swallowed her throat, forced herself to look at him, and raised her chin slightly. She moved her lips and her attitude was neutral. She tried to speak in a foolish tone, "It was for the child to eat, you ask so much."
Zhao Nanyu was stunned for a moment. His eyes were deep, but he didn't feel disgusted with her change of attitude. She was like a paper tiger. He can poke her with a finger, and yet this little paper tiger thinks she's powerful. So cute.
"Ok."
Seeing that he didn't continue to ask, Song Luan was relieved. Her chest was not that stuffy anymore. She went to her son, placed the food box on the low table and brought out the sweet osmanthus cake.
The crystal sweet osmanthus cake smells sweet and appetizing. Her son never seen this kind of cake before. The child was attracted by the sweet osmanthus cake. The two black eyes looked at the plate seriously.
Song Luan smiled, pushed the cake, "Try some."
He had a small toy in his hand, and his pair of big eyes looked at her foolishly. Song Luan simply picked one for him by hand, fed it to him, and whispered, "Open wide."
The child obediently opened his mouth, bit twice, and then swallowed. His voice was like milk, "Sweet."
He liked the sweet taste. It also wasn't greasy.
Song Luan's heart was greatly satisfied. He reached out his hand and pinched his cheek, and asked, "Do you like it?"
He was reluctant to move his eyes away from her. The osmanthus cake was sweet, and the smell of his mother was even sweeter. He nodded hard, "I like it."
Song Luan touched his head again, "You like it."
Little Zhao burried his face and lowered his eyes. He was still embarassed to be close to her. He wanted to be close, but dared not to.
Song Luan was still a little lost. She had seen her son being intimate with Zhao Nanyu and his uncle several times. But for so many days she was here, the child had not yet taken the initiative to hold her and pull her hand.
Although it is understandable, she was still a little sad.
But now it was better than the previous manner he had in which he dared not eat in front of her. Thinking this way, the depression in Song Luan's chest disappeared.
Zhao Nanyu, who was silent on the side, suddenly smiled, "It looks delicious. I'll try it too."
The slender fingers picked a piece of sweet osmanthus cake lightly and bit it. It was sweet and not greasy. It didn't look like something she could make at all. He raised his eyebrow, "It's delicious."
Song Luan said 'thank you' very politely.
Zhao Nanyu walked two steps forward. She was very close to him. She could smell the light fragrance that belonged to him alone. She tightened her hand. She didn't understand what he wanted to do.
Zhao Nanyu held out his hand. He was a scholar but his fingers were very rough. His cold fingertips fell on her slightly hot cheek. Fortunately, he didn't use much strength this time. His fingertips carelessly scratched her skin, and because of her delicate skin, a faint red appeared. He was gentle and frightening. He asked, "How can your face be so white? Are you not feeling well?"
She didn't say she was okay. He said something like this but she didn't know whether it was the psychological effect because Song Luan felt uncomfortable.
Originally, she was in good health, but after giving birth to a child, she was not as healthy as before, which was one of the reasons why the original owner didn't like her son.
However, even if her body was not that healthy compared than before, it was much better than being a sick seedling. She was alive without typhoid or fever.
The child who was sitting on the soft couch heard that she was not feeling well so he immediately raised his eyes and stared at her stubbornly. He was worried about her.
Song Luan thought about it and nodded, "Just a headache."
It seemed that Zhao Nanyu's hand had never been warm before. When he touched her, she felt like she would die of ice. After a while, he finally reluctantly moved his hand away from her face. "Then go back and rest."
Song Luan didn't hesitate to say anything. When she was about to leave, he suddenly grabbed her by the shoulder and held to the spot. The two people were very close. They stuck together.
When Zhao Nanyu spoke, the cold breath swept down her neck. He said, "Although it's spring, it's still cold. Next time you come out, wear more clothes."
Song Luan straightened her body and said stiffly, "Well."
"Go back."
"Okay."
She quickly rolled out of Zhao Nanyu's study. It felt that one year's life would be lost if she talked longer to him. No matter how well he pretended, it was useless. Evil was evil. It was impossible to hide such things as grumpiness.
It was still early when Song Luan returned to the courtyard. She moved to the rocking chair and lay in the courtyard for a while. She felt lazy under the warm sun, so she shook her head and went to sleep.
It's dusk when she woke up. After she opened her eyes, her brain was still a little confused. Her head was heavy and her feet were light. Her nose and throat were a little uncomfortable.
"Madam, it's cold outside. Why don't you come in?"
When she opened her mouth to reply, her throat hurt. She said nodded, and then asked, "How long have I slept?"
"More than an hour" The servant girl replied.
No wonder it was getting dark. She slept for so long.
At this time, her face was more paler than when she was facing Zhao Nanyu in the afternoon. She didn't seem to have any spirit. Song Luan's feet were soft. She felt that she was going to catch a fever because of the cold wind. She just recoverred from her typhoid fever, and now, she fell ill again.
She held the servant girl's wrist and said weakly, "Give me a hand."
The servant girl dared not disobey, "Yes."
As soon as she entered the room, she went straight to bed. The servant girl couldn't help but remind, "Madam, have your dinner."
Song Luan laid on the soft quilt. Her shoes was still on her feet and she had no energy to reply, "I have a headache. I will not eat."
Headache and stuffy nose. So painful.
The servant girl was going to tell her that Zhao Nanyu was going to come over for dinner tonight, but she had already wrapped herself up in a quilt.
After Song Luan left, Zhao Nanyu did not continue copying the family laws.
Little Zhao also stopped practicing his handwriting. His calligraphy was not good-looking. He didn't play with his toys, but instead ate several sweet scented osmanthus cakes in a row, even though he did not like sweets. When he reached for the cakes on the plate again, Zhao Nanyu stopped him, "That's your fifth one. You can't eat anymore."
Little Zhao withrew his hand and said in a low voice, "Dad, you don't want to eat?"
Zhao Nanyu didn't like sweet food either. He smiled and asked, "Do you like her so much?"
"Yes, I do." His son was a simple and ignorant child. When his mother began treating him well, he also began to like her.
It seemed that the little bun was not afraid of his father. He climbed down and walked to Zhao Nanyu with his short legs. He held his knee and looked up at him. "Dad, don't you like it?"
Soft, fragrant, sweet, and always smiles to people. Doesn't he like it?
Zhao Nanyu was quiet... silent for a long time. The color of the pupils deepened a little bit. All the darkness and violence were suppressed very well. He smiled, "I like it too."
Song Luan who was weak, sweet, and always tremble in fear when in front of him. He didn't know how but this fragile woman was really tickling his heart.
***
It was completely dark when Zhao Nanyu entered her room. The food on the table had not been moved and he did not see her figure.
He asked in a cold voice, "What about my wife?"
"Madam said she had a headache and is still in bed."
Zhao Nanyu strode to the inner room. The woman in the bed wrapped herself tightly with quilts, leaving only the sound of her breathing. He sat beside the bed and pulled open her quilt, forcing her to show her head.
Song Luan's face was red, and her beautiful eyebrows were wrinkled tightly. Her delicate body was soft and it stuck securely with the quilt. She was frail.
Zhao Nanyu put his hand on her forehead. It was a little hot. She had a fever.
=============== Chapter 13
Song Luan's head was dizzy. It was between half asleep and half awake. She felt that someone had helped her up, and her waist was squeezed roughly, and she grunted dissatisfiedly.
Her body was as soft as a water, her nose was stuffy, her chest felt breathless, and it was uncomfortable. It seems that there were two hands holding her chin, and they forced open her mouth hard. An unpleasant smell reached her nose. She frowned, and tightly closed her teeth. She didn't want to cooperate.
Zhao Nanyu had no patience. He tightly clasped her chin and said coldly in her ear, "Open your mouth and drink medicine. "
Song Luan would not open her mouth. She knew it was very bitter when she smelled it. Her body was uncomfortable and her temper became worse. She clapped her hands powerlessly, closed her eyes and hummed a few words out of her mouth, "I don't want to drink!"
Zhao Nanyu thought that he could see the shadow of the past, but this time she was not arrogant, but a little cute.
Since she still didn't want to drink, he would use hard means. Zhao Nanyu pinched her chin with two long fingers, and with a little effort, he forced her to open her mouth. He raised the medicine bowl in the other hand and poured it directly into her throat.
Song Luan was unable to stop the outflow of bitter tears. She drank too fast and resisted. She was choked by the medicine. And now, she completely woke up from her dream. She found that she was lying in Zhao Nanyu's arms. Half of the black medicine was still in the bowl.
When Zhao Nanyu saw that she was awake, he whispered in a warm voice, "You have a fever and need to drink this medicine. Come, drink the rest."
Song Luan was in a daze. His tone was much softer than usual. It was sweet and sounded like a coquette. "I don't want to drink. It's very bitter. "
Zhao Nanyu didn't seem angry. He took out a handkerchief from his sleeve. He gently and meticulously wiped the medicine stains on the corners of her mouth, "If you don't want to be ill again, be obedient. "
Song Luan took the medicine bowl from his hand and raised her neck.
[Gulu Gulu]
She drank all the medicine. Her face was paler and was not as red as before.
After a long time, she still did not slow down. There was a rush of breath in her chest. Under the urge, Song Luan reached out to him, "I want to eat candied fruit! "
Zhao Nanyu was startled and smiled. He took two candied fruits without complaint and handed them to her hand, and finally touched her face. "Eat them. "
Song Luan's attitude to him made her regret. She thought that she had gone with the wind, and even dared to order Zhao Nanyu.
She was in a complex mood and ate the candied fruit in her mouth. The bitter taste of the medicine was soon diluted by the sweetness. The medicine didn't work immediately. Her brain was still heavy and her complexion weak.
Zhao Nanyu got up, stood in front of her bed, and said, "Get up and lie down after dinner."
Song Luan lowered her head and said weakly, "I can't eat, I want to sleep. "
When she spoke, Zhao Nanyu had brought her a thick cloak. "Put it on, you have to eat even if you don't want to eat. "
After a pause, he said, "Don't be disobedient. Cover yourself with more clothes so you won't be wronged again with fever."
Song Luan's face was still grim. She reluctantly wrapped up her body with a cloak. When she got out of bed, Zhao Nanyu held her hand high and helped her. She said 'thank you' in a low voice.
The food on the table had been heated. Song Luan had no appetite upon seeing the light and tasteless dishes. She wanted spicy and sour food! But she didn't think anyone in this family can eat spicy food. She never seen any heavy dishes.
Song Luan suddenly felt that she was so pitiful that she couldn't even eat whatever she wants.
She held the chopsticks and poked them in her bowl, and refused to eat well. This scene fell on Zhao Nanyu's eyes and only felt it was funny. She looked like a child making trouble with her chopsticks.
After dinner, Song Luan's spirit was not good. She yawned and fought with her eyes. She rolled back to her bed without looking at Zhao Nanyu's face at all.
Zhao Nanyu stayed in her room for a while, standing quietly beside her bed, staring at her face and examining it carefully. Having seen enough, he turned away from the bedroom and stood by the window with his hand.
The servant girl stood behind him, bowed her waist, and dared not to breathe loudly. She respectfully handed over a letter, "Young master, this is the letter sent by the young master of He family to your wife this afternoon. "
Zhao Nanyu sneered, the sharp edge in his eyes could almost kill people. The youngest son of the He family was one of Song Luan's old friends. The man she tried to marry had also the surname He.
He took the envelope, opened it and looked at it. He could not help but feel cold. The cold glint in his eyes condensed into frost. Then he slowly tore up the letter piece by piece.
His voice was extremely cold. "Don't let her know. "
"Yes."
***
Song Luan didn't wake up until noon the next day. The fever subsided after she drank the medicine and slept for many hours. She was not as sick and hot as yesterday.
She forced herself to get up from the bed. As soon as she got dressed, the servant girl brought hot water to wash her face. When she finished cleaning, the servant girl called her, "Madam, the Old Master Song's birthday will come in two days, and we just received the invitation. You and Master should come together. "
Song Luan guessed that this should be her dowry servant girl. She came from the Song Residence.
She had no idea that Master Song, her father, was about to have his birthday. She coughed twice and said, "Okay. "
The servant girl was very happy, "This is good. The people in the residence won't gossip. "
It's just that the relationship between her and Zhao Nanyu was bad.
Song Luan felt it was okay. Anyway, her reputation was not good to begin with and It didn't matter if she had a thick skin.
Although the servant girl was surprised, she didn't let go of her hesitation. She had been with her since she was ten years old. The young lady was arrogant and was easily swayed by emotions. She wouldn't listen to anyone. Her love and hatred were clear. Like was like, and hatred was hatred. She used to look at her father with annoyance. But in these recent days, although the change was not much, she rarely quarreled with her father, and even agreed to go back to celebrate his birthday.
In fact, she did not dare to think that Song Luan would agree.
However, it's better to come. In the past three years, the young madam and her husband had never been together in the Song Residence.
When eating breakfast, Song Luan asked her, "Where did Zhao Nanyu spend the night?"
"Master went to back to the front yard. "
She said, "Oh" and didn't speak again.
When it was time to have lunch, her son suddenly appeared in her yard with his short legs. There was no one around him. Under the sun, the little man's face was shining. He seemed to not be happy and pouted a little.
Little Zhao startled Song Luan. She crouched down, her eyes were even with him, and said to him with clear eyes, "Why did you come here? "
He walked two steps forward, but his feet were not steady. He seemed like he was going to fall on her arms. Song Luan caught him in a hurry, only to find that his shoes were on the wrong side. She couldn't help laughing. "What's the matter? The shoes are all reversed."
The child was laughed at by Song Luan, and his face suddenly turned red. He was not ashamed. He lay in her arms and asked strangely, "Are you ill? "
He still can't call her mother. The tone he used was very respectful.
He also finished writing the words that his father told him to finish this morning, and then heard from his father that his mother was sick. After that, he didn't have much energy and felt playing with toys were boring.
Just now, he asked his father if he could come and take a look. With permission, he immediately put on his shoes and stepped on his little boots and ran this way.
Maybe he was worried or maybe it was because of something else. He even wore his shoes backwards.
Song Luan touched his face and gave it a light twist. "Oh, you know, I'm fine. You don't have to worry."
In front of her son, her words began to increase unconsciously. Unlike with Zhao Nanyu, he asked her a question and she answered with a sentence. She even wished that both of them would be speechless so no one would talk.
Regardless of her son's wishes, she picked him up and asked, "Have you had lunch? Would you like to eat with me? "
Little Zhao nodded awkwardly. His voice was very small and soft, "Yes. "
He reached out his small hand and took the initiative to hug her neck for the first time. Song Luan picked him up at the same time... It's rare for mother and son to have such a pleasant and harmonious scene.
When Zhao Nanyu came, the servant girls had just prepared the meal. Song Luan didn't expect that he would come directly without saying his greetings.
Little Zhao sat at the right end and called out his father.
Zhao Nanyu rubbed his head, then turned his eyes to Song Luan's face and asked, "Why do you look at me like that? "
Her eyes were so focused that it was difficult for him not to notice.
Song Luan coughed twice and shook his head. "Nothing." She put down her chopsticks, calming down her accelerated heartbeat. She bit her teeth, looked up and said in a stiff voice, "It's my father's birthday in two days. Go with me!"
Song Luan didn't want to take the initiative to open her mouth. It seemed very awkward. But there was no way. If she didn't say this, Zhao Nanyu will not take the initiative to mention it.
She had to be fierce.
Zhao Nanyu snorted, lips slightly raised, and he smiled more beautiful than not.
Song Luan, whose eyes were fixed on him, felt very scared. Just when she thought he was going to do something, he replied, "Okay. "
=============== Chapter 14
Soon after, Song Luan's father's birthday arrived. She didn't know what kind of attitude Father Song had towards her. To be honest, all the sons and daughters of the Song family in the book 'The Powerful Minister' were all hateful.
She sat on the bed and clasped her head angrily. If she could, she hoped that Zhao Nanyu would not go to Song family.
The reason was very simple. The Song family looked down on him, and certainly no one had a good face towards him. But if he didn't go on his father-in-law's birthday, he couldn't be justified.
Song Luan thought that her brain hurt more and more as she thinks. Ahh she yelled.
She fell on the quilt, buried her face inside, and her pair of legs kicked in the air wildly.
Zhao Nanyu got up much earlier than her. She thought that he already went out early, and so she flew around the bed without fear of being seen by him.
But Song Luan didn't know that Zhao Nanyu asked for a leave that day. He didn't have to go to the court or go to Dali temple. After practising his sword in the yard, he still had sweat on his forehead. When he opened the curtain, he saw the person who was jumping on the bed. Her white legs were dangling outside the quilt, and her hair was disordered, like a little madman.
Zhao Nanyu leaned against the door and watched her lose her temper. Then she smiled and sang, "Are you so happy kicking your quilt? "
Song Luan's head rang with a buzzing sound. She quickly raised her head and stared at him with round eyes, "Ah?"
Where did he come from? Didn't he go out this morning?
She was stupefied but then regained her mind, fixed her hair, smiled dryly and said with small voice, "I didn't kick them."
Zhao Nanyu smiled, "Okay, don't get angry. We can't be late today. "
His indulgent tone was like talking to a child.
Song Luan nodded and climbed down from the bed. When she was about to change clothes, she saw that he didn't want to leave, so she turned around and said, "Go out. "
The longer she got along with him, the more Song Luan's original claws and teeth come out. She was even a little smart and knew what can satisfy Zhao Nanyu.
"Okay, I'll go out." Zhao Nanyu put down the curtain for her very caringly.
Song Luan's wardrobe was full of dazzling clothes, most of them were in the color of red. They were more gorgeous than the other. There were only a few plain clothes. It seemed that the original owner didn't even wear them, maybe because it didn't look pretty.
She seriously thought about it. Finally, she chose a set of peachblossom qiyaoru* skirt. The bright color reflected her temperament better. If she had gone home today wearing plain clothes, she guessed that several girls in her family would doubt if she had any brain problems.
As long as there were young talents and aristocratic ladies in the grand meeting, the original owner must dress herself very beautifully and should have a glorious appearance in the eyes of the public.
After Song Luan had dressed up, Zhao Nanyu also told people to bring the birthday gift prepared in advance.
He sat quietly, his long and thin fingers gently tapping the table, waiting patiently for the woman in the room to come out.
Song Luan went out from the inner room and met his beautiful eyes. Zhao Nanyu stared at her intently.
The makeup on her delicate face was carefully applied. Her skin was tender and white as jade. The gorgeous makeup on her face was not annoying this time. It's less vulgar, but it sets off her beauty incisively and vividly.
Zhao Nanyu saw the shadow of the past from her face. She always liked to wear heavy make-up, and always wear the kind that can be seen at a glance.
He nodded, "It's beautiful. "
Song Luan's face was thick enough to resist his outspoken praise. Her ears were a little hot. She pretended to be calm and replied, "You are very handsome today."
Zhao Nanyu wore a blue round neck straight sleeve robe with a jade standing on the waist. The white jade crown tied up his hair. The lines of his lower jaw were sharp. After hearing her words, his lips rose slightly. It seemed that he was flattered by her.
Zhao Nanyu pushed the things in front of him and said slowly, "Do you like this gift to your father? "
Song Luan looked at it twice and said, "He likes it. "
Zhao Nanyu prepared a pair of inkstones. She didn't know this kind of thing at all and couldn't see a way. Her father was a civil servant of the imperial court and should have a preference for paper, pen, ink and inkstone. This kind of gift was not shabby in the past.
"That's good." He took a sip of tea and said, "It's getting late. Let's go. "
"Okay. "She replied.
The husband and wife had to take their son with them when going to the Song Family this time. There were only a few opportunities for children to see their grandparents.
Her son's clothes were very cheerful. It may be that the weather was still very cold these two days since his clothes were packed tightly and looked more rounder than usual.
He stood quietly on the side of the carriage in front of the house and waited. He stared at the toe of his shoes with big black eyes. When he heard the footsteps behind him, he suddenly became nervous. His fingers under the sleeves were tightly clenched. He was looking forward to something, but he didn't know what he was looking forward to.
Song Luan touched his head. "How long have you been waiting? "
Little Zhao had an uncomfortable face, his ears flushed red, "No...did not take long."
"How long is not long? "
Little Zhao couldn't stand the teasing. If he couldn't answer the question, he simply won't answer, and he would not speak.
Song Luan rubbed his face again, and sighed in her heart. The seriousness of her little son softened her heart. Her son was so cute!
Zhao Nanyu looked at her, then at his son, and said, "Get in the carriage. "
Song Luan wanted to climb up the carriage with her son in her arms, but she found it too difficult and gave up.
It was much warmer inside the carriage than outside, and her hands and feet gradually warmed up. Her son sat beside her, while Zhao Nanyu was leaning against the window.
The carriage was enough to hold three people. There were some snacks on the low table. It's used to alleviate hunger.
The atmosphere was a little stiff since no one spoke. It was very quiet. Song Luan was brave and gently hugged her son and put him on her lap. Then she asked, "Son, do you want to eat? "
He touched his round stomach and shook his head. "I'm not hungry, mother. I've already eaten. "
"Okay. "
Zhao Nanyu suddenly reached out and picked a piece of red bean cake and handed it to Song Luan's mouth. She was frightened by him. "What are you doing!? "
He smiled. "I think you want to eat."
She really wanted to eat. She didn't have time to eat when she got up early in the morning. So far, she was still hungry.
Song Luan raised her face and refused to let herself lose in this moment. She rightfully snatched the red bean cake from Zhao Nanyu's hand, put it in her mouth and muttered, "I don't want you to feed me. "
Zhao Nanyu raised his eyebrows after hearing this, but he didn't say a word. He just watched her eat silently.
Little Zhao looked at them curiously, licked his lips, and thought to himself...that red bean cake must be delicious. His mother looked so happy that he felt a bit greedy.
His small hand secretly grabbed the corner of his mother's dress, as if it would stop her from running away.
Zhao's house and Song's house were separated by half of the capital city. The carriage was moving slowly. Song Luan was already full. No one in the carriage took the initiative to speak. The rickety carriage made her drowsy. Her son slept right at her chest and and both pair of eyes were closed.
Zhao Nanyu put down the book in his hand and stared at them quietly. Both mother and son slept soundly. Song Luan's hand protected his son's waist and prevented him from falling off her leg.
Zhao Nanyu rarely takes a closer look of Song Luan. The marriage at that time didn't matter to him.
Even after she despised him and brought endless humiliation, Zhao Nanyu didn't think there was anything, just a woman who liked to be scornful. It was hard to clean up her mess so he felt it was easier to crush her directly than the ants.
Song Luan's flattery to him these days was not so obvious, but he was not a fool. How could he not see her intentionally showing weakness?
Zhao Nanyu smiled. He looked at the woman in front of him carefully. The more he saw, the more itchy he felt. There was no doubt that her appearance was very beautiful. Her features were bright and exquisite. Her lashes were black and thick. Her red lips were slightly open. Her poor sleeping posture made her collar a little disordered.
He held out his hand silently and arranged her clothes. He couldn't help it, his cold fingers slowly crossed the edge of her cheek, as if they were tracing her outline.
The sleeping woman seemed to feel something, and her whole body trembled and frowned.
Zhao Nanyu lifted his eyebrows and as if nothing happened, he took back his hand.
Song Luan didn't sleep long before the carriage stopped in front of the Song Residence. Song Luan's father was very proud in the court ranking, so his birthday ceremony was very dignified. There were already many carriages parked in front of the gate.
Song Luan listened to the voice outside and opened her eyes vaguely. She turned to Zhao Nanyu and asked, "We are here?"
"Yes."
He stepped out of the carriage first, then held the sleeping son on his shoulder with one hand and extended his hand to her. "Come on, I'll help you. "
The couple appeared at the gate of the Song family. Everyone could see that the most beautiful third lady of the Song family had gone home with her husband. Her husband?!
Song Luan felt embarrassed when she was stared at by the people. Zhao Nanyu was more calm, and walked straight.
Song Luan held her head high and put on a cold expression. She walked beside Zhao Nanyu with pride.
Song Luan's mother was Aunt Lin. She had longed for her daughter to come back. After knowing that she had arrived, she hurried to the front yard and saw her beloved daughter from afar.
Aunt Lin rushed up and took Song Luan's hand and looked at her up and down. Suddenly she lamented, "My treasure! You... How much did you suffer in Zhao's family? The flesh on that small face is now thin, there is not even a decent hairpin on your head. Ahhh your mother's heart is aching. "
At that moment, it seemed that Song Luan's mother was not bad
Aunt Lin pretended to wipe her tears, and then moved her eyes to Zhao Nanyu, who was beside her. She glanced at his eyes lightly, but didn't say anything bad to him. She just snorted and turned to her daughter to scold her. "My poor treasure. Since you did not marry well, your mother should have expected that your life will not be good after your marriage. Your mother didn't know that you'll be a mess like this. You didn't have beautiful clothes and jewelry and you can't even eat enough....My poor daughter!"
Song Luan: "...."
Zhao Nanyu smiled and listened, but his anger didn't show. Song Luan felt that he was squeezing her waist more and more hard.
The waist was pinched so hard that it hurts.
=============== Chapter 15
Song Luan hissed and opened her mouth to explain: "No, no, my mother. I'm doing really well."
Apart from the days when she was dying and lying in bed after being poisoned into the bone marrow, the original owner had a good life before she died, and Zhao Nanyu never treated her badly in food, clothing, housing and transportation.
Aunt Lin's face was almost written with the words 'I don't believe'. Song Luan's words did not comfort her, but they were darker and darker.
She did not agree at the beginning with her daughter and Zhao Nanyu's marriage, but she had no right to decide.
Aunt Lin was a daughter of a big merchant in the south of the Yangtze River. She was in a rich family. She had lived in royal clothes and jade dishes since she was a child. Later, Song Lian, the father of Song Luan, married her.
Song Lian was a great official of the imperial court. It's very good that the daughter of a merchant can marry in. Song Lian treats her pretty well these years. He treated several children equally and loved them very much. Aunt Lin was not short of money. Her room was mostly adorned with gold, silver, and jewelry. When she was a child, she thought that having plenty of money was a good thing. She also taught Song Luan all these.
Her own heart was not bad, but half of the credit for Song Luan's snobbish character lies in her. She doted on her baby daughter as an eye bead, and never scolded her if she did terrible things. Even if Song Luan made a mistake, she would protect Song Luan and blame others for her child's fault.
Anyone can be scolded, but she can't be scolded. Anyone can be wrong, but her daughter can't be wrong.
So even if Song Luan and Zhao Nanyu were caught having an affair, Aunt Lin firmly believed her daughter's beauty was coveted by Zhao Nanyu. Since he couldn't marry Song Luan on his own terms, he used this vicious scheme to tie her in marriage.
What kind of person was Zhao Nanyu? No one in the capital knows. If his mother was a prostitute, it's not certain that this llegitimate son could go back to Zhao's house if his father didn't have an heir.
Although he has passed the examination, he was not at the top. All the scholars who were selected together were better than him. He was really worthless.
Zhao Nanyu slowly released the fingers clamped on Song Luan's waist. He seemed to know that Aunt Lin didn't like him very much. He smiled at her with a good temper and said, "I'll go back to the room to put this son to bed."
Aunt Lin could not wait for him to leave, so she nodded her head.
In the past years, he and his wife also went back to Song Residence together. Sometimes Zhao Nanyu was called by his father-in-law to talk to him, so he couldn't take care of his son. Song Luan was an impatient person when it comes to children, so she locked her son in the boudoir and before she left, she threw some toys to him to prevent him from going out. Zhao Nanyu returned to pick up their son who was crying with grievances in her boudoir, so he was familiar where the place was.
After he left, Song Luan was relieved, but she heard her mother's bad words again and remembered the people who hated her family.
Aunt Lin pulled Song Luan to her room and looked at her with tears in her eyes. "Ah Luan, you must have suffered a lot at Zhao's house, and you even felt wrong. "
When did her daughter talk so well of him!? Just now that humble phrase she said that she had a good life, must be Zhao Nanyu, that man, who bullied her.
Aunt Lin wiped her tears, opened the cupboard and took out a small box from it. Then she opened the box, which was gleaming of gold, silver and jewelry.
Song Luan, who had never seen the world, swallowed, "This..."
Aunt Lin said, "You secretly take some back. Think about how to use it. I have nothing else but money. Don't be afraid of Zhao Nanyu. If you're in big dillema, just leave him. Let's find you a better man."
It's not uncommon for the people in this period to be open and remarry with divorce, but it's hard to say if she could still remarry with her infamous reputation. More importantly, it was absolutely impossible for Zhao Nanyu, who had a cold personality, to let her be happy.
Song Luan had to maintain the image of arrogance before her mother, "Mother, I'm not afraid of him! If he really dares to treat me harshly, I can return it two times worse. "
She was lying to herself. She only dare to take advantage of Zhao Nanyu while he was away, not to boast with her mother.
Aunt Lin thought... It made sense to think about what she said.
A Luan has never lost a fight since she was a child. She didn't think Zhao Nanyu would dare to show his face, but she was afraid that her daughter would be wronged, so she took a handful of jewelry out of the box and put it in her hands. "Take all these things. My A Luan should be exquisite and beautifully dressed!"
Song Luan silently put all these jewelries away and smiled, "It's still mother who's the most important to me." She paused after speaking, and added, "Men are dogs. "
Aunt Lin was very pleased and touched her face. "Do you have anything you want to eat? Your mother will personally cook it for you. "
"I'd like to have lotus seed soup. "
"Good. I'll do it for you in a moment. "
Song Luan felt that the mother of the original owner was really doting in treating her daughter, and almost everything good things were sent to her.
Her mood was very complex now, because Aunt Lin's fate in the book was not good. After her daughter was burned, the shock was too great that she died of grief.
Aunt Lin was still not satisfied with her dress. She just put two more gold hairpins in her bun and a beautiful jade on her wrist.
"Now this is beautiful. "
"Thank you, Mother. "
Aunt Lin said enough to her and went to the kitchen to cook lotus seed soup for her. As soon as she left, Song Luan's rigid back relaxed a little. She was really afraid that she would show her feet in front of Aunt Lin.
*Show her feet – Show her true personality. So she had to act according to the original owner's personality.
Since she wanted to save her life, her personality of being hostile and vicious can collapse in front of the male lead, but not in front of other people.
It's not hard to play a young lady who was arrogant and willful. She just passed the test.
Just after Aunt Lin left, Song Luan planned to go back to her house to see her son and Zhao Nanyu. She knew in her heart that Zhao Nanyu heard her mother's vicious tone. She must also remember them on her head.
It was not easy to brush some good feelings from Zhao Nanyu. Song Luan didn't want to be destroyed.
However, Song Luan was totally unfamiliar with the Song's residence, and she happened to be bad with directions. She walked around indiscriminately and could not tell which direction is leading to which. When she finally saw a figure in front of her, and as soon as she was about to ask him for a direction, the man turned to her.
It was a very young man. He was dressed in a blue shirt. He looked beautiful and soft. When he saw Song Luan, his eyes lit up, he ran straight to her. He was very happy and called out, "Ah Luan."
Song Luan frowned and took a few steps back, while thinking who was this?! Listening to his tone, it sounded like they were old friends with the original owner.
Not good! she wants to run.
Without giving her any time to react, the man grabbed her wrist and said, "Ah Luan, I know you still like me. "
Song Luan: "??? "
The man in front of him seemed to have a lot of words to say to her, and finally he said, "If it wasn't for the letter I received before, I wouldn't know that you'll be in this difficult situation. A Luan, will you follow me once I persuade my parents?"
Song Luan's expression was struck by thunder. It took her a long time to find her voice. "I'm married "
The man heard her and the hand holding her wrist were more forceful, and his eyes resentful, "Don't you hate him?! Before you married, you told me personally that you didn't want to marry him. If my parents didn't disagree, I would have married you. "
As soon as he said that, Song Luan guessed who he was. He must be the youngest son of the He family, He Run, who had a marriage engagement with the original owner.
He Run's father was the emperor's uncle, his aunt was the current queen, his mother was the county head. He had two elder brothers and they were not easy to provoke. An outstanding family had raised a stupid son like him who was easily convinced.
The original owner used some petty tricks to make him and his three spirits obssessed with her so much. At that time, He Run made so much trouble to the point of threatening his family with tears just so he could marry Song Luan
Unfortunately, as soon as the incident between Song Luan and Zhao Nanyu came out, the marriage arrangement between her and He Run was broken.
Now Song Luan's head hurts. What's this?!!
She pulled out her wrists and said in a good voice, "Mr. He, forget about the past. I'm having a good life now, so don't..."
He Run decided that she was wronged and didn't dare speak ill of her husband. He Run immediately interrupted her, "Don't lie to me... I won't let you stay in the fire pit of Zhao's family. What you wrote in your letter clearly says that you still love me. "
The expression on He Run's face seemed to be hurt. He then said, "I wrote back to you some days ago, and you should understand that I have never forgotten you in these four years. "
Song Luan was confused. She didn't receive a letter at all. She really didn't want to be involved with other men. "Mr. He, I have a husband and a son. It's not good for a man to act like this. You will meet a better woman in the future. "
He Run was about to cry, his eyes were red, and his hands tightly grasped her white wrist. "I don't mind. A Luan, we are in love. It's not your wish that you commit yourself to Zhao Nanyu. I don't blame you. Shall we start from the beginning? "
Song Luan listened to his inner rage. How could this young man say so much without listening to her?
She couldn't move her wrist away from him. She shouldn't be soft. She had to be stern. Song Luan raised her chin, put on a look of arrogance, and said slowly, "Do you think I like you? There are more guys that I like. As you say, I don't have enough on my hands. As long as there are rich and powerful men in the capital, I like them. I just like your family background, not you. "
As soon as Song Luan finished saying this, the man behind the pillar quietly laughed, at the same time, his anger slowly poured up from the bottom of his heart.
Zhao Nanyu silently raised his lips. He just happened to arrive just now and didn't hear much of what they said, but that last two sentence fell into his ears.
It turned out that everyone can, as long as they have money and power.
Yes, money and power are good things.
With these, he can keep Song Luan from escaping in her lifetime.
Zhao Nanyu's dark eyes stared at He Run's hand that was holding her wrist, and his scarlet eyes swelled with killing intent.
=============== Chapter 16
When He Run heard her words, his face turned white. Then he kneeled down and begged, "I...I....I have money and my aunt loves me. You don't have to worry about being bullied. "
Song Luan sighed heavily in her heart. After all she just said, he still did not give up. To make him so devoted and loyal, she didn't know what ecstasy the original owner fed to this man. He was deeply in love with her and never repented.
She shook off his hand, and for this reason, Song Luan knew that he couldn't explain clearly. She frowned and said, "Mr. He, I have something else to do, so I'll go first. "
He Run looked at her reluctantly, and even wanted to catch up to her, "A Luan, I... I will wait for you."
Fortunately, Song Luan ran out fast, so she didn't have to continue to struggle with him endlessly. She ran out of the garden in one breath, when she finally saw a servant girl, she stopped and asked, "Where is my husband? "
The servant girl felt that she was very unlucky. Third miss came back two or three times a year, and met her before. She was really scared of this bad tempered third miss, and was afraid of saying something wrong that would make her unhappy and get beaten up.
She pointed to a room on the left, and replied, trembling, "Your husband is in your room."
Song Luan pretended to be impatient and waved, "Okay, I know. "
She arranged her clothes, followed the direction pointed by the servant girl and walked past. The door was closed and there was no sound in it. Song Luan doubted whether Zhao Nanyu was in her room or not.
Zhao Nanyu came back one step ahead. His son was still sleeping. He sat by the bed for a while at first. Not long before, he stood up, and wanted to see her boudoir for the first time.
He never seen it carefully even when he had been here before.
There seemed to be a unique fragrance in the girl's room. In front of the bed, there was a dresser with a copper mirror on it. He opened the small drawer under the dresser and there were some household things, mostly for dressing. He saw several handkerchiefs in the corner, took them and puts them on his hands to have a careful look.
Zhao Nanyu laughed. The workmanship in the handkerchief were extremely poor. There was even no embroidery on them. At first sight, he knew that the owner of this handkerchief was not good at embroidery.
He silently put the handkerchief back to its original place, and did not continue to watch. He sat down and poured himself a cup of tea and took two sips.
At this time, Song Luan, who was outside the house, pushed open the door and came in. Her face was a little red and some sweat appeared on her forehead. She looked at him and asked, "Is little Zhao still sleeping? "
Zhao Nanyu lowered his eyes and held the cup tightly with his fingers. He could not hear any fluctuation in his voice, and said, "Yes. "
He suddenly raised his face and stared at her with deep eyes. At the moment when Song Luan was staring at him, she felt that his eyes were stormy, like a fierce beast coming directly at her.
Zhao Nanyu got up and slowly walked to her side. He suddenly smiled, took out a white handkerchief from his sleeve, gently wiped the sweat beads on her forehead, and asked with concern, "Why did you sweat? Where did you come from? "
Song Luan's back was taut and her back was cold. Although Zhao Nanyu was very gentle at this time, she was still nervous. She smiled dryly, "Maybe it was too hot. "
The temperature in Zhao Nanyu's eyes was a little colder after hearing the words.
Several emotions, such as violence, murder and jealousy, were well hidden on his chest. He still smiled and no one could see anything wrong, "Right? I thought you came a short distance from here? "
In fact, Zhao Nanyu had seen many scenes where Song Luan was entangled with other men. Sometimes, it was an aristocratic son in the capital, and othertimes it was the person in the royal family. He could bear it every time, because he had developed the ability of turning a blind eye.
But just now, when he saw the picture of Song Luan and He Run standing together, he felt angry for a long time, anger surged his heart. He was jealous and wanted to kill that man. He wanted to monopolize her.
Zhao Nanyu was a dangerous man. He could tolerate and control his emotions. After listening to those words, he didn't choose to show himself to them, but left quietly.
At this time, he silently stared at Song Luan, at this familiar and strange face...
Song Luan didn't dare to move. She didn't know if Zhao Nanyu had heard her conversation with He Run. "What can I do? It's such a big place."
Zhao Nanyu was a man who hated being cheated. Song Luan refused to admit about her meeting with He Run. She really wanted to ask if he had seen her, but had no courage.
"Do you want to drink some water?"
Song Luan hadn't drank yet since morning. She and He Run were talking so much that her throat and mouth had been dry for a long time. She nodded, "I am thirsty. "
Zhao Nanyu poured a glass of water for her and handed it to her, "Drink."
"Thank you. "
"By the way, did your mother say a lot to you? "
Song Luan wondered how much her mother said today, and that all she asked were all unnecessary questions. She shook her head, "She didn't say much. "
Zhao Nanyu chuckled, "How did you come here so late?" He looked directly at her eyes, as if to see through her heart. "Did you meet someone? "
At that moment, Song Luan thought that he had seen something. Her heart accelerated a bit. But after she thought about it, Zhao Nanyu could not have seen it. There was no one else in that place except her and He Run.
She was not stupid, so she would not tell him what happened to He Run. Song Luan replied bitterly, "I didn't meet anyone else."
It was really not an easy thing to lie in front of Zhao Nanyu's eyes. She coughed twice and continued to talk with great difficulty, "It's just that I got delayed with my mother's matters"
Zhao Nanyu was silent for a moment. "I see. "
His five fingers clasped tightly, forming a fist. Lying? Very well. Sure enough, her changes were all pretend these days, her human nature had not changed.
Zhao Nanyu thought of a lot of ways to torture her. He wanted to do it roughly–to break her bones, to watch her cry and beg for her life, beg for herself. He wanted to kill He Run in front of her.
Gradually, all these ideas were dispelled. It's not yet the right time. He could see his thoughts better than anyone else. He had treated her differently than before.
Jealousy and anger would not affect him.
He liked her pitiful look, full of grievances. He liked bullying her and looking at her red eyes with tears that hang weakly on that delicate appearance.
Zhao Nanyu grabbed her wrist, on the location where He Run's touch was. He stared at it for a long time, then took out the handkerchief and rubbed it two or three times on her wrist. Facing Song Luan's blank eyes, he explained, "It's dirty. "
Song Luan took a breath of cool air. Her white wrist had been rubbed red.
She still remembered the reason why she came to him, she said, "Don't take what my mother said today into consideration. "
Zhao Nanyu said, "I didn't. "
You liar! Her waist hurts so much because of him. How could he still have the face to say that he didn't?
Song Luan could not expose him either, so she could only go along with him, "That's good. "
Zhao Nanyu didn't ask her what Aunt Lin had said to her just now. She just persuaded her to find a better man.
Even when he hated Song Luan, he never thought about divorcing her, let alone now.
Want to leave him and have fun with other men? She can't dream.
Little Zhao turned over and opened his clear and innocent eyes slowly. The little boy got up from the bed without shoes. He stepped on the ground barefoot and rushed out.
He didn't like this room at all. Every time he comes to the house, his mother would lock him up alone. He couldn't wait for his father to pick him up and so he used to wait until the sky gets dark.
No one plays with him or talks with him.
Song Luan was shocked when he saw her son dashing in full speed. The child in thin clothes ran towards her. She opened her arms and subconsciously caught him.
Her son hugged her knee and buried his red face without saying a word.
Song Luan picked him up carefully and asked softly, "What's the matter with you? Why didn't you wear any shoes?"
Little Zhao buried his head in her chest, but he still didn't say a word. He grabbed the clothes on her shoulder with his small hand, afraid that his mother would leave him and lock him here.
Song Luan's collar was ripped open by him, and her white and soft chest showed a little bit. Zhao Nanyu glanced at it, then withdrew back his gaze, his eyes turned a little dark.
He reached out his hand and carried his son. The child in his arms was still struggling. He whispered, "Okay, be obedient."
Zhao Nanyu's simple words could frighten him. The child was really obedient and dared not move in his father's arms.
He raised his eyes, looked at her deeply, and reminded her, "Collar. "
Song Luan found that her collar was pulled down. She blushed and closed her lapel. She dared not look up at him.
Zhao Nanyu teased her, his beautiful eyes bent. "What a shame, I haven't seen it yet."
He licked his teeth and the dark light in his eyes continued.
Want, Very want.
Hold down her waist and do a lot of exercises together*
✯¸.•'*¨'*•✿ ✿•*'¨*'•.¸✯
Legend:
*You know what this means... (●'艸｀)ヾZhao Nanyu wants fuck her so bad. His inner desires is beginning to unravel.
=============== Chapter 17
Zhao Nanyu lowered his eyes and suppressed all his thoughts. He had endured all these years, and he could still endure this time.
Zhao Nanyu's heart and eyes were small. He remembered everything Song Luan did that made him unhappy. He remembered everything clearly, and he was waiting to settle everything with her.
The little bun hanging on him seemed to be full of troubles. His chin was on Zhao Nanyu's shoulder. He was silent and no one noticed his grievances.
Song Luan felt that his face seemed to be ucomfortable but she didn't think of the reason why she wanted he was making a face like that. She went forward two steps and looked at him with concern, and asked, "What's the matter? Not happy? "
She bent her lips and smiled for a while, and even asked, "Why are you not happy? pouting face is not cute at all "
He didn't want to admit it at all. He shook his head and said in a voice, "There is no unhappiness. "
He was just afraid. He thought of the past, the days when he was locked up. He liked the mother now, and didn't like the one who didn't want to look at him.
Song Luan couldn't help pinching his fleshy face. "Good boys don't lie."
It seemed that little Zhao was still reluctant to say it. He took his father's shoulder and refused to make a sound. Song Luan didn't want to embarrass him. Even if the child didn't want to say it, it may just be a nightmare, and he was embarrassed to tell her.
She smiled. "Well, if you don't want to say it, don't say it. But remember to wear shoes when you get out of bed. The ground is very cold "
Little Zhao nodded and admitted his mistake, "I'm not a good boy."
Song Luan touched his head, just about to say something, but Zhao Nanyu put him down in a flat tone, "Go, put on your shoes. Don't do it next time."
It seemed that little Zhao didn't want to leave the two of them. Pitiful eyes looked at Song Luan for fear if he turn his head, his mother would leave, the door would close, and he couldn't find anyone.
Zhao Nanyu, with a heavy face, said softly, "Don't make any trouble. "
Little Zhao lowered his head and went in barefoot to find his shoes.
When Song Luan read 'The Powerful Minister', she thought Zhao Nanyu was very fond of his son. Now it seemed that Zhao Nanyu was not blindly fond of him. He was very strict and would never allow him to get used to his bad habits.
She opened her mouth and complained boldly to him, "You were just too fiece with little Zhao."
After all, he was only four years old. Zhao Nanyu could speak in a gentler tone.
Zhao Nanyu raised her eyebrows, smiled and glanced across her feet. "I remember you didn't like wearing shoes at home. "
He had seen her running around barefoot several times.
Song Luan's throat choked. "There is carpet in the room, and barefoot is very comfortable. I'm not a child. What's the matter with barefoot? "
Zhao Nanyu snorted. Finally, she could see some fluctuations on his always-cold face. "Little Zhao must have learned those things from yours."
"That's not necessary. "
"Is it possible to learn from me? "
Song Luan blurted out, "He likes you more and sticks to you. Maybe he learned it from you. "
After her voice fell, Song Luan knew that she said the wrong thing. Of course, little Zhao sticks to his father more, the original owner didn't treat him well.
She bit her lips and took back her words,"He learned it from me. I'll never do that again. "
This tone was very rebellious.
Suddenly, there was a clear female voice outside the house, and the maid in front of her knocked on the door. "Third Miss, Master Song asked that Master Zhao needs to go to the front yard. He had something to say."
Song Luan replied, "I see. "
She turned to look at Zhao Nanyu, raised her chin, and said, "You heard that my father asked you to go."
Zhao Nanyu took a sip of water without hesitation and said, "Okay."
He put down the teacup on his hands, the beautiful peach blossom eyes bent into crescent shaped, and said softly, "Don't forget about our son."
Song Luan cleared her throat and said seriously, "I'll take him with me. Don't worry. "
Although she said this, Song Luan also knew that Zhao Nanyu would not be rest assured that she will take good care of the child. She had a lot of past mistakes. What if she goes crazy and mistreats the child again?
If anyone looked closely, you can see that Zhao Nanyu's smiling eyes were cold and indifferent. Although he thought that Song Luan these days was much different from the past and found her interesting, he knew in his heart that he still didn't like her very much.
Her change was sudden.
The time was not yet enough to trust her. But tonight, he couldn't help it. He had to go to the front yard and couldn't take the child with him. He could only leave the child beside her.
Song Luan had better not lie to him, or he would add another stroke to his revenge book.
Zhao Nanyu was silent for a moment, then laughed, "Then you have worked hard."
When he said this, his son who had just put on his shoes, ran out. Zhao Nanyu picked him up and said, "Stay close to your mother. Don't lose your temper. Be obedient, okay?"
Little Zhao was uneasy and reluctant to let his father go, but he also knew that he could not keep his father, so he was obedient and said, "Okay. "
Zhao Nanyu himself personally gave little Zhao into Song Luan's arms, smiling, "You've worked hard. "
Song Luan was so flattered that she quickly waved her hand, "Not hard, not hard."
She liked to spend time with her son! It's fun to play with him. And she didn't want to miss the chance to cultivate her mother-son relationship.
Zhao Nanyu frowned a little. He couldn't tell whether the joy on her face was true or false. He opened the door and left without looking back.
Zhao Nanyu just went out of the back garden when suddenly, there was a slim figure around the corner of the corridor. The girl was dressed in pink and looked like peach blossom. She walked to him and made a formal ceremony, "Brother-in-law."
Zhao Nanyu was not familiar with the people of the Song family, but he knew that she was Song Luan's sister, Song Yu.
He took a few steps back, very polite, "Fourth younger sister."
Song Yu's face become more and more red. Her eyes moved. She looked at him several times and felt embarrassed. Then she quickly lowered his head. "My father has been waiting for a long time. Let me show my brother-in-law to him. "
Zhao Nanyu didn't fail to see Song Yu's thoughts on him. He frowned and refused in a cold voice. "No, I know the way. "
Song Yu's teeth are about to be broken, and her face was much paler. She moved forward two steps and looked at him with watery eyes. "My brother-in-law, don't be polite to me. "
Zhao Nanyu said coldly, "No need. "
After the words fell, he left in a big step.
Song Yu stood in the same place with a stiff body and stamped her feet with hate. Brother in law is so merciless! She had just plucked up the courage to speak up, and he didn't even reciprocate.
She was not Song Luan. Her skin and face were below Song Luan's. Song Yu was also a commoner, but there was not much difference between her and Song Luan's family in Song Residence.
She had a common appearance, which was far inferior to Song Luan's exquisite color and beauty, and her literary talent was also inferior to her sisters. All of her sisters were quite mediocre with ordinary qualifications.
She was cowardly and timid.
After a while of sulking, Song Yu turned and walked towards Song Luan's house.
Song Luan was sitting on the soft coach coaxing little Zhao. Her son hugged her tightly. She didn't know what happened to him.
She felt that he was about to cry, so she asked patiently, "Do you want to go out to play? "
It's not good to stay like this the whole time. He's too quiet. As a boy, it's better to be cheerful. Song Luan's heart broke looking at him.
He shook his head and embraced her tighter, refusing to come down. "I don't want to."
Song Luan sighed. If he didn't want to, he couldn't help it. "Then we will stay in the house and wait for your father to come back?"
Little Zhao hummed in agreement.
The child's hands circled her neck tightly. It was the first time Song Luan was cuddled by her son. It seemed that he was afraid that she would leave him.
Song Yu came around at this time. She smiled at Song Luan and cried sweetly, "Third older sister."
Song Luan knew her. Song Yu was a woman of patience and virtue.
"Fourth younger sister."
In fact, Song Yu was very envious of her third sister's appearance. There were many men in the capital who liked her, and some of them were sons of excellent families. If it wasn't for that time...
She gathered her thoughts and smiled softly. She stretched out her hand to touch Song Luan's son, but didn't expect that the child would evade her hand.
Song Yu smiled awkwardly.
Song Luan explained, "Little Zhao does not like outsiders so much."
Song Yu looked at her with complicated eyes. In the morning, she was told that she was coming back with Zhao Nanyu. At that time, she didn't believe it very much. Her third sister didn't like her brother-in-law. Every time she came home, she had many complaints to say. It was not only the family who knew their bad feelings, but also the people around them.
But the messengers had said that they were so intimate that they didn't see any resentment between them at all. Song Yu thought to herself, how could it be all of a sudden? No, it shouldn't be.
And in the past, her sister didn't get along with her husband. She even didn't care for her child, and never saw her hug the child.
"I was abrupt and thought he was familiar with me." Song Yu said.
Little Zhao grabbed Song Luan's collar and refused to speak. He didn't like the little aunt at all. He had heard several times that the little aunt teased her mother with other men when his father was not around.
He buried his head on Song Luan's neck and said, "Mother, I'm a little hungry. "

=============== Chapter 18
He's not really hungry. He just didn't want his mother to talk to his aunt.
Song Yu pretended not to see his nephew's rejection of her. She stooped to approach him, and whispered, "Auntie has delicious food. Do you want to go? "
The child encircled Song Luan's neck, and didn't open his eyes. He is indifferent to Song Yu's kind smile. "I want to eat the cake made by my mother. "
Song Luan chuckled a little, and soon she was back to normal. She always kept three points of arrogance in front of the people of the Song family. "Fourth younger sister, go back if you have nothing to do. Don't make fun of yourself here. "
This was not pleasant to hear, but it was something that the original owner can say.
Song Yu thought that the temper of third sister was a little bit better than before, but now she didn't think so. Her mouth was as sharp as ever, and her bitter character was really annoying!
She was so angry that she had to swallow her stomach after almost breaking her teeth. She had suffered a lot from Song Luan. This elder sister was not only unkind, but when she was angry, this sister had slapped her face and grabber her hair. It was really not easy to provoke.
If it wasn't for her motive of investigating, Song Yu would not come and see her. When did she ever see her quiet?
She smiled stiffly. "This sister doesn't mind so much. "
After Song Yu left, Song Luan went to Auntie Lin with her son in her arms. As she walked along the way, she said, "Son, I'll make cakes for you once we arrive home, okay?"
If she cooked in front of Aunt Lin or other people in the Song family, she may frighten them all to death. They might think there's something wrong with her brain.
Little Zhao calmed down, and was very good now. He'll do whatever she says, "Okay. "
Aunt Lin had just come back from the kitchen and cooked the lotus seed soup herself. She was about to bring it to her daughter when Song Luan came. Aunt Lin also saw her grandson on her shoulder.
"Oh, little Zhao is awake. Come here. Grandma just cooked it. It's fragrant and sweet."
Aunt Lin treated little Zhao well. She had never been attentive or harsh to him. The child looked more like his father. He didn't talk much. He was obedient. This kind of grandson was not often seen. But, she could only care about her daughter, so her attention was not really towards her grandson.
Her daughter was her own family, but her grandson's surname was Zhao.
When he got off the ground, he climbed up to the table and said thank you politely. Then he picked up the bowl and took a taste.
It's sweet. It's very sweet.
Song Luan sat down beside him and took a taste. She almost spit out the soup. It was too sweet!
Aunt Lin looked at her with expectant eyes and asked, "Luan Bao, is it delicious?"
Luanbao was Song Luan's nickname. Aunt Lin liked to call her that when she was very young. When she grew up, she would cry and throw tantrums and refused to be called by that name. But occasionally, Aunt Lin would use this name once or twice.
Song Luan swallowed hard the soup in her mouth and said, "It's delicious."
The original owner liked sweet food, but she didn't.
Aunt Lin beamed and said contentedly, "I knew you would like it. No one in the Zhao family can make it. Drink more. There are plenty in the kitchen. "
"Mom, I know. "
Song Luan almost swallowed a bowl of lotus seed soup. Her mouth was full of the sweet and greasy taste. Her head and throat hurt. She quickly drank a glass of water to relieve the soreness.
Little Zhao drank a whole bowl and didn't feel uncomfortable. Song Luan was curious and asked him, "Do you like it? Is it delicious? "
He nodded. "Delicious. "
He didn't lie to her. He really like to think it's delicious.
If you remember, Little Zhao and Zhao Nanyu both don't like sweet foods. So when Song Luan asked her how it taste and little Zhao replied that it was delicious. He fully convinced himself that it was delicious (tho he doesn't like sweet things), so he's not considered as lying. Get it?
Song Luan giggled, "Are you still hungry?"
He shook his head. "I'm full. "
Song Luan was afraid that his stomach would hurt, so she quickly took away the plate in front of him. "It's good to eat just enough."
***
Zhao Nanyu was talking to his father-in-law.
The reason why Song Lian was quite high in the court was that he was 'simple and honest'. Of course, half of this kind of simple and honest was just pretend. He was the backbone of the Song family, so he was naturally careful.
He was not satisfied with Zhao Nanyu, his son-in-law.
Officials in the court were more or less snobbish. Based on his many years of experience in the court, he determined that Zhao Nanyu would not make much achievements in the court in the future. After all, he was his son-in-law. Even if he was not satisfied, he wouldn't mention it. Moreover, these years, he had been ridiculed because of his daughter. It should be regarded as compensation.
Zhao Nanyu handed over the birthday gift he prepared to Song Lian. It was received by the housekeeper standing beside Song Lian. His father-in-law didn't even plan to see it. He thought he wouldn't be able to bring anything of high value.
"I have also heard about the foolish things that Ah Luan did. Please be more tolerant of her and don't worry so much." Song Lian said, thinking of her daughter's private meeting with a man two months before.
Zhao rubbed his lips, "I know."
Song Lian also felt that he, himself, was terrible. No matter what Song Luan did, he didn't think it was her fault.
"I'm relieved that you are like this. It is the best for the family."
Zhao Nanyu stood and his hands was on his back. His body was lean. His eyes fell down and covered the emotion in his eyes. The sunlight shining inward hit him, and his delicate eyebrows looked gentle.
"Yes. "
Song Lian didn't say a word to him at all and just asked him a few questions as usual before he sent him away.
Glossary:
Zhao Chao – He's the relative closest to Zhao Nanyu. If you don't remember, he's the teacher/uncle of little Zhao who appeared briefly in =============== Chapter 1 and =============== Chapter 8.Zhao Wenyan (nickname 'Ayan') – He's Zhao's Nanyu's younger brother from another mother (which is the current wife of his father). To spike your memory, this guy here, is the one who fell in love with the original Song Luan. He dedicated all his life to find a remedy for Song Luan's poison. And when Song Luan died, he didn't recover and died after.
✯¸.•'*¨'*•✿ ✿•*'¨*'•.¸✯
Translated by: Tinker
Zhao Nanyu walked out of the main hall. He saw a lot of acquaintances in the courtyard. Many colleagues from Dali temple came. After greeting each other, he went to the backyard.
The day passed quickly, and it was evening in a flash.
Zhao Nanyu and Song Luan plan to leave after dinner at the Song's house. For the first time, Song Luan had not quarreled with her sisters. It was better to be safe and quiet. After eating the meal quietly, she didn't intend to talk to other people nor deliberately look for troubles.
In the past few years, Song Luan could not help but stab them with shap words every year. The original owner thought that their laughter was mocking her, so when she saw her sisters laughing, she would use sharp words against them, and would not give up until both of them were hurt.
Once they were about to go home, it was only Aunt Lin who was unwilling.
She sent her to the carriage while crying. She treated Zhao Nanyu beside her as air, wiped her tears and said, "Ah Luan, if you are unhappy in Zhao's family, you can go back to your mother's house. Anyone can be wrong, but you can't be wrong."
Song Luan couldn't laugh or cry, "Mother, go back."
After all kinds of guarantees, she sent Aunt Lin away, and only then did she notice to care for Zhao Nanyu. She turned to look at him and couldn't help her curiosity. She asked, "What did my father tell you? "
Zhao Nanyu replied, "He asked some common things, and didn't say anything else. "
The expression on his face was distant and indifferent.
Song Luan calmed down a little "Oh."
The carriage stopped on the way. Song Luan opened the curtain and looked out curiously. There was a carriage in front of them, which happened to block their way.
Song Luan looked for a while and was about to put down the curtain when a man came out the gorgeous carriage opposite to them. She decided to take a look, and could see that it was Zhao Chao–the uncle who was close to her son.
Zhao Chao came straight to their carriage and yelled from outside, "Second Brother."
Zhao Nanyu got out of the carriage. "Why are you here? "
Zhao Chao smiled, and his handsome face suddenly became vivid. Today, he was dressed in crescent-colored straight embellishment, which looked quite elegant. He replied, "I went out with Ayan to drink wine. Who knew that I would ran into my second brother. "
Zhao Nanyu frowned, and his face was full of disapproval. He whispered, "Don't take him to drink next time. He is still young. "
Zhao Wenyan was only 17 years old. Although they didn't have the same mother, Zhao Nanyu couldn't help but also be strict with him.
Zhao Chao seemed to guess what he would say, so he showed a vague smile, "You can't always stay at home and read. What can you do if you are stupid?" Then he said, "Let's go, older brother. We haven't had a drink together for a long time."
Zhao Nanyu turned over and said in a deep voice, "There are still people in the carriage. "
Zhao Chao made a sudden realization, "Is she there, too? "
Zhao Nanyu nodded.
Zhao Chao remembered that today was his second brother's father-in-law's birthday. No wonder they took a carriage together.
He smiled and didn't care. "Then take her with you."
Zhao Chao also heard that the feelings between his second brother and her seem to be different these days. They even go out together.
Zhao Nanyu thought for a moment, then nodded to answer, "Okay."
He lifted the curtain and said to Song Luan, who was in a daze, "Come down. "
Song Luan listened to him in a trance, and only after getting off the carriage did she know what he was going to do.
Since the time she got drunk, Song Luan vowed never to drink in front of him again, but this time Zhao Nanyu didn't give her a chance to refuse.
He told the coachman to take little Zhao home first, and then grabbed her wrist and went to a restaurant.
Zhao Chao booked a private room in advance and sat by the window. When he opened the window, she could see the deep lake not far away. On the dark blue lake, there were colorful river lights.
When going to the restaurant, several men turned heads to look at her. She had a gorgeous makeup, and the color of her clothes were bright enough. Her beauty and excessive facial features became more beautiful with the makeup applied.
It's no surprise that men stared her.
Zhao Wenyan sat next to the window with his face in sight. Seeing Song Luan coming in behind Zhao Nanyu, he snorted twice. He was quite dissatisfied. He almost asked why she had come??!
Song Luan's head hurts. Compared with Zhao Chao, the smiling tiger,
she was more reluctant to see Zhao Wenyan.
In case this person was the same in the original novel, it would be bad if he fell in love with her in the future!
As soon as Song Luan sat down, Zhao Chao pushed over a glass of wine and looked at her with a smile. He was as cunning as a fox, and said, "I'd like to offer you a toast, sister-in-law. "
Zhao Nanyu suddenly took the cup in her hand and said, "You eat something first to fill your stomach."
Then he looked up and drank the wine for her.
Song Luan was flattered and began to nibble at the cakes.
The smile on Zhao Chao's lips suddenly became meaningful. It seemed that the feelings of the second brother and the second sister-in-law had really improved.
Could it be that second brother started to like her? As soon as this idea came out, Zhao Chao laughed.
Although he couldn't see through his second brother, he didn't think he would like Song Luan.
And Zhao Chao felt that Song Luan might not live long.
=============== Chapter 19
Zhao Chao was different from his several brothers. He didn't choose to go and become an official. He followed the master in Taoist temple to learn medical skills when he was a child.
Now he had inherited his master's medical skills. He was now a famous doctor in the capital.
Zhao Chao was not only good at curing people, but also good at poison. Three years ago, his second brother asked him for a colorless and tasteless slow poison. At that time, he joked that his second brother was worthy of being his brother. He was more ruthless than him.
The medicine was called "Tianqing". When the second brother asked him for it, he gave it naturally and kept his mouth shut. He also asked who the medicine was for, unfortunately, his second brother didn't answer.
The medicine should be given for three years, but his second brother didn't ask him for it again.
Zhao Chao guessed that the medicine was used on Song Luan.
Zhao Nanyu's drinking seemed to be very good, even after drinking two cups of wine, his face did not change. He didn't talk a lot in front of his two younger brothers. He sat quietly drinking.
There was a strange silence in the room. He didn't talk to Song Luan, but she didn't care. She looked down at the cake in front of her, bored, and just counted the several pieces in the dish.
Zhao Chao poured a glass of wine for her. This time, Zhao Nanyu didn't stop her from drinking. He just glanced silently and didn't say a word.
Song Luan probably felt that Zhao Nanyu didn't like her very much, even if he had a warm and kind smile on his face, it seemed to be a little false.
She straightened her back and never looked as humble in front of others as Zhao Nanyu. Song Luan behaved like a proud young lady, even the tone of thanking seemed so reluctant. "Thank you. "
Zhao Chao frowned slightly, and seemed to notice she was unusual, but then still felt that Song Luan was not different from before, and was still that unruly and unreasonable woman.
Not knowing shame. Not knowing manners. And was snobbish.
Zhao Chao bent his lips and smiled, "I haven't seen second sister-in-law for a long time. "
Song Luan's tone was indifferent and alienated. "Is it? I don't remember."
Zhao Chao was not angry, but still looked at her with a smile. He had a face that made it easy to take off the guard. He said, "I heard that second sister-in-law was ill some days ago. I don't know how second sister got better?"
Song Luan coughed twice, her eyebrows and eyes were light, and she replied with two words: "Just Okay. "
There were two reasons why she didn't answer Zhao Chao. One was that she didn't want to spend time with people who didn't matter. The other was that she was afraid of showing little intimacy. Zhao Nanyu might think that she's seducing his brother.
Considering the whole situation, she was cautious. The only person she couldn't offend in this book was Zhao Nanyu, the male lead. It didn't matter what others think of her.
Zhao Chao had no temper. No matter how he was treated, he was not angry. He opened his mouth, as if he wanted to continue to ask.
Zhao Nanyu, who had never made a sound, glanced at him and said coldly, "Okay, go drink. "
As soon as he talked, Zhao Chao humorously closed his mouth.
Song Luan was on pins and needles. She just wanted to go home quickly. She didn't want to drink or participate in the feud between their brothers. Especially now, Zhao Wenyan's eyes were still fixed on her, but his eyes were not very kind.
Zhao Chao stopped, but Zhao Wenyan couldn't help but say, "Who knew if she was faking her illness?"
She did this last year. She pretended to be ill and sneaked out of the house to have fun with other men.
Zhao Wenyan's words aroused Zhao Nanyu's bad memories. He looked at Song Luan with a smile from the corner of his face. He gently stroked the fine hair on her cheek and said, "She won't deceive people. Ayan, you are speaking nonsense."
Zhao Wenyan just couldn't understand why he wants to protect her. What kind of protection does this sly woman need?
He blushed with anger. He really wanted to scream at Song Luan!
There was one time where she pretended to be ill and snuggled her head in his arms. This incident, Zhao Wenyan never told his brother about it.
Song Luan smiled awkwardly, in a white-lotus voice, "He didn't mean to, I don't blame him."
Zhao Nanyu's eyebrows and eyes were crooked, his voice was clear and cold, "My wife is so mature."
Song Luan's face was red. Her red face had a special appeal and charm. The candle lights brought out her bright and lustrous eyes. Her eyes seemed to be shining with water, and her ears were burning red. She drank a glass of water before she put down the heat in her heart.
Zhao Wenyan was very angry. He poured down his glass of wine and didn't know who he was venting his anger to. He was young and was not good at drinking.
At the end of drinking, he was not very conscious. His face was red. He didn't know what he was talking about.
Song Luan's back was always taut, and her eyes were not on him from the beginning to the end. Because of this, she didn't know that he touched his nerve. When Song Luan was about to leave, Zhao Wenyan suddenly rushed to her and scolded her angrily, "You shameless."
He was a young scholar. He had never done such a rude thing as swearing.
Song Luan was scolded. Naturally, he didn't have a good face for her, so he immediately scolded her and went back, "You are shameless."
"You don't wear too much in front of me and deliberately fall on me to seduce me." As soon as this sentence reached the throat, Zhao Wenyan was dragged away by Zhao Chao.
Song Luan had more or less two drinks tonight. The wine encouraged people's courage. Her courage was a little bigger than usual, so she rushed to scratch his face and pulled his hair like a shrew.
Zhao Nanyu grabbed her wrists with quick eyes and hands, and smiled shallowly. "It's okay now."
As soon as Song Luan saw him, she stopped making noise, and was quietly led down the restaurant by his wrist.
Zhao Chao took the drunk Zhao Wenyan to the carriage first, and Song Luan followed Zhao Nanyu back to the Song Residence.
In the dark of night, the wind is cold and stirred her ears. The cold wind slapped on her face, and Song Luan became sober from her drunkenness. Her brain was still dizzy, and her feet were soft.
She was actually a very lazy person. If she could sit down, she would never want to stand up.
The moonlight lengthened the reflection of the two people. Zhao Nanyu walked very fast. Song Luan struggled to keep up with him. Her feet hurt after walking for a long time.
This body was very delicate.
She panted and followed Zhao Nanyu. Her heels were worn and hurt.
They were the only person in the street. Song Luan burst into tears at the corner of her eyes and got up. Her short temper coming out. She stood in the same place and didn't know who she was angry with. "I won't go! "
Zhao Nanyu heard the movement behind him, turned around, and the moonlight fell half on his bright face, and slightly closed his chin. He asked, "What's the matter? "
Song Luan wiped her eyes and said, "I can't walk. "
She pouted and her face was not happy. Zhao Nanyu looked at her like this. For a moment, he was distracted. He thought that she was very tempting and delicious.
Advertisements
"It's not far. "
Song Luan pointed to her left foot. Afraid that he would not believe it, she bent down and took off her shoes and socks, stretched out his bare feet and pointed to his heels. "You see, my skin is all worn out!"
Zhao Nanyu was shocked by her astonishing behavior. He froze, squatted down, and place her foot in the palm of his hand. He wiped the blood on her heel, put on her shoes and socks, and stared at her with black eyes. His voice was very cold. "You're not allowed to take off your shoes outside."
You guys should know that historically, showing one's feet is a sign of intimacy. A wife should only show her feet to her husband.
It was also because no one was in the middle of the night. If someone looked at it, he would dig the eyeball of the man.
Song Luan did this because she was a little drunk. Her mind was somewhat sober. After having suffered, she settled down and said, "Oh. "
Zhao Nanyu didn't say anything. He squatted down and carried her on his back.
Song Luan fell on his back, hands around his neck, and the faint breath from her nose sprinkled on his neck, which smelled sweet.
She tilted her head, squinted and stared at him motionless. Her eyes slowly climbed up from his chin. His face was very delicate. She liked his nose and eyebrows.
Song Luan was stunned. In a trance, she reached out her finger and touched his face. Zhao Nanyu stopped for a moment. His face was still clear and cold. He held her waist in one hand and stopped her fingers in the other hand. He whispered, "Be good. "
When Song Luan heard his voice, she did not move. She was incredibly well-behaved so she withdrew her finger and understood. "Oh."
She wanted to say that she had listened to him intently, but dared not speak out.
Song Luan suddenly laughed and called out his name, "Zhao Nanyu. "
He continued to walk forward with her on his back, listening attentively. His voice was hoarse, "What's the matter? "
Song Luan's thin legs were tied to his waist. She moved around him. Her snow-white and soft chest rubbed against him. Zhao Nanyu's breathing gradually increased and said dumbly, "Don't move. "
Song Luan was not obedient this time. She laughed and blowed in his ear, "Do you like me? Hmm?"
Zhao Nanyu's face was taut and silent.
Song Luan's face was filled with laughter, and she exhaled, saying: "Am I not beautiful enough? Or is my figure not good enough? Don't you like it?"
Isn't she seducing? She didn't know.
Zhao Nanyu carried her back home, and the people under the vigil were shocked when they saw the appearance of their young master and his wife. They hurriedly avoided their eyes and dared not to look at his wife more.
Zhao Nanyu rudely kicked the door open and threw the woman on the bed. Song Luan was slightly drunk, her clothes were messy, and her white neck was a little red. It was really charming.
He tightened his jaw, his face expressionless, but the voice in his throat was hoarse, "You are drunk. "
Song Luan was not drunk. Seeing that he wouldn't flirt with her, she simply rolled up the quilt and wrapped herself tightly. "You don't like me."
Nevermind. I don't like you anyway.
=============== Chapter 20
Song Luan didn't expect to ask Zhao Nanyu what she wanted. She didn't think Zhao Nanyu would like her. Song Luan acted on a whim. She tried to seduce him to see how he would react. As expected, his concentration was very good. He was not moved by her at all, his face didn't blush, his heart was not jumping, his eyes were still cold, and his face had not changed.
She felt bored. Zhao Nanyu really was exactly the same as the book 'The Powerful Minister'. He was not close to women and had a cold personality. If he had to treat a woman differently, it would be because he had motives.
So it's not too much to say that he's heartless.
Song Luan took off her shoes, socks and coat. She jumped to bed, wrapped herself in a cocoon, rolled around, and went to sleep.
Zhao Nanyu sat beside the bed and gazed at her quietly. His white fingers slightly touched her cheek. The color of his pupils deepened gradually, and the corners of his lips rose little by little.
He didn't see that she had no heart for him.
***
It's early in the summer, and it was getting hotter and hotter. In this period of time, she seldom saw Zhao Nanyu. He was too busy that she didn't see him. Song Luan could guess what he was busy about.
In this year, the male lead took sides with the sixth prince. Since then, he began to show himself in the court. At last, the sixth prince fought hard in a fierce battle of seizing the crown. Zhao Nanyu made a lot of efforts and strategies. When the new emperor ascended the throne, he also became an important minister in power.
It's less than a year before the new emperor ascended the throne. That is to say, Zhao Nanyu's first day was not far away.
It's wasn't just Song Luan's self-love, but she really thinks that Zhao Nanyu didn't have the same intention to kill her as before. Occasionally, she could even see kindness in his eyes.
Zhao Nanyu didn't show up much. She was happy.
On this day, Third Lady Zhao suddenly called her over and asked her to have lunch together.
Third lady Zhao, Zhao Wenyan's biological mother, was devoted to Buddhism. During the holidays, she even wished that Zhao Nanyu, the 'son' would not ask her to greet her. The gloominess of Zhao Nanyu's body was too heavy that she didn't lke it.
Song Luan wore gold and silver, and went slowly to the third lady's house of the West courtyard while wearing a gorgeous makeup. The lunch had been prepared. When third lady raised her eyes, she saw a woman with a golden light and heavy makeup. She frowned immediately, thinking that Song Luan had not made any progress for the past several years.
Third lady Zhao sighed heavily in her heart. She couldn't take this daughter-in-law. She dared not to scold her. Song Luan was not only arrogant, but also had a bad temper. She could hit with a dozen of insulting words.
When she cried, she brought troubles. If she was aggrieved, she would make a fuss and wanted to go back to her family.
Her eyes hurt when she saw her. She did not dare to call people until she was ready. She smiled and said, "Ah Luan, sit down. "
Song Luan sat opposite to her, and there was an unfamiliar woman sitting on the table. Third lady Zhao said, "This is Ruoyun, a girl from the Yang family in Suzhou. "
Ah her real daughter.
Yang Ruoyun's was also very beautiful. She had a small and delicate face. Always smiling.
Song Luan nodded her head and said her greetings.
In the original book, Yang Ruoyun was a very important person. She was the second female lead in this book. She was infatuated with the male lead. Every year, Yang Ruoyun would live in Zhao's house for a period of time. She liked to follow the man when she was a child and wanted to marry him when she grew up.
As a matchmaker, Song Luan thinks that she was a very smart. Because the male lead likes the simple and timid little white rabbit, she silently guarded the male lead by the side, and bore no grudges. She did not seek fame or score.
Yang Ruoyun grasped the fact that the original owner didn't like the male lead. She got close to the original owner slowly, and blowed in her ears to leave the male lead. If her plan didn't work, she would make another plan, and would instigate the original owner to go out to find a man, which completely annoyed the male lead and resulted to Song Luan's losing her life.
"Good cousin." Yang Ruoyun smiled at her sweetly.
Song Luan also smiled, "Cousin is also good."
At this moment, her heart suddenly gave birth to a feeling that Zhao Nanyu and Yang Ruoyun were very matched. The cruel young master and the scheming infatuated girl were a good couple!
In the book "The Powerful Minister", it was written that the man liked the kind of delicate woman who knew how to act coquettishly, cries and chirps. Song Luan thought that maybe all men can't escape the desire of conquest and protection.
The delicate and weak girl could arouse the protection of men.
Third lady Zhao really didn't know her daughter's thoughts on Zhao Nanyu, and Song Luan knew that she didn't have any plans to send her as a concubine to Zhao Nanyu. In the book, she made every way to convince her mother to allow her to become Zhao Nanyu's concubine.
Song Luan pretended to be worried, "What's the matter?"
Third lady Zhao then said, "All the families in the Song Residence are getting bigger, only our third family is weak. The eldest in our third family was born prematurely, weak in body and bones, and often ill."
When she paused, she took out her veil and wiped the water from the corner of her eyes. Then she continued, "Now that your son is four years old, you and Ah Yu need another one, right? "
This is not what she wanted to say. She didn't care at all. It was the old lady who asked to call her. The old lady hated Zhao Nanyu, but she was very fond of his son. She was very sad that little Zhao was alone at home and had no one to accompany him. In addition, other married couples had more than one child, so she inevitably wanted to urge her.
Third lady Zhao could see that Song Luan was not interested in Zhao Nanyu, let alone liked him. She also heard that it was an accident when she conceived little Zhao. After four years of marriage, they had nothing to do with each other, and both were not in love.
Song Luan thought that third lady Zhao was going to make a bridge for Yang Ruoyun. She already figured out what she was going to do.She would lose her temper first and then agree unwillingly. If a man had more women, there would be no time to take care of her. How nice!
But, even this third lady Zhao was pushing her to have a baby with Zhao Nanyu?!
Oh my god.
Song Luan was embarassed to tell them that they almost never share a room. After she transmigrated, she did sleep beside Zhao Nanyu many times. It seems they gotten closer. But Zhao Nanyu never touched her. He had no desire for her just like a monk with a clear heart and few desires. She had reason to guess that Zhao Nanyu had never touched her again in the past four years. So one by one, the original owner would look for a man outside!
In this case, how could they have children?
Song Luan said with a dry smile, "Children matters would naturally just follow."
Third lady Zhao was disappointed to hear what she said. She didn't want to take care of their affairs. Unfortunately, the old lady said that she had to take care of them even if she didn't want to.
"I can see that the relationship between you and your husband had improved a lot these days. It should not be difficult to have a child at this time." The third lady must have misunderstood her. She might have thought that she didn't have Zhao Nanyu in her heart and didn't want to give birth to a child for him. In those days, she didn't get a long with her son well.
When Song Luan got pregnant in the month of October, she lost her temper easily in Zhao's family. She was crying and smashing things, which made Zhao's family uneasy.
Song Luan had the cheek to pretend that she could not understand her words. "Naturally fate comes when the child comes."
Yang Ruoyun, who was sitting beside, even opened her mouth to help her out. "My aunt, cousin is right. It depends on fate."
Of course, Yang Ruoyun didn't want her to have another one. She expected Song Luan to make trouble without reason every day. Song Luan thoroughly annoyed Zhao Nanyu and alienated their husband and wife relationship.
She was worried that she would touch Song Luan's temper, so she sighed, "Since you say that, next month, I will go to the temple with you to ask for a sign. Bodhisattva will see your heart. Maybe the child come sincerely."
Seeking a Bodhisattva? Might as well beg Zhao Nanyu.
He was simply not a normal man. He had good restraint and was frightening. If he didn't touch, he would never touch.
Song Luan pretended to be stupid. "Okay."
Advertisements
Third lady Zhao didn't plan on doing anything. Even though she knew that Song Luan had gone to the temple, she knew she didn't really want to ask for a son.
After saying a few words, third lady Zhao also found that Song Luan was not the same as before. She used to be beautiful, but she was too arrogant and sharp, and was unreasonable. Today, looking at her, she seemed to have calmed down. Her temperament seemed to be much better.
In the twinkling of an evening, Song Luan began to go back, and third lady Zhao didn't ask for her to stay.
Third lady Zhao looked at her for several times, then she finally couldn't help but remind her, "Ah Luan, you...You'd better break with other men from now on. Don't have any thoughts that you shouldn't have. Nan Yu...he...he's not someone who should be provoked."
A long time ago, third lady Zhao saw Zhao Nanyu, a child with extraordinary means. He was cruel and did not give people a chance to breathe.
Zhao Nanyu must know the things behind the deeds of Song Luan.
Song Luan thought that what she said was right. Her head was like a pounding garlic. "Uh, uh, you're right."
She decided to walk around when she saw a familiar man!
Song Luan still despised the original owner's ability.
In the evening, just after she returned to her yard, she listened to the servant girl's hesitation and said a man came to the door and happened to meet Zhao Nanyu, who came back from the palace. The man was brave enough not to let him in, and even shouted outside the door and wanted to see Song Luan.
Zhao Nanyu immediately kicked him and hit the man against the post. He vomited blood.
Cold air crawled down Song Luan's back. She was afraid to die tonight!!!
=============== Chapter 21
Huai Jin is a famous young man in the Hanchun Tower located in the Capital city. The reason for his fame was that he looked good and his facial features were small and delicate. Especially his eyes that seem to speak. They were more beautiful than the others.
When he was first sold into Hanchunlou, many wealthy merchants from the North wanted to buy him at a high price. Most of them were barbarians. His first owner bought him to humiliate and beat him up. Huai Jin suffered a lot at first, but later was taken by Song Luan. He was relieved. At least she looked like a normal woman and should be very easy to deal with.
Song Luan spent almost all her dowry to buy Huai Jin. But no matter how brave she was, she couldn't bring him back to Zhao's house, so Huai Jin still lived outside these years.
Song Luan didn't buy him to do that. She just liked people with good looks. Every time she came to Huai Jin to drink with him, she didn't do anything else.
Huai Jin came here because Song Luan hadn't been outside for a long time. He was always worried about what happened to her. He heard that the Zhao Nanyu and Song Luan's relationship improved recently. He thought what he heard was just a joke because Song Luan had said to him many times that she hate her husband. She thought it was Zhao Nanyu's plan that she was forced to marry him after being drugged, so she had a lot of dissatisfaction towards Zhao Nanyu.
Huai Jin didn't expect to meet her husband on her first visit. He had been living in the city for so many years. He was also very shrewd and fearless.
Zhao Nanyu stood under the steps with his back hand and looked at him silently for a long time. His eyes were as black as the deep pool, and the corners of his mouth pulled up. He smiled and asked, "Who is this?"
No one dared to tell him the truth. Everyone lowered their heads and refused to make a sound. The servant looked at them, and they hurriedly bowed their heads.
Zhao Nanyu's lips fell slowly, his eyes were cold, and his voice suddenly cooled. He snapped, "Are you all mute?"
The servant and the others trembled with fright. They were cold all over. In the hot and dry day, their backs were sweating.
Huai Jin and Song Luan looked to be in cahoots. So, they were doomed together. Who wouldn't have the foresight that they were awaiting death? So, Huai Jin said, "Who am I? Do you really not know, Mr. Zhao? "
Zhao Nanyu stepped with his black boots and stood three steps away from him. He bent his mouth. His cold vision swept across his face in an instant. He said clearly, "Are you worthy for me to know you?"
As soon as the words fell, he raised his foot and kicked his chest. The kick was so fierce that no one would think it came from a scholar. Huai Jin was kicked away by him immediately. His back hit the doorpost severely. There was a burst of pain in his internal organs, and bood slowly flowed down from his lips.
Zhao Nanyu looked at him as if he was looking at a dead thing. He patted his lapel gracefully, raised his lips with a chuckled. "Servants, see him off."
"Yes. "
Huai Jin stood up and rubbed the blood on the corners of his mouth with his hands. He said, "I'll go by myself."
This dog man. He's really cruel. It's no wonder Ah Luan didn't like him. Rude men are nothing good.
Yuck. Yuck.
Zhao Nanyu's eyebrows and heart jumped abruptly. His fierce anger was forced into his heart. His face was completely dark. He went straight to the backyard without saying a word. In the middle of the walk, he stopped suddenly and went back to his study first.
He had to calm down. Although now he wanted to do something unusual to Song Luan so that she would remember, but it was not yet the time.
Zhao Nanyu was clear about Huai Jin's details. The two had met several times, and he knew what they said and did each time.
After he became more and more interested in Song Luan, he could not be indifferent, and this kind of act irritated him.
***
Song Luan wandered around the room anxiously. She didn't know how many men the original owner had seduced. Before she thought that it was only He Run, and when she turned around and came to the door again, she felt that she was going to be bald.
After hearing the news that Zhao Nanyu kicked Huai Jin away, she was more uneasy. She racked her brain to think how to deal with him for a while.
First of all, she must not admit, but Song Luan didn't know how far Huia Jin and the original owner gone through, so she couldn't deny it completely.
Song Luan's brain ached. Fortunately, Zhao Nanyu didn't come to settle accounts with her immediately, which also gave her a chance to breathe.
In the dark night of early summer, when it was time for dinner, the sky in the distance was still bright, and the sunset was blossoming.
Zhao Nanyu wrote two words in silence. Then he took his son's hand and went with him to Song Luan's residence for dinner.
Song Luan was still in a state of confusion, and as she looked at Zhao Nanyu anxiously, she discovered that his face was not different from that of the usual times. She couldn't help asking herself, did he tolerate this matter? didn't plan to investigate?
Zhao Nanyu smiled from the corner of his eyes and said softly, "Why do you keep looking at me?"
Song Luan was confused, unable to understand his thought process. Why did his face show as if nothing happened?
She said, "Listen..."
Zhao Nanyu narrowed his eyes, smiled lightly, and then interrupted her, "Eat first. "
When both of them are full, he will have the strength to settle accounts.
Song Luan's words were forced down her throat. She had the courage to show her cards to him and explain to him, but Zhao Nanyu didn't seem to want to mention it.
She picked the chopsticks and looked at her favorite dishes on the table without any appetite.
Zhao Nanyu put some vegetables in her bowl, for fear that she would not eat, "Eat more. "
Song Luan gradually calmed down her heart and sighed, "Thank you."
Since he didn't mention it, she didn't need to bother him.
Zhao Nanyu seldom stayed in her house at night. Song Luan had just wiped her hair and had a faint fragrance on her body. She wore a very thin clothes, and her summer middle robe was transparent. He could see her exquisite body clearly.
Under the moonlight, she seemed to be white and shining. Her long white neck made people want to bite on it.
She didn't notice the person behind her. Facing the bed board, she supported her head with one hand and turned the book with her other hand.
Song Luan disliked the heat so her loose trouser were half rolled, showing her white leg. Her feet curled up, it looked small and lovely.
Zhao Nanyu quietly appeared behind her, enveloped her with his shadow. After a while, he suddenly reached out to hold her wrist and lifted the woman to him.
Song Luan opened her eyes wide and looked at him foolishly. At this time, they were close to each other. Zhao Nanyu's breath was on her neck, causing her goose bumps to come out.
The faces of the two people were almost sticking together. Zhao Nanyu's dark eyes stared at her closely, slowly opening her mouth. He seemed very happy. "I came back in the afternoon and met a very interesting man in front of my residence. "
Song Luan shrank to the corner of the bed, and she knew that Zhao Nanyu would not easily spare her. She reluctantly smiled, "I heard that. "
Zhao Nanyu raised her eyebrows. "I'm afraid you still don't know about it. It seems that the interesting man has an unusual relationship with you. "
Song Luan's back began to sweat. She kept her mind steady and said slowly, "I have nothing to do with him."
She also knew how powerless and pale her explanation was, but Song Luan believed that the original owner and Huai Jin had never done anything out of the ordinary, and the woman's intuition had never been wrong.
Advertisements
Song Luan felt that the man's expression in front of her seems gloomed, and his pleasant expression became somewhat distorted. He slightly pulled at his lips, "Nothing to do with him? That's not what I know."
Song Luan prefered a one-hit-one-kill than being tormented slowly to death. She closed her eyes, suddenly waved away his hand, wrapped the quilt, and quickly rolled to the corner. She moved far away from him, and said, "I said no. I am not that terrible. Although I have done many wrong things, I will never recognize what I haven't done. Belive it or not!"
Song Luan was very clever. After she had finished going wild, she began to sell miseries again. Her eyes were red. She was pitiful. She felt wronged. "I have a bad reputation! But do I want to?! No matter what I do, it's always wrong, or it's fake. You don't believe me. You bully me, and don't you like me at all!"
When she said this, she was very aggrieved. She was the kind of righteous wronged. Song Luan also knew that she had said enough...
Shameful, but her shame was not important to her at all.
Zhao Nanyu leaned close to her. He pushed her down and looked at her trembling. "Are you wronged?"
The woman under him was as pale as paper, and her body was slightly trembling. She was still very scared.
Song Luan was frightened to tears while she gritted her teeth. She reached out to wipe off the tears and inhaled, "Am I not wronged?"!? If you doubt me...you just....ah!"
A short scream suddenly came out of her throat. Zhao Nanyu's eyes suddenly turned sharp. His dark pupils flashed darkly. He grabbed her chin, and whispered her name, "Song Luan."
The person in his arms froze. She wanted to say something like "if you doubt me, just let me go."
Since she was not happy to live with him, anyway.
Whoever likes someone as fierce and dark as him is stupid!
Zhao Nanyu forced her to raise her neck. There were two tears on her delicate face. He lowered his head, covered her cheek gently with his cool lips, and lightly sucked the tears for her. Song Luan dared not move, and just let him do whatever he wanted.
Zhao Nanyu raised his face, clearly his eyes at this time were as gentle as the water, but Song Luan still did not dare to look at him, let alone look at him directly.
He pinched the finger on her chin lightly because of this, she had to meet his eyes, but only to hear Zhao Nanyu say, "Song Luan, I don't care how many men you have in the past."
"From today on, you'd better cut them off. "
He chuckled softly, "Otherwise, I will kill them one by one."
"Kill them in front of you. "
=============== Chapter 22
Song Luan's eyes were red, while she swallowed, "I know. "
Zhao Nanyu nodded contentedly, loosened her chin, his fingertips gradually fell along her cheeks. He lowered his face to her neck and smelled the light fragrance that belonged to her.
Zhao Nanyu's heart moved, his eyes deepened gradually, and his cold fingers rested on her waist. He untied the belt of her clothes. Song Luan was frightened. She trembled and was nervous.
Then, overwhelming kisses fell on her, and she heard him say, "As long as you are obedient, I will treat you well. "
She's his wife. If she keeps her peace and breaks up with other men, he will be good and not hurt her.
Zhao Nanyu was not bored of her delicate and daring resistance. He even felt an unusual pleasure in his heart.
This weak and fragile thing can only depend on him. He could manipulate her sadness and joy. This greatly satisfied his desire for control. He also liked the claws that she occasionally showed. She was cute and arrogant.
Song Luan thought that something would happen tonight, but Zhao Nanyu stopped at the last step, tied the buttons for her, and whispered in her ear, "Go to sleep. "
Song Luan closed her eyes but couldn't sleep at all. She remembered that Zhao Nanyu, the male lead, had a great characteristic – his obsession to cleanliness.
In novels centered for women, It was not a bad trait for a domineering male lead to have a habit of cleanliness. It was even considered a good quality because it would mean he won't casually like a woman, or won't easily have relations with them. While she was relieved, she was still somewhat lost. Song Luan secretly pinched her thigh. What's the loss!?
After Zhao Nanyu's warning, both him and his wife were in a peace for a long time.
Another month later, Song Luan was shocked to find that a very important plot of the book 'The Powerful Minister' was about to come, that is, the appearance of the female lead.
The female lead of 'The Powerful Minister' was a little flower tailor-made for the male lead. She only knew the simple and good things of the world. She had almost all the beauitful qualities of a woman. After saving the seriously injured male lead on the way, it was not a surprise that the male lead took an interest to her. As time went by, this interest became an infatuation.
Since then, the male lead had killed all hindrances around her. The only ability that the female lead had was acting coquettish!
And the male lead was very fond of looking at a beautiful woman who acts coquettishly, so he doted on her throughout the whole book.
Angry, really angry.
The gap between her and the female lead was big. This female lead had the right to do everything. In contrast, she had to carry all the blame that the original owner left.
This fate is extremely tragic.
The male lead took care of everything for the female lead clearly, and later, he placed people who was his confidants to serve beside the female lead in Zhao's house.
When she was reading the book, Song Luan felt that the female lead seemed to be very happy. She didn't have to do anything and no one contradicted her. She stayed happily in the backyard all day and was spoiled to the bone.
But this kind of life didn't seem to be free. She was secretly watched by people whenever she went out. It's bad that even though she had a good life, she was still being controlled.
However, this matter had nothing to do with Song Luan. She thought about it and maybe after eliminating Zhao Nanyu's hatred value towards her, she had to talk to him well about the divorce. Anyway, her mother was not short of money. It didn't matter if she was abandoned. It was enough to be able to eat. And from the beginning, her goal was to escape.
As long as the female lead appears, she could slip away!
Ah so beautiful!
The only thing that bothered her was that at present, it seemed that Zhao Nanyu still had no intention to separate from her. He really exerted his domineering nature to the fullest.
Life is my own, and death could only die by my side.
I'm scared.
Song Luan finished her breakfast and went to the front yard. Although her husband was a dog man, her son was still very good. He had won her heart.
Zhao Chao was teaching little Zhao to read poems these days. Song Luan stood outside the door and waited for him for a long time before he finished. Zhao Chao came out. His temperament was like a spring breeze. He smiles to everyone. It unconsciously made people relax and lower their guard against him.
When he saw that Song Luan was dumbfounded, he immediately laughed and said: "Oh second sister-in-law is here. Little Zhao is still inside."
"Well, I came to see him."
Zhao Chao was still standing at the door without hesitation to move. It seemed that he wanted to stop her from entering. He was still uneasy. She had made all the scars on her son's body. Who knows whether she really repented? She might be pretending all this time. Thinking of this, the smile on the corner of his eyes became cold, and he said, "How can sister-in-law have the time?"
Song Luan laughed but her eyes were not smiling. "I'm free every day."
Zhao Chao looked at her face carefully, and suddenly made way, "Then I will not disturb second sister-in-law. "
Song Luan frowned, and thought Zhao Chao had a subtle attitude towards her. He smiles at her even though he hates her. This attitude was better than others.
She shook her head and didn't continue to think about it. She pushed open the door and went into the study. Little Zhao sat at a low table, looking at the book in front of him with a serious face, as if he was having a hard time.
Song Luan sat down beside him, glanced at him, and said, "Do you understand?"
Little Zhao answered truthfully, "I don't understand"
Song Luan felt that the ancient poems Zhao Chao taught him were too difficult. Why would he put a four-year-old on such heavy burden? She closed his books gently. "If you can't understand them, just don't read it."
Little Zhao looked at the book in her hand and shook his head seriously. "No, my father will check it when he comes back in the evening. "
"What?" She frowned, "Will you be punished if you can't answer? "
He nodded, "Yes. "
Song Luan then asked, "What will be the punishment?
"Copy the book."
Song Luan was very angry, and was filled with indignation. She hugged her son, "Let's not read it today. I will not let your father punish you in the evening."
Why so strict to a four-year-old child? When she was only four years old, she was just enjoying her childhood. She couldn't bear seeing her son be this way.
He didn't say that he wanted to read the book and learn. It was because no one at home wanted to play with him. Children of the same age in the residence didn't like him and avoided him. He didn't like those people either.
It was better to sit quietly in the room and read.
But seeing that his mother didn't like him reading the book, he closed his mouth and didn't speak.
Song Luan was afraid of the child being bored, so she got a paper and a pen. She used her painting skills to draw a map of the game of the Monopoly game, and then made the dice.
The mother and the son sat cross-legged by the window, with the golden light slanting down her head.
Song Luan simply told him the rules, and then they started the first game.
Advertisements
He soon understood how to play. It seemed that the kid's luck was better. In the end, he won the game. He raised his face and smiled brightly at Song Luan.
Song Luan squeezed little Zhao's face in a good mood and waved her big hand, "Let's play again!"
Although he thought the board was dull, he closed his mouth since his mother was having a good time.
Near noon, the Zhao family suddenly became busy.
The sound of gongs in the street went through the courtyard and into Song Luan's ears. She asked her servant girl curiously, "What day is today?"
Gongs and drums were loud and firecrackers were blaring. It's not like there was a family event today.
The servant girl replied, "The exam results will be unveiled today."
Song Luan suddenly realized that it was the imperial examination. It was hot and noisy outside, but there was nothing in the house. It's quiet and weird.
It was only in the afternoon that she heard that Zhao Wenyan was not in the list. Upon seeing the results, he didn't eat or drink, and was constantly depressed.
Song Luan knew that he won't make it this time. It was only the next examination did he pass.
After a few days, Song Luan accidentally often met third lady Zhao. The woman's face was haggard, pale, and her eyes were red. She must have cried several times. The sadness on her face made people feel worried.
When she asked her, she realized that Zhao Wenyan had not yet recovered from failing the exam. Although he was willing to eat, he still didn't talk to people.
Zhao Wenyan was spoiled since he was a child. He was talented and proud. The results made it hard for him to accept.
When Song Luan saw him at the edge of pond... she subconsciously wanted to avoid him.
He seemed to have grown taller. He looked pale and white as a paper. When he turned around, he was met with Song Luan's eyes. Song Luan discovered that he was lifeless. Since the pride he was once had was crushed, he had no will to continue living.
She sighed. She didn't want to say anything, but she couldn't do nothing when she thought that only Zhao Wenyan was willing to die for her.
Since she could not turn a blind eye, she walked slowly and greeted him.
Zhao Wenyan stared at her angrily. Hearing this woman call his name made him think that she came to laugh at him.
Song Luan held her hand around her and looked up at him. "I heard that you were not on the list?"
"You!"
None of the family dared to mention it in front of him. She said it so lightly, and just wanted to humiliate him.
Zhao Wenyan was even more aggrieved. The woman's heart did change easily. She once said she liked him, but now she treated him as ice.
"What's wrong with you? Am I not telling the truth? I also heard that you want to commit suicide by not eating?" She walked slowly to the pond without any mercy, and lightly reached for him, "Oh, why bother? If you really want to die, you can jump down here. It's faster than going on a hunger strike. "
Song luan didn't give him a chance to talk, and continued, "Don't worry. Your second brother and your eldest brother will be filial to your parents. You can go at ease."
Zhao Wenyan's face was red with anger. He couldn't stand it. He roared angrily, "I don't want to die!!"
He just felt ashamed. His second brother passed the exam at first take. Unlike him...
Song Luan glanced at him and said, "If you don't want to die, why do you act like one? The worries your mother had made her thin. It's better for you to read more books these days. You're only 16 years old and your days are long. You're like a woman. Who wouldn't wan to laugh at you?"
Even though her intention was to comfort him, her words was unpleasant to hear.
Zhao Wenyan gradually calmed down. Although the woman in front didn't seem to laugh at him, he still didn't want to show weakness in front of her. "Take care of your own matters!"
He stood up and went away. Then he turned around, said in a bad voice, "Who told you to take care of me! Take care of yourself and don't talk with other men in the future! Otherwise my second brother won't let you go! Hum! That's all I have to say!"
He was kind enough to remind her how annoying she was.
=============== Chapter 23
Song Luan felt that Zhao Wenyan's vicious appearance was better than his silence. In her eyes, Zhao Wenyan was still a child, and he could not help being arrogant. It would be better if he vented by being attacked. It would only make him feel comfortable in this way.
The wind in the early summer was very gentle. The cool wind blew on her cheek. The fine hair on her forehead swayed with the wind. Her clothes were fluttering. The golden light fell at dusk, and she stayed for a while at the pond before going back to her residence.
The house was ablazed with candlelight, and the servant girls with plates of vegetables came in and out.
Zhao Nanyu had come back from Dali temple. He took off the imperial uniform and changed into a light blue regular suit. After bathing, his whole face looked more delicate, his eyebrows and eyes were clean, his skin was white, his temperament was cool, and he was like a fairy that could not be defiled.
Song Luan found that the jade pendant hanging on his waist had never been changed, and it was still the old piece of jade that was not very eye-catching.
She remembered that this should be a relic left by Zhao Nanyu's mother. His mother died of a serious illness. An abandoned prostitute with a year-old son was left in poverty. She finally died because they couldn't afford any medicine. Everything his mother could sell was sold, but Zhao Nanyu was left with this piece of jade which was not very valuable.
In this way, Zhao Nanyu's childhood was also miserable, and it's no wonder that when he grew up, his character was sick and twisted.
Song Luan silently took back her eyes and sat down in the position opposite to him.
Zhao Nanyu had a light fragrance on his body, which lingered on the tip of her nose. It smelled good, but she felt uncomfortable. Her chest was stuffy and her throat hurts.
After coughing twice, she filled a large glass of water.
"Uncomfortable? "
"It's okay."
Song Luan remembered that she had something else to say to him.
The blood relationship was wonderful. Even though she didn't have the memory of having a baby in October, she knew her son instinctively. She opened her mouth and suddenly stopped. Because she hadn't figured out how to call him, It seemed that it was not polite to call him by his full name, and she felt uncomfortable calling him 'Ah Yu' like others.
"Well, I have to say something to you."
"What is it?"
"I think you are too strict with your son. He is only four years old and doesn't need to learn too hard. There's an idiom that you should know–'It's not good to help draw the seedlings'."
Means that seedlings should naturally grow according to the time of nature. Forcing it to grow is not good.
Zhao Nanyu smiled angrily. "Strict? What happened to him?"
Song Luan tried to reason with him, "The ancient poetry and prose that you want him to learn are not understandable to a four-year-old child at all. If he doesn't understand it, you punish him. Don't you feel sorry?"
Never did Zhao Nanyu expect to be questioned one day by Song Luan that he didn't care enough for his children, so he was angry, "Although the mother has many faults, you don't want him to be a useless waste in the future. "
"Being strict is not a bad thing, but you are in a hurry."
"What do you think I should do?" Zhao Nanyu asked for her opinion seriously.
After thinking about it, Song Luan said, "Work and rest should be combined. You should still let him play. Don't punish him everytime, okay?"
Zhao Nanyu smiled, "Okay."
Song Luan was nervous and her palm was sweating profiously. Fortunately, Zhao Nanyu was not so unreasonable. He could also reasonably listen to her suggestions.
On second thought, if their relationship becomes better in the future, she could put the facts to reason with him, which should not be as difficult as it was now.
She couldn't help but want to say two words: Very Good!
Song Luan was in a good mood and ate more than one bowl of rice. Maybe she ate too much because the uncomfortable feeling came back.
While getting up, she was dizzy and out of breath. It immediately became dark in front of her. She couldn't stop her movement of falling.
Thanks to Zhao Nanyu's quick eyes, he stretched out his hand to her waist. His face was heavy and his black and white eyes were clear. He wanted to speak. Song Luan waved his hand. She first took a step and laughed dryly. "It's because I got up so quickly that I wasn't able to stand still."
After she stood firmly, she pushed his hand away silently. Song Luan didn't know what was wrong with her just now. The uncomfortable feeling was only for a moment, so she didn't pay attention to it after.
This body was empty originally, so it was not surprising that she fainted today.
Zhao Nanyu pinched her wrist and dragged her to the side. Her eyes were bright. He looked at her carefully and saw nothing wrong before releasing her. "If you are not comfortable, you have to say it. Don't bear it."
Song Luan thought to herself. Even if I have a minor illness or disaster, I dare not let you know. You want to poison me!
"I'm not a person who can endure." Her answer was so natural.
Zhao Nanyu whispered softly, "That's good. "
What's good? Song Luan didn't understand.
That night, she thought Zhao Nanyu would tell her about the matter of him leaving the capital, but he didn't. Song Luan laid straight on the bed for the night, and didn't bother to wait.
She didn't interfere with the main plot of the book. The plot line must not have changed, then the rest maybe Zhao Nanyu didn't plan to tell her.
All right. If you don't want to say it, don't say it.
Anyway, if he was about to leave, just hurry up and leave. Go meet your lovely, kind, and simple female lead, and then let me go.
The next day, Zhao Nanyu stayed at home.
The people in the residence who believed that their feelings have improved gradually changed their minds. In a few months, they could see clearly whether Song Luan really changed or not.
Zhao Nanyu spent most of the day away from her residence, either in Dali temple or in his study.
After taking care of Zhao Wenyan's affairs, third lady Zhao looked much better, and now she repeatedly reminded her to have children. Every night there was a vigil outside the house, so when Song Luan and Zhao Nanyu didn't spend much time in a room together, third lady Zhao naturally knew about it.
She didn't think it's Zhao Nanyu's problem. It must be Song Luan who refused to let him touch her. They were so indifferent in the room.
At the end of this month's family banquet, third lady Zhao secretly pulled Song Luan over to talk to her, "Ah Luan, you should be more considerate of Ah Yu. He really can't hold back his vigorous age. Moreover, you have been cold to him, which will chill his heart."
What third lady Zhao didn't say was that when the time comes that Ah Yu couldn't hold back and would find a concubine, Song Luan should not make trouble at that time.
Song Luan was really wronged. Zhao Nanyu didn't want to touch her, what could she do? Should she take off her clothes and rush to him? force him?
"Mother, I know it."
"Good."
Third lady Zhao didn't believe her. Song Luan felt that their relationship was so good now. If she had to have a relationship with Zhao Nanyu, she would have to sleep beside him as a woman. Who knew if she she could bear Zhao Nanyu's appearance on the bed.
Advertisements
That man naturally have very good abilities. She didn't want to die or be paralyzed in bed. If she could, she didn't want to do this.
Song Luan forgot what third lady Zhao said in two days. In addition, Zhao Nanyu had to leave the capital in a few days. She had a lot of ambition and became more courageous.
Looking for a good day, Song Luan came out the door wearing beautiful clothes. She was stupid to think that there was no one following behind her. She was free and unrestrained as she walked.
Song Heqing didn't expect to bump into his most disobedient sister in the restaurant.
Song Heqing and Song Luan were born to one mother, but was still kind to his other sisters.
The only thing that worried him was Song Luan.
He looked back at his sister on the lounge. His brain was dull, and he rubbed his eyebrows and told his servant "Go down and invite the third lady up. "
"Yes. "
Song Luan was confuse after being taken to Song Heqing. She saw the man in front of him shouted, "Brother".
They met on the day they returned, so Song Luan recognized him.
Song Heqing sighed, "You... I..I don't know what to say about you. It's only been few months since there was peace. To be honest, have you come out to find a man again today?"
Song Luan shook her head fiercely. "No, I came here to buy some rouge water powder and silk."
Song Heqing was dubious. Since his sister married, he had met her ten times outside. And those ten times, she always had a different man with her!
"Is it?" He waved impatiently, "Let's not talk about today... I heard that the slave you raised made trouble at the gate of Zhao residence a month ago! What are you doing?! Zhao Nanyu is not ugly, why can't you see it?! I don't ask you to die for him, but can't you give him face?"
There were not that many wild men in the capital, but there was no one as unabashed as her! Everyone in the capital knew.
Song Luan was bombarded by her brother. She felt wronged. She slapped the table, "He won't touch me. You are my brother. How can you blame me? I still feel angry!"
Song Heqing paled. He lowered his voice, and gnashed his teeth. "I don't believe you can't think of a way to let him touch you!"
His sister should be very good at it.
Song Luan's eyes widened. Wow, the Song family was something. Was her brother suggesting that she should give Zhao Nanyu an aphrodisiac?
Song Heqing waved to his entourage behind him and said two words in his ear. The entourage quickly left the room and came back soon. The man arrived with just a small bag with the medicine inside. Song Heqing lost all his face and put the medicine from his hand to her. "Take it. It's easy to use. If it's still doesn't work, I won't you stop from finding a wild man. Keep a low profile and don't go public."
Song Luan was stunned. At last, she knew why the original owner turned out like this. It was all because she was spoiled by the Song family.
The medicine in her hand was like a hot potato. Give this medicine to Zhao Nanyu? Was her brother crazy or was she stupid?
She dare not.
She was afraid Zhao Nanyu would eat her raw.
=============== Chapter 24
Song Heqing had something to do and didn't stay too long. He gave Song Luan a lot of money before he left.
Song Luan went downstairs after she had eaten and drunk enough in the private room. She bought a lot of things in the street at one breath. When her mood became better, she was reluctant to go back to the residence.
When she arrived home, she watched Zhao Nanyu standing under the bridge from afar. He stood quietly with his hands on his back, as if waiting for her. The man smiled at her gently and said, "You're back."
"Yes." After a pause, she said, "I also bought you a present. "
Zhao Nanyu was stunned for a moment, but didn't expect that he had his share in the things she bought today. He had a deep smile in the corner of his eyes, and politely thanked her.
Song Luan intentionally bought him a jade crown. Anyway, it's not wrong to be nice to the male lead. In fact, she didn't only buy things for him alone, but also for her son, and even Zhao Chao, he was after all the teacher of little Zhao. Although they didn't like each other very much, they didn't treat each other badly.
Zhao Nanyu raised his step and walked towards her, and now stood a closer distance. His tall body blocked her light and Song Luan's hair fluttered in the wind. He raised his hand and brushed her hair carefully, and said warmly, "I will go to Quzhou the day after tomorrow."
Song Luan was relieved. It seemed that the plot hadn't changed much because of her transmigrating. She was happy in her heart, and wanted him to go out quickly.
Go find your female lead, your little white flower is waiting for you!
Song Luan tried to hide her happiness and showed an indiffirent reaction, "Oh, good."
She raised her eyelids and looked at Zhao Nanyu's face quietly, and found that the man seemed not very happy.
After several months of getting along, Song Luan got a skill to accurately see Zhao Nanyu's mood. Although the smile on his face did not falter, she could see the falseness revealed in his smile.
Gee.. a man's heart is truly a needle on the bottom of the sea.
She didn't understand why he was unhappy again? She had only said two words since she came back.
Zhao Nanyu's eyes were always on her face, looking at her expression carefully. Unfortunately, he can't see any disappointment or worry from her face. The arc of his lips gradually fell down, and his smiled dropped by three points. At the moment, it was very clear that Song Luan didn't care about his journey.
This perception made Zhao Nanyu feel uncomfortable. His eyes darkened, and the sharp edge on his eyes was hidden. His five fingers under his sleeve slightly curled up into fist. He wanted her to go to Quzhou together.
Going from and to Quzhou would take about half a month. It didn't take long, but this time, Zhao Nanyu wanted to take her. Song Luan's heart thumped when she saw his eyes darkened. She was about to talk, but the man in front of her turned and entered the room, as if he didn't want to care any longer.
The two people remained silent in the room, and no one took the initiative to open their mouth. Zhao Nanyu sat in front of the window with a book in his hand. The lines of his chin were tight, his beautiful features were a little sharp, and his whole body was cold as ice.
Song Luan sat far away from him, cross legged on the soft coach. She took all the things she had just bought, and subdivided them.
Zhao Nanyu's remaining light silently watched her movements, his thin lips pursed into a straight line, and his expression gradually became cold.
She was really heartless.
Song Luan gave full play to the word "extravagance" when she went out this time. Aunt Lin gave her a lot of money when she went back to her mother's house. In addition, Song Heqing gave her a piece of silver, so she didn't lack money at all. She bought everything she liked.
She put the jewelry and clothes she bought for herself in the cabinet. She found the jade crown that she wanted to give to Zhao Nanyu, and held it in the palm of her hand for a long time with hesitation. She pulled back and forth her thoughts whether she would give or not.
Song Luan's eyes peeped at him, and found Zhao Nanyu's face was quite cold, which seemed even more unhappy than before. The air pressure in the bedroom was very low. She sighed and chose to continue sitting until Zhao Nanyu's face looked better.
She picked up a book casually from the bookshelf. The content on it was complicated and lengthy, so after reading it for a while, her little head couldn't control it and fell asleep.
Zhao Nanyu put down the book in his hand and silently took her actions into his eyes. The frost and snow between his eyebrows gradually melted. His face was not as heavy as before.
He remembered that Song Luan couldn't even read a few words. He also heard that when she was a child, she refused to study hard. Her studies were in a mess. She often made her teacher angry to the point that the teacher wanted to die.
They were married for four years, and he had never seen her read books before. Sure enough, she just pretended to read and had slept right after reading two pages.
Ater a moment, Song Luan's forehead knocked on the table. The pain woke her up. She rubbed her forehead, and subconsciously looked over Zhao Nanyu's side. The man looked down as if he didn't see the movement on her side.
Song Luan got down from the couch, grabbed the jade crown she bought, and walked to him. She coughed twice and refused to say more, "The jade crown I bought for you."
Zhao Nanyu took the thing and looked down, "It's very nice."
Song Luan thought that his face looked a little better after he got the gift from her. It was much better than the gloomy look. She nodded, "You like it."
Zhao Nanyu quietly took the jade crown. He looked up, thought for a moment, and said, "I have something to discuss with you. "
Zhao Nanyu thought that he might not be able to wait for Song Luan to bring up the matter of Quzhou. She didn't care from beginning to end, and didn't even ask when he would come back. Just now, she treated his anger like a joke.
Also, why bother with her so much. Zhao Nanyu decided to tell her.
Song Luan thought it was a trivial matter so she didn't care about what he's going to say, "What is it?"
Zhao Nanyu looked at her calmy: "You will go to Quzhou with me the next morning."
He said it was a discussion, but the tone of it was as if the decision was final.
Song Luan was dumbfounded for a long time. What's the matter with him? No, she refuse!
If the plot won't change, that means, the male lead would be ambushed on the way to Quzhou. He was seriously injured and got saved by the female lead.
What was she going to do? What if she died in the hands of an assassin! Besides, she didn't like to stay with Zhao Nanyu.
Song Luan wanted to shake her head, but she didn't dare to refuse in front of Zhao Nanyu's eyes. She said politely, "I haven't been far away. I'm afraid I'll drag you behind, and will delay your business."
As she talked longer, her voice gradually became lower. Zhao Nanyu looked at her with a smile. This made her hair stood up.
Song Luan gnawed her teeth and said, "What's more. If we are not home, who would take care of little Zhao?"
Zhao Nanyu's heart kept falling, and his eyebrows and eyes seemed to be covered with frost and snow. His expression became colder and colder.
However, the smile on the corner of his eyes and the tip of his eyebrows became deeper and deeper, which made him very penetrating.
He reached out his hand and touched her brow and asked, "You don't want to?"
Without waiting for her answer, Zhao Nanyu raised her chin slightly and said forcefully, "Even if you don't want to, you must still go."
He also kindly reminded her to pack up her luggage in advance.
Song Luan couldn't resist, and nodded with clenched teeth, "Well, then."
It took a long time for her to walk to the cabinet. She was about to prepapre all the clothes she had to wear, when her heart suddenly hurt.
The pain came suddenly and violently. Her white fingers tightly clasped the door of the cabinet. Song Luan's face was as white as paper, and her whole body was weak. Her throat hurt like a knife when she breathed.
Advertisements
She opened her mouth and wanted to call Zhao Nanyu's name. Before she could make a sound, her eyes gradually went black and she fainted.
She seemingly saw the man that was not far away from her changed his facial expression before striding towards her in a rush.
=============== Chapter 25
Glossary:
Huanhuan – This is the name of the aphrodisiac that Song Luan's brother gave her.
✯¸.•'*¨'*•✿ ✿•*'¨*'•.¸✯
Translated by: Tinker
Song Luan had a long dream. In the dream, she was a spectator outside the scenes. In the dream, there was a woman who often wore gorgeous and bright red clothes. Her face was extremely beautiful, her character was domineering, but her words were sharp and bitter.
The plots written in the book all happened. Her son broke his leg, and the silent child relied on crutches from then on. In the dream, she and Zhao Nanyu were almost strangers. She taunted and insulted him.
Zhao Nanyu was as cold as a stone. The violence between his eyebrows was thousands of times as strong as it was now. His eyes were bright and dark, and there was a fierce sense of killing aura in his heart. As the days passed, her situation became more and more sad. First, the Song family crumbled and Song Luan fell ill.
She couldn't even get up from the bed. There was a strong smell of medicine in the room, which couldn't be dispelled even by opening the window. She was lying on the bed with thin bones, pale face, and there was almost no blood on her lips. As if she would die the next seconds.
Her internal organs felt like it was being eaten, or being stirred inside with a knife, and even breathing became torture. She would like to die at once. It was not good if she was filled with medicine. She slept with pain every day.
Song Luan looked at the woman lying on the bed, whose eyes were sad and her heart was as dead as ashes, and inexplicably began to shed tears. She felt very sad in her dream.
The woman's bleak eyes seemed to look at her, and a smile appeared on her beautiful pale face. Song Luan thought that the woman saw her.
Suddenly, the man in dark blue came in slowly. The sound of boots coming nearer sounded like the bell of death.
The poor thin woman on the bed pulled up a hard smile, "Here you are."
The man looked down at her for a long time, then sighed with sympathy, "Uh, so pathetic."
The woman felt pain. The pain in her chest had never stopped. She seemed to live in a hell of endless pain. She opened her mouth and said weakly, "Kill me."
Zhao Nanyu looked at her calmly as she asked for him to kill her. He smiled and asked, "Does it hurt? "
How could it not hurt?
Every day, her limbs and her inner organs seem to be stabbed over and over by a knife. The pain was felt from the bottom of the foot to the back of the head. There was no place on her whole body that it didn't hurt. She had been suffering for three years.
"Zhao Nanyu, you are a bastard's child. Being born under a prositute woman, you can't escape the fact that you're born of sin." After she said this, she began to gasp heavily to relieve the pain in her chest.
The man smiled instead of anger.
As she wished, he had an exquisitely crafted dagger in his hand.
He helped her up, and the sharp point of the dagger pointed straight at her heart. With a sharp look in his eyes, Zhao Nanyu stabbed the dagger into her heart without hesitation. "Go die."
Song Luan woke up and was so scared that she hadn't recovered from her eyes for a long time. Just now, the dream seemed too real. She even suspected that the scene was when the original owner died.
Song Luan's eyes were staring at the top of the bed, the back of her head was numb, and her heart was blank.
She took a deep breath and gradually recovered from the fear in her dream. She slowly sat up, leaned on the pillow and remembered that she had just fainted.
Her hand unconsciously touched her heart. At this time, she didn't feel any pain or even any discomfort. But Song Luan still couldn't forget the sudden pain in her heart before fainting, like being stabbed with a needle in the softest part of her heart.
Song Luan's face was rather dignified. She knew that the male lead in the original book had given the original owner a slow-poison medicine. It seemed that the dog man poisoned her earlier than she thought.
Thinking of this, Song Luan's mind was bursting with thoughts of blood. She wanted to curse, but she swallowed her courage to scold the male lead. Isn't it just to survive?! She was so angry that she turned red around her eyes.
The residence... There was no one in the room. Song Luan wanted to share blood with Zhao Nanyu.
She forced herself to calm down. She thought about it. She would go out to see a doctor tomorrow. This body would still survive.
On second thought, if Zhao Nanyu had the poison, he should have the antidote in his hand. It would be impossible unless she coaxed him, would he give the antidote to her?
***
Zhao Chao was confused when Zhao Nanyu visited him. He didn't know what happened until he saw the woman lying unconscious in the bed. "What's the matter with second sister-in-law?"
Zhao Nanyu said in a hoarse voice, "Look after her."
For the first time, Zhao Chao saw that his second brother was nervous, and the cause was this woman named Song Luan, whom his second brother always hated. His heart sank, "Second brother....you will not "
Zhao Nanyu snapped at him, staring straight at him with black eyes. He was furious. "Don't talk nonsense, hurry up. "
Zhao Chao did not dare to delay any more. He sat down and began to feel the pulse for Song Luan, frowning slightly. Song Luan's pulse was normal. "She is fine."
Zhao Nanyu, with a black face, hardly looked away from her. He didn't believe Zhao Chao. He said in a cold voice, "She just suddenly fainted. She couldn't stand straight and couldn't speak. And you told me she's fine now? Hmm?"
He had to admit that the moment when Song Luan suddenly fell in front of him, his heart became nervous, even scared.
Since two years ago, Song Luan had been drinking porridge every morning with the poison he ordered. He only guessed that those medicine had worked, but he already stopped ordering from them a few months ago.
Zhao Chao was full of innocence. "Second brother, I know what you are doubting, but there is no problem in her pulse. Tell me again, what did she look like when she fainted? "
"She covered her heart."
"Maybe it's palpitation."
Zhao Chao also had no choice. His medical skills were not bad. He learned from a famous family and was talented. He saved countless lives. There was no reason why he couldn't make a diagnosis and treatment on Song Luan.
What's more, the second brother got the poison medicine from him. Symptoms such as heart pain didn't coincide with poisoning.
"Do you have any antidotes?" Zhao Nanyu suddenly asked him.
Zhao Chao put out his hand. "That's my master's medicine. I'll ask him when he travels back to capital." He also saw that his second brother's attitude towards Song Luan was different. After thinking about it, he said a few words of relief. "Second brother, you don't have to worry too much. The medicine is very strange. It won't work without the right amount in the next three or five years. "
After seeing off Zhao Chao, Zhao Nanyu stood under the corridor for a long time. He looked up and looked at the distance with quiet eyes. He didn't know what he was thinking.
The cold wind fluttered his clothes. His fingers were cold. He heard the movement in the room. He turned and entered the room. Song Luan sat on the edge of the bed barefoot, her expression was silly, and her pale face was flushed red.
He went over and crouched down in good temper to put on her shoes for her. Then he raised his face, his eyes were soft and watery, and looked at her quietly. He asked, "Is there any discomfort? "
Song Luan shook her head. "No. "
It's true. She felt good and there was no pain.
Zhao Nanyu sighed, "That's good." Then he asked, "What would you like to eat? "
Song Luan's stomach was really empty, so she felt hungry. She opened her eyes and looked at him brightly. "I want to have porridge. "
She simply felt that it was better for her health to eat light food.
Zhao Nanyu's fingers in the air paused, his eyes drooped, his face was hard to distinguish, and after silence he said, "I let the kitchen stew chicken soup for you to eat."
Advertisements
"That will do." As long as it's light and nourishing, she could accept it. Zhao Nanyu got up and prepared to bring chicken soup. Song Luan reached out and grabbed his clothes. He looked back. "What's the matter? "
Song Luan tried to look calm while pretending to ask him casually, "What happened to me just now? Did a doctor come?"
Zhao Nanyu touched her face, a little fondly, "Yes, they said you're fine."
Song Luan's expression almost faltered. She wanted to stretch out her hand and scratch his face. She didn't believe it!
"Really? I'm... Healthy?" She asked, gritting her teeth.
"Well, take it easy."
It was really hard for Song Luan to speak up and take it easy after being poisoned.
She wanted to tear Zhao Nanyu's face, but the plot in her dream still left her with lingering fear. She didn't want to experience the feeling that she was in pain all the time and couldn't sleep.
Song Luan got out of bed and drank a large bowl of chicken soup in front of Zhao Nanyu. She could eat, drink, and jump with no discomfort.
Song Luan couldn't help but think that she might misunderstood Zhao Nanyu. Maybe this wasn't poison but just simple fainting?
Song Luan was still not at ease. She put down her chopsticks and looked at Zhao Nanyu in her wet eyes. She called out to him, "Ah Yu.."
Zhao Nanyu's body suddenly froze, his breath sank, his fingers trembled, and his eyes were dark.
It's sweet.
He wanted her to continue to call him 'Ah Yu' a hundred times more.
Song Luan raised a sweet smile on the corner of her mouth. She opened her mouth and continued to say to him, "I think it's clear. Let's go to Quzhou together. I want to stay with you and not leave you."
Oh, she's going to vomit herself.
Song Luan also learned to be smart. In the past half month, he had a good relationship with Zhao Nanyu. It's not a bad thing for him to like her more.
It's better for him to be able to put his three spirits and five principles into his mind, so he would definitely not want to kill her.
Zhao Nanyu pulled her into her arms and touched the corner of her mouth with her soft lips. "No."
Zhao Nanyu changed his mind and couldn't let her follow him. He pinched her waist and bit her on the corner of her mouth. "Just take good care of yourself at home."
Song Luan really wanted to slap away the man who was close her. The dog man took advantage of her and wouldn't even let her get her wish.
With Song Luan 's understanding of him, she couldn't expect to cultivate a relationship of adversity with him on the way to Quzhou.
Song Luan thought of the package of Huanhuan given by her brother. She completely decided to let it go, and planned to give it to him tomorrow night.
If you can't get his heart, you have to get his body first.
Let him be reluctant to kill her.
=============== Chapter 26
Glossary:
Huanhuan – This is the name of the aphrodisiac that Song Luan's brother gave her.
✯¸.•'*¨'*•✿ ✿•*'¨*'•.¸✯
Translated by: Tinker
Song Luan didn't sleep well all at night. She kept tossing and turning. In the middle of the night, she was still lying on the bed with her eyes open. She didn't dare to move. She was afraid to disturb the man on her side.
Her mouth still hurts, there were still fine wounds on her lips that Zhao Nanyu just bit. Song Luan didn't like to curry favor with the male lead before she fainted. Even if she knew the final ending of the original owner, she just wanted to get along with him well, and didn't make any more mistakes. She never wanted to flatter and grovel in front of him.
As the saying goes – when you lick a dog, you get nothing.
But now the situation was grim, she had to seduce Zhao Nanyu. It's better to get his heart, so she didn't have to worry all day about being killed by him.
Zhao Nanyu had a beautiful appearance, exquisite brows, and looked as elegant as painting. She had nothing to lose going to bed with him! But to be honest, Song Luan wanted to throw away the medicine her brother gave before. Fortunately, she didn't.
When Zhao Nanyu touched and kissed her body last time, he could still control himself. He even closed her clothes and did nothing to her after.
If she didn't use this medicine, and wait until Zhao Nanyu was willing to touch her, it would already be the year of the monkey!
Song Luan thought about things and gradually fell asleep. In just a few hours, she had many fine dreams, and each fragments were presented in her mind. It's a pity that when she woke up, she forgot everything and didn't remember a single dream.
It's rare that she woke up before it got dark. Zhao Nanyu stood in front of the bed, his back was facing her, and he was dressing his clothes. He slowly put up his clothes and when he turned around, he saw her sleepy eyes. The clothes on her shoulders slid down, and her skin was bright and white. Zhao Nanyu couldn't help it, but leaned over and kissed her. "You can sleep a little longer."
Song Luan nodded. She was still sleepy. Both her eyes and brain hurt. It was the kind of pain that came from staying up all night. She rubbed her temples, and the tone of her voice was still lingering. "Okay, I know. "
Zhao Nanyu didn't put the light on. The room wasn't very bright. He covered the quilt for her. Then he went to the outside room. Before he left, he ordered not to disturb her.
Song Luan rolled two times on the bed, and rolled out of the bed in good clothes. Her belly was white. She sat in front of the dressing table and yawned. She drew a light make-up for herself. After finishing, she asked the servant girl to come in and fix her hair.
Song Luan was still gorgeous, but her eyes looked less brighter.
After dressing up, she couldn't wait and grabbed the money bag and went out. She strictly forbid the servant girls in the residence not to follow. Her fierce appearance was very intimidating and frightened the servants. Obviously, no one followed her. No one dared to ask where she was going or what she was going to do.
Song Luan went to the street and inquired about the best medicine hall in the capital. She went to the rank of famous doctors to see them for herself. Many people come to see those famous doctors every day. Just after the door opened in the early morning, the front of the medicine hall was already full of people.
She stood at the end of the line, praying silently for herself, hoping that she wasn't poisoned.
Song Luan walked into the hospital with tension. The doctor asked her to sit down politely. She didn't know if she was too sensitive. She always felt that the doctor's eyes were different from those of others.
She reached over and the doctor closed his eyes.
After a while, the fingers on her pulse moved away slowly. Song Luan couldn't wait to ask, "What is it like? What's wrong with me, doctor? "
"There is no abnormality in the lady's pulse. The body is just weak. Go back and take two doses of tonic."
Song Luan was still uneasy, and stretched out her left hand again, "Or would you like to see the pulse of this hand again? Traditional Chinese medicine pays attention to listening the pulse. Doctor, take a good look at me." She continued with a dignified look, "My heart and mouth ached yesterday, and my premonition was very bad. Doctor, please tell me the truth. "
The doctor stroked his beard and said in silence, "Did lady feel extreme pain before?"
Song Luan nodded.
"Is it still painful now? "
Song Luan also nodded.
...The doctor thought for a while and told her, "Lady has a poison in her body."
Song Luan's heart and knees were cold. It's too late. This body was already poisoned.
Wuwuwu! Zhao Nanyu lied to her last night!
Seeing that her face was white, the doctor hurriedly said, "Don't worry, lady. This time your palpitation is not caused by the poison. The reason why I didn't tell you that it's poisonous is because it's harmless. "
Song Luan's eyes brightened. "What does that mean? "
"I can't diagnose what kind of poison it is at the moment, but the amount of this medicine in your body is not much, and it will take a certain time for the attack. As long as you don't continue to take it, there should be no problem in your body. "
Song Luan asked anxiously, "Don't you know what kind of medicine it is? That is to say, you don't have an antidote?"
The doctor nodded.
Song Luan's fingers were colder than before. She felt a little sad and wanted to cry.
Now it seems that there was no other way but to coax Zhao Nanyu to give her the antidote.
Before the doctor had finished saying, "As for the sudden palpitation of the lady yesterday, maybe you haven't had a good rest recently. Pay more attention to your rest, and it will be fine."
Song Luan gloomily said thanks to the doctor, and went out of the hospital with no idea after paying the doctor's fee.
After she left, the doctor looked at his back and shook his head. He sighed to the children around him, "I don't know whether this lady's life is good or not. "
Before she came in to see the doctor, a young man had first let someone greet him and told him not to say what he shouldn't say. He guessed that what he had just said with the lady had been sent to the second young master of the Zhao family without a word.
Song Luan was still surprised by the fact that she had been poisoned. She didn't hurt her son or scold Zhao Nanyu as a mean son of a prostitute this time. How could this person do it to her?
After careful analysis, she came to think of the most important characteristics of being an overbearing young master. The possessive desire imposed a paranoid personality that couldn't tolerate his wife's indifference.
He must be the only one who owns his woman's mind and body. He should be in charge of life and death. Emotions and joys. Just like the female lead, after marrying him, she only had a few days out in this life, and there were many people hiding behind, watching her every move.
Song Luan shuddered at the thought, felt the chill throughout her body.
This kind of life which only relies solely on Zhao Nanyu to live is terrible.
After returning to the residence, Song Luan locked herself in her room the whole afternoon, and then gradually figured it out. Anyway, the doctor also said that the poison was not deep enough, as long as she didn't eat it anymore poison, she would be okay.
Looking at the Hehuan in the drawer, she thought it was really a good thing. Maybe after tonight, Zhao Nanyu would fall in love with her and wouldn't be able to hurt her in the future.
She really didn't want to die, and she didn't want to die in such pain.
Song Luan asked people to prepare good wine. For the first time, she didn't have any experience in medication. She poured half a bag of Hehuan powder into the bottle with shaking hands. She felt her chin and thought that the dosage should be almost the same.
This bottle of wine is not only for Zhao Nanyu, but also for herself. She's going to drink it. She's brave and doesn't give her way back. She raised her hand and shook the wine. Then she puts the tip of her nose together to make sure it's colorless and tasteless.
Maybe it was because he was going to Quzhou the next day, Zhao Nanyu came back from Dali Temple very early that day, and came directly to her residence as soon as he came back.
Zhao Nanyu felt that during these days, she only stayed by his side, even if she didn't say anything. He silently observed her every move and kept it in his mind. Without him knowing, she had already occupied a big part in his heart.
Advertisements
Song Luan took the initiative to come over. She smiled at him sweetly. "Ah Yu."
Zhao Nanyu squeezed the brush in his hand and tightened his back. "Yes."
"I heard that there are many beautiful women in Quzhou. When you arrive, you won't like other girls, will you? "
Zhao Nanyu looked up at her and said, "I won't."
Song Luan's smile was even sweeter. If she had a tail behind her, it would already be wagging. "You are so good!"
Zhao Nanyu's heart moved. He couldn't help touch her face. She smiled at him in the sunshine. She looked so beautiful.
After two people finished their dinner together, Song Luan summoned up her courage and suddenly stopped him, "I want to drink. "
Zhao Nanyu had seen her drunk state more than once. He frowned.
Before he refused, Song Luan had put the glass on the table and poured two the wine in each glass quickly.
Her palms were sweaty. She took the glass and handed it to him. "Would you like to have a drink with me? "
Zhao Nanyu took the glass and was stunned. Then he hooked up his lips and smiled. "Okay."
He raised his neck and poured the wine into his throat. The stone in Song Luan's heart landed steadily. She bit her teeth and poured her cup and into her stomach.
Zhao Nanyu looked at her meaningfully and smiled deeply in the corner of his eyes. He couldn't see what was put in the glass. He just wanted to see what Song Luan wanted to do.
The candlelight was shining on her bright white face, and soon the effect of the medicine began to play. Song Luan was weak. She could not stand on the table until her hands were leaning on the table. The bright red lips were bitten by her. Looking at the pale man in front of her, she swallowed her saliva and said stupidly, "I'm a little hot."
Zhao Nanyu's black eyes were nailed to her face, and there was no reply.
Song Luan couldn't stand it. The effect was too strong. Her brain was not clear.
Song Luan was not aggrieved. She looked very pitiful. She sniffed and was about to cry. She tugged at his clothes, as if begging him, "What should I do?"
"Help me."
Zhao Nanyu grabbed her chin, and his cold fingers made Song Luan felt very comfortable. She unconsciously rubbed against his palm,
He chuckled and sucked the tear from the corner of her eyes. "Don't cry now, you will cry later."
The woman in his arms trembled with fear.
=============== Chapter 27
It was deep in the middle of the night, and the movement in the room had not stopped.
The night maid listened to the faint cry from the room. Her face blushed red. She sympathized with the madam and was a little envious. The master didnt look like a person that could toss around vigorously. Sure enough, you can't judge a person by their appearance.
Song Luan felt that she was going to die. She was not far away from her death. At last, she cried out shamlessly. She begged and cried out in tears. Gradually, Song Luan realised that whenever she begged him, Zhao Nanyu would become more and more active. The man bit her earlobe and smiled softly, as if laughing at her ignorance.
She was a fish on a chopping board. She couldn't fight back.
When the two people stopped in the middle of the night, Song Luan was too tired that she couldn't lift her hand. The feeling was like lifting a stone and smashing her foot. Although she felt exhausted to death, she couldn't bear to sleep. She opened her eyes laboriously. Zhao Nanyu pulled the quilt up on her body. He looked at her with warmth and gentleness. "Why don't you sleep?"
Song Luan also wanted to sleep, but she couldn't. She asked, "Can you take me with you to Quzhou?"
"You stay at home. "
Song Luan put the quilt over her head and covered her face. She was not very happy.
Dog man still taking advantage of her.
Zhao Nanyu's face was a little heavy. After he thought for a while, his face was still not very good. How could he not see just now that Song Luan did everything just so she could go to Quzhou. Even there was no love with those men she entangled with.
There's no love.
Zhao Nanyu's heart was uncomfortable. It was very painful.
Song Luan's eyes were slightly red, and there was a mist of water in front of her eyes. She said cautiously, "I vaguely feel uncomfortable recently. Can you help me find a doctor again? I still cherish my life. You don't want me to...."
Zhao Nanyu interrupted her without permission, "I know. "
Song Luan went around and told him that she didn't want to die ambiguously. She said all these with so much politeness because she didn't want Zhao Nanyu to know that she had discovered the poison.
She added, "I'm afraid of pain and death. "
Zhao Nanyu smiled at her, but the smile on the corner of his mouth was a little ugly. He said, "Don't talk nonsense, it won't hurt you. "
There was a sneer in his eyes, and he suddenly understood how Song Luan suddenly threw herself to him so enthusiastically.
He was told that she went out early this morning to see another doctor.
Song Luan didn't know how many people he had arranged in the dark. Her every move could not be concealed from his eyes. It turned out that she knew about her poisoning, and then wanted him to help her detoxify, so she was willing to laugh at him and lie in a bed with him.
No wonder it didn't feel like she likes him with her eyes. This was done everything just to achieve her goal.
But it's okay to use him. It's important to use him.
Zhao Nanyu could have asked the doctor to hide her poisoning, but he didn't. In his opinion, as long as Song Luan didn't know who poisoned her, it would be fine.
"That's what you said. You can't lie to me." Song Luan was in a better mood at last, and was guaranteed to be overjoyed.
"Not lying to you."
Now how could he still let her die, Zhao Nanyu couldn't wait to be in one body with her.
There was a carriage waiting at the front door of Zhao's residence. Before Zhao Nanyu left, he took off the jade plate that was around his waist, and gently placed it beside her pillow. He bowed his head and kissed her forehead before leaving.
That jade pendant was a relic left by his mother, who had already left him for more than 20 years.
The fog was still heavy in the early morning. Zhao Nanyu said in a cold voice to the man hiding in the dark, "Look after her."
"Yes."
When Song Luan woke up, the warmth around her had long been gone. She sat up with difficultly and was breathing in pain. The traces of blue and purple looked scary.
Bah, Zhao Nanyu was a beast.
Fortunately, she didn't suffer in vain last night. She also got a promise from Zhao Nanyu. Although the man was vicious, he still kept his words. She could relax for a while.
Song Luan rested on the pillow for a long time. A servant girl outside began to knock on the door. "Madam, are you awake?"
"I'm dressing. Don't come in. "
"Yes. "
It took Song Luan a long time to dress. Her legs trembled when her feet touched the ground. She scolded Zhao Nanyu in her heart again. She had a psychological shadow in her heart because of his actions.
At a glance, she saw the jade pendant beside the pillow. She took it and looked at it carefully. She seemed to doubt that she had read it wrong.
Song Luan rubbed her eyes and looked at it carefully again. She was sure that it was Zhao Nanyu's most precious jade pendant.
Song Luan's psychological pressure suddenly increased. Not that she was being arrogant, but she felt that the weight of this jade plate was more important than Zhao Nanyu's heart.
She put the jade pendant back in place, thinking that Zhao Nanyu was too anxious to go out and left it at home. Anyway, she didn't dare to touch it.
The sunshine outside was brighter than any days. People couldn't open their eyes freely because of the strong golden rays. Song Luan just had lunch, and little Zhao came to find her to play the chess game they played last time.
The child was still embarrassed to express himself. After a long time of embarrassment, he rubbed at her trouser legs in a red face and says, "Mother, I want to play chess with you. "
Song Luan had nothing to do today. She touched her nose, smiled and replied, "Okay. "
Little Zhao was generally interested in everything. He didn't really like playing chess, but he came to her with an excuse to play chess so he could get closer to her.
The sun was too strong, Song Luan hugged him and went inside the residence. She now felt the struggle to hold her son. The child grew very fast, he was heavier than before.
He climbed on the bench and straightened his back. Song Luan wanted to laugh every time she saw him act mature. This little adult.
"Do you want to eat? "
"I came here on a full stomach." He replied seriously, with a straight face.
Song Luan nodded, "Okay." She smiled and pinched the flesh on his face. "Would you like to have dinner with me tonight? Do you want mother to cook the duck soy sauce for you?"
He didn't have a strong taste and didn't eat duck soy sauce, but if it was made by his mother, he would like to eat.
He nodded seriously. "Okay."
Advertisements
He liked her, but was embarrassed to say it. Every time he come to find his mother, he had a lot of words to say, but is always stuck in his throat.
He would just stare at her, obediently and docilely. He would do whatever her mother wanted.
After two games of chess, it was time for lunch break.
After coaxing her son to sleep, she planned to go to the kitchen to prepare the ingredients for braised duck with soy sauce. At last, the sun outside the window became gentle. She stretched her waist and was about to go to the kitchen, but suddenly, a head appeared on the wall. Song Luan stared at him with round eyes.
All of a sudden, there were many fragments of scenes appeared in her mind.
"What's your name? "
"Huai Jin. "
"I've bought you. You should listen to me. "
"Okay." The young man stared at the gorgeous beauty in front of him, and there was a flower blooming in his heart.
**
"Ah Luan, your husband is so fierce. Why do I think he wants to kill me. "
**
The beautiful young man sat in the high courtyard wall and looked at the quiet man with a smile. "Ah, second young master, you are not worthy of our Ah Luan. Don't look for her. She is still sleeping. She was too tired last night. "
**
"Ah Luan, wait for me. I will find a way to save your life and kill the dog man."
**
Finally, the scene ended on the young man with blood. He fell on the way to find the antidote for her. He was frozen to death in the ice and snow. His eyes were wide open as he died.
Song Luan suddenly returned to her consciousness. There were many memories in her mind that do not belong to her. In 'The Powerful Minister', only the original owner and the men that surrounded her were not clear. Their names were not written.
She said doubtfully, "Huai Jin? "
The man jumped down from the wall and turned around her. "Do you want to die, Ah Luan! You didn't come to see me for so many days. I thought you died in another man's bed! "
Song Luan's mouth twitched, so Huai Jin subconsciously answered, "I have become a good man "
Huai Jin chuckled and pointed to her neck directly. "Did that dog nibble your neck? I thought I'll go blind."
"I dared to come in when I heard your husband was away. The dead man was so vicious that I was almost killed by him last time."
Song Luan asked, "You looked for me. What's the matter?"
"Take a look." The expression on his face turned sharply, and he waved his sleeve fiercely. It seemed that he was losing his temper.
Huai Jiin squinted at her. "No, this traces of mark won't come off easily, right?"
Song Luan knew he was right when she didn't make a sound. He was angry. He pointed at her and said, "Didn't you say you want to leave him? How can you change your mind!"
"I'll be with you, but not now." Song Luan thought of the tragic death of Huai Jin in the future, but she didn't have the heart to be too cruel to him.
In fact, she didn't think that the original owner was such a scum, how could the luck of peach blossom not be bad?
Huai Jin turned a white eye at her. "You want to have another child for him and then leave? Wow you are so great."
Song Luan thought how poisonous this man's words were. He clearly liked the original owner, but he pretended to be free and easy.
"Huai Jin, I have something else to do. Why don't you get out of the wall?" She whispered to him.
Huai Jin's face was green, and he gnawed his teeth. "I'm leaving, hmp! You, You must remember to come to me."
Song Luan was not going to look for him, but Huai Jin just said something that reached her heart.
She wanted to run. But she couldn't think of thoughts like this for now...
She had to make up for the mistakes of the past, then go far away after being at peace with Zhao Nanyu. In the future, they would just mind their own business. This was the best solution for a couple who was forced to marry.
But the feeling of not being able to escape was annoying.
She looked up at the sky and thought wistfully. She didn't know if Zhao Nanyu had met the female lead now.
=============== Chapter 28
Translated by: Tinker
The mountain path was shaded by trees. The carriage was traveling on a bumpy road. They took the road that were not known to most people. No travellers were in vicinity except for them. The sound of rolling wheels was accompanied by the rustling wind and the swaying leaves.
The carriage suddenly stopped halfway. The coachman in the carriage suddenly screamed. He yanked the rope to a halt. He stared at the murderous man in black in front, and could not speak clearly, "Master...Master, ahead.."
The man didn't wait for the driver to finish his speech. A cold light flashed, and the sharp blade had cut his throat.
With a sneer, the men in black immediately came to the carriage with swords.
Zhao Nanyu didn't panic, and flew over the sword tip that was coming to him. He noticed he had a long sword in his hands and had no idea where this came from.
He laughed at the men in black, seeming not worried that he could get away from this predicament.
Zhao Nanyu was surrounded, their knives pointed straight at him. These people had made poison vows to take his life.
They are trained dead men, and they were either going to die or not.
The sword was stretched and the crossbow was drawn.
Zhao Nanyu had long known that the road to Quzhou would not go smoothly. No one in Dali Temple wanted to take over the mess of the murdered governer Quzhou. The old emperor seemed to deliberately gave this case to him.
Quzhou could be a regarded as a cold place with high mountains and long rivers. It was normal for officials to protect each other. The magistrate that replaced the previous was cunning. Within three months, he had cleared a group of local merchants and small officials around him.
It's not impossible to deal with the embezzlement of offcials and businessmen.
Zhao Nanyu, who went to investigate the case, naturally would not be welcoming. If he found something, Quzhou's officials would have to be replaced again. So the people behind the scenes certainly didn't want him to arrive in Quzhou alive.
After the intense swords clashing, Zhao Nanyu's white clothes were splashed with bright red blood. He was like an asura in hell. He looked at the lying corpses who came to kill him. His body was also stabbed with many wounds, so he was only able to stand with the support of his sword. He was fortunately not hurt badly.
Zhao Nanyu's knees fell straight on the stone road with a sound of a 'bang'. His brow wrinkled with pain. He gasped for breath and endured the sharp pain from the wound. He didn't emit any sound.
Suddenly, he heard a voice coming from the grass. Zhao Nanyu squeezed the sword handle in his hand, thinking it was the fish that had leaked from the net. He was ready to raise the sword and kill him.
A young girl with a round face wearing pink clothes suddenly rushed out with a medicine basket in her hand. The girl's appearance was not excellent compared with other beautiful women. She knelt down in front of Zhao Nanyu, frowned, and looked at the wound on him. "Are you okay? "
Zhao Nanyu still held the sword handle tightly, and there was cold light in his eyes, "It's okay."
The girl stared at the man in front of her. She had never seen such a beautiful man since she was born.
Although there was blood on his face at the moment, it did not hinder his excellent appearance.
The girl swallowed her saliva, bit her lower lip and said, "You are injured. I have medicine here. I can help you. "
Zhao Nanyu lowered his eyes, raised his eyelids again, and looked at her coldly. His eyes were obviously murderous. He spit out a word, "Go away."
The young girl was not discouraged and did not give up. Even though her eyes were red, she pretended to be strong. "I am not a bad person. I just want to save you. If you bleed like this, you will die."
Zhao Nanyu only felt that she deliberately squeezed her voice and pretended to be aggrieved, which made him nauseous. He laughed in a low voice and his smile coul penetrate people. "Go away, or I will stab you to death with a sword."
The girl was so scared that her face paled. She didn't doubt the truthfulness of his words, and was very aggrieved that she bit her lower lip. She looked at him pitifully, but saw the killing intention in his eyes were even worse. She quickly stood up and ran away.
***
All of these... Song Luan, who was far away in the capital, naturally didn't know. She thought the man and the woman had fallen in love at first sight! She didn't expect that the female lead would become a cannon fodder so easily.
She was busy cooking, and had time to think freely after making good dishes that her son loves to eat. Song Luan felt that something had changed since her fainting, just like when she saw Huai Jin today. Many plots that she had not read in the book were all drilled into her brain, which caused her to feel some pain.
The more she thought about it, the more painful it became. Song Luan simply chose not to think of this anymore.
The sky in the distance gradually darkened. After the sun went down, the weather suddenly became cold. Song Luan went back to the house and added a piece of clothes. Later, she went to the room to wake up her son.
After entering the room, she found that the child had woken up. A four-year-old child, who was still sleepy, didn't know want to do. Despite his refusal, Song Luan dressed his clothes one by one and patted his head, "How was your sleep?"
Little Zhao nodded honestly, "Good."
He seldom sleeps long during naps. But everytime he sleeps in his mother's room, his sleep would become particularly sweet.
Song Luan found that she really liked the child more and more. Her patience became better in front of him. "I'll take you to wash your face, and then we can have dinner together, Okay? "
She would always ask questions when talking to children. She wanted to fully respect her child's opinions. No matter what she asked, there was always only one good answer. He never contradicted nor refuse.
His father seldom asked his opinion. He always made the decisions before asking him.
Little Zhao used to think that he only liked his father. Now, he liked both his father and mother very much. It would be nice if this would stay like this all his life.
He held his mother's hands and asked what was in his heart, "Mother, will I have brothers and sisters in the future?"
He was not afraid of being alone, but he was still a chilld after all. He would occasionally envy his cousins who gathered to play together. He also wanted to have brothers and sisters so that they could play together. He would work hard to protect them in the future.
Song Luan didn't know how to answer him. She thought sadly, how good would it be if the male lead and the original owner were a loving couple. But the husband and wife were not normal people. The man was cruel and ruthless, and the original owner was also vicious and heartless.
She was looked at by her son's soft and cute eyes, and her soft heart turned into a pool of water directly, "There will be some."
Nonsense. Probably not.
At the end of 'The Powerful Minister', she didn't see Zhao Nanyu and other women had children. Even the female lead didn't have the honor. Based on Song Luan's many years of experience with an overbearing male lead, she reasonably speculated that the reason why Zhao Nanyu didn't want another children was because he was reluctant to let the female lead pass the ghost gate, or let her suffer pain.
Little Zhao's eyes curved with a smile and said seriously, "I will be a good brother."
Song Luan was amused by him. "Brother is very powerful."
The little child blushed red, and it reached his ears. They were very hot.
Song Luan made him blush, and laughed. She thought that if she really had a chance to stay away from the male lead in the future, she would be very reluctant since her son was sensible and obedient.
In the evening meal, Song Luan wished to put all the delicious food on the table into the stomach of her son. She fed him until he was full. She really didn't understand how the original owner was able to watch this child break his legs.
Not all stepmothers were cruel.
Thinking of this, Song Luan was more fond of her son. She fed him and played games with him. After an hour, she told the servants to fetch water and plan to personally give him bath.
Little Zhao's little hand clutched her skirt, refused to let her take off his clothes. He blushed and wanted to take a bath by himself.
Song Luan could not resist him, so she went away unease. She waited outside and called his name from time to time, for fear that he would choke the water and not make a sound.
Advertisements
Zhao Nanyu was not at home, so her son lived with her this time. She wanted to do what she always wanted. At night, she asked the people in the front yard to bring over little Zhao's pajama and bedding, and let him sleep in her room for one night.
When preparing the bed, Song Luan caught a glimpse of the jade pendant that she had put beside her pillow. She carefully picked it up and thought about it. After all, this was Zhao Nanyu's treasure, and it was the only relic left by his mother. It was better to lock it in the cabinet so as not to make mistakes.
In the absence of Zhao Nanyu, Song Luan had a very happy life. She ate two bowls of rice every day. The days were very good.
Third lady Zhao seemed to know that they had finally shared the same room again. She was very pleased. She called her to talk several days in a row. Because of this, Song Luan met Zhao Wenyan several times, but the two brother and sister in-laws did not greet each other when they met, pretending to be worse than strangers.
Zhao Wenyan didn't hate this sister-in-law so much than before. He heard that she stayed at home safely for a while, didn't go out to make trouble and didn't disgrace his second brother. She was willing to give her husband a good face.
But Song Luan couldn't see him at all in her eyes. She regarded Zhao Wenyan as a younger brother who was ignorant. After he came out of the shock of being defeated, she didn't plan to communicate with him.
When Zhao Wenyan saw that she ignored him, he became strangely sullen, thinking that women were fickle.
When the meal was half eaten, he threw his chopsticks away and left his mother's yard in a huff. Third lady Zhao felt that his son had been really spoiled by her. He was already old and still had a child's temper.
It took another half a month for Zhao Nanyu to come back from Quzhou.
He came back later than expected. Song Luan heard that something happened on the way. She guessed nervously that maybe the female lead appeared, and the two were chirping on the road and got delayed.
However, when Zhao Nanyu's carriage stopped at the door of his residence, the curtain of the carriage opened, and he was the only one who came down from it.
Song Luan was confused. Hey, what about the female lead???
She looked around for a long time and didn't see a woman!
Why was the female lead gone?!!
Zhao Nanyu's face was sickly white and coughed several times. He looked at her funny and asked, "What are you looking for? "
Song Luan shook her head. "Nothing."
Zhao Nanyu beckoned to her, "Come here, give me a hand. "
She ran over and said, "What's the matter with you? Are you hurt?"
Zhao Nanyu coughed several more times, his pale face turned red gradually, his face was weak, and he made a low hum.
Song Luan's mind circled. The plot had not changed! But the female lead?
Zhao Nanyu clenched her wrist and glanced over her with a light tone, pretending to ask casually, "Why aren't you wearing the jade pendant I gave you?"
Song Luan was dumbfounded. That is, the most precious jade plate of the man who kills without a thought, was given to her? She didn't believe it.
"That jade pendant is too precious. You'd better keep it yourself." She said weakly.
Zhao Nanyu stopped, pinched her hand, and smiled, "Put it on around you with a red rope, okay?"
It was clearly said with a gentle tone, but her scalp tingled when she listened.
=============== Chapter 29
Song Luan didn't know was going on. The plot of the original book was distorted because Zhao Nanyu didn't follow the original path. She was a bit at a loss.
In fact, Song Luan was deeply impressed with the jade pendant in the book 'The Powerful Minister', because it was written that after Zhao Nanyu became an important minister in court, many women wanted to climb his bed. Once, there was a woman who failed to climbed the bed who rushed away leaving, but because she was in a hurry, she broke the jade pendant with her feet, and it shattered.
The woman's family background was not high nor low, and her father was a fourth-rank official. In an instant, Zhao Nanyu dragged her out the room and killed her.
No one in the court dared to stand as his opponent. He was capricious and ruthless. They didn't fight back against him.
If he wants to kill, then kill.
And, in almost at the end of the book, Song Luan didn't see who the male lead gave this piece of jade. Even the female lead couldn't get it. He had always been wearing it close to his body for ten years.
All of a sudden, Zhao Nanyu wanted to give her such a precious thing. How could Song Luan not panic?
Since he said he wanted her to wear it, the paranoid and overbearing character of his certainly wouldn't allow her to take it off in the future.
One of the reasons why Song Luan wasn't brave was that she was careless. If incase she would break it one day, Zhao Nanyu would kill her like that woman. How pitiful.
However, what she didn't understand was why would Zhao Nanyu be willing to give this jade pendant to her? Why??
She was sure that it was impossible for him to like her.
Was there any other reason? She couldn't think of anything anymore.
Facing Zhao's dark eyes, she replied tensely, "Okay."
Zhao Nanyu seemed to be satisfied with her answer. His fingers brushed her cheek gently, and his eyes curved and smiled.
Song Luan felt scared and cold in her heart every time she saw him smile gently to her.
Back in the bedroom, Zhao Nanyu asked people to take a few red strings. He then sat down, bowed his head, and began to weave the ropes seriously. His drooping eyes were particularly beautiful and gentle, which could confuse people.
For a while, even Song Luan herself was stunned. She didn't expect Zhao Nanyu would make a red rope. His slender and white fingers were extremely flexible. He made the rope in three or two strokes.
Then he raised his face and looked at her and said, "Take the jade pendant. "
Song Luan walked to the cabinet, opened it, and took out the jade pendant from the sachet. She reluctantly pass it to him.
Zhao Nanyu put the red rope into the small hole of the jade pendant, and then stood up. He was tall and slender. Song Luan just reached his shoulder when she stood with him. Only when she looked up could she see the expression on his face.
Zhao Nanyu gently tied the red rope to her slender snow-white neck. He seemed very happy and asked, "Do you like it?"
Song Luan couldn't answer that she didn't like it. Her hand touched the jade pendant on her neck involuntarily, with a complex expression, "I like it."
Zhao Nanyu naturally put his arms around her waist, held her in his arms, put his chin on her shoulder, closed his eyes slightly, and sighed, "You like it."
She was his and couldn't ran away from him anymore.
Although Song Luan was held by him many times, she was still nervous. Her limbs were stiff and she didn't know where to put her hands. She suddenly opened her mouth and asked him roundly, "I heard that there were many beautiful girls in Quzhou. Have you met one or two? "
Song Luan quickly added, "Don't tell me you hadn't, I won't believe it."
Zhao Nanyu bent his lips and smiled. He misunderstood that she was jealous. He replied, "None."
"You lied to me. "
Since he was injured, it was impossible that he did not meet the hostess. As for why he was the only one to go back to the capital without seeing the female lead, it must be what happened in the middle.
Zhao Nanyu was used to her little temper, and kissed the corner of her mouth, "No."
Song Luan was a little discouraged and gave up.
After Zhao Nanyu stayed long enough, he went to the front yard to see his son. It's been long...he hadn't seen him in a month. The child would naturally miss him.
Zhao Nanyu checked his son's homework and then picked up the child. Little Zhao subconsciously covered Zhao Nanyu's neck with his little arms. He stayed with his mother these days when his father is away.
Little Zhao had already fallen in love with his mother's unique fragrance. He slept comfortably with his mother every day. Now that his father was back, the child didn't know whether he could continue to sleep with his mother. He probably couldn't.
His father never indulged him, but he still couldn't help it. He opened his mouth and asked in a low voice, "Father, can I sleep with my mother tonight?"
Zhao Nanyu didn't even think about it, "No way. "
Little Zhao's mouth drooped and his face was downcast, "Okay."
His father didn't allow it. Crying and selling pitiful faces won't change his mind.
Little Zhao didn't know that his father was injured. He was carried all the way to Song Luan's residence. When he put the child down, Song Luan found that his light clothes had been stained with slight red blood. The wound had opened.
Song Luan quickly carried her son into the inner room and didn't want him to see the picture.
Then she came out and kindly reminded him, "Your wound is opened!"
Just now when she saw that he still had strength to walk, she thought that his injury was not heavy. The original book really didn't deceive people. Serious injury was really a serious injury. But this ittle pervert, this male lead, was very tolerant. No one would have noticed this wound if not for his pale face.
Zhao Nanyu sat down and began to undress in front of her. When he was finally naked, he uncovered the gauze covering the wound. The wound was still open, and blood still ran out. Unwrapping the gauze took a long time. Some of the cloth was stuck to his flesh. Song Luan felt pain when looking at this. Zhao Nanyu looked fine, he pulled the gauze off without a flicker on his face.
Song Luan, unable to look anymore, took the initiative and said, "I'll get the medicine for you."
Zhao Nanyu was resting on the back of the bed. "By the way, please help me with the medicine. "
Song Luan didn't dare at all. She couldn't bear to look at the wounds on his chest more than once. She actually felt dizzy. It was hard for her to see the blood. But after transmigrating, the symptom became better, but only a little.
Song Luan shivered and handed the medicine to him. "You have to do it yourself. I'm afraid I'll hurt you. "
Zhao Nanyu didn't bother her. He quickly applied the medicine to himself. Then, he slightly closed his shirt. His face was beautiful and dazzling under the candle fire.
Song Luan swallowed her saliva and felt that Zhao Nanyu's appearance was really attracting to her. The words 'beautiful' and 'handsome' could be used on him at the same time.
She looked out of the window. It was dark before she knew it.
The dinner table had already been arranged. Song Luan and her son were sitting on one side, while Zhao Nanyu was sitting on the other side alone.
There was only the sound of chopsticks as they ate. As long as Zhao Nanyu didn't initiate the talk, Song Luan would just stay silent and wouldn't dare to speak first.
Advertisements
Song Luan didn't eat much during the quiet dinner. The jade pendant around her neck made her feel uneasy, as if she had been labeled as this man's and could never escape.
After that, Zhao Nanyu ordered his servant to take little Zhao back to his own room, and only the two of them were left in the master bedroom.
Song Luan found it stressful to be alone with Zhao Nanyu each time, so she soon ran off and slipped away to bathe.
Hearing the sound of the water behind the screen, Zhao Nanyu stood silently for a while, then stepped out of the room. The people hiding in the dark appeared behind him.
In the dark night, Zhao Nanyu's face was difficult to discern.
The guard reported to him the days when he was not around. Included in the report was that Song Luan and Huai Jin met several times. The look between Zhao Nanyu's eyebrows and eyes was cold.
"Go now."
"Yes. "
After Song Luan finished her bath, she went to dress. She wanted to take the jade pendant off her neck several times, so she stretched her hand to remove it but then was counseled to wear it back. She had no power to tie the chicken. She was not Zhao Nanyu's opponent in the future. To disobey and rebel against him would be tantamount to death.
***
She was so upset that she always felt that this thing hanging around neck made her one of his possessions.
Song Luan sighed. She put on her clothes and went out from the screen. Zhao Nanyu seemed to have been waiting for her for a long time.
She just came out of the water, wrapped in a mist, her face was rosy, her lips were red, and a few drops of water were hanging on her forehead. She was a delicate flower, waiting to be picked.
The look in Zhao Nanyu's eyes were very familiar, it was exactly the same as when he was drugged that night.
Song Luan shivered all over, and her heart was tight. She was so afraid of the beast Zhao Nanyu in bed.
As long as you don't go to bed, you can say anything.
The night they had sex, there was only endless tossing and turning. She was humby begging for mercy as she sobbed. She was in a mess.
Song Luan walked cautiously, naively thinking that he wouldn't do anything to her with his wounds.
When she was close to him, he suddenly grabbed her wrist and threw her in middle of the bed. His hands were leaning against her ear, and he looked at her from the top. His eyes deepened.
Song Luan shrunk her shoulders, afraid that he would eat her raw. She said, "Your wound..."
Zhao Nanyu lowered his head, bit her lips, and licked the blood that spilled from her little mouth. He untied her belt and replied, "It won't hurt."
His kiss fell on her facial features and licked the remaining blood from her lips.
Song Luan was really terrified. She struggled as she resisted, but he was holding her waist. The man saw her doing meaningless struggle, and gave a soft laugh.
He controlled her waist and stroked her butterfly bone with his fingers. "Be good."
Song Luan heard the meaning of threat from his simple three words.
He seemed to be saying, "Do it or die"
She couldn't afford it.
=============== Chapter 30
Song Luan was dragged to bed by him in a daze. The man was silent as he removed her clothes. His cool fingers were clasped around her waist, which was heavier than before.
Song Luan's strength was not as strong as his, so she wouldn't resist. She just hope that he could be gentle this time, but Zhao Nanyu, no matter how amiable he looked, was a totally different person in bed.
And Song Luan soon discovered a bad flaw of his. Zhao Nanyu would never stop until tears would be forced out her eyes, as she begged for mercy. In the end, Song Luan couldn't stand it so she just scratched his back with her fingernails, and asked him to stop while weeping.
Zhao Nanyu smiled and was in a good mood. He lowered his head and kissed the tears on her cheek, as if sighing. He asked, "Do you like me?"
Song Luan rolled up her quilt and wrapped herself tightly. She didn't want to say it but had no choice, "I like you."
Zhao Nanyu heard those dry words without love. He was actually amused by her straightforward and superficial attitude.
Song Luan slept soundly until the dawn. What's rare was that Zhao Nanyu was still at home. He didn't speak much, and the couple spent most of their time together without talking. Song Luan was used to silence.
After breakfast, third lady Zhao sent someone to deliver a message to invite them to have lunch together.
It's also because good things happened that the third lady would call Zhao Nanyu. She was not a good stepmother. She was not close to Zhao Nanyu these years, but she was considerate in all aspects and kept a proper distance.
It was Zhao Wenyan who was fortunate enough to study in Yueshan academy this year. The teacher of the academy was a famous scholar in the capital. He was only willing to recruit three or four students every year. The quota was quite expensive. Zhao Wenyan was still young. Now he studied with famous teachers, and was not afraid of failing in the future.
It was a good thing. No wonder that when Song Luan arrived, third lady Zhao still had a big smile on her face. After getting along with her several times, Song Luan found that third lady Zhao had a soft temper, a soft ear, and a soft root. She treated everyone well.
Zhao Wenyan was dressed in a blue suit, and his black hair was tied up high. He was a young man with an awe-inspiring demeanor. He stood under the tree with his chin up, looked up at Song Luan, and snorted disgustingly. Song Luan had long been surprise. Every time the child saw her, he looked like this–like a proud peacock. Neither of his eyes look straight at her.
Zhao Nanyu intentionally blocked her body, moved her intimately, took her small hand, and walked into the room together with their fingers intertwined. Third lady Zhao was very pleased to see that they had good feelings.
Family matters were okay. These two children didn't give her anymore trouble.
The maidservants had started to prepare the dishes, but the third master Zhao hadn't come back.
Several people sat in house and talked. It was Song Luan and the third lady Zhao who were talking most of the time. Zhao Nanyu listened silently and rarely made a sound.
After a while, the third master Zhao arrived. He first went back to the room and changed his clothes before he came out.
Zhao Nanyu took the time to go outside. Zhao Wenyan was still standing under the tree. His face was wild, some of his baby features faded a little bit, and looked more mature. He was handsome.
He knew of Zhao Wenyan's failure, and then he knew that he wanted to die and made a lot of trouble. But throughout this event, Zhao Nanyu never came out and said words of relief to his brother. It was good for the boy to suffer some setbacks. Later, he heard Song Luan's words to him, and it made Ayan rise up.
Zhao Nanyu came up to him and patted him on the shoulder. "Ayan."
Zhao Wenyan was tensed, "Second brother."
Zhao Nanyu was still very fond of his younger brother, Ayan. If anything would happen, he would protect him. He smiled gently. "You will go to the academy in a few days."
Zhao Wenyan nodded, "Yes."
"Keep yourself from arrogance and carelessness. Learn from Mr. Du, understand?"
"I know." He paused, thought about it, and said, "But I don't want to stay in the academy."
Mr. Du requested that all students must live in the academy.
Zhao Nanyu thought that his younger brother's innocence really followed his mother, "Then don't go."
Zhao Wenyan closed his mouth and didn't say a word. If he didn't go, his mother would kill him. He would not dare to be as headstrong as before after this year.
Zhao Nanyu put his hand on his back and looked at the fallen leaves calmly. After a long time, he suddenly asked, "Ayan, do you have a girl you like?"
Zhao Wenyan's whole body was tense and his heart was tight. His hand under his sleeve clenched into fist, then his five fingers loosened. For a moment, he could not even make a sound. Just then, Song Luan's face flashed in his mind. A short moment was enough to make him uncomfortable for a long time.
He was stuck in his throat and lowered his head. "No."
Zhao Nanyu knew that Song Luan had entangled with him before. At that time, he didn't pay too much attention as he saw that his brother was disgusted of her.
It was just yesterday that his guards told him that Zhao Wenyan's actions towards Song Luan seemed to be different. He was able to sit and talk with her calmy without ridiculing her.
Zhao Nanyu had a keen intuition. He didn't like Song Luan talking to other men. Even if that man was his younger brother, even if they just talk, he would be uncomfortable for a long time.
He was jealous. He knew it won't happen if he says it won't.
Zhao Nanyu closed his eyes, and the fine wind brushed his cheek. He thought of her delicate and frail appearance, her eyes covered with water, and her lips that would slightly raised. He immediately opened his eyes, and looked at Zhao Wenyan meaningfully, saying, "You are approaching the age of marriage. If you have a girl you like, you must tell your mother, she will surely help you."
Zhao Wenyan's voice dropped a lot. It was not hard to hear the disappointment. He even dared not look up at his second brother, "Mhm."
"Come in, father has come back. "
"Okay."
Zhao Sanye was also in a good mood today. It didn't affect his mood at all even when he saw his elder son who he didn't like very much. He was nice enough to say a word to Zhao Nanyu, "Everything is well in Quzhou?"
"It's done. "
"It's fine that you did not get any scratch."
Song Luan held the chopstick and was uncomfortable in heart. It seemed that no one else in this family knew Zhao Nanyu's injury except her. He didn't say it himself. Now his father asked about it, and he didn't even mention it.
Zhao Sanye swallowed a mouthful of liquor, grinned and looked at his two sons. He said, "Don't lose the Zhao's face when you go out."
His loving eyes completely turned to Zhao Wenyan as he continued,"Ayan was picked up by Mr. Du this time to be a student and it gave me face. You can speak in front of the emperor, Ayan. You must seize the opportunity, okay?"
Zhao Wenyan frowned. He didn't like his father saying these things in front of his second brother. "Dad, I know it from my own heart. Besides, I go to school to study, not to bow to others."
Besides, Mr. Du certainly didn't like flattery.
When Zhao Sanye saw that his son didn't want to mention it, he immediately didn't say, "Okay. Dad won't say it anymore."
Song Luan pretended not to hear anything. She lowered her head and devoted herself to eating the food in front of her. Zhao Nanyu took two pieces of crystal clear meat and placed it into her bowl. "Eat more."
Song Luan was a meat eater. The cooking in the Zhao family didn't really suit her taste. The soup had little water, not enough oil and didn't have any spicy flavor. She didn't expect that Zhao Nanyu would be so considerate.
During the dinner, Song Luan was only interested in eating. She didn't need to take any dishes. Zhao Nanyu did all the work for her. The man seemed to be happy to do such a thing. He was not impatient at all
She didn't say a word to minimize her sense of being. Zhao Sanye didn't like his daughter-in-law either. He didn't look her in the eye from beginning to end and ignored her directly.
Advertisements
Zhao Nanyu accompanied Zhao Sanye to drink two glasses. Zhao Wenyan was still young so he was not included.
Zhao Sanye had a good time. It was late when he was finally willing to put down his glass and let the servants help him up.
Zhao Nanyu was not so good either. His ears were red, but it was not obivious. His skin was white, and his face was no smilling. He still looked like a noble and an inviolable fairy.
He and Song Luan didn't plan to stay any longer. Before they left, third lady Zhao San suddenly stopped her. She looked at her with complicated eyes and began to worry. "Ah Luan, I don't think you look very well when I look at you."
Song Luan subconciously touched her cheek, "Ah? Really? I feel okay. "
Third lady Zhao said, "You look a bit haggard. Your face is too pale. I don't know if you are ill."
Song Luan smiled awkwardly. She didn't have any problems these days. She didn't feel pain or any dizziness. "Maybe I have too much powder today, so I looked pale."
Third lady Zhao was still uneasy. She asked people to take out the tonic she had prepared and hand it to her. "Take these tonics and drink them. The woman's body can't be ruined. I'm waiting for you to add another younger brother or sister for little Zhao."
Zhao Nanyu intercepted the medicine in his own hands. After thanking third lady Zhao, he took Song Luan's hand and left.
Song Luan thought she wouldn't be able to finish all the supplements she gave her, but it was not until they returned to the yard that Zhao Nanyu threw the supplements in his hand to the young man and told him lightly, "Throw them away. "
See, Zhao Nanyu's dominance as a male lead was vividly reflected from this scene.
Ugh. So annoying.
Zhao Nanyu suddenly hugged her and buried his face in her neck. The hot breath made her itch. She heard him say, "What do you want? I'll find it for you. Don't get it from others."
She could only eat what he gave.
Song Luan was speechless. She dared not touch what he gave her, okay!?
Zhao Nanyu had a faint smell of wine. He raised his face and looked at her with dark eyes. He smiled a little bit.
Perhaps because of the effects of strong wine that he said, "Do you know? Ah Yan likes you."
=============== Chapter 31
In the book 'The Powerful Minister', the author carefully wrote Zhao Wenyan's love for the original owner that should happen a year later.
But after she transmigrated, Song Luan didn't get along with Zhao Wenyan happily, and they even seldom spoke, how could Zhao Wenyan like her?
But looking at Zhao Nanyu, he seemed to be telling the truth. Song Luan thought for a moment and the details that she had neglected for a long time. She had been deliberately trying to avoid the storyline before the events in the book happened.
But although some things had changed, the result was not different.
She worked hard to create the image of a good wife and mother in Zhao's house.
She wanted the man to show mercy and spare her life, but she was still poisoned, though not deeply yet.
She intended to avoid contact with Zhao Wenyan and didn't want to let the boy with a miserable ending fall in love with her, but he still did.
Some details that she didn't notice before seemed to confirm her speculation. The endings and other emotional lines of people around her had changed. It seemed that everything related to her was slowing walking towards the line of the original book.
Song Luan's mind was a little confused. She shook her head and wanted to throw away all the bad ideas in her mind, so as to avoid scaring herself.
She smiled laughed and tried to say in a light and lively tone, "Ah Yu, are you drunk?! You began to say silly things."
Zhao Nanyu was not drunk. He said this sentence deliberately to scare her. He wanted to see what kind of performance she would have.
He didn't plan to calculate such old accounts with her. He knew that Song Luan's past would kill him.
Zhao Nanyu nodded, still closed his eyes. "Mhm, I'm drunk."
Song Luan exhaled steadily from her chest, and helped him with difficulty. "Then go to bed earlier."
"I have a headache."
"......." Song Luan then said, "Maybe you drank too much."
"Yes."
Zhao Nanyu refused to say what he wanted her to do, and Song Luan was too lazy to guess. She helped Zhao Nanyu to the bed and took off his shoes. "I'll go to the kitchen and bring you a bowl of sober soup."
Zhao Nanyu held her cuff tightly with one hand. "I don't want to drink it."
He didn't want to drink, and Song Luan just didn't want to serve. At this time, she was tired physically and mentally. She just wanted to roll into the bed and get a good sleep.
Song Luan looked down and saw his face-like-jade. The man's lips were red, his eyes were beautiful, and his facial features were vividly more exquisite. She licked her lips and looked at Zhao Nanyu's alluring face a hundred times more and felt that her tiredness dissipated.
Song Luan unconsciously stretched out her fingers and carefully painted his face with her touch. Suddenly, she realized what she was doing, and quickly took back her hand and felt that her fingertips were hot.
Song Luan forgot to take off her clothes and laid traight to the bed. Her back faced the man as she drifted soon to sleep.
In the middle of the night, Song Luan felt very hot in her sleep. Her forehead began to sweat, and drops of water began to drip down the outline of her cheeks.
Song Luan couldn't wake up in her dream. She only felt that she was trapped in a stove and was blocked by iron walls in four directions. She was forced into a small room and her limbs seem to be trapped–unabling her to move.
She couldn't stand it, and gave it two bangs. Gradually the shackles on her body loosened, a cold hand reached into her collar, slowly untied the buttons, and took off her clothes.
Song Luan, who was still in-betweens of dreaming, felt much cooler, and hummed comfortably. Suddenly, her lips felt cold, as if she was bitten.
The next morning, after Song Luan woke up, the other side of the bed was empty. Zhao Nanyu had probably went out long ago.
She got out of bed, looked at her face in the mirror, and stroked the lip with her fingers. Though it was painful, there were no wounds.
Song Luan thought it was strange. She thought that she was bitten by Zhao Nanyu again last night. This person had a strange hobby. He liked to bite her lips every time he kisses, then licks and bites the same wound again and again.
This time she didn't find the wound and could not help doubting her intuition. Didn't Zhao Nanyu do it?
Thinking about it for a while, he was drunk last night and it was impossible to get up and bite her in the middle of the night!
In fact, Song Luan didn't find any fun staying at her residence. She had no one to talk to and didn't have many good friends.
As noon approached, the maidservant reported that the fifth miss of the Gu family came to visit.
Gu Shuang, the fifth miss of Gu's family, was a close friend of the original owner. The friendship between the two was sincere. In the original book, the two of them were described in four characters, "In Cahoots"
狼狽為奸 : a metaphor that means to collude with each other to do bad things.
Gu Shuang was also a spoiled young lady. She was the only daughter in her family. Her four elder brothers loved her with no bottom line, and so she developed a temperament that was always doted and pampered on.
The only difference between Gu Shuang and Song Luan was that she hadn't married yet. Although she had a marriage agreement, her fiancee had to keep his father's filial piety for three years, and the marriage period had been delayed for three years.
Gu Shuang was petite and her face was delicate. She appeared in front of her, and stared at her with her round eyes, "Aluan! Why haven't you come out to play with me lately?"
Perhaps influenced by this body, Song Luan had a natural sense of familiarity and intimacy when she saw her. She said with a smile, "Recently busy."
Gu Shuang blinked, "What are you busy with?"
Song Luan didn't answer her question. She asked, "Why are you here today? Do your brothers know?"
It was not the first time for Gu Shuang to come to Zhao's residence. She sat down and took a big sip of tea. Then she said, "Of course, my brother knows and they didn't want me to come, but can they control me? I'm here to see you."
Song Luan was interested in hearing funny stories. Her days in the backyard alone could be said to be boring! No fun!
In ancient times, there was a lack of entertainment facilities. She was also a very poor cannon fodder, and no one was willing to have fun with her.
As for the fun the original owner used to find, she dared not go on.
Looking for a man in the kiln? She didn't have nine lives to live with. Besides being a wife and a mother, she really shouldn't do such a thing.
窯子里 (kiln): most direct and lowest sex transaction place in ancient country, formerly called brothel.
"Where do you want to go?" She asked.
Gu Shuang's eyes turned and took her arm. "Shall we go to drink and listen to the opera?"
This was not out of line! Song Luan's eyes brightened, and immediately nodded, "Okay."
The women of this dynasty were not as deeply bound as those of other dynasties, at least it was not difficult to go out. Especially the bad tempered Song Luan, it was even easier for her to go out. No one dared to stop her.
And Song Luan had asked Zhao Nanyu before. If he would get angry if she ever went out to go shopping.
Zhao Nanyu looked at her with a smile, nodded and said, "Will not."
Advertisements
Two words.
In this case, Song Luan was more relieved.
Gu Shuang pointed to her and said, "Ah Luan, haven't you slept well these days? How can you look so much worse than before?"
"I didn't sleep well for a few days. "
She was tossing and turning in bed with Zhao Nanyu these days and made her really exhausting.
Gu Shuang said, "Then I'll help you put on makeup, let's go out together beautifully!"
As expected, she was a good sister who didn't want her to look ugly!
"Okay, please."
"Be kind to me."
While Gu Shuang was helping her with her make-up, she could not stop her mouth and kept talking, "My second brother told me that you and your husband seem to have made up these days?"
"Yeah." Gu Shuang's second brother said nothing wrong. They indeed reconciled.
Gu Shuang smiled, "That's not bad. Your husband is handsome, and it's good if you're together."
Of course, Song Luan knew that Zhao Nanyu was very handosme. She didn't need to be reminded of what she could see with her eyes.
She thought of Zhao Nanyu's bright face in the moonlight. Her heart started pounding, and her beating speed was abnormal.
Song Luan cleared her throat, "Let's not talk about him."
"Okay."
Two beautiful women walked side by side as they went out. Both looked like a delicate flower, so this attracted a lot of attention along the way.
Gu Shuang seemed to have been used to this kind of eyes for a long time, but Song Luan still felt uncomfortable.
They finally arrive at the restaurant where they could listen to the opera and drink wine. Gu Shuang seemed to be a regular customer. When the shopkeeper saw her, he immediately greeted her, with a kind smile on his face. "Miss Gu, do you want an elegant room or in the lobby? "
The restaurant was divided into two floors. On the second floor, there were elegant rooms and four square tables leaned by the stairs.
Song Luan hadn't seen a large ancient restaurant before. She answered for Gu Shuang, "Let's sit at a small table on the second floor."
"Yes, upstairs, please." The shopkeeper took them to the stairway, hesitated and said, "Madam, your brother is also drinking on the second floor."
Song Heqing was here, too?
Her brother was there, and her husband was sitting beside him too.
Zhao Nanyu looked at her with a curved smile, his face full of spring breeze, and Song Luan was dumbfounded. She didn't expect to meet him.
Song Heqing met Zhao Nanyu in the middle of the road today. He called his brother-in-law over to have a drink with him, and also wanted to talk about Song Luan on the way. After all, she was his sister. He had to help him as a brother no matter what she did.
Fortunately, his sister and brother-in-law met coincidentally.
Song Heqing looked at his silly sister, and looked at the man with a slightly cold temperament. He shook his head helplessly.
His sister was really naive.
Being a brother was very worrying.
But Song Luan herself didn't feel anything. She didn't come out to find a wild man. She was full of confidence.
And Zhao Nanyu said that he would not be angry if she went shopping.
=============== Chapter 32
Song Heqing had a headache. It was really embarrassing for several people who know each other to coincidentally meet.
He had also wanted to talk to Zhao Nanyu alone. Now, he had no chance to talk.
He looked helplessly at the younger sister sitting on the edge. She was happy watching the play, like a small white eyed wolf with no heart, and looked very careless. Song Heqing, an old fox who had been mixing in the court matters for many years, was keen and sharp to details. Since Song Luan appeared, Zhao Nanyu's smile on her was a little cold.
He did not fail to understand that no man like to see his wife in public, especially Song Luan, who had a long history of running out doing ridiculous things.
Song Heqing couldn't help it. Song Luan was spoiled by her parents. She got anything she wanted when she was still young. As long as she opened her mouth, Aunt Lin would work hard to find everything for her and satisfy her wishes.
Song Luan's beauty was so exquisite that ordinary people couldn't resist her crying. When others see her crying, they just wanted to give her all their heart so that she won't cry any more. So day after day, year after year, Song Luan was used to this exorbitant lifestyle.
He guessed that Zhao Nanyu likes the same type of woman as him. A woman who was obedient and sensible, like a delicate flower that would make people want to protect it.
Song Luan didn't look at Zhao Nanyu much. She was tired of watching Zhao Nanyu at home. She came out to have a walk, and wanted to see the dancing and singing in the restaurant.
Song Luan held her chin and looked at the girls on the stage excitedly. She couldn't move her eyes. Gu Shuang had asked her to come out to drink. Since her brother and husband were here, she was not afraid to drink, so Gu Shang poured her a glass of wine and sent it to her.
"Come on, this wine is quite delicious."
Song Luan had not drunk such a strong wine before. She poured a cup down her throat, and was about pour another cup for herself, but suddenly, someone grasped her wrist. Zhao Nanyu's hand was cold. He couldn't help but snatch the glass off her hand and said, "It's too strong. You can't drink too much. "
Her body was fragile. It wouldn't be good to drink more.
Even third lady Zhao found out that her face was not good recently. How could Zhao Nanyu not see it? He just didn't say it. He was afraid to scare Song Luan.
Secretly, Zhao Nanyu ordered the kitchen to cook medicine meals these days. He couldn't figure out whether it was the poisoning that made Song Luan unhealthy.
Song Heqing asked him drink together. The reason why Zhao Nanyu accepted was to ask him about Song Luan's palpitations.
Zhao Nanyu didn't care about her life and death before, nor asked about her private affairs. But now, he wanted to know anything and everything about her.
Song Heqing knew more than he did. He said that his sister's heart had no major problems, only that it was weak.
Song Luan was born prematurely and was very fragile. She was carefully raised for a long time before she was cured. This made Aunt Lin dote on her daughter. She was constantly fed with good herbs to nourish her body.
Song Luan knew that the strong quality of the wine was not good, and she had no choice but to let him drink it. "Then I won't drink."
Gu Shuang looked at her and Zhao Nanyu. She was surprised that Song Luan looked like a paper tiger in front of her husband.
Not only was she strange, but Song Heqing also felt that he had seen an evil ghost. He knew what virtue his sister had, and she had never been so obedient!!
But now it's good. His sister's reputation wouldn't get worse. Before, Song Heqing was always worried that the two of them would separate. He was really afraid that his sister would not find other men willing to marry her in the future.
Zhao Nanyu was a talented person. Although he was not loved by the emperor, he was also the special guest of the sixth prince. It's not clear what kind of person he would be in the future.
Still couldn't look down on him.
It was not easy for the four people to drink together. After half an hour, Song Heqing said that he would go first. Zhao Nanyu seemed to wait a long time and looked at Song Luan and said, "Let's go back then. "
Song Luan didn't want to, she just came out and hadn't started shopping yet.
She glanced at Gu Shuang, hinting at her with frantic eyes. Gu Shuang originally wanted to say something, but Zhao Nanyu's sharp eyes made her cold.
Zhao Nanyu looked at her with a smile before he said, "I haven't seen your brother for a long time. I will go see him and definitely greet him well tomorrow."
Gu Shuang immediately recognized that this was a direct threat. Her eldest brother was the one who was most strict with her. Today, she just sneaked out and didn't dare let her several elder brothers know that she escaped to find Song Luan.
She knew her brothers would break her leg if they find out.
Gu Shuang said with a dry smile, "Then I'll go back..I seem to be very tired."
Before getting on the carriage, Song Heqing dragged Song Luan to talk. He lowered his voice for fear of being heard. "Did you use the medicine I gave you last time? "
Song Luan really didn't want to recall this incident. It was all tears and blood. She clenched her teeth and two big words sprang out, "Already used!"
Song Heqing couldn't wait, "How did it go?"
What he wanted to ask was not the effect of the drug, but the relationship between them after the drug. Did their relationship became more pleasant?
But Song Luan clearly misunderstood her brother's words, clenched her teeth, thought for a long time, and then spit out a few words, "He is too fierce!"
"......."
Song Heqing's old face was red in a flash, his ears and neck were red. His sister really dared to say this kind of thing. He was ashamed to hear her words!!!
Song Heqing was stuttering, and his words were all tangled, "Our family's daughter speaks so...oh...I am really....I don't know what to say about you!"
Song Luan felt it was strange.. He wanted to ask her this! She was not even happy about answering him!
"Your medicine is strong."
Zhao Nanyu was not a human that night. It was like the beast within him had been summoned. She almost died.
Song Heqing waved his hand. "Okay, don't talk about this. You continue to have a good time with your husband. Also, show me little Zhao. I haven't seen my nephew in half a year."
Song Heqing's incessant chatter was also worrying, "Don't make trouble again. You are not a child, can you be more sensible? "
"Brother, I know."
Song Heqing then handed her the purse at his waist. Every time he saw this sister, he would give her money for fear that she wouldn't have enough money to spend.
On one hand, he told her not to go out, and on the other hand, he gave her money to shop and spend things.
This was also typical for the Song family.
Having said enough, Song Heqing finally got into his own carriage and went back to the Song Residence.
Zhao Nanyu didn't feel impatient after waiting so long. When Song Luan got on the carriage, she found that this was not the direction to the residence at all.
She turned and said, "Where are we going? "
Advertisements
Zhao Nanyu replied, "Go to the hospital."
He couldn't find Zhao Chao for a long time already. He couldn't wait. Couldn't wait anymore. He could only take her to the capital of the hospital first.
"Is your injury so serious?" She didn't realize that the reason they were going to the hospital was because of her.
Zhao Nanyu didn't answer.
The carriage shook as it moved. She was about to fall asleep when Zhao Nanyu suddenly said, "What did you want to do today?"
Strolling in a kiln to display her beauty? Or to simply slip out to drink?
"Nothing to do."
Zhao Nanyu clasped her chin, gently stroked her ruddy lips with her fingers, and softly wiped off the rouge color on her lips. He took out his handkerchief from his sleeve, and slowly wiped all the makeup on her face.
He said, "I'm reluctant to let others see you, because you are so beautiful today. "
How could such a beautiful face be seen by others? What would I do if I'm robbed?
Song Luan looked at the person in front of her. Her lips were a little sore. She didn't understand. How could she not get angry? He also took off the makeup on her face.
It's not light how he removed her makeup at all. Her sore eyes were about to burst into tears. Rough man!
Song Luan didn't want to make the atmosphere stiff. She raised a big smile and said, "I am beautiful every day."
Yes, so I didn't want you to go out every day.
Song Luan, who was weak and beautiful, should stay in the huge and gorgeous cage he made.
Zhao Nanyu nodded, "Well, beautiful."
Soon the carriage stopped in front of the hospital, and Zhao Nanyu took her by the hand and brought her in.
Hou Taiyi, with grey hair and white beard, was over 60 years old, and his eyes were still bright and sharp.
Zhao Nanyu greeted him, and said, "I ask doctor Hou to check her pulse."
Hou Taiyi nodded.
Song Luan now knew that the person to be looked at was her! However, she was quite willing to see a doctor. If she could find an antidote, it would be for her.
After carefully examining her pulse and looking at her face, Hou Taiyi stroke his beard and said directly in front of them, "Madam is born weak. She is sick and has heart palpitations. If she doesn't take care of it in time, she may die soon."
=============== Chapter 33
Song Luan's head felt as if it was severely split by a thunderbolt. The words that hit her head made her unable to recall for a while, and her originally pale face seemed even whiter now.
What? She's dying? She lived so humbly and yet she was dying???
Song Luan's heart trembled. She really wanted to fight Zhao Nanyu now.
Zhao Nanyu's face was not better than her. The five fingers curled up under the sleeve trembled slightly, and his face was pale. There was no expression on his tight face. A pair of black eyes looked straight at Hou Taiyi. The voice in his throat was very hoarse. He asked, "Hou Taiyi, do you have a good prescription for this?"
No, Song Luan was not born with physical deficiency and multiple diseases. She was in good health before she gave birth to little Zhao. She was no different from ordinary people. Although she almost died when she was a child, she was not weak to this extent.
In her final analysis, it had something to do with his poison.
Zhao Nanyu clasped his hands and clenched his jaw. He didn't even know about the toxicity of Tianqin or whether there was an antidote. At first, he just simply wanted her to die.
Zhao Nanyu's chest was full of dull pain, and the numbness spread through to his limbs. The stubborness in his eyes didn't waver still
He would never let Song Luan die like this.
Hou Taiyi sighed for a long time, "Madam has eaten something that she shouldn't have in the recent years. This pulse looks very dangerous." After a pause, he said slowly, "But madam is not incurable. Fortunately, you didn't eat too much of the dangerous food. Don't touch them again from now on. Don't eat cold or raw food. Take extra care of the rest you take. I'll make some more plans. There's still room for healing."
Of course, Hou Taiyi did not dare to guarantee that Song Luan would live for a long time.
He's the head of the hospital, and he had seen no more tricky diseases. Song Luan did not have the general disease, but a result of taking poison, and this caused her palpitations and other minor problems to her organs.
He did not know what kind of poison it was, nor did he ever see such dangerous poison that could slowly destroy a person's body.
But he also mentioned that the amount she ate was not large, and good thing they found it early, so it wasn't incurable.
Hou Taiyi was just used to saying that the illness was more serious, so that the patient would take care of themselves. But he was very curious. Whose venemous heart would poison this woman? Really pitiful.
Zhao Nanyu opened his mouth, his bloodless lips looked scary. He said softly, "Thank you for your help."
"You're welcome." Hou Taiyi turned his eyes to Song Luan. He heard about this domineering lady. After thinking for a while, he said, "Madam must take medicine well, and the things that hurt her should not be touched. "
Song Luan's ears were buzzing. She couldn't hear what Hou Taiyi said later.
Zhao Nanyu answered instead of her, "I will watch her."
The bitter fruit Zhao Nanyu planted by himself was naturally tasted by him, so he would surely keep her safe.
Since Hou Taiyi said that there was a cure, then it could be cured.
After taking the medicine prescription from the Huo Taiyi, Zhao Nanyu immediately asked the following servants to take the medicine. He took Song Luan back to the room.
After Song Luan returned to her consciousness, she found that she had returned to her room, and the people in the kitchen had prepared the tonic. Zhao Nanyu brought it to her. "Come, drink the medicine."
Song Luan looked at his gentle appearance of giving medicine to her. She then recalled the memory in her dream. He fed the poison to the original owner himself and forced her to die.
Song Luan knew clearly that in the book 'The Powerful Minister', all the things that the male lead did to the original owner couldn't be said to be wrong. His own son was disabled by her, and he had countless green hats on his head. What he did was understandable.
But what's wrong with her? After an inexplicable sleep, she found she transmigrated and got a pair of rotten cards.
She was afraid of death, and she didn't want to die. She just lived a short life of more than 20 years, she really didn't want to die yet.
No one knew if she would die in this world, could she still return to her own world? She dared not gamble.
Song Luan's brain was very confused now. She suddenly cried when she thought about these things, and she lowered her head and silently shed tears.
Zhao Nanyu sighed, put down the bowl in her hand, and gently wiped the tears for her.
Her tears flowed like a river. Zhao Nanyu couldn't wipe them clean at all, so he watched her cry quietly.
Although Song Luan was crying, She also knew she need to drink the medicine. She took the bowl in front of him, lifted her throat and drank all the bitter medicine into her stomach.
She hiccuped as she cried. She seemed to treat Zhao Nanyu as a vent. Her small fists greeted his chest, "I'm going to die."
Zhao Nanyu let her hit him with her fists and didn't fight back. Seeing that she drank the medicine while she cried, he teased and laughed. "You won't die."
Song Luan believed his words, and she wiped her eyes with tears. "I didn't hear what Hou Taiyi said."
"He's scaring you. If you take good care of yourself, nothing will happen."
Song Luan's anger was all over him, and she began to make unreasonable troubles, "Why do you coax me? You don't like me either. I'm dead just as you wish.Didn't you long for me to die?"
These words were half true and half false.
Zhao Nanyu didn't fight back nor scolded her.
For fear that she might lose her temper and hurt herself, he removed all the sharp objects in the room. "No."
Song Luan's heart would be much calmer after she vented. She gradually calmed down, and her tears soon stopped, but she still refused to give Zhao Nanyu a good face.
Zhao Nanyu didn't force her. He kindly left her alone. Before leaving, he didn't forget to say, "You are only weak, not terminally ill. Don't scare yourself. While I'm here, you will get better."
Song Luan didn't make a sound. She really didn't want to talk to him.
No matter how dull she was, she realized that Zhao Nanyu was very different from before, and the contempt and gloom in her eyes gradually disappeared.
For dinner in the evening, little Zhao should have come over, but Zhao Nanyu didn't let the maidservants bring him. He instead let him stay in the front yard.
Song Luan was upset when she saw this. Zhao Nanyu held the bowl of pigeon soup for her. She looked at it and pushed it away. She refused to drink it.
Zhao Nanyu didn't seem to be angry. If she didn't eat this, he would give her something else. After a meal, Song Luan didn't eat much at all. She really had no appetite.
She broke the pot and thought that Zhao Nanyu would be upset, but he didn't.
In the night, Song Luan came out of the screen after bathing and saw Zhao Nanyu sitting beside the bed. He probably was waiting for her.
Song Luan wanted to climb into bed, but was dragged into his arms. She was forced to stick to his chest. He chuckled, and then whispered in her ear, "Even if you want to die, I won't give you a chance."
Song Luan's thin body trembled. This is what the male lead would say.
Advertisements
She felt that Zhao Nanyu was agitated when she refused to talk with him in the afternoon and evening.
Zhao Nanyu hugged her waist, and he closed his eyes and said in a low voice, "I had a sweet dream last night."
He said to himself, "You were in it."
Song Luan didn't expect that she would hear Zhao Nanyu saying this in her lifetime. She admitted that at some point, her heart beat faster than usual.
Zhao Nanyu didn't lie. She was indeed in his dream. If Song Luan knew the specific picture in his dream, she would surely scold him as a beast again.
Zhao Nanyu suddenly pressed her on the bed. With eyes like stars, he only looked at her. Then, he covered her delicate body. His long and delicate fingers wrapped around her hair, but he did not get her response, so he asked again with hoarse voice, "You are not going to talk to me for a lifetime?"
Song Luan looked away, "No."
She needed to vent, and Zhao Nanyu, who was the fuse, should naturally become the vent.
Zhao Nanyu lowered his head and gently kissed her cheek, then breathlessly kissed the person under him before he let go, "Still too idle that you still have time to think."
Song Luan turned her head and was angry to death. "Don't touch me."
He's like this. She didn't want to serve him at all!
Song Luan didn't realize that when she was kissed breathlessly, she looked at Zhao Nanyu's eyes with a trace of love, but it was not obvious.
Zhao Nanyu didn't plan to do anything to her. He just held her to sleep that night, but even if he repented and regretted he fed her the poison, he already had no way back.
He would find all the elixirs in the world for her to keep her alive. He would rise to the top and have enough power to control her life.
After waking up the next day, Song Luan meditated in bed for a long time.
From today on, she wanted to follow the words of Taiyi and take medicine well. Wasn't it just physical deficiency?! Wasn't it just heart disease? It would be okay.
After this, she still treated her son just as before, but she obviously did not flatter Zhao Nanyu as much as before.
All her thoughts were written in her face. Within a few days, even the servants knew that the second young master and his wife had a cold war.
=============== Chapter 34
The cold war between Song Luan and Zhao Nanyu was completely unilateral. Because she didn't pay much attention to him, she wouldn't notice that Zhao Nanyu was still the same as before. He still came back to her house everyday after working in Dali Temple.
Song Luan felt that it's quite good now. Her life was more relaxed than the previous months. She didn't walk on thin ice nor tremble anymore. Since the body had turned like this, all she could do was take the medicine. As for Zhao Nanyu, how could she like him! She stopped serving him already.
However, he was worthy of the title of male lead. He was still powerful. Even though Song Luan had given up holding this unreliable golden thigh, she dared not provoke him too much.
When the male lead looked at her smilingly, Song Luan felt tight in her heart. She was sweating at the back of her hand, and all her words were swallowed in her throat.
Song Luan originally disliked the bitterness of traditional Chinese medicine and never wanted to drink it well, but this time, she listened to the words of Hou Taiyi.
When she drank the medicine, she was more obedient than anything. She didn't need other people's urging. She pinched her nose and raised her neck to drink.
She wanted to live another two years in such a beautiful world.
She didn't know who told her son about her recent illness. When Zhao Chao taught little Zhao to read poems, he was absent-minded and didn't write very well.
Zhao Chao was not unreasonable either. Little Zhao was obedient and sensible. He was a cute little baby. He also liked this little Zhao. Even if he sometimes makes mistakes or doesn't study hard, he couldn't bear to punish him.
This time there was no exception in Zhao Chao. He collected the pen and paper for him, held the child on the chair in his arms, and asked, "What's the matter? Your mind is not focused on practicing this calligraphy? Are you hungry? or tired?"
Little Zhao was indifferent to strangers, but he was still soft and cuddly in the face of familiar relatives. He hugged Zhao Chao's neck, and his small face was very frustrated. He said, "My mother seems to be ill. My father didn't let me go to see her last night. I was a little worried. "
Last night, his father didn't let him go, and this morning he even forbade him.
He listened to his father's words very much and rarely resisted or objected, but this time he really couldn't hold back and wanted to see his mother.
Zhao Chao was stunned. He didn't even realize that Song Luan had unconsciously left a very important position in this little kid's heart.
To be honest, he hated Song Luan very much.
Zhao Chao was used to wearing mask on his face, so no one could see that his disgust was so deep. He always thought that Song Luan's life and death were unimportant. It was even better if Song Luan died. She was a plague or a curse from the devil.
He was willing to fight when he saw how she treated this 2 year-old child before.
But now it seemed that little Zhao liked her very much. In just a few months, the child's heart was completely turned towards her.
If she died like this, he was afraid it would take a long time for little Zhao to recover.
Zhao Chao touched his head. "Do you want me take you to see your mother?"
"Yes." Little Zhao laid on his shoulder and nodded vigorously.
Zhao Chao thought that Song Luan was conniving. Normally, the medicine of Tianqing in her body was not enough to cause fatality, and the poison of his master was gentler than the medicine he made.
If he used his poison, Song Luan would have been dead long ago.
He couldn't bear to see him sad, "Okay. I'll take you there."
Song Luan was the second most disliked person in Zhao family, Zhao Chao, who hid his swords in his smile, was not a good person. As the saying goes, he smiles on his face but wants to kill you.
She knew that Zhao Chao also hated her very much. In the original book, Zhao Chao was a man who could be ranked as the fourth male lead, and could play a role at a critical moment. The female lead was always liked by many men at the same time.
'The Powerful Minister' was a common book with the usual setting. The little white flower female lead was pitied by all kinds of men because of her weakness. After meeting the female lead twice, Zhao Chao took the initiative to get closer to her.
His identity as the fourth male and the second male lead's cousin meant that he could not get the female lead. Even so, Zhao Chao would play the word 'affectionate' very well, so that the female lead would not marry for life.
Song Luan felt that the author's brain was not very good when she read the book. The men in the book didn't marry for the sake of the female lead's life. She thought of abandoning the novel for a time, but she still put up with it.
Song Luan was about to drink some medicine when he saw little radish's head coming in. His eyes were as beautiful as grapes when he saw her. His eyes were full of worries, and he called out to her softly, "Mother."
Song Luan put down the bowl in her hand and pinched his cheek lightly. "Why are you coming here? Don't you have class today?"
Little Zhao set aside his shyness, and it seemed he was about to cry. The emotion in the child's eyes was the purest. He looked at her and said, "Dad told me that you are ill. I'm a little worried."
Song Luan's heart was warm and her chest was blocked. It's really good to have him. She won't leave him in the future.
Song Luan was an orphan who grew up without both parents. She was alone most of the time. When she heard little Zhao, her eyes became red, and she smiled at him. "Mother will soon get better."
She didn't know how long it would take for her to get well, but the palpitation attack was not easy. The pain was very painful.
Little Zhao raised his face and asked, "Mother, is the medicine very bitter? Would you like some sugar?"
Every time he had a fever and drank bitter medicine, his father would reward him with two sweets. So, he took out the sweets in his pocket, spread out his little hand, and laid the four sweets wrapped in sugar paper in his palm. "It won't be bitter after eating. "
This is what he saved. His father gave him very little every time. Zhao Nanyu was afraid that he would have bad teeth.
Waves of warm water flowed into Song Luan's chest and made her feel warm.
She couldn't help kissing him. "You keep it for yourself. Your mother is not afraid of suffering."
He was very stubborn, and just wanted to give her the candy, "You eat."
The son followed his father's stubborness. Song Luan had to take the sugar and swallow it. "I'll take one."
Little Zhao shook his head and looked at her with large eyes. "No, it would not be bitter after you eat three."
Song Luan couldn't help it. She ate the remaining two sweets together from his little palm's heart. "Is it alright?"
Little Zhao nodded, "Mm-hmm, it won't be bitter."
Zhao Chao stood by the door and looked at them silently without disturbing them.
The golden sunlight hit her shoulder through the window pane. The woman lowered her head, with her features outstretched. The jasmine color clothes made her look more white.
Zhao Chao found that his second sister-in-law's temperament was better than before, gentle and quiet.
Before he came, he thought about whether Song Luan was pretending to be ill. But looking at her pale face. It didn't look like she was pretending.
Last time, he looked at her pulse, her appearance was not as bad as it is today. Average people couldn't see it. But, he, a doctor could already see the clues.
Song Luan's physical was weak. The body seemed to lost a lot of nutrients. It looked like something was slowly devouring her.
Song Luan seemed to notice his eyes. She raised her head, frowned at him, and coughed twice, "Third brother-in-law is also here."
Zhao Chao smiled three-times wider, "I brought little Zhao here. "
"Thank you. "
"No, I see little Zhao is worried about second sister-in-law, so I have to take him to see you. See you're okay, I'm relieved."
Zhao Chao'd mind still didn't change. It didn't matter whether Song Luan died or not. It's better to die. In the Zhao family, who hadn't she seduced?
Advertisements
First, Ayan.
Then, her second brother.
It's easier for her to die.
Song Luan smirked twice, and said stiffly, "Thank you for your concern,"
Zhao Chao beckoned to little Zhao, "Now that you've seen your mother, it's time to go back to study and practice calligraphy."
Song Luan was angry as soon as she heard it. The contempt in Zhao Chao's eyes aroused her anger. She hugged her son and sneered, "He won't practice today."
"Second sister-in-law, this..."
"Oh, my heart is hurting again." Song Luan didn't bother to talk to him, so she covered her chest and started pretending.
Little Zhao was not at ease... Hearing his mother say it hurts, his face turned white. He said to Zhao Chao, "Uncle, I want to accompany my mother."
Zhao Chao watched her 'play' coldly. It was hard for him to put his emotions on his face and smiled sarcastically. He said, "Second sister-in-law is really good."
Song Luan ignored him and put her heart into her little 'play'.
Zhao Chao was so angry that he had no choice but to walk away with big steps.
As soon as he left, Song Luan stopped pretending, but her son was obviously frightened by her.
Song Luan was both distressed and guilty. He coaxed him softly, "Don't be afraid ah...I'm all right."
Her son wiped away his tears silently, hiccuped and said, "I'm scared."
He was afraid that his mother would leave him.
Song Luan comforted him, "Don't be afraid. Mother will always be here."
He cried and fell asleep in her arms.
Song Luan placed him on the bed, took off his shoes and covered him with a quilt. She wiped the tears on his face with a handkerchief.
In the face of this small face similar to Zhao Nanyu, she sighed and went out the room.
A maidservant reported that lady Yang came to visit her.
Song Luan remembered her. Yang Ruoyun, the third miss of Yang family, was one of the characters that provoked the original owner.
Song Luan thought about it and guessed that at this time, Yang Ruoyun came to stir up her relationship with Zhao Nanyu.
After all, everyone in the Zhao's family could see that they were both in cold war recently.
Yang Ruoyun couldn't let go of such a good chance. She provoked the original owner, let her splash Zhao Nanyu to death, then would cause them to alienate their relationship.
Song Luan wanted to praise her.
Of course, she would follow Yang Ruoyun's wishes.
This man, she doesn't want it. Whoever wants it could get it.
=============== Chapter 35
Yang Ruoyun stayed in Zhao's house for half a month, with almost no sense of existence. She stayed low-key besides third lady Zhao.
Yang Ruoyun's face was painted with light make-up, and looked beautiful and delicate. She had a gentle smile on the corner of her mouth. Her smile was appropriate. When she came in, she softly cried out to her, "Cousin-in-law."
Song Luan knew that Yang Ruoyun is a very intelligent woman. She was able to understand the situation clearly, and had both strategy and courage.
She pretended to have a flat response and asked directly, "Is there something wrong that third cousin came over?"
Yang Ruoyun didn't seem to see her unhappy face and pretended not to hear the hostility in her words. This cousin was used to have no good face to anyone, and she had seen it for a long time. Besides, she had developed the ability to keep her face unchanged.
She smiled and said, "Aunt heard that there is conflict between cousin-in-law and cousin. She was worried and had no choice but to let me persuade you."
Remember, Zhao Nanyu is Yang Ruoyun's cousin
Song Luan knew that there were many people in Zhao's house staring at the two of them. What's more, Zhao's house was so big that no information could be hidden in this house.
It's not unusual that their husband and wife had a bad relationship. It was normal. The reason why the third lady was worried was that old lady Zhao was waiting for her granddaughter-in-law to have another baby. The second reason was that the third lady was worried about them. The two of them were willing to share a room after getting along well. She didn't know how they became cold these days.
Song Luan hummed, with a stubborn look on her face, "There is nothing to persuade."
Yang Ruoyun smiled and said, "Don't be angry with cousin. How can there be an overnight feud between husband and wife. If this time, my cousin was angry at you, serve him softly. Men are very easy to coax."
It sounded as if Yang Ruoyun was doing this for good. In fact, this sentence stabbed the key point. This second female lead was worthy of her title. Their ability to sow discord was first-class.
The original owner was proud. It was impossible to reconcile with Zhao Nanyu, let alone coax the man in a low voice.
Song Luan pretended to be angry and gave her a cold look. Her eyes were full of disdain. She raised her chin and deliberately said, "Soft? Why should I be soft with him? Why am I going to coax him? Ridiculous."
Yang Ruoyun lowered her eyes and slightly hooked her lips. Then she walked forward two steps, took her wrist affectionately, and comforted her anxiously. "Cousin-in-law, step back, even if it's cousin's fault, you shouldn't be angry with him for such a long time. He's busy enough. I see that he has lost a lot of weight. "
Song Luan silently pushed away her hand, looked down at her, and said, "Do you mean that I should just swallow then?"
"Of course not, but my cousin-in-law who doesn't know how to coax people, must have been aggrieved because of cousin. Aunt is worried."
How nice her words were! At first, they were concerns for her, afraid that she would not live well or suffer losses. Thinking clearly, If these words fell into the original owner's ears, she would surely explode.
Song Luan's face was taut, and her expression did not soften at all. Her tone was very poor. "Aggrieved. Why should I be wronged?" She looked up at Yang Ruoyun with sharp eyes.
She pretended to be impatient and said, "You don't have to persuade me anymore. I will do what I want. If you are worried about your cousin's anger, you can persuade him instead of me. "
Yang Ruoyun's expression was aggrieved, and she bit his lips and said, "It's because I speak too much. In that case, I won't bother much."
She walked out of Song Luan's yard slowly. Her face was clear and her mouth was slightly hooked. She was very happy.
This Song Luan was as boring as ever. However, she thought that Song Luan had changed some days ago, and was pretending in front of others.
It's hard to change her nature.
Song Luan had better not reconcile with Zhao Nanyu all her life. She would watch Song Luan put herself on the dead end.
Song Luan was not worthy of Zhao Nanyu. Apart from her better appearance, how could she compare her moral character and knowledge?
It was also a coincidence that Yang Ruoyun met Zhao Nanyu on the corridor after leaving Huai Shui Residence.
When she saw the person she was thinking about, her heart beat faster than usual. She went up with a red face and made a formal ceremony, "Cousin. "
...
Zhao Nanyu expression was faint, "Third cousin."
Yang Ruoyun looked at him affectionately, summoned up her courage and said, "Has my cousin just come back? "
"Yes."
"I...." She suddenly said, "It's a coincidence that I just came out from my cousin-in-law's residence."
Zhao Nanyu didn't have any patience to deal with her. He was not familiar with this distant cousin, and had not seen her for several times in all. The gentle and sensible girl who was obedient was no different from the ordinary ladies.
But when he heard about Song Luan, he immediately became interested and asked with interest, "What are you doing with her?"
He remembered that Song Luan had a better relationship with Gu Shuang, but had no similar relationships with other women. It was either quarreling or grabbing each other's hair. Song Luan never met his distant cousin, how could they still talk?
Yang Ruoyun would not miss any chance. She paused before she said, "My aunt asked me to advise my cousin-in-law." She frowned. "Don't blame cousin-in-law, cousin. She's just not sensible, so she's a little grumpy."
Zhao Nanyu laughed when he heard it, "What?"
"Isn't it? My aunt said that you seem to have quarreled. You haven't talked well for several days."
Zhao Nanyu interrupted her with a cold smile. "No quarrel, tell my mother not to worry." After a pause, he continued with a smile," Your cousin-in-law has a lovely temper. Of course, I won't blame her."
Yang Ruoyun's brain was confused. This was totally different from what she thought?!
How could this happen? Shouldn't this cousin hate that woman?!
She didn't return to her mind until she realized that she had caught Zhao Nanyu's sleeve. The man in front of her had a cold and bright eyes.
He removed her hand coldly and smiled more horribly than not. "You don't need to care for our affairs if you still want to stay in the capital. Otherwise, I can also let someone send you back to Jiangnan."
Yang Ruoyun's eyes were red, and she was quick to respond, and promised: "I was abrupt, please don't blame cousin."
Zhao Nanyu glanced at her, didn't say more. He turned around and left.
Yang Ruoyun was biting her teeth and stomped her foot. She was hated by Zhao Nanyu. She didn't know when Zhao Nanyu was so tolerant of Song Luan?! Was it because she was beautiful?
Meanwhile, Song Luan was in the residence, and didn't what had happened between Zhao Nanyu and Yang Ruoyun.
Little Zhao in the room woke up before long.
The child was half-awake and had a hazy face. Song Luan helped him dress and let him wear his shoes. Little Zhao smelt the light fragrance from his mother and stretched out his hands to hug her.
Song Luan chuckled and held the little kid in her arms. He wrapped his hands around her neck.
As soon as Zhao Nanyu came in, he saw the picture of her coaxing the child. He was stunned. He was not very happy and asked, "Why is our son here? Shouldn't he be practicing calligraphy at this time?"
Song Luan, who pretended not to hear, turned her back to him and bowed her head to coax the child in his arms.
Advertisements
Zhao Nanyu's eyes were dark, and the bright candle light reflected on his white face. He slightly closed his chin, but his expression was not worried.
He went to his son, since Song Luan would not speak to him. He asked him, "Speak."
Little Zhao looked from her mother's delicate face to the suddenly appearing father. He said with a low voice, "I asked my uncle to bring me over."
Zhao Nanyu's voice without a hint of emotion, "Come down."
Little Zhao pinched Song Luan's collar tightly then slowly loosened it. The child could not resist his father's authority. He was about to climb down from his mother with his hands and feet when he was suddenly held.
Song Luan hugged him and looked up at Zhao Nanyu. Although she didn't want to talk to him, she was afraid of him.
She sniffed. "Why are you angry at the child? You come at me."
Zhao Nanyu smiled, his thumb gently crossed her delicate cheek, and finally fell on her chin, lifting it gently, "Can you hold my anger?"
His tone was very low and cold. Song Luan's back was cold and her mind was trembling. It wasn't that she was not scared. It was because the force he used was too strong. Those dark eyes made her shiver.
She didn't open her mouth, because she couldn't stand Zhao Nanyu's anger...
Little Zhao broke free from Song Luan's lap, and stood in front of Zhao Nanyu's and said in a low voice, "Father, it's my fault. "
"What's wrong?"
"I shouldn't have come to disturb my mother."
When his father left in the morning, he told him that he was not allowed to let his mother take care of him, but he didn't hold back. While little Zhao thought about it, his eyes became red, although he didn't cry loudly, tears still ran down his cheeks.
Zhao Nanyu sighed, squatted down and wiped the tears off his cheek gently, "Don't do it again next time. Don't ask your mother to hold you since she's not well these days."
Song Luan did not resist, and shouted at him, "I'd like to! Are you in charge?"
Zhao Nanyu's eyes slowly moved to her face, thinking, and asked, "I can't control you? Hmm?"
He patted his son's head and called a servant girl to come in. He told the servant girl to carry him back to the front yard.
There were only two of them in the bedroom. Song Luan shrank back and closed her mouth after shouting at him impulsively.
Zhao Nanyu tolerated her deliberate neglect for so many days, which was the limit. He walked step by step towards the woman who was shrinking in the corner.
=============== Chapter 36
Zhao Nanyu's gloomy appearance was frightening. His face was pale and cold as ice. Song Luan shrank towards the corner of the bed. Her body trembled slightly.
A few days ago, she thought that she was going to die, and her temper was suddenly stimulated. Every time she woke up these past two days, she felt like she was not beyond cure.
Many of the plots in the original book had been changed. The legs of little Zhao did not break, and the female lead did not appear. She did not elope with Huai Jin, and Zhao Wenyan did not fall in love with her. The story progressed differently.
Although she knew the plot and the ending, she was still miserable than the others.
Song Luan pinched the quilt under her body. She was bullied. Zhao Nanyu was a little bit fierce. She was afraid from the bottom of her heart.
Zhao Nanyu patted the head of the bed and whispered, "Come here."
The soft voice that reached Song Luan's ears was not the same at all. Her scalp was numb and her body was tight. She shook her head desperately.
She was not a fool. Did he just ask her to go there? His face clearly says it all–'I will not give you good fruit to eat!'
Zhao Nanyu tilted his head and smiled. His pure and clear smile shook her spirits for a while. His appearance was really excellent, not only could be described as handsome, but also breathtaking and beautiful. He had delicate features with no flaws. When he smiles, his gentle features were more vivid.
Song Luan's cheeks felt it was scolded with hot water, and the heat spread to her ear tips.
She lowered her head, took two deep breaths, and stopped looking at Zhao Nanyu.
"Ignoring me?" Zhao Nanyu also saw that Song Luan's attitude towards him had changed obviously after they came back from Hou Taiyi's hospital. She had become more courageous and bold, with her little anger.
Song Luan clenched her teeth and said nothing.
Zhao Nanyu smiled angrily, with a smile on his eyebrows. He grabbed her directly from the corner by the wrist, and kissed her carefully.
Song Luan was bewildered and confused
In fact, she was also very smart. She was not blind. Why couldn't she see that Zhao Nanyu liked her a little? But his like was still too trivial.
Relying on this, she probed Zhao Nanyu's bottom line and deliberately ignored him for these past few days.
In fact, Song Luan thought that this man was good at other places except for his black belly and cold heart. But she couldn't accept being trapped in the backyard all her life, and the fate of her life being controlled by him.
Song Luan couldn't break fee. Her face was rosy. She couldn't breathe when he kissed her. Her body was soft. Her lips were bitten. She hissed, and said, "Don't kiss, it's painful..."
"It hurts, I'm sorry." Although he said sorry, his movements were still indifferent.
His slightly cool fingers slowly climbed from her back to her spine. Her clothes slipped unconsciously, and Zhao Nanyu became stiffer.
Song Luan couldn't stand his offensive attack, so she tried to run back. Of course, she couldn't escape and was quickly caught back.
Zhao Nanyu chuckled and whispered in her ear, "It seems that you are very happy ignoring me these two days?"
Zhao Nanyu's eyes were bright and scorched, as if he was thinking of something. Song Luan's scalp numbed as he stared at her. She couldn't resist his questioning, her five fingers held his back tightly, and pinched it, "I'm dying, and you bully me!"
Zhao Nanyu's eyes were covered with thin blood threads, and his momentum was sharp. "Don't talk nonsense."
Song Luan pushed him away, hugged the quilt tightly as she breathed heavily. Her hair was soaked with sweat. She didn't have any strength, "Hou Taiyi said that day that it was because I ate something I shouldn't have, but I couldn't figure out what I ate? I didn't know....I didn't think anyone would want to hurt me."
Zhao Nanyu stopped for a moment and lowered his eyes. Holding her face, he whispered, "I'm not good, I didn't protect you."
Zhao Nanyu figured out why she was so cold these days. Maybe she blamed him for not protecting her. This misunderstanding was better than her knowing that the person who poisoned her was him.
Bah! Obviously it's your poison. You still don't admit. I'm pretending not to know here.
Song Luan closed her eyes and said, "If I don't live long, you can find another one. I think your cousin Yang Ruoyun likes you very much. If you like her and want to marry her, I won't stop you."
Yang Ruoyun, in any case, the female character who almost married this male lead. The gentle and atmospheric appearance was what this man liked.
If he had not just met Yang Ruoyun on the way, Zhao Nanyu would hardly remember what she looked like. He rubbed his eyebrows. "I don't like her."
Song Luan was surprised. He denied it directly.
Zhao Nanyu pulled down the quilt that covered her head.
He asked, "What did she come here to tell you today?"
Song Luan thought about it and decided to go ahead and say, "She advised me to coax you, to be soft to you and not to lose my temper with you."
Look, what a good female character.
It didn't matter if the female lead didn't show up! At least, there's this female character.
It was a pity that Zhao Nanyu didn't seem to understand the meaning of her words, and frowned, "Don't let her in next time. "
He didn't know what they will say to Song Luan. These irrelevant people were really annoying.
I wish they could all disappear.
Until today, Zhao Nanyu's intention to kill Huai Jin had not weakened at all. He had just been patient.
He wanted to remove all the men who have had unclear connection with her before.
Even thinking that Song Luan might have liked any of them, he couldn't bear the feeling of jealousy rising up his heart.
"She's your cousin. You don't give me this face. I'm afraid people will say I don't understand etiquette and I'm arrogant."
"No one dares to say that to you."
Song Luan curled up and was tired of saying so much today. She was very tired. But, she was tossed by him again. She was fighting with her lower and upper eyelids. "I want to go to sleep."
Zhao Nanyu didn't let her go. He bent her legs on her waist and drew close to her ear. He breathed softly, "Don't worry. It's still too early."
The hibiscus tent was warm, and the low sobbing sound in the room was ambiguous. The sound didn't come down until midnight.
Song Luan's consciousness was dim. She was crying and felt she would almost die. She also realized that the man seemed angry, but she didn't know what she said that touched his scale that would result to this cruel punishment.
Zhao Nanyu chuckled and said in a low and hoarse voice, "You can easily push me to others...then it's not true when you said you like me before?"
Of course it is false. You still need to ask?
Advertisements
After that day, Zhao Nanyu was calm and quiet. Song Luan was willing to take care of him, although she was not as warm as before.
Zhao Nanyu had no shortage of soups and medicines. Song Luan's complexion became a little better. The maintenance of the body was a long-term thing, even if Song Luan was in a hurry, she had no choice but to take this step by step.
Zhao Nanyu seemed to be afraid that she would not take the medicine well. He would personally watch her every morning and evening as she drink all the medicine in the bowl.
After drinking the medicine for a month, Song Luan's state of mind was so good that she would occasionally lose her temper, but Zhao Nanyu only watched her closely, even if she vented on him.
Third lady Zhao looked at the cold and lukewarm appearance of the two people. She was worried and couldn't help it. They were still like that after more than a month.
Yang Ruoyun was the happiest of all the people in the house. She would like them to stay like that for the rest of their lives. Song Luan had been quarreling with Zhao Nanyu for a long time every time she had a chance.
Yang Ruoyun won't give up easily, even if she was scolded or threatened by her cousin.
If Song Luan was not worthy of him. Only she (YR) was worthy of her cousin.
Zhao Nanyu never paid attention to this unimportant cousin from the beginning to the end, and even forgot to clean her up.
He'd been checking Huai Jin these days. Huai Jin must had forgotten he was kicked out harshly, because he was not afraid squatting and wandering outside the backyard fence these two days. He should be looking for an opportunity to come in and chat with Song Luan. Zhao Nanyu wouldn't let him in.
When investigating Huai Jin, Zhao Nanyu also learned a very interesting thing. Song Luan seemed to hide most of her gold, silver, jewelry and money to Huai Jin.
Zhao Nanyu thought about it a little, and figured out why she hid it there. Ten percent of it was for the purpose of leaving in the future.
If she leaves openly or secretly, she could just take the treasure and go. This method was convenient and easy to use.
Midsummer was approaching, and the days were becoming more and more lively.
When the emperor's birthday was celebrated in the palace, any official invited to celebrate in the palace could bring a family member with him.
Zhao Nanyu naturally wanted to take Song Luan with him, but she was very reluctant to go.
This time, there was a detailed description in the original book of entering the palace.
The original owner drank a lot of wine, so she secretly slipped out of the hall to cool her face.
A group of people went to the pond to admire the lotus. The original owner had offended many people earlier, and someone placed the medicine into her wine glass. Although it didn't kill her, it also made her suffer a lot.
When the original owner came to the pond, her abdomen suddenly felt pain. Wave after wave of pains, she gradually understood what was going on. She held on to the railing.
When her painful face was white and speechless, He Run came out, lifted and carried her regardless of other people's eyes.
The male lead then came, looking at her lying in He Run's arms with a cold face, while she painfully clutched her stomach as she screamed in pain. He didn't take her from He Run's arms, but went to call the doctor for her.
Song Luan didn't know who want to hurt her. She really didn't want to feel the pain.
But it was no use that she didn't want to go, Zhao Nanyu only family member was her.
On the day of departure, Song Luan got on the carriage and entered the palace with Zhao Nanyu.
She thought in silence that she won't drink the wine that had been drugged.
Zhao Nanyu smiled at her sincerely and squeezed her face. "Well, it looks nice."
He meant that she looked a lot better, unlike the previous days that looked like as if she would die any minute.
=============== Chapter 37
The banquet in the palace was very important. It was not only Zhao Nanyu who went in Zhao's family, but also everyone who had official positions in the palace had to go. No one knew who sent out the news that the emperor wanted to take advantage of this birthday to point out marriage for several unmarried princes.
Several princes who were most likely to win the throne of the East Palace were among them.
As soon as the news came out, many high-ranking women who had not yet been married in the capital were moved by the news. The status of a prince was noble. If their family could marry the royal family, of course, it would be a great good thing.
There was only one girl in the second room of the Zhao family. She was not very healthy and often gets sick. So she spent most of these years outside the villa cultivating. In the past two years, she gradually recovered and returned to the capital. The younger sister just arrived this year. The second wife finally persuaded the second master to take her with her.
The two carriages of the Zhao family were parked in front of the door. Song Luan saw this little sister who almost never showed up before she got on the carriage. Zhao Min had a beautiful appearance, and a quiet temperament.
Zhao Min also saw her. She paid her respects and did a greeting ceremony. The tone was distance and alienated, "Second sister-in-law."
Zhao Min was wearing a very festive dress today. She was pretty and nimble with her red skirt, delicate skin, and beautiful features. She had an excellent jade pendant on her wrist.
Song Luan gave her a friendly smile, "Fifth Younger Sister"
Zhao Nanyu didn't seem to care much about this sister. After glancing and nodding, and then said his greetings. He gently clasped Song Luan's five fingers, "It's late. Let's go. "
Song Luan followed him to the carriage. Zhao's house was not far from the palace gate. There were so many officials and family members entering the palace today, so for a while, the gate of the palace was blocked. The carriages parked outside looked like a long dragon.
Song Luan couldn't hold back her curiosity. She opened the window, stretched out her head and looked out. She found that the line was extremely long. She estimated that they had to wait long for their turn. She drew back her face and sat in her position in a proper manner.
In fact, the carriage was actually not big, it was only enough to accommodate the two of them. Song Luan was so bored that she had no choice but to talk to Zhao Nanyu. She asked, "How can Erbo bring Min Hui's sister into the palace today? Does he also want Min Hui's sister to show her face in the emperor to get married with the prince?"
Zhao Nanyu grasped her cool hand, and casually said, "Several princes haven't had any imperial concubine yet. It's not surprising that the second uncle wants to fight for opportunities for this fifth younger sister."
He took a deep look at Song Luan and held her palm harder. There were many people in the world who were obsessed with power, even Song Luan was included. He remembered that she liked the power status of gold, silver, jewelry, and the feeling of being held high.
Song Luan didn't know that the man thought of her past again. She nodded, "I understand, people would climb up high if they had the chance."
Zhao Nanyu sighed, "Yes."
Now that she liked those, he would give them all to her, so that she would not have a chance to escape.
Absolute power means no one can't resist.
Most of the information about the emperor's selection of imperial concubines for his sons came from the palace. It was certain that the emperor deliberately let the information spread among the people. Since ancient times, the princes' marriage had never been a matter of mutual love, but a game between all forces. Today's agenda was suspicious. The candidates must have already been decided to balance the strength of all parties.
After waiting for about half an hour, the carriage finally entered the palace. After getting off the carriage and walking to the front of the main hall, Zhao Nanyu met some acquaintances.
The person who came was a handsome man. He had on a shallow smile on his lips that look like the spring breeze in the rain. The man was dressed in a dark robe and wore a delicate white jade crown on his head. He even looked good from a distance.
"Ah Yu, it's a coincidence that we met before entering the hall."
Zhao Nanyu arched his hand and said, "Sixth Royal Highness."
Song Luan suddenly realized that her intuition was right. Just now, seeing the smile on his face, she felt it was fake. It turned out that he was the second biggest winner of the book, the sixth prince, who later became the new emperor.
It's not unreasonable that the sixth prince and Zhao Nanyu had a good relationship. The ruthless style of these two men were too similar. Zhao Nanyu's means were above the sixth prince, and the ruthlessness of the sixth prince was beyond anyone's reach.
The girl who had saved his life treated him wholeheartedly, but in the end, she also said to be destroyed.
Before the sixth prince ascended the throne, he seemed to be a very easy-going young man, smiling like a spring breeze. But after he became king, he changed his face very quickly. He made a drastic change and killed many people.
The eyes of the sixth prince seemed to linger on Song Luan's face for a moment as he smiled, "Ah Yu, is this your wife? This is the first time I've seen you together."
"Well." Song Luan's white face was soon turned red by the wind, and Zhao Nanyu stood in front of her to block most of the wind.
After a pause, he said, "Your Highness, let's go in and talk."
Sixth prince raised his eyebrow. He did not expect that his best friend would be so distressed and concerned for his wife. She had made a great noise last year. Who in this place not know that the Song family's third lady had a family affair? She did not lack troubles these past few years.
He thought that Ah Yu was disgusted with this capable lady, so he never mentioned this wife in front of him. Now it seems that those rumors were false.
Ah Yu clearly liked this third lady of the Song family.
"Alright, let's go in and talk."
Once in the palace, Song Luan was frightened by the battle inside. Even if it was a happy event, the atmosphere was solemn.
The emperor's birthday was not meant to play.
The only person she knew in the whole palace was Zhao Nanyu, who she had to rely on. Zhao Nanyu seemed to realize her tension and uneasiness, so he held her hand tightly and never let go. He said, "Don't worry, just follow me."
Song Luan, of course, followed him.
First, she didn't want to drink the wine that had been drugged. Second, she couldn't let Zhao Nanyu see the picture of He Run holding her.
In fact, at the beginning, Song Luan was worried about whether she would suffer retribution if she changed the plot of the original book without permission?
Gradually, she found that the fate of others had been changed, and she had not been punished, so she gradually let go of this thought.
When everyone was seated, the emperor came.
Song Luan listened to the eunuch's high pitched voice and felt her ears hurt. Although the emperor was not young, and his body was weak. The majesty of the emperor made others dared not look straight.
The emperor sat in a high position and rarely smiled. "You don't have to be restrained tonight."
Although he had said this, his ministers did not dare to take it seriously.
The emperor seemed to be in a good mood today. His face was plain, and the smile on his face didn't go down tonight.
Song Luan only looked at the emperor carefully at the beginning, and for the rest of the time, she only lowered her head and ate the food in her bowl. She and Zhao Nanyu sat in the back position. The food at each table was just enough.
The food in the imperial palace was better than the food outside. It looked more appetizing. Song Luan put some pieces of pineapple crisps on her plate.
She tasted them. They were not sweet and not greasy. They tasted very good.
She couldn't help eating them one by one. She ate all of them in a short time. Unfortunately, there was only a small plate for each person, so there was nothing left.
Song Luan's mouth dried after eating too much, but she didn't dare to drink water at all.
Tonight, she decided not to drink anything.
Advertisements
She was already hungry. What she had just eaten was not enough for her stomach. She licked her lips, and wanted to eat more.
Zhao Nanyu silently pushed the pineapple cake in front of him to her, "Eat it."
Song Luan was afraid that the more she ate, the more thirsty she would be, but she couldn't resist her greediness, so she ate two more pieces. Zhao Nanyu observed carefully and was afraid that she was thirsty so he poured a glass of water for her and pushed it to her, "Drink water."
Song Luan was like a frightened bird. She quickly refused, "No, I'm not thirsty."
After swallowing, her thirstiness was relieved.
The emperor in the throne did not know how to laugh. He looked down softly at the people sitting down. The emperor suddenly raised his glass and said slowly, "Let's drink together, everyone."
All the people stood up, and Song Luan hurriedly got up. She had to take up her glass and watched all the people drink the wine. She bit the glass, and her lips only lingered at the mouth of the glass. She didn't drink a drop of wine.
In such a big occasion, no one should pay attention whether she had drunk this glass of wine except those who want to harm her with medicine.
Sure enough, no one looked at her. Song Luan took a sigh of relief and sat down slowly. At this time, she found her sister, Song Yu, sitting opposite her.
Song Yu also noticed her eyes and smiled at her.
Song Luan gave her a fake smile. Song Yu sat beside Song Heqing.
There were many girls in the Song family. This sister was very skilled, making her brother bring her to the palace instead of the other sisters. She must be one of the many women who wanted to be a princess.
It was difficult for Song Yu to marry the prince. The Song family was also a high gate, but it's far different from the royal family.
When Zhao Nanyu saw that the wine in front of her did not move, he said with a smile, "This is the fruit wine provided by Gongli special. It's very delicious. I remember that you like to drink fruit wine very much. Why don't you drink it?"
She made a random excuse, "I'm afraid to make a fool of myself."
Zhao Nanyu knew that Song Luan likes to drink, but the amount of wine was not good. If she drank a little, she would be drunk.
"Don't drink in the palace. I'll ask someone to take some back to the palace later."
"Okay."
The emperor was talking with his sons. They looked very harmonious.
At the end of the dinner party, the people accompanied the emperor to the imperial garden to see the fireworks.
Finally, the emperor announced several edicts in succession.
It's all about marriage. There were also six of the princes.
Most people didn't expect that the emperor had already selected people in advance and seemed to be waiting for today's announcement.
The birth mother of the sixth prince was poor and died early. His influence among these princes seemed to be the weakest at present, but the Emperor gave him the legitimate daughter of the prominent Xuanguo family.
Xuanguofu had been honored for many years and held military power. Xuan Zhengqing was the most beloved daughter in the family. The old lady and her parents love her the most.
When the imperial edict came down, even if Xuan Zhengqing had no intention to marry sixth prince, she had to kneel down to thank him.
Looking at the smile in the eyes of sixth prince, Song Luan could not see whether he was satisfied with the marriage at all. It stands to reason that the Xuanguo family could increase his power, and this was not unreasonable.
But Song Luan thought of the plot in the original book. It was written that after the new emperor ascended the throne, a luxurious palace was built in the rear area. It was said that a woman was imprisoned in the palace. For many years, no one had seen how the woman looked like, but everyone guessed that it must be her beautiful face that made the emperor built a palace for her.
She didn't think Xuan Zhengqing was that woman.
The emperor seemed tired. He told everyone to go to the imperial garden to see the fireworks when the time came, and then he left the main hall after giving orders.
The invisible pressure on Song Luan's head suddenly disappeared, and she felt more comfortable.
Song Yu suddenly got up and walked towards her. She had a pleasant smile on her face. "Sister, the palace is too stuffy. Can you accompany me out to cool in the wind?"
Song Luan refused without thinking. She never left Zhao Nanyu for a step. "I'm fine."
Song Yu's face was thin, and her face turned red after she refused. She felt so pitiful after being seen by others. She thought that her unreasonable elder sister was bullying her. "Elder sister, I'm really scared to go by myself. Can't you go with me?"
Song Luan shook her head and didn't give her any face. She suddenly took Zhao Nanyu's hand, "Ah Yu also drank too much. I have to accompany him. "
After being rejected twice, Song Yu didn't have the courage to speak for the third time. She bit her teeth and went back to her place.
As soon as she left, Song Luan let go of the man's arms.
Many people in the main hall have gone out, either to blow air or to the imperial garden to wait in advance.
Zhao Nanyu asked her, "Are you full?"
"I'm full. "
Her biggest problem now was thirst, but she still had to keep holding until she leaves the palace before she could touch any water.
Zhao Nanyu nodded. "Let's go. I'll show you around the palace. "
"Okay."
Song Luan also wanted to see what the ancient imperial palace was like, and whether it was really as gorgeous as described in historical books.
The palace was surrounded with red lanterns. It was lofty and exquisitely carved.
After passing two paths, they arrived at the back hall. Zhao Nanyu met sixth prince by the lake.
This time, he was accompanied by a little eunuch. After a careful look, the little eunuch looked very beautiful. He was not like a boy.
Song Luan could see that the little eunuch was a girl almost at a glance, mostly pretending to be the eunuch to follow sixth prince.
There were many people beside the pavilion by the lake. It seems that the sixth prince was not prepared for her. In front of her and Zhao Nanyu, he squeezed the little eunuch's face and made her laugh.
Song Luan did not dare or want to see it. The more she knew, the faster she would die. Zhao Nanyu was his best friend, but she was nothing.
Sixth prince and Zhao Nanyu had something to talk about. Sixth prince bent a pair of peach blossom eyes, and looked at her deeply, "Miss Song, are you free?"
"Ah?"
"A Yun is timid. It's her first time around the palace, can you take her around?" The sixth prince gave the little eunuch's hand directly to her, and said to the little girl gently, "Follow this sister."
"Okay."
Song Luan was so depressed. It was also her first time to enter the palace. But these two men want to talk alone, she couldn't help it.
She took the little girl's hand and led her not far away. Song Luan did not dare to stay too far away from them. She could still see their position when she looked up.
The little girl beside her also stayed in peace. Song Luan said, "Shall we sit and watch the fish?"
"Okay."
The two women stared at the carp in the lake, and soon after they were busy. It was Song Yu and her friends who also came.
"Sister, you are here."
Song Luan leaned against the railing and looked at the man in the pavilion who was still talking with the sixth prince. Her uneasy heart fell down a little. She said, "I am watching the fish."
"Does the fish look good?"
It's much better than you.
Song Luan was born to hate Song Yu, and her disgust was overwhelming. She turned around impatiently and said, "It's not good, so I'm leaving. Take your time if you like."
Fortunately, the original owner never had a good face for Song Yu, so it's not surprising that she said these words to Song Yu.
Song Luan was about to leave when a sharp stabbing pain came from her lower abdomen. Her legs immediately softened and she almost fell to the ground in pain. Fortunately, A Yun on her side helped her.
The little girl's voice was sweet, and was worried, "What's the matter with you?"
The pain this time was different from that of the last time. The feeling in the abdomen was the same as being beaten with heavy boxing. The flesh and blood were stirred in the belly. Her forehead was cold and sweaty. She opened her mouth, but she couldn't say anything. "My stomach hurts so much."
This kind of pain did not give her any chance to breathe. Every minute was torture. The original ruddy lips was now extremely pale. Song Luan pinched A Yun's wrist and tightened her teeth to prevent her from calling out.
A Yun was obviously scared. She wanted to call people, but she couldn't let her go. She was about to cry.
Song Luan's face was white and her consciousness was still clear. She gasped heavily, and her lower lip that she bitten had already bled.
At this time, a man suddenly appeared in the crowd. He Run looked worried. He pushed away A Yun and picked up Song Luan. "What's wrong with you?! What's going on?"
Song Luan wished that her eyes would pass out in the dark, and break away from He Run. However, she did not have the strength to push him.
All of a sudden, a gust of wind swept through her ears.
Zhao Nanyu finally appeared and ran from the pavilion in a hurry. He stared at He Run coldly. His eyes seemed to be poison. He wished He Run's hands on her were chopped.
Zhao Nanyu decisively grabbed Song Luan. The woman in his arms looked as if she had already lose all the blood. Her hair was soaked by cold sweat.
But knowing Zhao Nanyu was with him, Song Luan relaxed. She placed her arms around his waist, and buried her face in his chest. She was quite aggrieved, "It hurts."
It really hurts. She still felt the pain in her body clearly.
It was more than a hundred times more painful than her monthly period.
She obviously didn't touch a drop of water, so why was she stuck in this scene!? Why did He Run still appeared?!
=============== Chapter 38
Zhao Nanyu asked the sixth prince for a room to put Song Luan, who had been sweating and suffering from stomachache, on the bed.
She couldn't bear it any anymore, but Zhao Nanyu couldn't hold her in his arms any longer. Her lips whispered in low tones as she grasped his clothes tightly without letting go. Tears ran down her face, and it didn't stop pouring from her eyes.
Zhao Nanyu looked at her dry lips and was about to get up and pour a glass of water for her, but the person on the bed trembled and held out their fingers. She had to hold on the corner of his clothes as she didn't have any strength. "Don't go."
This kind of dull pain was really too hard to endure. It made people more and more conscious.
Although Song Luan feared her impending death at what Zhao Nanyu would do towards her in the future, but he was the only one in the Imperial Palace who could bring her a sense of security. Song Luan's eyes were glistening with tears. They were as red as the rabbit's. They were pitiful.
Zhao Nanyu sat back and took her hand and whispered, "Okay, I won't go." His back was tight, his eyes were bloodshot, and his face was cold. He turned his head and said earnestly to the sixth prince behind him, "Excuse me, sixth highness, please ask a doctor for me."
After a pause, he added two more words, "As soon as possible."
Tonight, sixth prince saw how Zhao Nanyu treated Song Luan.
Now, the sixth prince ordered people to go to the Taiji hospital and ask the Tai doctor to come over.
Song Yu stood outside and watched. She was so nervous that she kept wringing her handkerchief. Her face was ugly and white.
Song Yu had to admit that there was poison in the wine glass in front of Song Luan's table.
She looked for that kind of medicine so hard before she attended the birthday party in the palace. The medicine had no harm other than stomachache. Although she hated this elder sister, Song Luan was after all, still her sister. She dared not kill her.
But tonight, she knew that Song Luan didn't even drink since she stared at her all night. She never touched the glass from the beginning to the end!
How could Song Luan get poisoned!? Song Yu even began to doubt that maybe Song Luan had seen through her. However, Song Luan's speechless appearance did not look like it was pretend. For a while, Song Yu was confused. She didn't know what was going on.
Tai doctor was quickly invited from the Taiji hospital. Since the sixth prince personally sent the message, the doctor did not dare to delay, so he hurried to check her pulse. After careful diagnosis, he took a breath of relief and turned to let the apprentice behind him go to Taiji hospital to get the antidote.
Zhao Nanyu's face was heavy, the lines of his chin were cold and hard, and there was a murky breath coming from him. He said in a hoarse voice, "Taiyi, what's wrong with my wife?"
He clenched his five fingers, and it turned white. At that moment, he almost thought Song Luan was going to die.
The doctor said slowly, "Madam ate Qingluo by mistake, and this caused her stomach to hurt. After taking the antidote, she will be okay."
"Qingluo?"
"It's a kind of poison from the south of Xinjiang. It's not vicious either. It won't take peoples' lives after taking it. It will only hurt them."
The sixth prince responded first, and waved his hand, "Go and find out where the poison came from."
Song Yu's heart suddenly jumped. She pride herself on her calm temperament and was not afraid of being checked. The wine glass passed so many people, so they wouldn't find that it was her. Song Yu forced herself to relax gradually.
There was a ready-made antidote in the hospital. The little apprentice quickly sent it to her. Zhao Nanyu helped Song Luan up, gently feeding the antidote into her stomach, and carefully wiped her lips.
Song Luan's back was already wet. Because of the pain, she had been biting her lips, and tiny wounds began to appear.
"Don't bite yourself." Zhao Nanyu couldn't see it.
Song Luan buried herself in his chest and sobbed. Zhao Nanyu took out his coat to wipe the sweat off her face. He reached his finger to her lips. "Bite me."
Song Luan was not polite to him either. She opened his mouth and bit him. She immediately left two wounds.
Fortunately, the antidote soon worked, and the pain in the lower abdomen gradually eased. Slowly, the surging pain disappeared, and Song Luan loosened her teeth.
She felt she had just been fished out of the water, and was embarrassed.
Even though Song Luan was poisoned, it didn't turn into a big commotion. Today was a great day, no one would poke this kind of thing in front of the emperor and make him unhappy.
***
Therefore, only a few people on the lakeside at that time knew.
Soon, the people that sixth prince ordered also came back, along with the wine cup on the table of Song Luan,"Your highness, the wine glass was poisoned."
"I see. Step back."
It seems that Zhao Nanyu was not surprised to hear this sentence. He had seen a lot of dirty things in the palace. He pulled up a smile of ridicule.
The person poisoned the cup directly. It could be seen that this person's means and mind were very common.
It's too easy to find out who poisoned this.
Song Luan had no strength in all her limbs. She didn't hear the report because she was too tired. She laid in Zhao Nanyu's arms and slept quietly.
Zhao Nanyu covered the quilt for her, stood up, and said to sixth prince, "Thank you for your help."
"Why are you so polite."
Zhao Nanyu's eyes swept over Song Yu's body intentionally. He casually rubbed his fingers, and said lightly, "It's almost time. The emperor will come to the imperial garden."
The sixth prince said, "You stay and take good care of her. Naturally, I will speak for you for father's side."
"Thank you, your highness."
Sixth prince left.
Naturally, some people who stayed also left and didn't continue to stay any longer.
But the little eunuch beside the sixth prince was not willing to leave. She was still too young and was scared by Song Luan's appearance. Her eyes were red and she grabbed sixth prince's clothes. "How is she? Is she alright?"
Sixth prince patted her head, "Don't think about it too much. It will be fine." Then he took her hand, "Don't you want to see fireworks? Come on, I'll take you there."
The little girl was coaxed by him around two or three times.
Almost everyone left, and the palace soon became quiet. Zhao Nanyu watched over Song Luan's bedside, and his thumb lingered on her pale face.
Song Luan was dizzy. Her body seemed to float and sank in the air. Her dreams were always strange. There were many strange pictures drilling into her mind.
Zhao Nanyu looked down and saw that she was slightly frowning. Her heart's palpitation was smooth, but her breathing was weak and her lips were still pale.
Zhao Nanyu found new clothes for her, took off the wet clothes which had been wet by her sweat, and helped her changed.
Advertisements
Song Luan couldn't settle down in her dreams. There was a voice in her ear all the time. It was low and hoarse. She couldn't sleep comfortably because of the noise.
Zhao Nanyu caressed her face carefully and intimately, and said, "Clearly you were very careful. How could it be that something happened? I can't let you out of my sight for a moment."
"It seems that you will have to stay at home in the future, so you won't suffer so much. It must be very painful just now. I feel distressed when I look at it."
He kissed her on the forehead. "Don't worry, I won't make you suffer in vain."
Song Luan woke up to his voice, slowly opened her eyes, and saw the man beside her.
She recovered some strength after sleeping, so she opened her mouth and asked, "What have you found out?"
More than anyone else, she wanted to know what was going on. It was written in the book that the drink of the original owner was poisoned, but she didn't touch the drink. Why would she be poisoned?
The strangest thing was that Song Luan didn't see He Run in the palace, why did he suddenly appear in the palace again? She was so careful to avoid the plot of the original book. Why did it happen at last?
"Poison was left in your wine glass." Zhao Nanyu did not intend to hide it from her.
In an instant, the little blood on Song Luan's little face faded away. She looked pale and scared. Her body was still soft. She could only sit on him.
Song Luan did not give up and asked, "Is there anything in the food?"
Zhao Nanyu shook his head. "It's not in the food."
Song Luan's heart was cold. She didn't touch the wine. She ate pineapple cake during the banquet, but Zhao Nanyu also ate it.
She had a bold guess in her heart. What happened before was strung into a line in her mind. She showed her weakness and flattered him. Zhao Nanyu still gave her the poison. She could not avoid Huai Jin and He Run, because Zhao Nanyu still thought that she had something with them.
She was cautious, but still couldn't escape the plot. Indeed, she tried hard to avoid the path the original owner took in the book, but the result hadn't changed.
That is to say, some plots of the book had changed because she was a transmigrator, but her ending would not change. There were always other reasons that will lead to the end of the original book.
The future of everyone else in the book could changed, only she, who was the transmigrator, couldn't changed.
It didn't matter if her character was broken. The fate line would still be pulled back by an invisible hand.
Song Luan thought it was more and more like this. Her heart sank continuously. She remembered clearly the ending of the original owner. She was stabbed after the poison entered the bone marrow, and then burned alive in a fire.
Song Luan's eyes became extremely complicated when she looked at Zhao Nanyu. Now Zhao Nanyu liked her more or less. Since he liked her, he wouldn't kill her, would he?
Would he still want to stab her to death?
Song Luan didn't believe it. She forced herself not to think. Maybe today's event was just a coincidence.
Song Luan didn't know yet if there were any consequences for her character collapse, but if she went along with the original character of Song Luan, her body would be much unhealthier than it was now. The broken spur would gradually erode her vitality, which was why her heart suddenly ache before the first days she transmigrated.
Even if she was poisoned by tianqin, it was far from the time when the poison was going to happen.
Seeing that her face was ugly, Zhao Nanyu asked, "What's the matter? Scared?"
Song Luan wriggled her lips and said, "No."
Zhao Nanyu wanted to laugh, but he only showed a smile. He hugged Song Luan tightly. Even though she said she was not afraid, he could feel her trembling with fear. "Do you want to know who did it?"
"Yes." She forced back her tears and asked, "Who is it?"
In 'The Powerful Minister', it was not written who poisoned her during the banquet, it only showed that the original owner lost a big face to the male lead in this banquet, and the hat on Zhao Nanyu's head became greener.
"Your sister, Song Yu."
"Ah? How could it be her?" Song Luan was shocked. The younger sister was usually timid and submissive. She would play with anyone and would get along well. She had no idea.
She looked ordinary.
How could she be so cruel that she dared to attack her own older sister?
Zhao Nanyu didn't understand the twists and turns between girls, but at a glance, she could see that Song Yu didn't like her, and her means were too childish, so the people that sixth prince ordered were able to find the poison so easily.
The reason why he didn't say it in front of everyone was that he wanted to wait for Song Luan to wake up and ask her what she wanted to do.
"What do you want to do? Do you want to destroy her reputation? Or something else?"
Song Luan didn't think about these things at the moment, and she didn't get Song Yu's intentions, but if she told Zhao Nanyu that she didn't care, it seemed that it was too white lotus, so she said, "It's up to you."
Zhao Nanyu nodded. "Okay, let me do it."
His means, needless to say, would not make people feel better.
Song Luan's brain was in a mess, and the speculation of her ending was still lingering in her mind.
She raised her eyelids, and her beautiful eyes fixed on Zhao Nanyu. She just opened her mouth to ask him something, when the door of the hall was pushed open. Song Heqing rushed in from the outside in a hurry. His handsome face was full of anxiety. "Ah Luan, I heard that you fainted?! Ah? What's the matter?"
Song Luan tried to smile at him. "Brother, I didn't faint. I just had a stomachache."
Song Heqing rushed forward, pushed Zhao Nanyu away, and looked at his sister with concern, "How can you have a stomachache?"
On the way, he was almost scared to death. He originally came out to find Song Yu, who he couldn't find. When he caught a palace man, he asked. The palace man not only told him about Song Yu, but also told him about Song Luan.
He was so frightened that he was afraid that Song Luan would be hurt to death, so he rushed here in a hurry.
Song Luan didn't want Song Yu to tell her brother about her poisoning. Song Heqing was a terrible man in the court, but in front of his sisters in his family, he was very silly and sweet, and he believed everything her sisters said unconditionally.
Song Heqing was really unbiased and loves every sister. She felt Song Heqing truly loved her even just the few times she spent with him. So... she didn't have the heart to let him know these silly accounts.
"I ate too much cold food, and had a bad stomachache."
Song Heqing didn't know what to say about her. He poked her in the forehead. "When can you be sensible!? Girls should eat less cold food."
He turned his head and scolded Zhao Nanyu, "So do you, how can you let her do that!? Why won't you stop her when she does this? Don't let everything go her way."
Song Heqing said these with a little guilty conscience. He knew that his sister was a 'little boy', and no one could persuade her with her bad temper.
When Song Heqing pushed Zhao Nanyu away, he was stunned. When he saw him poking Song Luan's face, his anger became even worse. Even brothers and sisters should not be so intimate.
Zhao Nanyu said coldly, "Brother, it's my fault."
Song Heqing scolded him for awhile, and then calmed down. He coughed twice and asked Song Luan in a low voice, "Does it hurt now?"
"No more pain. "
The pain disappeared after she took the antidote.
Song Heqing raised his hand and touched the back of her head, thinking that her sister was so cute and ignorant. If she had been so obedient all her life, there would be no need to worry!
A few days ago, Song Luan's little dog (HJ) dared to find him in the street. He was full of nonsense, saying that A Luan had been living in deep water all day, and asked him to bring her out of Zhao's house.
Song Heqing laughed at that time, and was angry. He kicked the scoundrel away.
"I have said this many times. Don't be capricious in the future." He said this in Song Luan's ear.
"I really changed!" Song Luan grumbled discontentedly.
"It's better to change."
Zhao Nanyu coughed several times when he saw that this brother and sister were talking longer.
Song Heqing was very discerning, knowing that he disturbed the couple. He got up, but didn't change his style whenever he leaves Song Luan. He didn't bring his purse today, so he gave her all the valuable things on his body.
Little sister, you must be spoiled.
Song Luan collected all the gold and silver jewelry he gave and held it like a small wealthy fan. She pointed to the bag in her arms and asked curiously, "How much are these worth?"
Zhao Nanyu glanced at it. "Several hundred Liang."
He reached for it. "I'll put it away for you."
Song Luan knew that she couldn't take it back. She quickly hid everything behind her and said softly, "How can you rob my money! I don't believe you're so poor."
Of course, Zhao Nanyu didn't lack anything at this point. He was only possessive. He couldn't accept that she would use other things given by others. Moreover, he couldn't let Song Luan hide too much money.
Once the rabbit gets fat, it wants to run.
Zhao Nanyu ridiculed her, "If you let others see this picture of you that you have never seen money before, they will definitely laugh at you."
Song Luan didn't feel ashamed either. She said in a big way, "No one doesn't like money."
"You really don't want me to help you?"
"I can do it myself. "
"Okay." He shrugged, as if he gave up.
Zhao Nanyu was not in a hurry. He would take this away when she sleeps.
Song Luan held the bag in her arms. She was also good at blocking it for fear that Zhao Nanyu would rush up and rob it.
"You're tired?" Zhao Nanyu asked her.
"Not too tired."
"Then we will go back to the palace."
The palace was a place of right and wrong. What would happen if they stay a little longer?
Song Luan didn't want to stay in the palace anymore. Her legs were still soft. Zhao Nanyu didn't want to let her go, so he went forward and held her back.
Song Luan's hands were tied around his neck, and she looked up at his delicate side face, which was flawless. Song Luan thought of a lot of things, lost her mind for a moment, then blurted out the questions from the bottom of her heart. Her voice was very small, almost like a small whisper, "Will you kill me?"
Just like in the book.
He stabbed her heart with a knife.
***
Will he?
=============== Chapter 39
Zhao Nanyu was stunned. As the wind howled in the cold night, he continued to walk in steps. He almost thought he had heard her wrong. He cut the nails and cut off the iron, so he decisively answered, "No."
Now, how could he still be willing to kill her? He wished she had no worries or illness.
Zhao Nanyu hugged the person in his arms more tightly, as if unintentionally, "Why do you suddenly ask?"
It was still cool in the evening. Song Luan suddenly felt her arms were very warm. She nestled in his arms. Her mood was still a little low. "Nothing, I just asked."
Song Luan thought it might be that he was too surprised. Zhao Nanyu didn't want to kill her. He seemed pretty good to her. As for the plot of the original book, she was reluctant to think about it. The more she thought about it, the more painful her brain was, it was better to let it go.
She still didn't plan to follow the plot line because it would hurt too many people, especially her obedient and pitiful four-year-old son.
But she didn't know if there were consequences for deviating away from the original book.
There must be a way to get there. Song Luan comforted herself like this.
Zhao Nanyu held her waist tightly in his broad hands and murmured, "Don't think about anything."
Song Luan nodded, but this time she listened to his words, "Okay."
Zhao Nanyu walked to the front of the palace with her in his arms. When the fireworks stopped, the officials scattered, and all of them went out of the palace together.
The third lady of the Song family was really famous. In addition, her father was a proud man in the court. Most people had heard of Song Luan's right and wrong enmity with Zhao Nanyu, and many high spirited scholars mocked Zhao Nanyu in their hearts.
At that time when they saw him holding Song Luan tenderly, for a while, they thought that the moon was misty. They wiped their eyes, but they did not see him wrong.
The woman in his arms was really beautiful.
The moonlight poured on her jade-like face. Her skin was white as snow, and her appearance was exquisite. Zhao Nanyu raised his hand without trace, and the wide sleeve blocked her face.
He quickened his pace, obviously eager to leave. But someone who didn't understand the vague atmosphere, went up and said hello to him, "Brother Zhao."
Zhao Nanyu nodded, "Lord Chen."
"Brother Zhao, why didn't I see you enjoying the fireworks? I also never seen your wife." Lord Chen had no malice. Recently, the sixth prince was in the limelight, and Zhao Nanyu was close to this prince. He was just trying to make a match.
Zhao Nanyu was always very kind to his colleagues. Even though his heart was disgusted, he still replied flatly, "My wife was not well, so she didn't go watch the fireworks."
"So it is." Lord Chen's eyes glanced at her, but the beauty was covered by Zhao Nanyu so tightly that he couldn't see anything. He smiled again and said, "I wonder if brother Zhao is free tomorrow? I have something to ask brother Zhao."
The emperor had been ill for several months. His appearance at today's banquet was not good. Everyone was guessing that the emperor would choose a prince in this period of time. But they didn't know who the prince in the emperor's heart was?
Tonight, he gave several marriages in one breath. The most prominent one was the sixth prince. In addition to the emperor's preference for the sixth prince these days, there were not a few people who were optimistic about this sixth prince.
Zhao Nanyu thought about it and said, "Okay."
Song Luan was oppressed by his sleeve. She just wanted to show her head, but she was pressed back mercilessly.
The carriage was waiting at the gate of the palace. Zhao Nanyu held her up. At last, she could breathe. Her face was red and flustered.
Since that time when she and Zhao Nanyu made love, he liked to move his hands and feet on her. It was normal for him to bite her twice. This time, he couldn't help biting her cheek.
Song Luan turned her head angrily. She didn't talk to him on the way back to the residence.
The lantern in front of Zhao's house was high. The two fierce stone lions look more ferocious at night.
They almost came back at the same time with Zhao Erye.
Zhao Nanyu's relationship with this second uncle was very rusty. They rarely speak together.
After a salute, he took Song Luan's hand, and went straight back to the courtyard.
Song Luan already slept in the palace for a while, so she was not sleepy at all. After bathing and washing her face, she sat in the middle of the bed cross legged in a chinese dress. When Zhao Nanyu took a bath, changed clothes, and came out of the screen, Song Luan remembered what she had forgotten.
She held out her hand to Zhao Nanyu, "The gold and silver jewelry my brother gave me!!"
Her bag disappeared. It must be Zhao Nanyu who hid it for her.
Zhao Nanyu wiped his hair and replied, "I'll help you put it away first."
Song Luan thought to herself that his character should not be a stingy man, how could he get greedy for her things now? What's more, Zhao Nanyu was not short of money at all, and he couldn't use the jewelry her brother gave!
"I have said that I don't want you to collect it for me. I have a place to put it! How can you take my things?" Song Luan said angrily.
Zhao Nanyu pondered for a moment, and thought that he didn't treat her well just now, so he said, "Tomorrow, go to the warehouse and pick out any jewelry that you like."
All the gold and silver jewelry in his storehouse were given by the emperor. Even if Song Luan wanted to sell those jewelries in the future, pawnshop wouldn't dare to buy it.
Song Luan didn't know about it. After thinking, she thought it was not a loss. For fear that he would take it back, she said quickly, "You said it yourself. I will not be polite tomorrow. "
Taking whatever she wants means taking as much as she wants. Treasure is a good thing in any dynasty. No one would think too much.
Zhao Nanyu swallowed the smile on his lips and nodded.
Song Luan was not too sleepy at this time, and the boring books she read looked almost the same. She couldn't understand Zhao Nanyu's books, and couldn't mention her interest. She rolled twice in the bed, but she was still not sleepy. She put on a blouse and said, "I'm going to see my son. He must miss me."
Zhao Nanyu held her wrist. "I'll take him and let him sleep here tonight."
He detained little Zhao these days. He didn't let her get close to Song Luan for many days.
This time, he would be happy for sure.
Zhao Nanyu went to the front yard with a light lantern on his hand. Little Zhao was not yet asleep. He laid on the bed in a very serious position, his black eyes were wide open, staring blankly at the top of the bed, and didn't know what he was thinking.
Zhao Nanyu lit the light in the room, found a coat for him, reached out and touched his head, and asked, "You can't sleep?"
"Yes." No matter how serious he was, the voice of the child was still a little milky. He said, "Dad, I ate in my grandmother's house tonight. I waited for you and my mother for a long time, but neither you nor my mother came back."
When his parents are not at home, he can't sleep well.
Zhao Nanyu took him out of the bed and put on his coat for him. Then he picked up his son and said softly, "I will take you to your mother's side to sleep. "
Little Zhao's eyes were bent as he smiled and hugged his father's neck. He said sweetly, "Okay."
Advertisements
When Zhao Nanyu saw that he was smiling, he also laughed.
The father and son soon arrived at Song Luan's residence from the front yard. The candles were bright inside. Song Luan couldn't wait to get off the bed when she heard the noise outside.
She had an old habit of walking barefoot again.
The barefoot girl rushed to the door and saw bright eyed little Zhao in Zhao Nanyu's arms, "You came quickly."
Zhao Nanyu reminded her, "Put on your shoes."
"Got it." She went up to take little Zhao. She looked at him with a smile, and asked, "Does this little son miss me?"
Little Zhao replied honestly, "Yes."
Song Luan liked to stay with her son. She was happy. She looked down at him carefully and sighed, "Did you get thinner? There's not much flesh on this face as before."
Little Zhao shook his head. "I eat very well, mother."
Song Luan held him and thought that he was indeed lighter than before. She said, "You must be too tired with learning so much. Tomorrow I will stew soup for you and supplement your body. It's better to be fat and white. "
Little Zhao's face turned red. "Mother, I'm not a little boy."
Four year olds also know that fat people don't look good. In fact, she couldn't say he was fat. He looked...beautiful and looked cute with the little meat on his face.
Song Luan chuckled, "Okay, that's the deal. Come here after finishing your homework tomorrow noon, okay?"
"Okay."
He also wanted to eat what his mother made. Last time, the pastry was delicious. As long as his mother made it, even if it wasn't delicious, he liked it.
Song Luan held the little child and was reluctant to give up. She seemed to have countless words to say, "Did your uncle punish you when he taught you lessons?"
Song Luan still remembered that not only Zhao Chao who punished her son to copy, but also Zhao Nanyu.
That time when she boldly told Zhao Nanyu not to punish little Zhao, the man promised her, but she didn't know if he was lying to her.
Little Zhao originally wanted to say that he had been punished, because he couldn't lie, but his father suddenly coughed, so the child immediately understood, and shook his head, "No."
Song Luan nodded contentedly. "That's right. You're only four years old. You can't be punished even if you don't understand how to read or how to learn." She was still uneasy, and told him, "If your uncle punishes you in the future, come and tell your mother."
Song Luan knew in her heart that little Zhao was her son and shouldn't get hurt.
Zhao Nanyu couldn't just watch anymore and said with a smile, "You are not afraid to spoil him."
"You are too strict."
"Okay." Zhao Nanyu patted his son's head. "That's enough. Should you go to sleep?"
Little Zhao reluctantly climbed down from Song Luan's lap, put on his shoes, and said to Song Luan, "Mother, I'm going to sleep."
His bed was located on the side of the room. She had slept several times with little Zhao.
He knew his way to the room so she didn't need to carry him.
His short legs pedaled to the edge of the bed, climbed up the bed with a little effort, and covered himself.
She embraced her lovely son contentedly before going back to room.
Zhao Nanyu laid beside her without saying a word, and silently extinguished the candle.
The room was in darkness. Zhao Nanyu's cold palm covered her hand.
In the dark, Song Luan heard him ask, "Is there anything else that is uncomfortable?"
Song Luan despised his cold hands and broke away. She turned over and turned her back to him. She didn't forget to answer, "No more."
"That's good."
Zhao Nanyu grabbed her waist and pulled the woman who was rolling fast to the corner of the wall. He held her firmly in his arms and held her close to his chest. He kissed her on the forehead. "This time, it's still my fault that I didn't take care of you."
It seems that he should not let her out in the future. There was no doubt about Song Luan's beauty. It could be seen from the many eyes that followed her today.
She was even more beautiful when she dressed up. No one knows how many dignified gentlemen despised her temperament on their lips but covet her in their hearts.
Zhao Nanyu thought, of course, he would hide her, and not give her a chance to be robbed.
When he closed his eyes, he could still remember the feeling when he saw He Run holding her in his arms. His hatred and jealousy rushed to his head and couldn't help it.
Song Luan had fallen asleep. She couldn't hear what he said, but she could feel someone kissing her all the time, like a mosquito that couldn't be driven away.
Annoying to death.
Zhao Nanyu covered her ears and blew softly, as if sighing, "I really can't take you."
I just fell in love with her.
That night, Zhao Nanyu didn't touch her because he was afraid of her frail body. She slept in his arms.
In the middle of the night, Song Luan couldn't stand the temperature on his body several times. Unfortunately, she was dragged back once when she rolled out of his arms.
Finally she gave up resistance completely and laid in his arms.
When she woke up, Zhao Nanyu was gone. Song Luan scratched her hair. She remembered that someone asked him to meet and talked about something last night. She guessed that he should have gone out.
After getting up to wash, Zhao Nanyu was no longer in the residence.
Song Luan first went to the housekeeper to ask for the key to the storehouse, and went to pick out the gold and silver jewelry in Zhao Nanyu's small vault!
Zhao Nanyu's storehouse was richer than Song Luan thought. It seems that he had everything in several big boxes. She even saw a set of wedding clothes with excellent workmanship and full of gold thread. She could hardly walk.
Song Luan swallowed very ignorantly. She carefully selected several sets of jewelry from the box. When she picked them, she asked the housekeeper what was more valuable?
She took as much as she could. She wanted to change it to money with these jewelries in the future. How can she live such a good life?
As a matter of fact, Zhao Nanyu had already calculated her mentality, and left her with no future.
It was not early to pick out the jewelry, and Song Luan didn't forget that she told her son that she would make him stew.
The cooks were not surprised that she went into the kitchen to cook. This lady had a remarkable ability.
The stewed chicken and mushroom soup that Song Luan made was nutritious, delicious and fragrant. It took Song Luan two hours to stew the chicken.
Song Luan tasted the soup. It was neither salty nor greasy. It was delicious!
When the soup was ready, her son came.
Walking together with little Zhao was Zhao Wenyan, who had just returned from the academy. He had less sharpness in his eyebrows than before, and his eyes were still clear.
Song Luan's face was surprised. For a moment, she didn't know when he came back?
Didn't he go to the academy?
Zhao Wenyan looked at her uneasily and said, "I'm looking for my second brother."
Song Luan frowned. "Your second brother is not in the residence. He had gone out."
He shook his sleeve angrily, and somehow began to lose his temper, "I know! I'm leaving! "
Song Luan's face was full of ignorance. She really could never understand Zhao Wenyan's anger?! Adolescent children, the mind was really hard to guess.
Zhao Wenyan went back halfway and then folded back. "Then I will wait for my second brother to come back."
He insisted on staying, and Song Luan didn't want to bother with him. She was just focused with her chicken soup.
Song Luan ignored Zhao Wenyan as much as possible, regarded him as air, and didn't take the initiative to talk with him. She was satisfied with only knowing him. She filled a small bowl of soup for little Zhao. Afraid that he would drink it when it's too hot, she blew it deliberately, and then gave it to him, "Drink."
Little Zhao picked up a bowl of soup and said, "It's good. "
"Is it? How about stewing soup for you every day?"
"No way." Little Zhao shook his head seriously, and said, "Father will not agree."
His mother was not in good health. How could she stew soup for him every day? She'll be tired.
Song Luan thought about it. It seems like Zhao Nanyu's thought process was different from that of ordinary people, so maybe he also wouldn't agree.
"Okay." But Song Luan explained to the child, "In fact, your mother's body is not so bad. She ate bad things a few days ago, but next time she would not. You don't have to worry about mother."
The child's heart was the most sensitive. Song Luan still didn't want her child to know too much at his early age, otherwise he would worry about her body. She hoped her son would be happy.
He was very stubborn. "No, I have to take good care of my mother."
Song Luan couldn't convince him. "Okay."
Zhao Wenyan was completely ignored. After eating, he stood up and said, "I'll go."
He seems to hate Song Luan at first glance.
Song Luan was very satisfied. It seems that only the things related to her could not be changed. But the fate of everyone else had changed.
The more Zhao Wenyan acted like this to her, the happier she was.
At dusk, Zhao Nanyu went back to the house. As soon as he entered the house, he asked, "Ayan has come to see you today? "
Song Luan was peeling melon seeds on her coach, and she gave him some, "No, he came to see you." She turned over and patted the dirt off her body.
It was strange. "How do you know everything?"
Zhao Nanyu opened his mouth and said, "The servants said."
Song Luan did not doubt him. "Oh."
She had a tiger headed doll, and when he said this, she believed it.
Of course, Song Luan didn't know that she was surrounded by Zhao Nanyu's eyes.
The maidservants who attended her daily life, and the shadow guard who hid in the dark.
....she lived in a huge net he had woven, and she wouldn't be able escape.
=============== Chapter 40
At sunset, beams of golden light fell nto the room through the window. The branches outside the window swung with the wind, making a rustling sound.
Song Luan didn't seem to want to talk to him. She sat on the window and bent her head to peel melon seeds. Zhao Nanyu walked over and asked, "Did Ayan say why he was looking for me?"
Song Luan was surprised. "No, he didn't say a word to me."
Zhao Wenyan despised her and lost his temper. He was no different from the wayward child. And Song Luan thought that he mostly felt disdain talking to her.
Zhao Nanyu nodded, and his displeasure dissipated. He didn't want his brother to be too close to her. He had better not meet her again later, but as long as both of them were in Zhao's residence, they would have to meet once or twice.
"I'll ask him later."
"Oh. "
For a while, both husband and wife were silent again.
Zhao Nanyu was not a talkative person. He picked up a book from the bookshelf.
When Song Luan looked up, she saw his side face. After a while, she went back to her mind. After coughing twice, she remembered that she had another thing to say to him, "That...I..."
Zhao Nanyu stared at her. "Say it."
Song Luan wanted to go back to her mother's house recently. She still remembered several big turning points in the original book. After a few months, the emperor would die and the new emperor would ascend the throne.
The Song family was involved with the wrong side. Song Luan's father was deprived of his official position. There was nothing left in the Song family. Both men and women were exiled. She thought of her good brother Song Heqing. She couldn't bear to see this big family destroyed.
Song Luan just wanted to remind her father and brother that it didn't matter if he didn't stand on the side of sixth prince. As long as he didn't oppose him, he won't have to settle with them in the future.
She looked at Zhao Nanyu and said slowly, "Tomorrow I want to go back to Song residence to see my mother. "
Zhao Nanyu put down the book in his hand, and suddenly wondered why she wanted to go home. He straightened his lips, and asked, "I will go back with you in two days."
He was too busy these two days to spare time to accompany her back.
Song Luan quickly waved her hand and said, "Don't. I'll go back myself, and I won't bother you."
She spoke in a polite way and regarded him as an outsider.
Zhao Nanyu was silent for a long time. He seemed to be discussing with her in a gentle tone. "I'll accompany you when I'm free. I'm not sure if you can go by yourself. "
The capital was really unstable these days.
This morning, the emperor made an edict and granted the throne to sixth prince. The sixth prince, who was in the limelight because of the marriage, was even more noticeable this time.
They had not yet figured out whether the emperor really intended to pass the crown prince title to sixth prince. At noon, the palace issued two more holy orders, and conferred the younger ninth prince and tenth prince respectively.
The emperor's mind was hard to guess. No one could understand what the emperor wanted to do.
However, several other princes who had sealed the king early had been eager to move. Anyone could see that the emperor's dragon body was uneasy during this day. If something unexpected happened, whoever had the military power in the capital was the last winner.
The birth mother of sixth prince died early, and he grew up beside the queen when he was ten years old. However, they didn't have an amicable relationship, so the sixth prince couldn't rely on the queen.
These days, the queen had secretly recalled her brothers who were guarding in Bincheng to the capital. This made chaos for a long time.
Song Luan didn't think there would be any trouble in the capital city. What's more, she wouldn't even be affected if the gods fought. She looked at Zhao Nanyu and said, "I'm just going home, and I'm not wandering around outside. What can happen?"
Zhao Nanyu shook his head and smiled, "Well, I know." After a pause, he said, "But I'm still not sure. Would you just listen to me once?"
Song Luan was a little frustrated.
Little Zhao probably inherited his stubbornness from him. He would never change his mind. But every time he used that kind of gentle tone, she would be embarrassed to quarrel with him. It gave her a kind of illusion that she was ignorant.
She knew she couldn't beat him, and lost her face. "I know."
Song Luan was also a good speaker. She didn't really intend to promise anything to him.
Zhao Nanyu was not at home in the daytime. Wasn't it easy for her to go out?
Seeing her dejected, Zhao Nanyu knew that she was not happy. He squeezed her bulging cheek and said nothing.
After dinner, a woman she had never met came in.
Zhao Nanyu said to her, "This is Grandma Lin. I asked her to come here and take care of your body. "
Song Luan had the problem of being picky about food, so he was afraid that she won't drink the medicine well because it was bitter. The servant girls couldn't control what she could eat. Zhao Nanyu invited this Grandma, who took care of her brother, to come here.
Grandma Lin who looked serious. She respectfully saluted Song Luan, "I pay respects to Madam."
Song Luan nodded, "Get up."
Grandma Lin didn't like the lady who she had only seen a few times. When she first saw their son, he was less than a year old. She saw that this woman didn't care about her own child, and didn't even worry when he fell ill.
At that time, she thought that the young master had a good temper. This kind of woman had long abandoned her family.
Unexpectedly, one day she would be called to serve this madam.
After meeting, Zhao Nanyu asked Grandma Lin to retreat. He slowly explained to Song Luan, "I'm not looking for someone to look at you. Grandma Lin not only takes care of people, but also can make medicinal meals that taste good. You will like them."
Song Luan's eyes widened. "Look after me??? "
She didn't really think about it. Looking after her? For what?
Zhao Nanyu's reaction was very quick. Seeing her appearance, he knew that she didn't think much. He felt relieved and laughed secretly.
"I'm afraid you don't take your medicine well."
Song Luan was scared to death by him and mistakenly thought that he would do what she did to the female lead. He kept her locked at home. In his world, nothing could escape his eyes.
She didn't want it.
Yes, the male lead was still normal now.
Song Luan said, "I've been much better recently. My chest and brain doesn't hurt. Besides, the medicine is too bitter. "
Advertisements
"Drink more of the bitter medicine."
"Oh. "
Although Zhao Nanyu didn't speak much, he always liked to bite her ear and say something shameful in bed. Song Luan was never his opponent in this respect.
She was coaxed three or two times, and was taken to bed in a confused manner.
Zhao Nanyu's aggression made her unable to resist, and she tried to ran away with tears. He just grabbed her ankle and pulled her back. He lowered his head and sucked the tears from her eyes. He said in a loving voice, "It's still early. What can you do in the middle of the night?"
And she suffered.
Song Luan's heart trembled, her eyes were red than rabbit's.
She was bullied too hard by him. Before she went to sleep, she suddenly realized a very serious problem. She had not drunk any contraceptive pill, what would she do if she had a child?
It was a pity that Zhao Nanyu didn't give her the strength to think deeply. After tossing and turning, she was already tired and had no heart to think.
In the early morning of the second day, the first thing she did after she woke up was to go out. It was impossible to go out in a proper way, but there was still a back door in Zhao residence, and she planned to sneak out through the back door.
Grandma Lin looked at the blue and purple bruises on her shoulder and ordered people to pump water in and find ointment for her. Song Luan took the ointment on her face and refused to let Grandma Lin apply the medicine to her.
Her skin was delicate and easy to leave a mark. It looked scary, but actually it didn't hurt.
Grandma Lin's eyes were sharp, and she was relieved when Song Luan drank the tonic.
Song Luan's whole body was uncomfortable when she saw her. Fortunately, she was not always waiting for her in her room.
After she finished drinking the medicine, Grandma Lin went to work.
Song Luan sent away all the other servant girls in the room, and then changed into a set of servant clothes timidly. She opened the door fearfully and quickly ran out of the room.
***
Although the back door was small, there were also small guards guarding the door.
Song Luan waited for half the incense stick by the door, and didn't doze off. She was very dedicated, and didn't dare to act rashly.
Song Luan bit her teeth and turned to the wall in the backyard. She remembered that Huai Jin turned in from that wall last time. There should be no one there.
She kept her head down along the way, and no one saw her.
Song Luan suddenly thought, 'why did she go so low as to climb a wall?' 
She shouldn't have given in to the power of the man last night.
She should have said that she would go back to her mother's house! But now it's no use regretting. In order not to let Zhao Nanyu find out that she lied and said nothing, she had to go out by climbing the wall.
The corner of the backyard was not too high. Song Luan found some big stones to pad her feet, and tied up the skirt in the way. She looked around, and made sure that no one was around.
She started climbing the wall quickly. With the height of the stone, she easily climbed up the corner.
Song Luan closed her eyes and jumped. She found a young boy squatting under the corner of the outer wall. He was wearing orange clothes and the skin on his face was shining white under the sun. He was a beautiful boy.
Song Luan and Huai Jin looked at each other. She choked for a moment. She's was afraid of what was coming!
She didn't know what to say.
When Huai Jin saw her, his eyes lit up like a shining star. He stood up with a rather aggrieved tone. "Ah Luan, I have been waiting for you for many days! "
He squatted in this corner and guarded for many days.
"You finally came to me, but how did you know I was under the wall?"
If she knew he was under the wall, she wouldn't climb out at all.
Song Luan secretly congratulated herself..
Fortunately, Zhao Nanyu didn't see it! Otherwise, it would be a scene of 'Caught in the Red-Apricot wall crime scene'
It seems that her luck was not too bad.
=============== Chapter 41
Huai Jin was a very beautiful little boy. When he looked at Song Luan with red eyes and disappointed look, he felt a little guilty.
Song Luan didn't even think that this child would be so stubborn. Because she didn't go to him, he stood outside the wall waiting.
The corner of the wall was not a good place to talk. Song Luan looked left and right and found no one else. She was still uneasy. She grabbed his sleeve and dragged him under the tree in the corner.
Under the shade of the tree, the golden light fell on his cheek through the leaves. The boy was almost white, and his lips were red and his white teeth were beautiful.
Song Luan tried to reason with him and said, "Huai Jin, I didn't know you were waiting for me. I have other important matters today. I really don't have time to talk with you more. I'll go first."
Huai Jin easily reacted, he grabbed her arm and the corner of his mouth bent down. His voice was loud. "Where are you going?!"
Song Luan quickly covered his mouth for fear that he would attract others. She lowered her voice and patiently explained, "I'm going first, so hurry back." and she started to run.
He followed her closely. His angry face turned green. "Are you going to leave me?"
Huai Jin was a smart person. Song Luan didn't come to see him in such a long time. She probably didn't want him anymore. This thought made Huai Jin sad.
He didn't know what he had done to make her angry.
Song Luan thought for a moment. She thought it would be a good thing to speak clearly with Huai Jin now, so as not to hurt him in the future.
She turned sideways, and her face was frozen. Finally, she said, "Huai Jin, I..."
As soon as Song Luan opened her mouth, Huai Jin knew what she wanted to say. He blocked his ears with his hands like a rogue. "I won't listen. I won't listen."
"I haven't said anything yet and you won't listen?"
"It's definitely not a good word."
Song Luan sighed for a long time, but even if Huai Jin didn't want to hear it, she would still say it, "I didn't do the right thing before. Huai Jin, I already have a husband and a son. I'm a woman, you're a man. We should not go so close in the future. You're better off living your own life."
Such a beautiful boy must be liked by many girls in the future.
Song Luan wanted to find a good future for him as much as possible, rather than dying in the ice and snow.
Looking at Huai Jin's face, it could almost kill flies between his eyebrows. His face was as black as the bottom of a pot. He shouted angrily, "But you don't like that man with the surname Zhao! You said you were going to leave him, and we....we originally have no relationship like that. I won't do that with you!"
Song Luan was completely relieved that the original owner and him still had good manners and didn't break through the bottom line of the relationship between men and women.
Since she couldn't persuade him, Song Luan didn't want to waste her precious time. She had to go back to Song's residence as soon as possible.
She had to come back before dark.
Huai Jin's goal was not to leave her, but to follow her behind. He followed her all the way, and finally realized that the two had come to the gate of the Song residence.
Two days ago, he was kicked by Song Luan's brother in the street. The location was not too different from where Zhao Nanyu kicked. He still felt the pain until now.
Song Luan was recognized by all the servants in front of the Song residence. They were stunned as they wiped their eyes and made sure they didn't see it wrong.
Then, they hurried up to meet her! "Third lady, how did you come back?! You didn't tell us beforehand."
Song Luan said slowly, "I came back to see my mother, should I still report that?"
"I dare not. Come in quickly. I'll inform Aunt Lin right now."
"No, I'll go in and find my mother myself. "
She entered the gate of the Song family, but Huai Jin was blocked at the gate. Several bodyguards blocked the gate tightly. They seem to have known Huai Jin for a long time.
Also, who didn't know the friendship he had with the third lady?
Song Luan found Aunt Lin's yard according to her last memory. When she arrived, Aunt Lin was picking up silk and satin to make autumn clothes she would wear this year.
Song Luan's sudden appearance really scared Aunt Lin, "Ah Luan, where did you come from?"
Aunt Lin's gold and silver jewelry almost blinded Song Luan's eyes. She replied, "I stopped by today to see you."
She didn't dare to tell her mother the truth.
Aunt Lin seldom doubts the truth of her words. She held her hand, smiled and said, "You are still filial and still know to come back to see me."
After saying this, Aunt Lin told the maidservant inside the room to go out. She didn't like having outsiders whenever she talks with her baby daughter.
Song Luan sat down and poured herself a glass of water. She took a small half of the cup and licked her lips. She asked, "Mother, can you speak to father?"
Aunt Lin's eyes narrowed. "Why do you ask? What's your idea again?"
Song Luan swallowed her throat, but refused to answer, only to be pampered with her mother. "Tell me first."
Aunt Lin felt that her precious daughter was the most beautiful and charming in the world. Song luan didn't need to ask.
Song Luan asked directly, "Can you say one or two words to father?"
This was her modest words. Song Luan was so beautiful, and Aunt Lin was her biological mother. Her appearance was not bad. Although she was old now, she still had charms.
In addition, Aunt Lin's temperament was excellent. She was very soft when it needed to be in front of Song Luan's father. In these years, she is still had the favor of Song Luan's father.
At least if she speaks, the master would be willing to listen to her.
Song Luan's mind gradually relaxed. She was afraid that Aunt Lin would not be able to speak to her father. In that way, she couldn't remind her father not to go against the sixth prince.
"Mom, I heard a message from Ah Yu yesterday."
Aunt Lin raised her ears, "Tell me."
Song Luan confirmed that the doors and windows were closed, so she whispered in Aunt Lin's ear, "I heard that the emperor intended to pass the throne to the sixth prince."
Of course, she just made this nonsense up. She didn't know who the emperor wanted to take over his position, but she knew that the future emperor was the sixth prince, which was enough.
Aunt Lin stared and was surprised. "My God, Luanbao, you are so good. I thought you only know how to have fun, and make fun of things. It's good."
After she paused, she asked, "But where did Ah Yu get the news?"
Advertisements
No matter how many times she was asked, she couldn't explain it, so she pretended to be unhappy. "Mother, don't you believe me?"
"Oh, I believe in you." Aunt Lin also guessed the deep meaning of Song Luan's words to her. If the emperor wanted the sixth prince to be the next in line, wouldn't their family fight with the sixth prince in the future?
Aunt Lin also knew something about the court. She usually had tea and flowers with the wives and concubines of the dignitaries. She talked about rouge and gouache, but occasionally talked about who was demoted and who was promoted.
"Mom, just believe me. I'm afraid something will happen to our family."
"Don't worry, your mother will speak about this to your father." Aunt Lin was tactful and could speak very well. If she wanted to tell the master about it, she would not be as straightforward as Song Luan.
Suddenly, Song Luan heard the cry faintly. She raised her eyes and looked at Aunt Lin foolishly. She asked, "Niang, is anyone crying in the house?"
When Aunt Lin heard this, her eyes seemed to glow, and her face was full of gloating ridicule. "Ah, it's your sister, Song Yu, who is crying."
Song Luan's hand holding the teacup was stagnant, "What's wrong with her?"
Aunt Lin said slowly, "Since the evening when she came back from the palace, she began to have stomachache. She couldn't see several doctors well. You didn't see her, but in a few days, she became too thin and didn't look good. I feel sorry for her."
Song Luan looked at her mother's smile, which couldn't be suppressed. She was in a complex mood.
Aunt Lin talked about other people's affairs with great enthusiasm and kept on talking. "Yesterday, I invited a Taoist master to take care of it."
"What did the master say?" Her intuition told her that this must be Zhao Nanyu's revenge for her.
Aunt Lin almost didn't laugh out loud.
She didn't like Song Yu at all. She was very pitiful. For the past four years, her eyes towards Zhao Nanyu was still the same ever since the first time Zhao Nanyu came to the Song residence.
"The doctor said that she was guilty of evil in her life. Only when there is a happy event can she get rid of it." She moistened her throat, and then said, "It's just that she is at the age of marriage. Now, she was given a good candidate. They have cooperated with each other and talked about marriage. They just made an appointment this morning, but your sister has something in her heart. She has been crying since the morning."
What was the use of crying? She still had to marry even if she didn't want to marry.
Aunt Lin wanted to watch a good play. In this way, Song Yu didn't have to wait for her son-in-law (ZN) to give up the marriage with Luanbao.
Song Luan naturally had no affection for Song Yu, a person who targeted her, so she kept silent for a long time and finally jumped out of her mouth and said, "This is very good."
Having said that, Song Luan didn't plan to stay in Song's residence this long, and Aunt Lin didn't keep her long.
Aunt Lin once again cried at the door. This time, she didn't see the carriage or even a person to serve her daughter. Aunt Lin knew what was going on.
But she firmly believed that there was a reason for her daughter to do this thing, and her baby daughter would never be wrong.
Aunt Lin also secretly stuffed a bag of gold leaves into Song Luan's sleeve, for fear that she would be cold and hungry and poor.
Song Luan returned to the road and climbed back to the high wall according to the previous method. She didn't know that someone was waiting for her like an assailant waiting for its prey.
Zhao Nanyu was dressed in a blue tunic. The light wind raised his sleeves. His hair was tied up high. His facial features were three points sharp, and a killing aura showed in his face. 
He stood with his hands on his back and his lips raised slightly.
He looked at her on the high wall and smiled. The soft wind brought his gentle voice to Song Luan's ears. He said, "Be careful. I'll wait for you from below. Don't hurt yourself. "
Song Luan shivered violently and her legs became soft.
=============== Chapter 42
Song Luan's legs were trembling. Zhao Nanyu came back earlier than she expected.
Seeing her slow to move, Zhao Nanyu bent his eyes and whispered, "Jump down. I'll take care of you. Don't be afraid."
His beautiful eyebrows seemed to have a smile. Zhao Nanyu didn't seem angry at all. He didn't blame her for what she did. But Song Luan's heart was shaking when she listened to his words. She couldn't stand still, so she fell off the high wall without noticing.
Zhao Nanyu didn't deceive her. He caught her steadily. It seemed that he didn't intend to let her go.
As he walked into the house, he said, "Fortunately, I am here. If I'm not here, won't you fall to the ground?" He gave a low laugh, his muffled and laughing voice were very pleasant.
Song Luan lowered her eyes, not only did she not dare to look at him, but also did not answer his words. She was still very guilty this time. After all, she deceived him first. She couldn't stand upright in front of him.
At dusk, the sky in the distance was red with the afterglow of the setting sun.
After entering the house, Song Luan rolled down from him. Zhao Nanyu looked at her quietly with a smile on his face.
Song Luan's clothes were dirty, and the pink skirt was stained with dirt on the corners.
Her gray-faced face looked really embarrassing.
She lowered her head and stared at her toes. She was waiting for Zhao Nanyu to settle accounts with her. The man was very stingy and would not spare her. She waited for a long time, but there was no movement from the person in front of her.
Zhao Nanyu was calm as he touched her face. "I'll ask someone to give you water to bathe. You've become a little dirty cat."
The more he was like this, the more Song Luan couldn't stand it. She had a sudden headache.
She took her clean clothes and went to the screen to take a bath.
Then she took off her clothes and sat in the tub. The petals were floating on the water, sending out a light fragrance as it steamed. Song Luan's body gradually relaxed.
Song Luan had been lying in the tub for a long time. It was not that she spent a long time in the bath. She just didn't want to go out to face Zhao Nanyu. She would rather let Zhao Nanyu scold her that she didn't keep her promise.
She didn't want to see him smile.
It was really scary.
After half a stick of incense, the water was already getting cold. Song Luan didn't want to get up from the tub.
After getting dressed, she walked out slowly.
Zhao Nanyu went up to wipe her hair by hand. He said, "If you really want to go out, why do you have to climb over the wall? It doesn't matter if you climb the wall, but if you break your leg, you will never get it back."
For some reason, the big stone in Song Luan's chest fell to the ground. After a long time of fear, Zhao Nanyu finally began to say that she had climbed the wall.
Maybe it's her prejudice against Zhao Nanyu, but Song Luan thought that Zhao Nanyu's last sentence was frightening her, suggesting that if she climbs the wall again, he would break her dog's leg.
She opened her mouth and wanted to talk. Zhao Nanyu didn't give her the chance to talk, and continued, "I'm also to blame. I didn't allow you to go out."
Song Luan dared not let him admit his mistake, and murmured, "This time it's my fault. It's nothing to do with you. I don't mean what I say."
Zhao Nanyu smelled the light fragrance on her body and smiled, "Okay, don't mention it. Next time don't do this rash thing again. I'm afraid that you will be hurt."
His lips were full of laughter, and Song Luan was so annoyed by him.
Zhao Nanyu then said, "You love beauty so much so you shouldn't leave scars on yourself."
Song Luan's throat was tight, and spewed a word out of her mouth with difficulty. "Okay."
After so many lessons, Song Luan was not naive enough to think that Zhao Nanyu had just let her go. Moreover, since he kept under the corner, he must have known that Huai Jin had been squatting on the wall. It was strange that this dead man didn't mention anything.
When Song Luan went out, she was still lamenting her good luck.
Before the day ended, she overturned her car.
Today, she looked like she was climbing the wall to meet a wild man.
In the middle of the night, Song Luan crawled into bed trembling. Zhao Nanyu wore a white tunic, with his long silky black hair scattered around. The candlelight reflected his perfectly jade white face.
He had a book in his left hand. Seeing Song Luan coming, he quietly collected it.
Song Luan's heart was frightened by his burning eyes. She had a premonition that tonight would not be easy!
Maybe Zhao Nanyu was waiting for her here! This man liked to torture her in bed.
Not to mention torture, she would feel uncomfortable in addition to being tired.
Song Luan was suddenly thrown into bed by his strength, and she was trapped in the quilt. Zhao Nanyu's long fingers slowly caressed her cheek and it slowly fell on her collar.
He chuckled softly and didn't say anything. He bit her lips. This time it was a real bite. She took a breath of cold air as it hurt.
Zhao Nanyu's movements were never gentle and fragrant. He would not let her go. He whispered in her ear, "Is Huai Jin beautiful?"
Song Luan replied in her heart, beautiful.
But she didn't dare say it.
She didn't open her mouth. Zhao Nanyu had some ways to make her speak.
Song Luan felt that her waist was not her own.
"Is he beautiful?"
"No...not beautiful." Song Luan almost cried out.
Zhao Nanyu kissed her chin, nodded contentedly, and began to ask the next question, "Is he good-looking or am I?"
"You...you...it's you." She sobbed.
Zhao Nanyu smiled. "He is infatuated with you. He has been guarding for half a month."
Song Luan shrank back and sniffed. She said, "Don't get me wrong. He and I are just friends."
She also only treated Huai Jin as her younger brother. She didn't dare to be involved with Huai Jin.
Advertisements
She also hoped that this time Huai Jin would not provoke Zhao Nanyu's hatred because of her, and would result to his tragic ending.
Zhao Nanyu looked at her and knew what she was thinking. He took some of her wet hair and said, "Don't worry, I won't move him."
Zhao Nanyu had a deep mind and knew that Huai Jin still had a position in Song Luan's mind. He would not give Huai Jin a chance to win sympathy.
These concubines...he would slowly clean up, one by one, in the long run. He was really not in a hurry.
Song Luan was very relieved. She was really afraid of him.
At the beginning, Zhao Nanyu also said in her face that if he saw any wild man who had relationship with her again, he would kill them one by one.
Song Luan didn't sleep well this evening. She had several small nightmares one after another. Zhao Nanyu in the dream was dressed in a white robe, and his clean clothes were splashed with red blood. He held a sword in his hand. The tip of the sword was dripping with blood.
The bloody Zhao Nanyu smiled at her and raised his hand. Song Luan found that his other empty hand was holding her heart.
Song Luan's face was so white that she woke up immediately. It was still early, and the sky outside the window was still dark.
But there was no one around Song Luan. Zhao Nanyu went out early for several days in a row. The situation in the capital was complicated. He was busy discussing with the sixth prince.
The queen's family came with a lot of force, but she went back to capital without permission.
However, the emperor didn't go to the court for several days. He never came out of the Wenhua palace. The queen refused to allow anyone to visit him for the sake of recuperation.
If the emperor didn't survive this, the world would fall into the hands of the tenth young prince.
Song Luan knew that the day of the emperor's death was not in this period of time. He would have to spend a few months. Within two days, the emperor should wake up.
However, these things had nothing to do with Song Luan. She had already reminded the Song family once. If she met her brother Song Heqing, she would remind him again. If his brother believed what she said, it would now depend on his fate.
At the end of summer and early autumn, the temperature of the day changed greatly, which made people shiver in the both the night and day. At the highest time of noon, they need to take off clothes.
Song Luan had chosen the cloth early and asked grandma Lin to send it to the tailor's shop to make new clothes, not only for her, but also for Zhao Nanyu and little Zhao.
There was no lack of homework for little Zhao. The poor four-year-old had to study for three hours every day. He was a premature baby and did not have a person to look after him. Before long, little Zhao got sick and had a high fever.
Song Luan's eyes were red and she put the baby on the bed. She hurriedly said to grandma Lin, "Go find a doctor!"
She put her hand on her son's forehead and felt the temperature. It was okay if it's not too hot.
Zhao Chao stood aside and coughed twice. "Second sister-in-law, give me little Zhao."
Song Luan subconsciously hugged her son and forgot that Zhao Chao was still a doctor. "No need."
She also felt that Zhao Chao had put too much pressure on her son which made him sick.
Zhao Chao was also in a bad temper. Although he seemed to hate Song Luan even more, he still loved this little kid, and he was reluctant to see him suffer from a high fever.
He said, "Sister-in-law, don't forget that I'm a doctor. I can see little Zhao's situation."
Hearing this, Song Luan gradually released little Zhao. She shook his hand and bowed her head, saying, "Look at him now. "
Zhao Chao breathe a sigh of relief after passing the pulse. "It's just a fever."
"Just?!" Song Luan sneered and continued to quarrel with him.
The child in her arms closed his eyes and groaned as if it was hard. Little Zhao reached out his little finger and slowly grasped her light sleeve. He said weakly, "Don't worry, mother, I will soon be okay."
His illness was normal. The body and bones of the premature infant were weak. Little Zhao was a good child. He didn't want to talk about his little discomfort and the pain in his body.
Song Luan embraced him and made up her mind that she must take care of her son.
Seeing that his mother was still unhappy, he got up and kissed her on her left cheek, "Mother, I will sleep now."
=============== Chapter 43
Little Zhao's body was still a little hot, and his cheeks were abnormally red. The child was listless. He was leaning his head against her chest.
Song Luan was so worried, but she could only wait for Zhao Chao to prepare the antipyretic medicine and send it to the kitchen for boiling. She wanted to fetch some water to wipe his body, because he was extraordinarily sticky from his own sweat. He tightly grabbed her clothes and refused to let go. He shook her head. "Mother, don't go."
Song Luan's heart softened, so she held him and didn't let go. Fortunately, the antipyretic medicine was soon ready, and the black medicine was still steaming with hot water. Song Luan took the hot medicine bowl and blew it cold. Then, she fed her son a spoonful of the medicine.
This medicine smelled bitter, but little Zhao didn't cry or even frown.
He swallowed it.
The bitter medicine was fed to him smoothly. Song Luan took out a handkerchief and wiped the corners of his mouth for him. She looked at him painfully and asked, "Is the medicine bitter or not?"
Little Zhao nodded, "Bitter."
Are there any medicine that are not bitter?
Song Luan ordered grandma Lin to bring up some candied fruits. She coaxed her son, "It won't be bitter if you eat some candied fruits."
Little Zhao picked out two candied fruits from her palms. "Father said that I can't eat too much. If I eat too much, my teeth will be broken."
No matter how distorted Zhao Nanyu's character was, Song Luan couldn't deny that he really taught his son very well. His rules were sensible.
After feeding the medicine, the temperature on little Zhao's forehead went down a little bit. It wasn't as hot as before.
Song Luan stuffed him very carefully into the quilt, afraid that he would freeze. She pinched her son's soft cheek and said, "Go to sleep."
Take medicine and then go to sleep. This would make him better.
His eyes were wide open, and the dark eyes followed her closely. He was reluctant to move or close his eyes. He refused to sleep.
Song Luan smiled, lowered her head and asked softly, "Why don't you sleep?"
It was reasonable that people would get sleepy after taking medicine.
Adults were more vulnerable than usual when they are sick.
He reached out his hands from the quilt and looked at Song Luan with eyes. "I want to hug mother."
His eyes were big and round. Song Luan couldn't resist the expectation in his eyes and the kind of pleading. She just took off her shoes and climbed onto the bed. Little Zhao hugged her neck and smiled at her sweetly.
Song Luan seldom saw this child smile. He usually had no expression on his face.
Song Luan patted him on the shoulder and asked, "You can't sleep?"
Little Zhao's brain was still a little dim. With a strong nasal sound, he replied in a milk voice, "Mm-hmm. "
Before, when his mother didn't like him, he had never been held by her, slept with her, or cared for as carefully as he was today.
Later, when his mother treated him better and better, he was happy, but grew dissatisfied because he could only meet her for a few days.
Apart from having lunch with his mother every day, he spent most of his time in the front yard. It could be seen that although his father loved him, he didn't like him sleeping with his mother very much.
Moreover, his uncle said that he was now a four-year-old. When his uncle was four years old, he also lived in the front yard early. No one in the family stuck to his mother like him.
After thinking about it, Song Luan said, "Shall I tell you a story?"
Little Zhao looked at her with bright eyes, "Okay."
Song Luan didn't know what kind of stories he wanted to hear, so she chose some familiar stories to tell him. "Once upon a time, there was a temple with three monks. One day, the master asked them to fetch water together."
Her voice was soft and her tone was gentle. She told the story and the child in her arms had already closed their eyes and fell asleep.
In the night, Zhao Nanyu came back late. He was wrapped in cold air as he walked to the door to cover himself from nightly breeze. He pushed the door open. The candle fire in the room was not bright, and the faint yellow was enough to brighten the room.
At a glance, Zhao Nanyu saw Song Luan, who sat in front of the dressing mirror, removing her headdress. He quietly walked over and asked, "Little Zhao is ill?"
As soon as he came back, grandma Lin told him about it.
Song Luan froze for a moment and nodded, "Yes, he had a fever. He took medicine first before he fell asleep."
Zhao Nanyu frowned. "In the other side of the room?"
"Yes." Song Luan turned around and looked up to see his face. His facial features were hidden in the dim yellow light, and the lines of his lower jaw were tight and slightly cold.
She summoned up her courage and said slowly, "I want to bring my son to my side."
Song Luan was already prepared that Zhao Nanyu would not agree with her. After all, she had abused the child before.
She had beaten and scolded her son.
The day before she transmigrated, the original owner did not give him food.
So even if Song Luan knew that Zhao Nanyu liked her a little now, she didn't think he would trust her with his child.
Sure enough, Zhao Nanyu did not agree.
"No." It seems that there was no room for discussion. But the reason why Zhao Nanyu refused was not what Song Luan thought.
Song Luan opened her mouth and lowered her voice, "I know... I wasn't good at taking care of my son before, but I won't be like that now, I will take good care of him. You also think he is still young, but you are also busy. You can't always look after him, but I can! Can you just trust me once? "
Zhao Nanyu gave her a deep look and shook his head slowly. He was not moved. "He is not small. When I was the same age as him, I had no father or mother around me. You are spoiling him. It's not good for him."
Song Luan had a headache. She felt that she and Zhao Nanyu were not in the same page.
"I am not spoiling him! You're misinterpreting me!"
Zhao Nanyu raised his eyebrows. Indeed, he said that on purpose. The child's mind had been cultivated. Even if Song Luan wanted to spoil this child, he would be very self disciplined to restrain himself.
Zhao Nanyu just felt that if little Zhao would be taken care by her, it would take up Song Luan's hard work and energy. All her attention would be with the child.
Song Luan didn't really want to stay with Zhao Nanyu. He never saw love from those beautiful eyes when they looked at him.
As soon as their son came, there was nothing more important than him.
Advertisements
"I didn't." After a pause, Zhao Nanyu coaxed her softly. "Okay, let's stop quarreling. I'll pick two more maidservants to serve him. Don't worry."
Little Zhao had been weak since he was a child. In the past four years, Zhao Nanyu had been used to his illness recurring several times a year. Song Luan hadn't paid much attention to recovering her son's body these past few years.
Song Luan blurted out, "He is my child. Can I not worry?"
She regretted it once her voice came out.
Zhao Nanyu looked at her and sighed, and he compromised. "So I'll let him come to live here when he doesn't have a class."
Song Luan had a natural sense of fear in front of Zhao Nanyu. This fear may be due to knowing the plot in advance.
Knowing Zhao Nanyu's vicious and cruel nature, and the more she had in contact with him, the more she knew that Zhao Nanyu was really not easy to provoke.
She did not ask for any more conditions, and said in a muffled voice, "That will do. "
***
Sickness comes like a mountain, sickness goes like a silkworm
He had a bad illness for a long time. The fever subsided but he began to cough again. Within a few days, his voice became hoarse. Song Luan had no choice but to find Zhao Chao and ask him to prescribe a new prescription.
After examining the pulse, Zhao Chao's face sank, and he sneered, "His sickness is probably not from second sister-in-law's birth, but because he was abused again and again."
He obviously blamed Song Luan for this.
Song Luan was speechless. "I didn't."
"Forget it. I'll complain this to second brother." Zhao Chao hurriedly went to the pharmacy and picked up the medicine again.
Song Luan was ridiculed by Zhao Chao's strange and gloomy spirit. Apart from feeling a little anger that stuck in her chest, she didn't know whether she was angry at herself, Song Luan looked pale and haggard.
Zhao Chao brought the medicine himself after decocting it, and watched Song Luan feed the medicine to little Zhao before he left.
After he passed by, his footsteps stopped.
He stared at her silently for a long time, and retracted his gaze again. Because of pride, he still did not ask what he wanted to ask.
Zhao Chao also thought it was strange. He had seen her look better some days before. He thought there was nothing wrong with her.
How could it be that after just over half a month, her appearance became worse.
Song Luan deviated from the plot line of the original owner. There were no consequences that she knew of. She only thought that she took over this body to continue the plot.
Even the medicine was not enough to stop Song Luan's body from decaying so fast.
Zhao Nanyu's 'tianqing' under her body was also gradually waking up, and the combination of the two caused this current situation.
Song Luan deliberately fought with Zhao Nanyu in cold war, which was what the original master would do to Zhao Nanyu, so she managed to maintain the human structure by mistake, and her health gradually improved.
And all this happened silently. Song Luan had not yet understood this, and she was not even willing to admit that her body was gradually declining.
Perhaps because little Zhao was sick, Zhao Nanyu came back very early this day. He stood by the door and didn't make a sound. He watched Song Luan's gentle voice coaxing little Zhao to drink medicine.
After the medicine was fed, Song Luan walked out with an empty bowl.
Looking up, she saw Zhao Nanyu, who she didn't know appeared. Her chest was a little stuffy, and she managed to walk to him. Her voice was also a little hoarse. "You are back."
Before Zhao Nanyu could speak, Song Luan's legs and feet suddenly softened, and she fell in his arms. Zhao Nanyu firmly supported her waist.
Song Luan seemed to know what he wanted to ask. With a smile, she stopped his question in advance. "I'm sorry, I didn't stand still."
She broke away from his arms and walked out.
Zhao Nanyu still firmly held her wrist.
Song Luan was shocked by his cold and fierce eyes. He held her with so much power that her wrist must have been squeezed hard.
Song Luan mumbled, "You're hurting me."
=============== Chapter 44
Song Luan had been taking care of her son day and night. She was really tired.
Even her well-dressed makeup couldn't cover her haggard face, and there was a gloomy aura around her. 
Zhao Nanyu loosened his wrists and swept a look at her face. He said in a cold voice, "Your appearance now is not very good. It's better to leave it to the servants to take care of the child."
Song Luan said with a smile, "I'm okay. It's not a big problem." 
Zhao Nanyu didn't believe what she said. He had a debt in his heart and was reluctant to see her worry about her child's illness all day long. Zhao Nanyu just wanted to keep Song Luan's body healthy now. 
He stretched out his hand, and his cool fingers slowly slipped over her pale cheek. It also gently pulled the scattered hair for her.
He urged her in a warm voice, "I know you can't trust me, but if you do this to take care of him, you will be ill again. If little Zhao knows that you got sick, he will feel very sad. This child has a heavy mind. Even if he is sad, he will not tell you." 
Song Luan rubbed her wrist, stared at her toes, and did not answer him. 
In addition to being tired these days, she also felt that there were some uncomfortable places in her body. Her chest was stuffy and she had short of breath. Her heart and mouth also hurt. It was very similar to the symptoms of when she fainted for the first time. She also blamed herself for taking less medicine some days ago. 
It was only now that Song Luan had reluctantly admitted that she had really became a sick seedling, and that she couldn't live without medicines. She didn't lift her head, and just said, "That's fine, please find a reliable servant to look for little Zhao." 
Zhao Nanyu heard her unhappiness. He squeezed her chin and raised her face. Song Luan's unhappy face could be seen in her straight face. Even her words were less. 
He sighed, "Ah Luan, I am not refusing to let you near the child, but I am worried about your body."
Song Luan knew that the poison in her body couldn't be control immediately. 
With his eyes closed, Zhao Nanyu could remember the picture of when he asked Zhao Chao for poison. 
At the beginning, he didn't take Song Luan's life to heart and asked Zhao Chao for the most dangerous medicine that could torture a person. Zhao Chao picked from the cupboard and found a small red bottle and threw it to him. At that time, Zhao Chao laughed and said that he was cruel enough. 
Zhao Nanyu even took this word as praise. He thought of all the things that Song Luan had done, and only wanted to torture her slowly, rather than kill her all at once, which was too boring. Even he couldn't hide from the cause and effect. 
Song Luan looked at Zhao Nanyu with complicated eyes. 
She suddenly felt that Zhao Nanyu was really worried about her this time, and not for other reasons. And this kind of care was still very useful for Song Luan. In fact, Zhao Nanyu could give her enough security at a critical time. 
Song Luan thought the last time she was in the palace. She almost thought she would die of pain, and was really afraid. But in the moment when she was hugged by him, the fear that magnified in her heart gradually subsided. 
She was held in his arms while quietly being coaxed. She cried conspicuously in his arms, and all her grievances and uneasiness dissipated right then. 
"Well, I didn't think much." Song Luan looked at him with sincere tone. 
Today, Zhao Nanyu wore a crimson round collar and narrow sleeve robe. There was an exquisite patterns embroidered in the middle of his robe. His waist was decorated with jade belt. His black hair was tied up high, showing his extremely handsome features. 
At sunset, the yellow golden light passed through the window pane, and the soft light fell on his delicate face, which made him look white and transparent. 
There was no doubt about the beauty of the male lead. Song Luan had been stunned for several times. This time, she may have been seduced by Zhao Nanyu's beauty. She stood on tiptoe and pecked his lips. Her face was slightly red. "I know you are worried about me. Thank you." 
Song Luan took the initiative to kiss him. 
She blushed, sat down, and pretended to drink a glass of water. 
Zhao Nanyu's fingers caressed the place she pecked, his eyes curved with laughter. He licked his lips, squinted at her, and said, "Kiss again." 
Song Luan did not open her eyes and pretended not to hear. 
She was just seduced by his beauty...
Song Luan rarely took the initiative. Although Zhao Nanyu wanted her to peck him more, he didn't continue to force her. 
***
The weather gradually turned cool, and the autumn wind was blowing. The ground of the courtyard was covered with golden leaves. 
The windows of the inner room were tightly closed, so no wind could get in. 
Little Zhao's illness began to improve, but Song Luan's complexion was still as pale as ever, and only after taking tonic did she get better. 
In this way, Song Luan would never dare to stop the medicine easily again. Now her body was like a bottomless hole, and she could only fill it continuously. 
Problems such as chest tightness and shortness of breath never appeared after taking the medicine. But her face was still pale. 
Other people in the family who knew that little Zhao was sick, came to their residence and visited him. After Zhao Wenyan returned to the academy, third lady Zhao had time to come see little Zhao. Although she never liked to interfere with the affairs of Zhao Nanyu and his wife, he was also her grandson. If he was ill, she could not help asking. 
Besides, third lady Zhao still likes this kid. Some of the other children in the family were more lovely and charming than him, but they were not as good-looking as him. 
Besides, he was the most sensible one. He didn't cry, nor quarrel, and didn't get angry with the adults. Third lady Zhao picked some valuable supplements from her warehouse, but was surprised to see Song Luan's weak appearance. Didn't she look good the other day? Why was she so haggard? 
Third lady Zhao thought in her heart for a while, thinking of the love between the two couple. Zhao Nanyu was young and energetic, maybe Song Luan was fooled by Ah Yu in the matter of the bed. In addition, Song Luan was worried about her son's illness, so this made her thin and weak. 
She felt that as their nominal mother, she had to say something. She took Song Luan's hand and said, "Ah Luan, although I'm happy to see you and your husband mixing oil, you can't get used to Ah Yu in anything. You have to persuade him when he comes." 
Song Luan heard the fog in her head, "Ah?" 
When third lady Zhao saw the ignorant expression on her face, she coughed twice and whispered in her ear, "You can't be coaxed in bed. He'll be used to everything if you don't. He needs to understand restraint." 
Song Luan blushed and her neck moved awkwardly. She looked rather embarrassed. She said, "I see. Thanks for reminding." 
She couldn't help it! Zhao Nanyu was a beast in bed! Don't tell him to exercise restraint. As long as she made a sound, Zhao Nanyu's movements would only get fiercer and fiercer and won't listen to what she was saying at all. 
The more third lady Zhao saw and know Song Luan, the more she liked her. She patted Song Luan on the back of her hand and said with concern, "When you look after your son, you should not treat your body too harshly. When you gave birth to him, your body became weak by then. You can't be careless any more." 
Song Luan listened to her words, and was very moved. The third lady in front of her was not the same as in the original book. In the book, she was a cold woman, with only her own son in her eyes and heart, regardless of what Zhao Wenyan did. 
The two were talking, and there was a "dang" sound in between, as if something had fallen to the ground. 
Song Luan opened the curtain and hurried into the room. It turned out that her son woke up. The child wanted to dress himself, but he accidentally knocked over the candlestick on the desk. 
Song Luan was relieved and went to pick up the candlestick for him. She smiled and said, "You're awake?" 
He just woke up with a red face, and nodded, "Mother, I...I was careless." 
Song Luan laughed and carried him off the bed. She dressed him up one by one. "It's okay. You didn't do anything wrong."
Advertisements
She began to tease her son with a smile. "You are mother's sweetheart. You will always be my son no matter what you do." 
Sure enough, the little old-fashioned son was red in his ears. 
Song Luan pinched his face, "Okay, let's go out and meet grandma, shall we?" 
Little Zhao's eyes drooped and his cheeks were hot. "Okay." 
Third lady Zhao was also very happy to meet her grandson. She took out the prepared golden sugar and handed it to him, "Good kid." 
Little Zhao thanked her politely, then he was carried to the front yard by grandma Lin. He had to continue getting his pulse checked. 
As soon as the child left, third lady Zhao went on talking. Before she had finished speaking, she looked at Song Luan's stomach meaningfully and asked, "Hasn't your stomach moved yet?" 
Song Luan was dumbfounded for a long time, then she quickly denied, "No...." 
Third lady Zhao sighed, "It's been several months. It's not right." 
Song Luan couldn't lift her lungs at one breath, and her fingers trembled.
She knew later that Zhao Nanyu had never let her eat Bozi soup after everything they did in bed. She was lucky enough that she didn't get pregnant. 
Song Luan's brain was in a mess.
She begin to guess Zhao Nanyu's mind. Did he want her to have another one? Otherwise, with his meticulous character, he would not forget such an important thing as Bozi soup. 
But Song Luan herself had no intention of making another one for him. She was still waiting for a proper time to leave. As long as the Song family does not fall, she could leave safely. Her voice was trembling. "Don't worry, fate will come naturally." 
After thinking for a moment, third lady Zhao said, "After two days, when you are better, you and I will go to flusi to worship Buddha together, and then we will worship Guanyin." 
Song Luan was not good enough to refuse the elder's request, so she had to answer it with a stiff head. "Okay." 
After having tea and talking for a long time, Song Luan sent third lady Zhao away. She sat by the window and thought for a long time. Still, she thought it was very difficult to drink the soup by herself. She needs people to buy the medicine and decoct it. 
Song Luan decided to tell Zhao Nanyu about it when he comes back at night.
=============== Chapter 45
[At the teahouse]
A man in a dark imperial uniform with kylin patterns embroidered in his chest, sat by the window. The man's lips were smiling. He looked proud.
The windows were half open, and the shouts of peddlers on both sides of the street could be heard in the elegant room.
Opposite to him sat a noble man as regal as a magnolia tree.
Sixth prince Li Han took a sip of wine, smiled at Zhao Nanyu, and said, "I'm afraid my mother can't wait."
Zhao Nanyu's face was cold and his brow slightly wrinkled. In recent days, the Queen's action was more urgent than he thought. She couldn't wait to arrange her own people in the forbidden army. Her father and brother's army also secretly went back to the capital.
Every move was for the purpose of getting on the throne.
Zhao Nanyu pondered for a moment and asked, "What is your highness going to do?"
Li Han's eyes were full of smiles. "Naturally, I'm waiting to see a good play."
His father was in his palace position for more than 30 years. He was cautious and skillful, now he was seriously ill and trapped in the Wenhua hall. It was strange. Maybe the old emperor deliberately designed to test his sons, but didn't expect the queen to be the first.
Zhao Nanyu looked out of the window quietly and said, "The queen is very anxious."
The battle for the throne had always been extremely cruel. If you want to rise to a high position, you must have the ability to be calm.
Zhao Nanyu guessed that these days the emperor's reward to sixth prince made the queen disorderly, and triggered her to fight.
Li Han raised his head and drank up the remaining wine in the cup, smiling, "Yes."
He seemed to think of something interesting. "Ah Yu, your father-in-law showed me his kindness a few days ago. You know that he hated me deeply regarding the food release incident in Xuzhou. He also participated in several of my meeting. Didn't you talk about your father-in-law?"
Zhao Nanyu was stunned. After the silence, he said in a cold voice, "I didn't."
Li Han was surprised and said, "I really don't understand why the Lord Song suddenly turned the wind."
Zhao Nanyu took a sip of tea and said slowly, "Maybe Lord Song saw something."
Li Han said regretfully, "It's a pity. I thought about how to deal with all the sons of the Song family." He seemed to remember that Zhao Nanyu's wife was also from the Song family, and Ah Yu still valued her very much. With a smile, he continued, "Ah Yu, I didn't know that you were happy with your marriage."
Zhao Nanyu was expressionless and didn't answer.
Li Han was already used to his reticence for a long time. He said to himself, "I remember. No wonder I saw her familiar before. I had seen her. "
The expression on Zhao Nanyu's face finally fluctuated, and Li Han continued, "Last year, on the Shangyuan Festival, I saw her strolling in Huadeng street with the little prince of He's family. I heard that the little prince of He's family seemed to be still deeply in love with her."
Zhao Nanyu was not in a hurry. He took a sip of tea and looked calm. "That's all in the past."
Li Han smiled. "I really admire Ah Yu for your grace. "
Zhao Nanyu's eyes were drooping. There was a sharp flash in the eyes and a sneer on the corner of his lips. He didn't have much energy. He just didn't want sixth prince to continue with the joke.
It was still early, but Zhao Nanyu was not interested in sitting down. He got up and said softly, "I'll go back first."
Li Han laughed more vigorously. Tut, the man was angry, but he knew that he must be magnanimous in front of him. Zhao Nanyu was only so rude when he was angry.
Li Han didn't care about his rudeness. "Then I won't send you."
Zhao Nanyu turned around and left.
Coincidentally, as soon as he left the teahouse, he turned around and met Song Heqing, Song Luan's brother.
Song Heqing also saw him, came up, and said hello to him.
"What a coincidence, brother-in-law."
Zhao Nanyu eased his face, as he was Song Luan's brother.
Song Heqing shook the fan in his hand. "You just came out after tea?"
"Yes."
"Now that you've had a drink, hurry home. I won't bother you much. "
Song Heqing heard from the guard that the third young lady had sneaked back home in the clothes of a servant girl. He thought that his sister had made an old mistake and was uneasy to come out and hook up with men. Now Song Heqing urged him to go home. He hoped Zhao Nanyu would have a good look at his sister. If he watched her carefully, she would not have a chance to run out?
The Song family was partial and short-sighted.
Zhao Nanyu nodded. "Then I'll leave first."
Song Heqing quickly waved his hand. "Hurry back. Maybe ALuan is waiting for you at home."
Zhao Nanyu hooked up the corners of his mouth, and didn't speak again.
Every time he went back home, Song Luan was always busy with her own affairs. But on this day, Song Luan was waiting for Zhao Nanyu to come back. She made a good draft in her heart in advance, but she was still guilty.
After autumn, the weather became colder and colder. 
When Zhao Nanyu pushed the door and entered, there was a gust of cold wind.
Song Luan was wearing a pomegranate colored coat with a green pleated skirt underneath. 
She looked at him and stopped talking.
Zhao Nanyu looked at her pretty little face and raised his eyebrows. "What do you want to say?"
Song Luan's voice came out from her throat. It was very small. "Hmm.." She looked up at him and said, "That...that I want to say...these days we have been having a good time with no caution. But...I don't plan to have another one now. I'm still young to have another child. So I want to tell you, can I have the kitchen cook me a bowl of Bozi soup in the future?"
The atmosphere in the room was oppressive and heavy. Zhao Nanyu's dark eyes looked directly at her, and he didn't say a word. The light in his eyes went down a little bit. His face was like a blue jade, and now it was a little cloudy. His lips rose slowly, like a smile, but Song Luan couldn't see the real smile in his face.
Song Luan suddenly felt cold. Her scalp was numb and her teeth were shaking uncontrollably. She tightened her back and tried to stand up straight without losing her momentum.
Facing Zhao Nanyu like this, she was just like seeking her own death.
But now she had no way back. She had no reason to take back what she said. Song Luan just felt that Zhao Nanyu's stare at her was a bit frightening.
Advertisements
She was patient, calm, and said, "I'm talking to you. Don't look at me like this. I'm scared."
Zhao Nanyu raised his feet to her side for two steps. Song Luan subconsciously retreated, and then stood still. She was afraid to die, so she had to pretend to be an innocent. 
She cleared her throat. "Give me a word."
Song Luan had made plans. If he didn't agree, she would find a way to get some medicine.
Zhao Nanyu rubbed his fingers and pretended to be careless. He asked, "Don't you like kids?"
Song Luan wasn't able to answer right away. Of course, she had no resistance to cute children, but that didn't mean she was willing to give birth for him.
Song Luan shook her head. "No, I just don't think the time is right. We need to take care of our child now. We can't think of another one, can we?"
Zhao Nanyu collected his eyes and seemed as if he was easily persuaded by her, "You are right, too."
Song Luan was very happy and her eyes were bright. She said, "Is that..."
Were they settled!? It should be.
Zhao Nanyu touched her face and smiled in a low voice. His words were bare-naked and straightforward. He kissed her earlobe and said, "Don't worry, I didn't get them in."
Song Luan was so annoyed by his lewd words that she bit his lips and said, "Speak well."
Zhao Nanyu laughed dumbly, and his voice was deep and sweet, "Okay, then it's up to you."
Her body and bones were not suitable for pregnancy, and it's the best and most appropriate choice not to have children. But when these words were said from her mouth, Zhao Nanyu still had anger in his heart. However, he usually hide his emotions well, not showing his sadness and joy.
As soon as the voice turned, Zhao Nanyu suddenly said, "I've answered whatever you said. Is it my turn now."
Song Luan's intuition told her that it was not a good thing, she barked and asked, "You...what do you want?!"
Zhao Nanyu had no plans to do anything with her, but he wanted to say something, so he said, "The little boy from the He family wrote to you."
Song Luan murmured, "I don't know. "
Of course, she won't know. All these letters were intercepted by Zhao Nanyu.
He touched her head tenderly, took an envelope out of his sleeve, and smiled softly. "It's okay. I'll read it to you now."
Song Luan shivered and sneezed in shock.
Zhao Nanyu's fingers were very beautiful and round. He slowly took the letter out of the envelope and read the handwriting on it, "I can't see you, my love. I can't sleep at night."
Song Luan: "......."
With a pale face, she stretched out her hand and grabbed his wrist, and tried to discuss with him, "Don't read it."
It was too sour. Her teeth were going to be sour.
Zhao Nanyu waved his hand gently, "It's the little boy's intention, which is naturally to reach your heart."
Song Luan looked at him pitifully. Zhao Nanyu hooked his lips. The arc was slightly cold.
His eyebrows seemed to be covered with ice.
Song Luan poked her finger to play, thinking that Zhao Nanyu was really to abnormal and perverted, especially his way of reading letters.
Very perverted!
=============== Chapter 46
If it wasn't for Zhao Nanyu who volunteered to read her the letters, Song Luan wouldn't know that He Run had written so many to her these days. Zhao Nanyu read one letter after another in a low voice.
Song Luan's ears and brain hurt. He enunciated words clearly and read them very slowly, for fear that she couldn't hear them clearly.
After reading, Song Luan watched Zhao Nanyu slowly tore the envelope in his hand to pieces and scattered the scraps of paper on the ground.
Zhao Nanyu was so angry after thinking about it. He looked down at Song Luan, who pretended that she didn't hear anything. His lips turned up, and he laughed. Suddenly, he reached out his hand, grabbed her chin, and said, "How is it? Did it move you?"
Song Luan thought that the male lead's jealousy was really big. The air was full of sour taste, vinegar and gas. He was afraid that she couldn't hear it.
But she was also wronged. She didn't write the letters, and didn't receive any of them.
Zhao Nanyu intercepted her letter and flicked her face, which was really stingy.
Forced to look up at him, she whispered back, "I didn't hear you."
Song Luan was still very clever. She didn't face her problems directly and tried to avoid the trouble. However, Zhao Nanyu was not easy to fool. He smiled and said, "I'll read it to you again. This time, you should listen carefully."
Song Luan's eyes were wide and round. Didn't he tear all the letters?
Zhao Nanyu saw at a glance what she was thinking in her heart, and said, "My memory is not bad. After seeing that many times, I will recite it for you again."
Song Luan's body was stiff and her heart was shaking. She held out her hand tremblingly. Her thin fingers carefully grasped his clothes, swallowed her saliva, and spoke to him in a friendly voice, "Don't do this."
Stingy. So petty!
Zhao Nanyu looked at her excitedly and said, "What's the matter with me?"
Song Luan couldn't stand his hypocritical and sullen ghost appearance. If he gets angry, he will lose his temper directly?!
Why did he slowly torture her heart like this? It made her terrified.
She looked out, raised her face, and said with a higher voice, "You are angry."
Zhao Nanyu nodded, and generously recognized it. He replied, "Well, yes."
Song Luan was innocent when the pot came down from the sky.
"I didn't write to He Run. What are you so angry about?"
Zhao Nanyu once said to her that he would never mentioned the past, but he often could not control his emotions, especially what sixth prince said today, which he couldn't forget even if he wanted to.
"Then I'm unreasonable."
Song Luan's heart suddenly felt a little more guilty. When she thought about it carefully, it was the original owner who took the initiative to hook up with He Run. He Run's longing for her was also because she always treated him vaguely.
In a reasonable sense, it was her fault.
Zhao Nanyu loosened her chin, went to his usual place, and sat down. There was a stack of unused white paper on the desk. He picked up the brush on the pen holder, stood at the desk expressionless, and calmly began to practice calligraphy.
The clouds on his face was light and breezy.
Song Luan probably understood his temper. She made him uncomfortable, in return, he would make her feel bad and upset. He would try his best to beat her in other matters.
She walked slowly to him and said, "I promise you, as long as I am your wife, I will never do anything that will make me apologize to you."
When Zhao Nanyu smelled her fingers, the black ink dripped on the paper carelessly. He put down his pen. "That's it?"
Wasn't that enough?
Zhao Nanyu sighed softly, thinking that he would be able to hear the words of love from her mouth. In fact, he knew that as long as he did not ask, she would never admit that she liked him.
What's more, even if he asked, Song Luan's liking didn't have any weight. It was just the practiced words that she could say with her eyes closed.
He grabbed her small hand and took her to his side. Song Luan was held in his arms. His strong hand rests on her waist. "Well, that's enough..."
Why was he so angry with her? Because she had no heart and no lungs.
That night, Zhao Nanyu took her hand and taught her how to practice chinese characters. Song Luan refused for a long time. Zhao Nanyu didn't lose a word to her face, and directly said, "Your words are so ugly."
There was no writing style. She even wrote wrong words.
Song Luan couldn't be blamed for all this. She couldn't write the characters of this dynasty. The original owner was not a person willing to study hard. She couldn't recognize even a few words.
Zhao Nanyu stood behind her. With her small hands wrapped in his big hands, she wrote in the paper stroke by stroke.
Zhao Nanyu's breathing sound passed her ear, and Song Luan blushed. Her expression and action were not natural.
"You're not even as good as your son." Zhao Nanyu teased her.
Song Luan was embarrassed by what he said, and just wanted to talk back, but instead listened to Zhao Nanyu talk, "I heard from your brother before that, you never study your lessons well after you went home from school. Your assignments were all written by someone else."
"My brother didn't say that."
Zhao Nanyu chuckled. "Since you said it's not true, then you have the final say."
Song Luan thought that Zhao Nanyu was trying to coax her. Her heart was pounding faster and her cheeks were burning. His doting tone made Song Luan feel embarrassed!
"Do you and my brother get along well? Why didn't I know about it before?" Song Luan didn't remember that the original owner's older brother and the male lead knew each other.
Zhao Nanyu nodded, "Not bad."
In the past few years, Zhao Nanyu and Song Heqing had seen many times and talked alone more than twice. At that time, Song Luan was not as smart as she was now. She was very disobedient and disliked his lowly birth, so she often ran out to meet with different men.
This kind of thing couldn't be concealed, and Song Luan didn't seem to hide it. Zhao Nanyu still went his own way despite the wind and rain in the capital.
So every time there was a rumor, Song Heqing would always go to find him, or apologized and make more excuse for Song Luan. Over time, Zhao Nanyu heard a lot about Song Luan from Song Heqing's mouth.
Song Heqing was a good brother, but he doted on his sister too much. This was not a good thing.
"Your brother also said that you often bullied others when you were young."
"I forgot. Why didn't you tell me what you were like when you were a child? "
Advertisements
Zhao Nanyu's voice was a little heavy. "When I was a child, well, I was not very loved like you. "
Before the age of seven, he followed his mother to beg for a living. He was displaced and often bullied. After his mother died, he was picked up by the Zhao family. He had no worries about food and clothing. However, many people laughed at him secretly, and his cousin would smash him with stones.
During the Spring Festival, the old lady never prepared his red bag, nor would she leave dinner for him.
Zhao Nanyu's childhood memory was very bad, but he thought that Song Luan must be a spoiled girl who grew up in the palm of her hand.
Once upon a time, Zhao Nanyu hated her willful and reckless actions, and hated her noble appearance of not putting anyone in her eyes.
Now, he loves her.
Yeah, it's cute.
Cute and lovely.
Song Luan didn't continue to ask. She just didn't bother. She just asked this sentence out of politeness.
Zhao Nanyu's abnormal behavior, wasn't it because his childhood life was too miserable?
She was practicing calligraphy, but later on, she didn't know what was going on. She didn't know where she had thrown her brush, because she was abruptly turned to bed by Zhao Nanyu.
Since their son got sick, they haven't made love for a long time.
It may be Zhao Nanyu had been a vegetarian for too long, but it was more likely because of her and He Run's affairs, and he was determined to make her his.
Song Luan had learned this lesson many times. Although her tears were useless in front of Zhao Nanyu, his movements would be lighter as long as she cried for pain and pretended to be hurt a little bit.
So at first, Song Luan hummed and hawed, "It's painful..It hurts...please take care of me. I am physically weak..."
Zhao Nanyu kissed her on the corner of her mouth and seemed to believe her words, "Does it really hurt? "
Song Luan nodded and lied without breathing. "Really."
Hearing this, Zhao Nanyu really lightened his movements. He did not fail to see her poor acting skills.
He continued in silence. The night was very long, and Song Luan had no strength to move her last two legs.
It was not early when Song Luan got up from her bed the next day.
The first thing she did after putting her clothes on were to ask grandma Lin to decoct her a bowl of soup.
Song Luan's words could only be obeyed by servants. Grandma Lin had been serving in the Zhao's residence for a long time and was loyal to her master. But for Song Luan, who was protected by her husband, grandma Lin had a lot of complaints in her heart. From the bottom of her heart, she thought that this woman was not worth treating her well. Now, drinking the bozi soup just so she could avoid having children, grandma Lin felt chilly.
Zhao Nanyu came back from the outside after practicing his sword. Song Luan in the room had just swallowed the Bozi soup. Her mouth was bitter. She had eaten two candy before she could disperse the disgusting smell of the medicine in her mouth.
Zhao Nanyu silently watched her take medicine and poured her a cup of water. Song Luan took the cup and thanked him softly.
Song Luan could see that Zhao Nanyu was in a bad mood. She held up her chin and thought silently that the man seemed to be very unhappy every day, that is, his face was particularly smelly this morning.
They had a good breakfast together. Song Luan went to the cubicle as usual to see her son. At last, the child had recovered from his cough. His complexion was rosy and his illness was cured.
Song Luan was very happy after seeing it. She planned to cook a bowl of braised pork for him at noon.
He had suffered a long time from his disease. These days, he could only eat some light vegetables and porridge, and greasy foods were not allowed. Seeing that his fleshy cheek had lost a lot of weight, it hurt her badly.
Recently, she liked to help her son dress up. After dressing him beautifully, she had a sense of achievement in her heart. At first, she wanted to come by herself, but later she was persuaded by little Zhao to let him come.
Song Luan put on a red coat for him. It was autumn. She was afraid that the child would freeze. She just put on a thick cloak for herself. The collar was a white fox hair. It was warm to touch.
The child's lips were red and his teeth were white.
Song Luan hugged him and took him out. Zhao Nanyu saw little Zhao being hugged by her. His eyes and eyebrows were filled with a happy smile.
All of a sudden, he thought, if only he could have another daughter as charming and lovely as Song Luan.
=============== Chapter 47
Zhao Nanyu took two steps forward, reached out his hand, and said, "Little Zhao is a little heavy. Let me hold him."
He took the child from her arms, and little Zhao naturally hugged his neck and shouted, "Father."
Zhao Nanyu touched his head. "Is it uncomfortable?"
"Mmhmm." Little Zhao was guilty. If he wasn't ill, his father and mother would not worry about him.
Little Zhao buried his head, and his eyes were red. He cried out, "I'm wrong, father."
Zhao Nanyu held him quietly, and the tears of the child fell uncontrollably on his shoulder. When little Zhao had cried enough, he said, "Boys should not easily shed tears."
When he said this to him, little Zhao burped and wiped the tears on his cheek with his sleeve. His nasal tone was thick. "I won't cry anymore."
His father used to say that crying was a sign of weakness. He just couldn't help it today.
Song Luan didn't notice that he was crying at first because the child cried quietly. She went over and looked at him heartily. Then she took out her handkerchief and wiped his face gently. "It doesn't matter. If you want to cry, you just cry. No one will think you're weak."
The couple were very different in educating their children. Zhao Nanyu was very strict with his children in all aspects. As for Song Luan, who was a typical kind mother, children should be well loved. This was the case for boys, especially for girls.
Zhao Nanyu didn't seem to have anything to do today. He stayed at home and had lunch with them.
Although Song Luan had a good cooking skill, she had only been in the kitchen several times, and each time it was to cook for her son. No one else had this honor, even Zhao Nanyu.
Zhao Nanyu didn't ask her where the cooking skills came from. He knew that Song Luan used to be a delicate lady who didn't touch spring water with ten fingers, and no one dared to let her cook in the Song family.
According to her proud nature, she was not a person who would wash hands and make soup for others. She had never learned this since she married to the Zhao family.
Zhao Nanyu was vaguely aware of what. He guessed some of this, but did not say it.
He was very good at observing other people. Song Luan was his wife. He knew what she would be. What's more, the changes of Song Luan these days were too big and had full of flaws.
But these...Zhao Nanyu didn't care. As long as Song Luan was by his side and under his control, it was enough.
Zhao Nanyu tasted the braised pork made by her. It was bright and sweet. It was not greasy. It was really delicious.
Song Luan had two small bowls of rice, and her stomach was full. She just put down her chopsticks, raised her eyes to Zhao Nanyu, and said to her, "By the way, mother said that she would take me to Fulu temple to worship Buddha the day after tomorrow. I think we might stay in the temple for another night."
Zhao Nanyu didn't know about it. He smiled, "Mother likes you very much."
Third lady Zhao believed in Buddhism. She went to the temple every month to donate incense money to worship the Buddha. She had never brought Song Luan as her daughter-in-law before.
"Maybe I'm just loved by people."
"Yes." Zhao Nanyu thought for a moment and said, "Come back early before it gets dark. It's cold at night in Qinshan mountain. I'm afraid you can't bear it. "
He was too strict that he wouldn't let her sleep in the temple overnight? She was a little uncomfortable. Song Luan hated being controlled.
Later, she realized that Zhao Nanyu's attitude towards her was a little like that in the book. He was the same to the female lead.
Keep her out of the limelight...everything was arranged in advance.
That life made people have no chance to breathe.
Now that Zhao Nanyu was not yet too serious, Song Luan didn't want him to develop to that extent that she couldn't go anywhere.
"I'm not that vulnerable. It's just a night's stay. It's not going to be bad."
Zhao Nanyu took a sip of tea and retreated half a step, "Take two more servant girls with you."
No need to guess, these two maids must have been arranged by him...
Song Luan frowned. "That's okay."
In 'The Powerful Minister', the man's personality was very fashionable, and his paranoid and black character had won him a lot of popularity. Song Luan remembered that when she was reading, Zhao Nanyu seemed to be a normal person at the early stage, at least he wasn't over-controlling.
When she was a reader, she didn't like the man's character very much. Every time she looked at his heart, she felt flustered. She would have given up reading the book long ago if it weren't for the fact that she was curious to see the ending of this obsessive-compulsive disorder male lead.
Song Luan prayed silently in her heart, hoping that the male lead would be more normal. Even if he would blackened, it should not be this time.
The next morning, after breakfast, Song Luan and the third lady Zhao set out to Fulu temple in a carriage.
Zhao Nanyu said that she could go if she was surrounded by two familiar servant girls. They were usually in her room. Third lady Zhao not only took her alone, but also Yang Ruoyun.
Three people in a spacious carriage. It was not too crowded.
Today, Yang Ruoyun wore a set of pink skirt, and after putting on makeup, she was more delicate and gentle than usual.
It's an hour's journey from Zhao's family to Fulu temple. Third lady Zhao was very energetic. She held her hand and talked all the way. Yang Ruoyun didn't say a word from the beginning to the end.
"You don't know, the goddess Guanyin of Fulu Temple is the most effective. The daughter-in-law of Mrs. Cheng came to worship a few days ago. The day before yesterday, she was diagnosed with pregnancy. You must pray well and sincerely."
Song Luan did not open her eyes, because she would guilty when she lies. Third lady Zhao didn't know that she and Zhao Nanyu had agreed not to have children. Third lady Zhao was also kind-hearted. She would be sad if she knew.
"Hmmm-hmm. Mother, don't worry. I will sincerely worship Buddha. "
Yang Ruoyun suddenly looked at her with a farfetched smile on her face. "I remember that little Zhao is still young. What happened? Is cousin in a hurry?"
Zhao Nanyu was not in a hurry! In the book, he only had one son.
Song Luan guessed that he didn't like children very much, maybe he thought it was too troublesome, or thought it was enough to have one son.
She said to Yang Ruoyun, "Yes! Ah Yu is anxious. He wanted to have a child to accompany our eldest son, so he won't be too lonely. "
Song Luan opened her mouth and talked nonsense. It was better to infuriate Yang Ruoyun. This female character really didn't make her worry.
Yang Ruoyun's smile froze and sank for a moment, and she suddenly said, "Yes, my brother's aunt gave birth to a second child for him the other day. Maybe men want women to open branches for them. They want to scatter their leaves."
Every word Yang Ruoyun said had her own deep meaning. None of it was nonsense. She reminded Song Luan that she couldn't give birth. She should also take two concubines to open branches and leaves for Zhao Nanyu.
Song Luan was the best at pretending to be stupid. She laughed and pretended that she didn't understand anything. "Is it? Congratulations to your brother."
Yang Ruoyun was angry. Zhao Nanyu had only Song Luan. He hadn't had a concubine for four years. Now it seemed that he didn't have such a plan. It was really cheap for Song Luan to dominate such a good man.
Advertisements
Third lady Zhao didn't have any intentions to shove concubines to Zhao Nanyu. The child seemed to be easy to talk, but actually he was rebellious. She was afraid that she would send people by his forefoot, and then, would hear bad news in the next moment.
It was harmful to others and to her. He was hard to please.
At the beginning of the year, the old lady once wanted to do send concubine to him, but was persuaded by third lady Zhao that Zhao Nanyu was already a mature man. If he really liked other girls outside, or wanted to take a concubine, he would do it by himself, and he didn't need them to intervene at all.
It had to be said that third lady Zhao was more thorough than others in this respect.
The carriage stopped at the foot of the mountain, and the temple was built on the hillside. The mountain was not high, and Zhong Lingyuxi was beautiful. You can walk a hundred steps to the gate of the temple.
The servant girls followed them with their luggage. All the things that they needed to use was packed in the bag. The coachman then drove the carriage back to the residence, and then would pick them up tomorrow.
Song Luan took third lady Zhao's hand and followed her into the temple. The fame of Fulu temple was very famous in the capital. Along the way, they met many well-dressed ladies, all of whom came to pray for God to worship.
First, third lady Zhao took her to the main hall to worship the Buddha. Song Luan knelt in front of the Buddha, folded her hands, kowtowed several heads and invested a lot of money.
The atmosphere in the palace was tranquil and solemn, and no noise could be heard.
Third lady Zhao was still asking for a sign, so Song Luan stayed in the temple, but was suffocated by the incense, so she came out first. In the courtyard on the left side of the main hall sat a Taoist in a robe.
It was a strange thing to see a Taoist in the Buddhist temple. What's more, the Taoist hadn't been driven out by a monk.
It seemed that the Taoist priest also felt her eyes, smiled at her, and asked, "Fortune telling?"
Song Luan saw his face with clear eyes and sharp facial outline.
She approached him somehow, and sat opposite him. She felt nervous for some reason. "Then, please count my future."
The Taoist stared at her face carefully. It took a long time before Song Luan heard his voice. There was a kind of natural indifference to it. "Madam has a strange fate. I'm afraid that madam will die in the future."
=============== Chapter 48
Song Luan really wanted to flip the Taoist's face in front of her. What was he saying?! 
She opened her eyes and stared at the Taoist, as if to stare a hole in his body. She took a deep breath and said with dry throat, "You...I'm very unhappy with what you said."
The Taoist smiled meaningfully at her, and said, "Isn't madam aware of this ending long ago?"
Song Luan's heart was shocked. Her fingernails were deeply embedded in the tender flesh of her palms. This Taoist was very cruel. She pinched herself to make her brain awake.
What did this Taoist know?!
Song Luan took a breath of cool air and looked at the Taoist's face carefully. He was very young and quiet. He had a sense of emptiness just like he had a dream.
Song Luan understood what he meant. The Taoist's previous sentence probably referred to the end of the original owner in the book 'The Powerful Minister'. He was not wrong. If she followed the line of the original book, she would also die.
Her husband and son ended her life with their own hands. She died so tragically.
Song Luan's fingers under her sleeve trembled uncontrollably, and the sound from her throat also quivered. "I dare to ask...would there be a way to escape?"
The young Taoist smiled and said, "Nothing can be force, let nature walk by itself. A forced change of life may backfire."
Does forced change of life meant the way she deliberately avoided the way of the original book? Does she have to go along with the original plot in order to be saved?
Song Luan smiled, "I...."
What did she want to say?
The Taoist priest interrupted her, "Madam is pale and short of Qi. In recent days, madam should also feel stuffy and short of breath, and madam's heart is aching. Didn't madam really not think about it?"
Song Luan was not stupid. She could understand what he wanted to say. Was this one of the symptoms of her death?
But she obviously....
Song Luan straightened her back, but her face became more and more pale. She said hard, "It's only for a while. I took the medicine just fine. I hope the Taoist priest doesn't talk nonsense. "
The young Taoist heard the words and smiled softly. "Madam, please think about it carefully."
Song Luan had no strength to question the identity of the person in front of her. She was sure that the Taoist had never appeared in the whole book, nor was he mentioned. However, his unpredictable words made her believe that he already knew her identity as a transmigrator. He might even know that this world was just the world in a book.
Song Luan's back was dripping with sweat. Only when he reminded her of this, did she remember that when her body gradually improved, she was in a cold war with Zhao Nanyu.
The pupil suddenly shrank. At this time, Song Luan realized that she could live longer as long as she kept the original plot.
All of a sudden, Song Luan felt that the existence of this book was like her whole life. No matter what the final result was, it was not very good. The only difference was that Zhao Nanyu liked her more than before.
Did she really have to be like the original owner to continue to live?
The young Taoist seemed to see the doubt in her heart, and became a bit kinder, as he said, "Madam is smart and intelligent, and will surely find life."
Song Luan looked at him and said, "Who are you? "
The young Taoist smiled, "One day, you will know."
After he said those words, he slowly got up to leave, and soon disappeared in the courtyard.
Song Luan sat on the stone chair. The autumn wind blew and lightly touched her cheek. Her ears became red by the cold wind, and the coolness in her body had not yet disappeared.
Third lady Zhao's close servant girl panted and trotted to her side. 
"The third lady has been looking for you for a long time, but she hasn't found you anywhere just now. She's very worried. Now, you are found."
Song Luan looked up at her. "What's the matter with my mother looking for me?"
The servant girl replied, "Madam, please go visit Guanyin."
Song Luan took a sigh of relief and stood up tired. "Let's go."
After waiting for a long time in the palace, third lady Zhao saw her coming and asked, "what's the matter? Are you not feeling well?"
Song Luan reluctantly smiled, "No, I'm just tired."
"Go back to your room and have a rest. "
"Okay."
Guanyin in Fulu temple was really effective. On the day they came, they met many women who came to repay their vows. 
Song Luan kowtowed in front of Guanyin statue with three sticks of incense. She closed her eyes and didn't make a vow. What she thought was what the young Taoist just said.
After worshiping Guanyin Bodhisattva, Song Luan was ready to go back to the wing room for rest. She happened to meet two monks outside the hall. Her heart moved, and she went up to salute the two monks and immediately asked, "Little monk, are there any young Taoists in the temple?"
"This is a Buddhist temple. How could there be a Taoist?"
Song Luan was in a trance for a while. Who did she just see? 
She thought, in her bitterness and pleasure, that such an immeasurable superior was mysterious.
She whispered thanks and went back to the wing in a daze.
The room prepared in the temple was very simple. Song Luan washed her face and climbed onto the bed. She sat in the corner against the wall with her legs crossed. She carefully thought over the last words of the young Taoist.
Song Luan wanted to understand the boundary between the cause of the ending. As long as she did not show too much difference from the original owner in front of Zhao Nanyu, it should be regarded not collapsing from her character.
It was cold in the mountain at night. Song Luan felt warm after covering two quilts. She couldn't breathe because of the heavy quilt pressure. Song Luan had not dreamed for a long time. That night, she dreamed of the woman she had dreamed of before.
She laid on the bed, sick. Her once beautiful face was gloomy and her bright eyes were lifeless. 
She was wearing Song Luan's favorite pomegranate skirt.
Unlike the previous dream, Zhao Nanyu in this dream was haggard, and was skinny.
He hugged the woman on the bed and leaned closer to her ear, murmuring something indifferently.
Song Luan felt that Zhao Nanyu was about to cry. His eyes were almost full of distortion, violence and sadness. He didn't look like a normal person anymore.
The woman lying on the bed opened her mouth and said a word to him. Zhao Nanyu's body was almost petrified.
Song Luan actually saw his tears fall.
Advertisements
He was very depressed.
When Song Luan woke up, she raised her hand to wipe her face and found that she had also cried. She knew that the woman in the dream was herself, not the original owner.
Probably after her death, the body gradually corroded and swallowed.
This strengthened Song Luan's decision to go according to the original plot. She only needed to show the original owner's sloppy and unreasonable character. 
As for making Zhao Nanyu wear a green hat, she would not do it.
Song Luan looked out of the window. It was just dawn. She climbed out of the quilt and cleaned herself. Then she was led by the little monk in the temple to have a fast meal.
After having breakfast, they were going back to the residence.
When going down the mountain, Song Luan met an acquaintance, her good sister Song Yu.
The two sisters met in the Palace last time. After that, Song Luan never saw her again. Last time, aunt Lin told her that Song Yu would marry.
Looking at the present appearance of Song Yu, she couldn't see that she was going to marry soon.
Song Yu was thin and she almost didn't recognize her. Her temperament was dull and she didn't get angry. 
When they passed each other, Song Yu looked at her resentfully.
"Third sister, what a coincidence."
Song Luan thought she would not say hello to her. She smiled and said, "Does sister come to pray too?"
"Yes. What about sister? "
"I'm just like you. "
Song Yu said coldly, "Then I wish sister all the best. "
Song Luan politely replied, "So do you."
She thought that the eyes of Song Yu seemed like she wanted to kill her. Song Luan thought that Song Yu really hated her.
Song Yu really hated her. She gnashed her teeth and looked at her back when she left the palace. 
After leaving the palace, she went home and her stomach hurt so much that she couldn't see well for three days. Finally, her parents rushed to help her, and intuition told her that it was Song Luan's intention to revenge her and set her up.
It was almost noon before the carriage stopped at the gate of the Zhao's residence.
Song Luan didn't sleep well last night. She just slept on the carriage for a while. 
She was in a good mood. Seeing that no one was around, she stretched comfortably.
Before she went back to the yard, she saw a little dumpling head come out.
Song Luan had something in mind, and didn't smile too much when she saw little Zhao. She squatted down in front of him and touched his head. "Are you coming out to pick up mother?"
Little Zhao nodded. He asked her to open her hand and hold him.
He was shy and seldom took the initiative in front of her. It seemed that after his illness, the relationship between the mother and the son became better.
Song Luan lifted him up with a smile. "Good boy. You're not hurt anymore."
The gloom in her chest had dissipated. Her son was such a warm baby.
He had been clinging to her for an afternoon, even sleeping. Song Luan had no time to think about other things, let alone to mourn.
In the evening, Zhao Nanyu didn't go back to the residence. Song Luan and her son had a meal together. After eating, she coaxed her son to sleep.
She gently put the child down on the small bed in the compartment, pinched the quilt corner for him, and sat in front of the bed for a long time. Song Luan then slowly withdrew.
She didn't know when Zhao Nanyu came back. He took off his outer clothes. When he heard her footsteps, he turned around and looked back, and asked, "Is it fun in the temple?"
Song Luan remembered what the Taoist said.
She pouted. "I did not go there to have fun."
Zhao Nanyu had just come back from the outside, but his hands were still cold, so he dared not go forward to hold her hands. 
He was acutely aware that Song Luan's mood seemed to be very low. He asked casually, "What's the matter? What's wrong with the temple?"
Song Luan lowered her head and watched her toes play. Her eyes were red gradually. The word 'death' was engraved in her mind and couldn't be removed.
She lowered her eyes, and silently shed tears. Droplets of waters fell on her sleeves, like running water crawling down over her whole face.
She silently cried.
Zhao Nanyu thought something was wrong. He lifted her face up, gently wiped the tears on her cheeks with his fingers, "Who bullied you?"
Song Luan really didn't want to cry in front of him, but she couldn't control herself. She was very aggrieved and very sad.
She sniffed, her voice changed a tone, and she could hardly speak clearly. "I read a book at home this afternoon, and the people in that book were so miserable, so I was very unhappy."
Zhao Nanyu was skeptical, but he still coaxed her and said, "The books are all fake."
Song Luan cried even louder when he heard his voice. She couldn't breathe. What Zhao Nanyu said made her even more sad. What happened in this book was all true.
Zhao Nanyu thought that what she liked most was the poor appearance of her tears. Now she couldn't stop crying. She was very sad. He hugged her and coaxed her patiently, saying, "Don't hurt yourself by crying."
Song Luan's eyes were red and swollen. She couldn't stop.
Zhao Nanyu was helpless and carried the woman to the bed. "You can't feel better tonight if you cry again."
Sure enough, Song Luan immediately stopped.
Zhao Nanyu didn't want to threaten her, but according to her crying method, it was estimated that Song Luan would soon faint from crying.
He went out for a while, and when he came back, his face looked a lot heavier.
Zhao Nanyu didn't believe that Song Luan was crying just because she read a book, but he only asked the people who watched over her just now. Nothing happened in the temple and no one bullied her.
He reluctantly put down the confusion in his heart, Zhao Nanyu went back to the house and raised his hand to put out the candle.
Song Luan felt much better after venting out. She rolled the quilt and faced the wall. Before long, she felt that there was a person beside her.
Zhao Nanyu fell asleep beside her, put out his hand around her waist, and pulled the woman out of the corner. Zhao Nanyu's fingers were very restless, and he untied the belt on her waist three or two times.
As he was about to do something, Song Luan turned around and looked at him.
She decided to carry forward the arrogant character of the original owner from today on, and work hard! It was better to do this than to die. It was better than dying of death.
Moreover, Song Luan already had the confidence to do this, because Zhao Nanyu liked her. So Song Luan fluently thought that even if she was indulgent and unreasonable, the male lead would not want kill her.
Song Luan bravely clapped his hand away. "Don't touch me."
The bright moonlight shone on her beautiful face, her eyes were still slightly red, and Zhao Nanyu remembered her face in his heart.
Zhao Nanyu licked her lips and her waist even harder. He kissed her lower lip. He didn't take her words to heart, but took them as a kind of interest. He smiled gently, "Ah Luan is so fierce, I'm afraid."
Song Luan felt the dullness in her chest dissipate a lot when she pushed him away.
It seems that being fierce was effective.
She's really going to take the road of unruly and willful lady.
=============== Chapter 49
Song Luan was a gentle and timid girl before she transmigrated. She seldom quarreled with others when she was a child, and so, her elders praised her as a good girl.
Song Luan thought that she had been very fierce to Zhao Nanyu. In fact, in his eyes, she was not even near from being fierce, more like a coquettish kind, and this aroused his interest more.
Zhao Nanyu instead liked her coquettish appearance more than her indifference.
The cold lips tasted her clavicle, and his hand strongly embraced her thin waist. Zhao Nanyu sniffed the fragrance of her body and sighed, "Luan Bao is so fragrant."
He remembered that Song Luan's mother called her with that. At that time, Zhao Nanyu remembered it silently, and when he felt this strong surge of wanting Song Luan more, he called out her name 'Luan Bao'
When Song Luan heard him call her name, she had goose bumps on her arms. The two normal words appeared very sorrowful from Zhao Nanyu's mouth.
The atmosphere in the hibiscus tent was very ambiguous. He continued to call her name while biting her ear. It seemed that he was forcing her to give a response. Her toes curled up and Zhao Nanyu find her very cute. Song Luan was flustered. Could she still run?
She instinctively shrank back. Song Luan wouldn't be his opponent forever in the book, so for now, she still couldn't run.
But, she couldn't escape without being bullied.
Song Luan's face was angry, "Don't touch me. Why can't you be reasonable? You touching me is really annoying."
Her face was not intimidating at all, and her tone was soft. Zhao Nanyu was amused by her appearance. "Is Luan Bao playing coquetry with me?"
Song Luan fiercely replied, "No, I'm murdering you!"
Couldn't you see? Wasn't it obvious enough? This man was really shameless.
Song Luan couldn't help but stretched her hand to push him, "And don't call me Luan Bao, I don't like it."
When he called out her name with a very pleasant voice, and he even deliberately extended the ending of her name, which made her tremble.
Zhao Nanyu asked her in a good temper, "Why?"
"My mother can only say that name." Song Luan, who was still suffering, suddenly opened her eyes and smiled, "Are you going to be my mother?"
Zhao Nanyu raised his eyebrows and chuckled, "You have a sharp teeth and a sharp mouth."
Zhao Nanyu kept calling her intimate name the whole night. Song Luan couldn't help but listen. She couldn't block his mouth, so she instead kicked and pinched him, but this was regarded as sentiments between husband and wife.
It was a good weather the next day.
Song Luan laid half dead on the bed and thought it over carefully with her eyes open. Last night, she shouldn't have said that he wanted to be her mother, because this made Zhao Nanyu unhappy and even retaliated.
At this time, even when she woke up, she couldn't move. It was sour and soft.
After a long time, Song Luan sighed deeply and sat up from the bed. Grandma Lin heard the sound and came in to find her clothes.
Song Luan put on her clothes. After washing, the servant girl outside came into the house with breakfast.
Song Luan had developed a special taste. She didn't like sweet or greasy food in the morning, so she had always drank porridge these days.
However, in the recent months, she felt that the taste of white porridge seemed to have changed. There was a slight sweetness in the porridge before, but now she couldn't taste any of that flavor.
Song Luan had two bowls of porridge before she filled her stomach enough. After breakfast, she found that Zhao Nanyu had already returned to the residence.
Zhao Nanyu was in a good mood. He went in and changed his clothes, and said to her, "Do you want to go riding?"
Song Luan was walking around the room when she heard this, she immediately stopped, her eyes brightened, and nodded, "Yes!"
She was ashamed to admit but she hadn't ridden a horse yet.
And Song Luan remembered that the original owner could ride a horse well.
Every autumn, the emperor would personally preside over the equestrian competition. Noble young men and women were invited to participate.
In the book, there was a sentence that said, 'Song Luan won the title in the women's category.'
Zhao Nanyu patted the back of her head and said, "Go change your clothes. I will take you to the horse farm."
Song Luan then went to change into her riding clothes. Last night, her plans to fight Zhao Nanyu were all eaten by dogs.
Song Luan was dressed in a red riding suit. Her hair was all set up. Her facial features stood up with elegance. She was gorgeous and beautiful.
When she arrived at the horse farm, Song Luan found that it wasn't only the two of them, but also sixth prince and Ayun, who was beside him.
A Yun was warm and approachable. She also took the initiative to talk to her without putting on airs.
"Miss Song, I heard that you are good at riding. I don't know if I have the honor to see you today."
Song Luan said with a smile, "I'm flattered."
She couldn't ride a horse, but maybe when she gets on the horse back, her instinct would probably kick in.
A Yun hid behind the sixth prince timidly. She seems to be afraid. She was timid and had a small voice.
She leaned out her small head from behind sixth prince, looked at her with concern, and asked in a low voice, "Miss Song, are you well?"
Song Luan liked A Yun very much. The little girl was naive and lovely. When Song Luan saw her, She wanted to be protect her. But it was a pity that she didn't see her name in the original book and didn't know her final ending. Maybe Song Luan forgot about the plot, or maybe she didn't read carefully.
Song Luan didn't realize it herself, but she had been looking at A Yun with eyes of pity and sympathy. After sixth prince ascended the throne and became the new emperor, the queen became Xuan Zhengqing, his former imperial concubine. Moreover, the new emperor had several beloved imperial concubines in his harem.
To put it another way, if A Yun was the woman locked up by the new emperor, she was also very miserable. Her life was only a few decades, and had no chance to escape from the shackles in her life.
Song Luan had only seen A Yun twice, and each time she could only see her unreserved love for the sixth prince.
She smiled. "Yes, I'm fine now. Were you scared last time?"
A Yun looked like she was going to cry last time.
A Yun nodded her head in a funny way. She was really scared. She thought miss Song would die of pain.
Zhao Nanyu was not happy with how long she chatted with unimportant people, so he dragged her to pick horses.
Song Luan picked a gentle looking foal from the stable. She patted the foal on the hip and said, "I'll pick this horse."
Zhao Nanyu took a look and raised his eyebrows. He was surprised. "Are you sure?"
Song Luan coughed twice uneasily and said, "He's the best."
Advertisements
For this reason, Zhao Nanyu could not laugh or cry. He thought that according to Song Luan's temperament, he wouldn't choose this young foal.
But that's fine. He wouldn't worry about her bumping.
Song Luan was picked up by Zhao Nanyu, which made her feel a bit embarrassed. Her legs were short, and she couldn't climb high enough.
At first, Zhao Nanyu stood by to watch her make fun of herself. When her patience wore thin, he held her on the horse back with the smile of his lips.
Maybe it's the instinct of the body, because Song Luan could control him well when she got on the horse, but she didn't dare to ride very fast. She just around the horse farm for two rounds.
Zhao Nanyu was right behind her. He was dressed in a black riding suit. His handsome face looked heroic. The sun fell on his fair face, adding a bit of nobility.
After two turns, Song Luan felt tired and almost twisted her feet when she jumped off the horse.
It seems that sixth prince and A Yun hadn't started riding yet. A Yun looked pale and scared. She couldn't let go from holding sixth prince's arms.
Sixth prince didn't know what to say to A Yun who was scared to tears. He looked at her red eyes and her pitiful appearance. He couldn't help but laugh loudly, and immediately held her face kiss her.
Song Luan thought that this sixth prince was really a bad man.
A Yun had no title to follow him, but she followed him knowing the unforeseen future.
The new emperor in the original book was not pleasant. There were countless beauties in his harem. However, the emperor's heart was indifferent. The woman who he would loved to the heaven...would be killed in the next instant.
Song Luan thought of Zhao Nanyu again. In fact, he was not such a good person. Before he became a powerful minister, he was a gentle young man. When he had the power of life and death, he began to uproot the dissidents in the court. Those who opposed his regime, one by one, were uprooted. Sometimes even the whole family couldn't stand against him.
His cruelty gradually appeared. At first, some courageous ministers joined hands to destroy him, but unfortunately, the new emperor was too fond of Zhao Nanyu and never cared about the lives he slaughtered.
Zhao Nanyu was very vengeful. He wrote down the names of the people who took part in his adversity. He picked them up mercilessly. As time passed, no one dared to provoke him again.
Zhao Nanyu was violent and cruel, but his methods were still effective in Dali temple. The Treasury gradually filled up and peoples' life improved.
Those who hate him couldn't wait to kill him, and those who support him would be willing to die for him.
Zhao Nanyu appeared behind her and put his long arms on her shoulder, "Tired?"
Song Luan retracted her eyes. She had a slight trouble breathing, "Yes, I'm tired. I don't want to ride."
"Then let's go back and rest early."
"I don't want." She raised her chin slightly and said angrily.
Why should she go back when she had just gone out? This time, it was not that she intended to copy the original owner's temper, but that she was really grumpy inside. She was upset at seeing and hearing him.
Song Luan thought about it. Maybe it was because her monthly period was coming soon. She was in such a bad mood.
Zhao Nanyu was always indifferent. Song Luan had never seen anyone who could cover up his emotions.
"You're being childish again."
"I just don't want to go back so early. I want to buy jewelry. Other girls have beautiful jewelry and beautiful clothes. I don't have much."
Song Luan was lying. She couldn't wear all her clothes. As for jewelry, she had already picked some in Zhao Nanyu's warehouse.
Zhao Nanyu was also used to her temper. He nodded thoughtfully, "Let's go, I'll take you to buy it."
Song Luan suddenly had the illusion that she was being spoiled by him, like he was his daughter.
Sixth prince and A Yun were not interested in staying in the race course anymore, so they went to the downtown together, but sixth prince seems to have other things to do, so he didn't join.
A Yun was reluctant to let Song Luan go. Before she left, she held her hand. "Miss Song, can I come to see you later?"
Song Luan's pupil shrank. After a long time, she returned to her mind. She was in a trance and answered, "Yes."
Sixth prince put his arms around A Yun's waist, and his expression was not very pleasant. He said deeply, "You like her!"
A Yun bit her lips and didn't speak.
After they left, Song Luan was still in a trance. Just like Huai Jin, when A Yun held her hand, many unseen pictures came into her mind.
Gorgeous palaces, golden cages, and a pitiful woman.
That woman was A Yun.
Even if Song Luan knew this, she couldn't do anything.
Zhao Nanyu saw her look gloomy and grabbed her finger to play. "Aren't you happy to buy jewelry?"
Song Luan didn't make a sound. Zhao Nanyu took her to the best jewelry shop in the capital. She childishly wanted to empty his money bag and bought many hairpins and earrings at one go.
When Zhao Nanyu saw how much she had taken, his eyelids did not falter. When they went out of the shop, he commented with a smile, "These are not very good."
Song Luan held her bag of jewels and stared at him. "Then why didn't you say it earlier!?"
Zhao Nanyu smiled and didn't reply. Of course, he won't say it. Song Luan's thoughts of leaving him hadn't stopped. The cheap and worthless jewels they bought were also very good. They would not be worth much in the future.
He stopped and mumbled, "I can't bear to disturb your interest."
Song Luan snorted, "You are mean!"
Zhao Nanyu bent his lips and smiled, "Shall I give you my warehouse key?"
Everything in the storehouse couldn't be pawned. Even if Song Luan took it, she could only admire it, since it won't be changed into money.
***
In a word, Zhao Nanyu made it impossible for her to leave. It was a good way to cut off her wealth.
Why not? Song Luan was not a polite person either. She stretched out her hand and said, "Yes, please give it to me."
Zhao Nanyu held her small hand. "I'll give it to you when we arrive home."
Song Luan believed his words. 
It was evening when they went back to the residence. Old lady Zhao suddenly asked them to go over for dinner.
There was no family celebrations today, so Song Luan felt strange. The old lady clearly didn't like the two of them. Normally, she wouldn't want to see them. How could she suddenly ask them to accompany her for dinner?
Song Luan had a sudden brain shortage and her heart became uneasy.
Women's instincts were surprisingly accurate. The old lady did not have a good heart.
The old lady put on a majestic face. The three people had just finished their meals. She raised her eyes, swept their faces, and paused, "I looked for you today to tell you something."
Zhao Nanyu looked indifferent, "Please say it."
The old lady took a sip of tea and said, "I want little Zhao to live in my courtyard." 
Song Luan's face was distorted by the old lady's words.
=============== Chapter 50
Song Luan originally wanted to endure it, thinking that she was an elder and shouldn't have conflict with her, but old lady Zhao didn't seem to be joking. The old lady really wanted to take her son to the main court.
What was the reason? She and Zhao Nanyu only had little Zhao as their child. Furthermore, they were still alive to take care of their son. How could this old lady Zhao put forward such an impertinent request?
Song Luan straightened up, her reasoning still intact, but her voice was still a little unsteady. "Grandma, little Zhao already lives here in the house. If you want to see him, you can ask the maidservant to lead him to you."
Od lady Zhao sat in front of them with her face taut and heavy. "I mean to bring little Zhao to my side and let him live in my courtyard."
Song Luan was mad. It was true that old lady Zhao frequently meets with little Zhao, but she didn't have to do such a thing as robbing children, did she?
"Grandmother, Ah Yu and I have only one child."
"You? If you and Ah Yu are good parents, will I want to take him to my side? I haven't had a good day with you. Your son was seriously ill a few days ago. Have you been a good mother to him?"
Song Luan's chest was filled with rage. Finally, her she couldn't control it, so she blurted out, "Grandmother is really confident. It seems that after you take him, he won't get sick in his whole life."
Song Luan didn't know how insidious and sour she was when she said this.
Old lady Zhao hadn't seen Song Luan like this for a long time. She thought she had changed her behavior in this period of time, but never really expected that she didn't have any progress.
The old lady pointed to Song Luan and said, "I'm kind enough to point out your wrong behavior, and yet you mock me. You don't respect your elders. You have no manners. No one will expect you to teach good values to your son!"
Song Luan took a deep breath. "Granddaughter-in-law spoke to grandmother-in-law very well, but this grandmother refused to listen. Grandmother says she is blunt, but granddaughter-in-law just told the truth."
Third lady Zhao hadn't won the upper hand in Song Luan for several times in recent years. Unlike other daughters-in-law, Song Luan had been spoiled growing up since she was a child. Her parents and her brother doted on her. She had a rebellious disposition, but no one had ever paid attention or corrected this behavior in the Song family.
Old lady Zhao frequently quarreled with her in the early years, and she would punish her after quarreling. But this person was not willing to accept her punishment.
Song Luan beat Zhao Nanyu to give up her idea in a rage, but the old lady said it many times. Zhao Nanyu was only listened.
"I just want to ask if you accept to let little Zhao stay in my courtyard."
Song Luan tightened her mouth, but did not reply.
"What about you!?"
Song Luan was angry in her heart. She refused to answer her questions. Weren't the answers clearly laid out? Why should the old lady ask again?
Old lady Zhao was stunned by her dead state of ignoring her. She pointed to her with her trembling hands, "I tell you, the old man Zhao also has this thought in his heart. If you are not willing, you can't help it."
They like little Zhao especially because he is intelligent. It was true that old man Zhao thought about it, but because Zhao Nanyu and Song Luan only had one child, they never mentioned it.
Song Luan said, "You are determined to rob my child, aren't you?"
She was really rude. She poked every word on the old lady's face. Old lady Zhao raised her hand and was about to slap Song Luan's cheek, but Zhao Nanyu stopped her hand in mid air, with a light face. "Grandmother, calmed down."
The old lady snorted, took back her hand, and asked coldly, "You want to protect her? Haven't you seen what she did to you in the past?"
"Ah Luan is the wife of your grandson. It is natural that he wants to protect her." Zhao Nanyu replied without hesitation. The old lady couldn't find any fault from his words.
The old lady thought it would go well. Although Zhao Nanyu loved his son, he was busy with court duties and didn't have much time to bring him at home. As for Song Luan, old lady Zhao had never seen her love towards her child ever since litte Zhao was born. She wondered if Song Luan had been hit by a devil in this period of time, and suddenly changed her temper.
Now it seems that Zhao Nanyu and Song Luan wouldn't agree.
The old lady thought of this in a whim. Few of her grandchildren had families, and they even had fewer children. It's hard to avoid loneliness when people are old, and little Zhao who she knew was obedient and beautiful pleased her.
From her heart, the old lady thought that it was much better for little Zhao to follow her than to live with Song Luan. She would not be inferior to him in food, clothing, housing, and transportation.
How could she know that this husband and wife pair was so disrespectful.
Old lady Zhao didn't want to open her eyes any longer. She didn't even want to look at Zhao Nanyu. Every time she sees him, she always remembers his mother who made the Zhao family lose face.
She said in a cold voice, "Since you look at me with annoyance, go back now."
Song Luan was eager to leave at once. Just after she turned around and stepped forward, she was dragged back by Zhao Nanyu.
He patted her on the back of the hand peacefully and said, "Don't worry."
Zhao Nanyu turned his head and smiled at old lady Zhao in a good temper. The smile in his eyes were cold. "Grandmother, you came and took little Zhao today, so we will take the child and leave immediately. We will not pollute your eyes."
Little Zhao was brought to the main courtyard by old lady Zhao and her servants, and before Zhao Nanyu came back, Old lady Zhao just coaxed the child to sleep.
The news spread quickly. old lady Zhao thought Zhao Nanyu didn't know about it. She guessed that he had many eyes hidden in the residence.
Thinking of this, the light in the old lady's eyes was cold, "The child just fell asleep."
Zhao Nanyu did not change his face. "This grandson will go and wake him up."
"Are you determined to oppose me?"
"This grandson don't dare."
The old lady was not polite to him, and her voice suddenly snapped, "Chunzhi, stop him!"
Chunzhi immediately stopped him in front of the door. Zhao Nanyu narrowed his eyes and kept silent for a moment. He was not polite at all. He kicked the person openly and directly broke into the inner room.
Just now, Chunzhi's foot was hard and heavy. He couldn't get up for a long time after he was kicked. He didn't dare to stop Zhao Nanyu.
The third young master's ferocious appearance was rare, which frightened everyone.
Little Zhao fell asleep and hadn't woke up even after the big commotion. Zhao Nanyu picked up the child, took Song Luan by the other hand, and then went to the old lady, who was pale with anger. He said respectfully, "This grandson will leave first."
"Violent, Presumptuous."
Besides these two words, the old lady couldn't say anything else.
Song Luan was led out by him. She couldn't believe her eyes. She thought Zhao Nanyu didn't dare to contradict the old lady. She didn't expect him to kick the person first, and then take little Zhao directly.
Song Luan lowered her head, coughed twice, and said, "Although this is not a good sentence, I still want to say it. "
Zhao Nanyu listened attentively. "Tell me, I'll listen."
"It's really nice to see that old lady crumble."
Song Luan realized the pleasure of willfulness. She felt comfortable all over without any guilt. She added in silence, "I'm so angry!"
Problems of chest tightness and shortness of breath were gone.
Advertisements
Zhao Nanyu chuckled. He couldn't help but pinched her face. "Naughty."
Song Luan's skin was white and tender. Zhao Nanyu's strength was great. He had gather all his strength and pinched her cheeks thoughtlessly, which made her face ache. She waved his hand angrily.
"Why don't you pity me at all?!"
When he kisses her, it's like eating her. In bed, he often want to eat her alive. It's really annoying.
Zhao Nanyu raised his eyebrows. "Do you think I don't pity you enough?"
Song Luan pointed to her neck, opened her collar and traces of what he did last night appeared before his eyes. "This is pity? You are shameless."
Looking back on last night's incident, she blushed and didn't want to continue to say these obscene words. Instead, she turned to another topic and said, "Why do you reject the old lady Zhao's offer of taking care of little Zhao? Thought he never liked you, she was willing to help you with your children."
Song Luan's heart was straight and quick, and she said what she had in mind.
Zhao Nanyu sighed and felt helpless for her, "Don't think about it. Don't worry. I won't let my grandmother take our son."
This is what the man said. Of course, Song Luan chose to believe him.
Back to the Huai Shui residence, Zhao Nanyu put his sleeping son on the bed and told the maidservant to fetch water.
Little Zhao gradually woke up, blinked and found that his mother was right in front of him. He called softly, "Mother."
Song Luan listened to the soft and sweet call, and her heart felt softer. She sat beside the bed, touched her son's face, bent her eyes, and said, "Wake up? "
Since little Zhao just woke up, his nasal sounded heavy, his voice was waxy, sweet and cute. He slowly explained to her, "I...I fell asleep in my grandmother's house by accident."
He wanted to come back this afternoon, but his grandmother refused to let him go.
"Well, mother knows." Song Luan propped up her chin and asked him, "Do you like grandma?"
Little Zhao lowered his head, as if unwilling to answer her question.
Song Luan then said, "Tell your mother the truth. You can't lie. Your mother won't blame you."
Sure enough, little Zhao shook his head honestly. His grandmother was very strict. She didn't laugh or get close to him. Besides, little Zhao knew that her grandmother preferred his two other cousins.
Song Luan laughed happily. "You are really my good son."
When Zhao Nanyu saw Song Luan's silly look through the screen, she didn't know how beautiful she was. Her eyes were brighter than the stars in the sky.
Zhao Nanyu was naked, his black hair like silk spread on his straight back, and a few drops of water flowed down his face like the moon. He approached Song Luan slowly, and held her hand, just playing with nothing. 
Zhao Nanyu asked, "Why are you so happy?"
Song Luan hummed, "Won't tell you."
Zhao Nanyu didn't continue to ask, but only continued playing with her fingers. "If you don't want to say it, it's okay."
Little Zhao didn't get a chance to sleep with his mother that night. He even began to miss his illness. At that time, his mother accompanied him to sleep, and his father wouldn't stop him. But now, he couldn't.
Little Zhao didn't mention that he wanted to sleep with his mother, because he knew his father wouldn't agree.
Because Song Luan ran twice in the horse farm and fought with the old lady Zhao today, she felt tired and immediately went to bed.Her sleeping face was very relaxed.
She laid on the bed with disordered clothes.
Zhao Nanyu covered the quilt for her in silence, and straightened her body.
She slept with his arms around her.
At noon the next day, Song Luan found out that old lady Zhao was ill. Everyone in the house said that she had given the old lady a bad breath.
Song Luan felt wronged.
She didn't think that a woman with a heart of stone like the old lady Zhao would be sickened by her words, but her quarrel with old lady Zhao last night reached the ears of old man Zhao. He is a a man of great etiquette, so after hearing it, he became angry.
He directly ordered the servant to take Song Luan to the ancestral hall. When Song Luan arrived, she saw Zhao Nanyu already kneeling in front.
Old man Zhao's face was as black as the bottom of a pot."Ah Yu, you really let me down. Why did you contradict your grandmother!"
Zhao Nanyu didn't care to explain in front of his family. His face was light, looking as if it didn't bother him. He said, "This grandson is willing to solely accept all the punishment. Ah Luan's body is too weak to bear the family rules."
Old man Zhao glanced at Song Luan coldly and snorted, "If she is weak, how can she have the energy to disrespect the elders!? I tell you, there is no such reason! Without fear of punishment, she wouldn't remember her wrong deeds."
Several young men with long whips stood in the ancestral hall. The whips were thin and long. Being hit by those whips would be painful.Song Luan was scared when she saw it. If she was beaten by this thing, she would return to the soil of the earth!
Zhao Nanyu straightened up and said in a deep voice, "This grandson will suffer the punishment on her behalf."
"Well, grandfather won't stop you." Mr. Zhao had no good face. "Forty times and nothing less."
Song Luan jumped up and shivered. Before she could speak, Zhao Nanyu touched her hair and smiled softly at her. "Go out, don't look."
Song Luan was about to cry. She was sad and sour.
She was finally taken out of the temple. Even from where she was, she could hear the sound of the whip. Song Luan sobbed silently.
She didn't expect that Zhao Nanyu would deliberately take the punishment.
Zhao Nanyu knew that the most important etiquette for the Zhao's family is to respect the elders. But even knowing this, he still rebelled against his grandmother last night.
The bitter tears that Song Luan silently shed just now showed that she was distressed.
Zhao Nanyu closed his eyes and thought quietly that this was good. Her tears made him feel good.
Song Luan was like a pet caught by the hunter. She wouldn't be able to escape the trap he gradually set.
T/N: this part is so sweet...ZN took SL's punishment instead...~
=============== Chapter 51
Zhao Nanyu's back was soaked with blood after 40 lashes. He had excellent endurance, and didn't even cry out because of pain from beginning to the end. But, listening to his dull hum was more painful to see.
Most of the Zhao family members were watching, except for Zhao Wenyan who was still studying in the academy. The other brothers of similar age stood silently watching. No one dared to plead for Zhao Nanyu, not even Zhao Chao. He knew that his grandfather wouldn't be hard towards Zhao Nanyu. The second brother rebelled against his grandmother. Being whipped was not a severe punishment.
Zhao Bo stood on the edge and watched this good play. It's strange to say that although his second brother was not very pleasant and his grandmother didn't like him, the number of times Zhao Nanyu was punished from was only a few times. It was not easy to see his second brother embarrassed once.
Originally, Zhao Bo was still looking at it with great interest for fear that he would miss a little detail.
Unfortunately, he didn't see an interesting expression on Zhao Nanyu's face. Gradually, he didn't think it was interesting.
Tut, wasting time.
Zhao Bo thought that if he had known that his second brother's expression was this boring when he was punished, he wouldn't come see him, and would just find other interesting things to pass time. This would be better than standing in a daze, watching him.
When the whip was over, the pain from Zhao Nanyu's back was very severe. He knelt for a long time, so his knees were aching. He straightened up slowly while he gradually became paler.
Having beaten him like this, old man Zhao felt soft hearted and waved his hand, "Help the third young master to go back."
Zhao Nanyu's face was pale and his voice was light. "No, this grandson can go back on his own."
Old man Zhao knew that he was stubborn. Since he said that, old man Zhao was too lazy to talk to him, and didn't continue to pester him.
Song Luan had been waiting outside. When she saw Zhao Nanyu, she immediately ran to him and looked at the bloodstain on his body. She wanted to touch him, but she dared not for fear of hurting him. Her eyes were red, like she was scared to death. "Is it painful? I...I..I'll..."
She said incoherently, "I... I'll help you. I'll help you with the medicine." After a long pause, Song Luan said regretfully, "I will not trouble you in the future."
After this incident, whenever she would see the old lady, she would talk less, and won't argue again.
Song Luan was very guilty. Zhao Nanyu was punished for her so badly that his face was white and bloodless, as if he would fall down any time.
Zhao Nanyu put his hand on her shoulder, and leaned most of his body on her. He smiled at her, so that she wouldn't worry anymore, "Don't blame yourself. Don't think too much."
The more he said this, the more uncomfortable Song Luan felt. She wiped the water from the corner of her eyes and carefully helped him walk.
The servants in Huai Shui residence had already prepared hot water. Song Luan was not afraid of shame this time. Her throat was sour, but she took the initiative to say, "Take off your clothes. I will clean your blood for you, and then apply the medicine."
Zhao Nanyu's eyes drooped, and his lips rose slightly. "Okay."
The man's body is thin with smooth skin. There were are many whiplash marks on his back.
Song Luan wiped the blood on his body with a damp cloth and asked, "Does it hurt? If it hurts, you must tell me."
Zhao Nanyu closed his eyes and could still smell her fragrance on the tip of his nose. He smiled softly, "Doesn't hurt."
In spite of what he said, Song Luan didn't dare to exert too much force. She finally dried his back and found the powder for hemostasis and scar removal in the cupboard and sprinkled a little bit on his wound.
Song Luan heard him hiss and stopped quickly. She swallowed and carefully said, "Bear with it a little longer, it will be okay soon."
"Well, it's hard for you."
After the powder was applied, Song Luan was relieved. She took a long breath and pressed her weak finger on his shoulder. "Don't move around tonight, or the wound will hurt."
Zhao Nanyu casually put on his clothes, and obediently responded well.
In fact, Zhao Nanyu didn't feel much pain. Seeing that Song Luan was so worried about him, he deliberately acted as if he was in pain. As soon as they walked out of the room, a servant girl came to deliver a message that someone came to visit.
Zhao Chao came uninvited and sat down to drink tea. There was a medicine bottle in the middle of the table. It seemed that he brought it for him.
Zhao Chao wore a straight blue coat, and looked very upright. There was a three-point shallow smile on his fair face. After seeing Song Luan, he stood up and explained in a slow voice, "I'm here to deliver medicine to my second brother."
Although Zhao Chao was very kind, Song Luan couldn't force to like him in her heart. Her intuition told her that this younger cousin is very deep-minded, hypocritical and scheming.
After clearing her throat, she replied, "Thanks for your thoughtfulness, but I have already applied medicine for your second brother."
Under the moonlight, the beautiful face of Song Luan was fairer, and the bright and lustrous light sprinkled on her shoulder, which made her look serene and beautiful.
Zhao Chao looked at her twice for a while before he felt disdained. He had ignored her beauty since her insides were like a decayed rotten wood, but he couldn't help but admit that her skin was indeed fascinating.
Zhao Nanyu quietly pulled Song Luan behind him and touched her head, "You go inside the room first. I'll talk to him."
Song Luan left quickly without saying anything. Anyway, she hated Zhao Chao. It's better not to meet or talk to him.
"Grandfather had a good face today. Is the pain felt by second brother very bad?"
Zhao Nanyu took the medicine bottle in Zhao Chao's hand. He put it casually, and said, "Well, it's not serious."
But he pretended that it hurt so he could see Song Luan's concerned face.
"Second brother, do you really like second sister-in-law?" Zhao Chao remembered that this was not the first time he asked this question, and at that time, Zhao Nanyu never answered him.
After a long time, Zhao Chao heard the soft "Hmm" sound. If he didn't carefully listened, he wouldn't hear the small voice from Zhao Nanyu. It was easy to be ignored.
Zhao Chao's smile gradually stiffened, "Second brother, what do you like about her?"
In the eyes of Zhao Chao, Song Luan is worthless, vile, wicked, and shameless.
Zhao Nanyu's eyes were cold and his voice was low. "When is it your turn to take care of my affairs?"
Listening to this low tone, Zhao Chao knew that his second brother was angry. He kept his voice, and didn't continue to prompt him for an answer.
In fact, there was something more important for him to say tonight.
"Second brother, the emperor is awake."
Zhao Nanyu raised his lips and said, "No, the emperor has never been in a coma."
The crafty emperor was testing all the people under the throne–his wife, son and ministers. In the great temptation, only those who could calm down could survive.
These days, the queen moved frequently and even risked recalling her father and brother to the capital secretly for the last battle.
The queen took advantage of this situation to break the sixth prince's confidants.
"Not in coma?"
"Yes." Zhao Nanyu looked out the window, and at the sky, "We don't have to do anything."
"Such a good opportunity..."
Advertisements
As long as it's ruthless enough, the queen could be uprooted this time.
Zhao Nanyu replied, "No need."
Zhao Chao always believed his second brother's words, so he nodded. Without asking for more information, he said. "Since second brother has already made arrangements, so I will go back first."
"Okay." After a pause, Zhao Nanyu called him back, thought about it, and said," I will not appear in front of her in the future."
Zhao Chao knew who the second elder brother meant by 'she'.
"Yes, second brother."
When he left, Zhao Chao suddenly began to sympathize with the beautiful woman in the residence who didn't know anything. His second sister-in-law is stupid and poisonous. Maybe she didn't know how many days she has left to live.
After knowing this second sister-in-law, Zhao Chao knew that she didn't like to be controlled. But his second brother was a man who liked to control everything in his hand.
This conflict–just like water and fire, between the two was incompatible.
Song Luan was too weak to be his second brother's opponent.
Song Luan eavesdropped between the cracks of the door, but Zhao Nanyu caught her. The moment the door was pushed open, she nearly fell to the ground. Fortunately, he held her waist in time.
Zhao Nanyu looked at her with a smile, "Look at what I caught? What kind of rabbit was pulled out?"
Song Luan's face turned red. "Did you know from the beginning that I was eavesdropping?"
When she couldn't wait for an answer, she quickly added, "Well, I admit that I eavesdrop on purpose, just because I think he is going to speak ill of me."
Zhao Nanyu rubbed her face. "Well, I know you hate him. I won't let him appear in front of you in the future."
Song Luan was stunned. "I'm not mean to that extent."
Zhao Chao was his family. How could the family disappear just because he said it?
Zhao Nanyu didn't explain. As long as he wanted to, there were thousands of ways to do it. Of course, it's impossible for him to say these words in front of Song Luan. It's not good to let her know too much.
Zhao Nanyu had a wound on his back, so he could only sleep on his side.
Song Luan was forced to lie in his arms. In the middle of the night, Song Luan still couldn't fall asleep. She thought Zhao Nanyu had already gone to sleep, so she boldly poked him in the face. "I heard...you admitted that you like me."
Song Luan bent her eyes and suddenly smiled happily. "Also, I am so beautiful and kind, no one will not like me."
=============== Chapter 52
It took Zhao Nanyu half a month to get rid of his injury. This half month, he requested for leave and didn't go to Dali temple.
The situation in the capital was becoming more and more serious. After the emperor woke up, the first one to be cleaned up was the queen family. Both the queen's father and brother were sent to prison, and the 10th prince, who was the queen's son, was demolished of his crown prince title.
The sixth prince had been raised by the queen since he was ten years old. According to the truth, he should also be affected this time. However, during the period when the emperor was in a coma, he was so depressed that he didn't do anything other than stay in the royal palace. He didn't even fight the forces who tried to remove his own wings.
Although the queen received several punishments, the sixth prince was given an exemption.
After a few days, the emperor seemed to have finally made up his mind and ordered his ministers to draw up an imperial edict for the queen. After hearing about this, the sixth prince knelt outside the Wenhua hall all day and pleaded for the queen in tears.
Just after noon, the old eunuch came out of the palace, and said helplessly, "Sixth highness, you'd better go back. The emperor said that there are no more people left."
The sixth prince's voice became hoarse these past few days. Even with a hoarse throat, he yelled towards the Wenhua hall, "Father, you are kind. The queen is also confused and deceived. Over the years, the queen had been sincere in treating father. Please think twice."
There was no response from the Wenhua hall.
Until evening came, the sixth prince was still kneeling at the gate of the palace. Finally, a word came out from inside the hall. It was cold at that time. The old eunuch drew his hand into his narrow sleeve and said, "Go back. The emperor went back to rest already."
The sixth prince, with a sad face, got up from the ground and patted the dust on his knees. "Thank you very much."
The sixth prince limped out of the palace. As soon as he got out, his sadness disappeared. He gave a sarcastic smile and ordered, "Go back to the residence."
"Yes."
The queen's strength had been exhausted, but even so, the queen couldn't die yet. After all, she was his mother in name. If he wanted to become a great man, he needed a mother with high status.
Although Zhao Nanyu was idle at home, he was one of the few officials promoted under these circumstances.
He was directly transferred from Dali temple to be the chief censor of the inspector's court. At first, when they heard that Zhao Nanyu was transferred to the inspection court, no one in the Zhao family could believe that he's not working in Dali temple anymore. How could he suddenly get into the emperor's eye?
Compared with other people, Zhao Nanyu was still indifferent to this promotion. His usual behavior was still the same even after being promoted. No one told Song Luan about this news.
After the family dinner this month, Song Luan also foolishly told Zhao Nanyu that the people in the second room seemed to be more polite to them than before.
Zhao Nanyu smiled and said nothing.
When it came to family dinner, Song Luan had a bitter stomach and wanted to vomit. She not only had to face the old lady's face, but also dared not stretch her chopsticks, so she didn't eat enough.
As soon as she came back from the main courtyard, she began to have a stomachache, and it seemed to be tumbling. She felt nauseated after. Zhao Nanyu gave her a mouthful of warm water and said, "Is it better?"
Song Luan frowned, but her stomach was still very uncomfortable. She shook her head, "Not yet better."
These days, Zhao Nanyu's gentleness made her temper grow stronger and bigger. She pushed him away, "I don't want to drink water. Just let me vomit."
Zhao Nanyu didn't mind being pushed by her. He picked up Song Luan who was half squatting on the ground. He said to the servant girl outside the room in a cold voice, "Ask the doctor to come and have a look."
"Yes."
Before the doctor came, Song Luan vomited all the things she had just eaten in her stomach. Zhao Nanyu took a generous breath for her and poured her a cup of water. "Gargle."
After Song Luan vomited, the feeling of nausea in her chest disappeared by half. She poured half a cup of water to clean up the taste in her mouth. After slowing down, her face became ruddy.
At this time, the doctor had already arrived. Song Luan refused to let him feel the pulse. Maybe she had taken too much medicine, so she was afraid of the doctors, but even more afraid of their dark and bitter medicine.
She licked her face and acted coquettish with Zhao Nanyu, "I just ate and it only hurt my stomach. I'm not going to make a fuss and check my pulse!"
Zhao Nanyu held down her hand, which was frantically moving. "Take a look. It won't be too bad."
Song Luan was used to making trouble for no reason these two days. "Just don't let the doctor look at me. Don't bully me."
He said directly to the doctor, "Doctor Du, please."
She turned her face and didn't want to see him. She was so angry that she handed her wrist to Dr. Du.
After checking the pulse, Dr. Du said slowly, "It's just a bad stomachache. Madam should eat less heavy food next time."
She murmured in a low voice, "I didn't eat much tonight "
She only had few meats on her plate, and couldn't even finish all of them.
Zhao Nanyu thanked Dr. Du and sent the man out in person. Song Luan sat by the bed with her back to his body. She was still angry at his self assertion and didn't intend to talk to him.
She felt complicated. On one hand, she felt that Zhao Nanyu also cared about her, but on the other hand, she felt that this man dominated her too much. He had to intervene in every detail.
Zhao Nanyu knew that she did not eat too much food when they were in the main courtyard, so he ordered the kitchen to make a bowl of chicken soup noodles. The aroma was overflowing, so when Song Luan smelled the smell, her stomach grumbled. She wanted to eat the noodles.
Although Song Luan was hungry, but because of her self-esteem, she restrained herself very well.
Zhao Nanyu ate the noodles slowly. Song Luan was angry at the sound of his eating noodles.
She would look pitiful if she cried now.
Song Luan scolded Zhao Nanyu in her heart. She poked her little finger at the quilt under her body to play.
Suddenly, a large shadow covered her eyes. The man sighed and pushed the bowl full of noodles to her. He laughed, "Wipe your mouth."
"Don't give it to me. Let me starve to death."
Listening to her childish words, Zhao Nanyu laughed more deeply, "I can't finish it."
Song Luan turned sideways, "You deliberately ate the noodles alone in front of me. Didn't you want me to vent my anger?"
It's bad to make fun of her.
Zhao Nanyu said what he always say to her, "I'm worried about you. Even if you don't like to see a doctor, if you feel uncomfortable, you still have take care of yourself. Don't inflict yourself with trouble."
What he said was reasonable, and Song Luan couldn't refute. She was speechless.
She was a little angry, but she held the bowl, and buried her head to eat the noodles. She didn't want to continue talking with him.
"Oh? You don't want to talk to me?" Zhao Nanyu pinched her ear and moved closer to whisper.
Song Luan trembled, "Don't lick my earlobe, I can't focus eating."
Why was he sticking closer to her? Was she that fragrant?
Zhao Nanyu's lips and teeth moved downward, and he softly bit her neck, "Delicious."
Advertisements
It's sweet and fragrant. It's really delicious.
Song Luan did not have the delusion that she could correct the male lead's twisted and paranoid character.
That would just be a dream.
She could only pray that the male lead wouldn't become more abnormal.
It's good to be a gentle young master.
***
Zhao Nanyu recovered from his injury and was officially admitted to the inspector general's court.
Up to now, no one dared to look down on him. Even Song Heqing looked up to him.
This brother-in-law was more competitive than he thought.
Song Luan received an invitation letter from Song Yu at home, saying that she wanted to get together with several sisters and invited her to the poetry festival before her wedding ceremony.
After two days' consideration, Song Luan finally decided to go. The poetry appreciation meeting was not only her and Song Yu, but also the invitation letter was handed to everyone, so she had no proper reason to decline it.
Every year in the early winter of Daliang, there was a poetry appreciation meeting, which lasts for ten days. Scholars gather together, and this made the atmosphere lively.
In the early winter, there was no snow and frost. The cold weather outside seemed to drill the bones of the body. Song Luan was afraid of the cold and wrapped herself up tightly. She wore a red cloak with a warm and soft fox hair on her head.
She took a servant girl and went out of the door.
Song Yu was waiting for her in the restaurant ahead of time. When Song Luan entered the elegant room, she was stunned, "Why isn't there other people?"
In the invitation, Song Yu said that there were other people, was it a lie?
Song Yu gave her a sweet smile and poured her a cup of hot tea. "Sister, be at ease. Please sit down. The other sisters have not arrived yet. Maybe they're delayed with dressing up."
Song Luan didn't like the smell very much. She went to the window and was about to open it, but Song Yu stopped her hand. "Sister, it's cold. I'm afraid we'll be cold if you open the window."
Song Luan twisted her eyebrows. "It's okay. I'm not afraid of freezing."
She was dressed enough that the wind coming through the window didn't freeze her at all.
Song Yu bowed her head in embarrassment. "This sister is wearing less clothes today. This sister is really afraid of typhoid fever."
Song Luan remembered that today was not far from Song Yu's marriage day. No wonder she was afraid that she would freeze. No one would want to be sick on the day of the marriage.
Resisting the discomfort, Song Luan closed the window again.
Song Yu lowered her eyes. No one saw the calculation in her eyes.
Even with the doors and windows closed, Song Luan could hear the noises in the street. She had already drunk two cups of tea, but the other sisters did not arrive yet.
Gradually, Song Luan also noticed something was wrong. She glanced at her servant girl and found that the servant girl had already been separated from her by Song Yu.
Song Luan was about to stand up, but her legs were weak.
Before she got up, she fell back on her chair.
Song Luan's head was dizzy, her limbs were weak, and her white face was covered with abnormal flushed of pink.
She knew that she was cheated by Song Yu.
There was no one else at all. The reason why Song Yu didn't let her open the window was that there was something wrong with the aroma in the room.
Song Luan opened her lips and asked, "What do you want to do?"
Kill her? Or did she want her to be insulted?
Song Yu's smile at the moment was slightly ferocious.
After her plan was successful, she was obviously in a good mood, and she said slowly, "You will know immediately."
=============== Chapter 53
Song Luan was rudely thrown into another room by Song Yu. The windows and doors were tightly closed.
Song Luan was exhausted, her cheeks were getting red, and the temperature inside her body gradually rose.
In her heart, Song Luan thought that Song Yu was really one of those vicious characters of this book, and her harmful means were vulgar.
She barely supported her hand and sat by the bed with an unsteady breath. She smiled sarcastically at Song Yu. "You want a man to insult me, do you?"
Wasn't it written like this? Of course, Song Luan thought that this kind of plot was for dogs.
Song Yu's eyes were full of fierce light.
She walked two steps forward, approaching Song Luan. Her sharp fingernails slowly scratched Song Luan's cheek. With a ferocious face and a cold smile, she spat out harsh words, "How can you call it an insult? Don't you like men the most, sister?"
Although Song Luan was not her, she still had to explain for the original owner, "I only like good-looking things."
"My sister has been holding it up for months, so I'm going to help you today. My sister doesn't have to thank me."
"I thank you for your kindness. Let me go now. If anything happens to me, your brother-in-law will not let you go." Song Luan could only scare her by mentioning Zhao Nanyu.
"You should worry about yourself." Song Yu knew that as soon as Zhao Nanyu finds out about Song Luan, he would see a scene where Song Luan was entangling with other men. At that time, it would be certain that Zhao Nanyu would not let Song Luan go.
No man could tolerate his wife that made them wear a green hat, plus Song Luan in the past had been 'stirring up trouble' outside. Where would Song Luan have a good life if her husband finds out?
Song Yu thought viciously that she could not marry someone she loved, so she would never let Song Luan have a good life.
Song Luan's body was getting hotter and hotter, and she forced her brain to try and stay awake. She bit her teeth and said, "I'm your sister, I'm not doing you any harm, do you really want this?"
"Sister? Ha? I've lived under your shadow since I was a child," Song Yu said, "And why can you do everything you want? I don't eat as much as you and also not as pretty as you. You've been making fun of me all these years."
Song Luan underestimated Song Yu's hate for her.
The growing resentment spread deep into Song Yu's heart, creating the situation today. "Song Yu, wait for me to get out, I will kill you." Song Luan stared at her, saying word by word.
Song Yu was really shocked by what she said for a moment, but now she had no way out even if she wanted to regret it.
She clapped her hands and walked outside facing an ugly and short man."Serve my sister."
Both Song Luan's brain and eyes were painful. She was in chaotic.
She was soberly awaken by a man in front of her.
She really wanted to vomit the present cliche plot.
Vulgar! Vulgar!
If Song Yu wanted revenge, could she come up with an out-of-the-ordinary method?!
As the man gradually approach her, Song Luan shrank back. The man grinned at her. Song Luan's eyes were hurting by looking at this ugly person. Her sister was also absolutely dead, where did she find such a disgusting person to insult her?!
Song Luan gasped, carefully groping out a defensive dagger from her narrow sleeve. And when the man moved forward, she lifted her hand and used all her strength to plunge into his chest.
Her clothes were covered with blood stains that had been splashed, and she couldn't bear the thought at the moment. Song Luan walked slowly to the door.
She leaned her ears to the door, listening carefully to the movement outside. She was afraid that Song Yu was still outside. After listening for a while and making sure that there was no one, Song Luan pulled the door and ran.
She did not run very quickly because of her weak health. She didn't know what was in the incense.
Song Luan didn't know where she was. After looking at the inn, she slipped out the back door...
She didn't dare to walk through the main road, she could only sneak down the small path.
She was exhausted after having run for a short time. She was grasping for air by the wall. Her body slid down, sitting at the corner of the alley, and wringing her palm with her fingernails. Only feeling the pain could she keep her calm.
Song Luan secretly regretted it. She was too scared that after stabbing the man, she immediately left and lost the dagger. She could have used it twice by cutting her thigh so it could disperse some blood clots.
Song Luan remembered one time in the original book, when the original owner was caught by Zhao Nanyu having a good time with other men.
She could no longer remember the specific description, but after she was caught being raped, Zhao Nanyu only looked at her with cold eyes, and immediately closed the doors.
Oh, shit. Oh, shit.
She was in a fuck-shit plot.
Song Luan had no doubt that if one day Zhao Nanyu saw that she betrayed him, he would cut her head off.
This was the reason why she did not have a lot of men. People who are too extreme in character will do extreme things.
She is more inclined to love in a long time.
Song Luan's brain was getting dizzy, her vision was almost hazy, but she suddenly heard a familiar voice."Ah Luan!? Why are you sitting here?!"
Song Luan gasped for breath. She tiredly raised her eyelids and looked up. It's Huai Jin.The handsome face was shocked and surprised. He was dressed in red, and he looked even more dazzling in this winter season."I...I..I have no energy." Her legs and hands were soft.
She couldn't stand up. Her body was so hot that she was about to burn up.
Song Luan had sweat on her forehead. There was an abnormal pink flush on her face. Huai Jin was carrying the steamed buns he just bought, but without saying a word, he let go of the steamed buns and reached out his hand to help her who was almost collapsed on the floor.
Huai Jin opened his mouth and was startled. "Did you kill?! Why is there blood on your body?! And how did you get out with this look?! your husband bullying you again?"
Song Luan was uncomfortable, but she endure hard, "No...not him, you take me back. Walk through the back door, don't let anyone else see you."
She would be criticized again if anyone sees.Song Luan meant to take her back to Zhao's house, but Huai Jin misunderstood her words. He was young and strong, so he carried her and ran to their yard.
In the past, He and Song Luan often stayed in this yard. Hua Jin was a little happy because Song Luan hadn't been here for a long time and hadn't asked him to drink wine together.
He put Song Luan on the bed and watched her cry in pain. He stamped his feet anxiously, "Shall I call a doctor for you?"
Song Luan sobbed at the quilt and swore that she would make Song Yu cry when she was ready!Huai Jin was young and smart. He knew that Song Luan couldn't be seen by outsiders.
What's more, if he ran out to call a doctor, Song Luan would be alone and it wasn't good!
Song Luan looked at the furnishings of the house and choked, "I want to go back to Zhao's residence."
"Ah? I made a mistake. Then I can take you back to Zhao's residence now?" Huai Jin's voice was getting lower and lower. To be honest, he was afraid of being kicked by Zhao Nanyu again.
"I feel sick. Go and get me a bucket of cold water."
Huai Jin found out later that she had been drugged. His words were lower as he said something in his heart, "I'm more effective than cold water."
Advertisements
It's winter now. The cold water would damage her body.
Song Luan didn't have the strength to stare at him, "You. go. fetch. water. I am not afraid of cold."
Huaijin saw that her expression was firm and her lower lip was bitten with blood, so he said, "I will go now."
He quickly took a bucket of cold water and put it in the room. He helped Song Luan as he scolded, "Who did you harm? It's too vicious! I'm in pain seeing you like this. When do you plan to leave Zhao Nanyu? Although I can wait for you for a few more years, I feel a bit lonely. Otherwise, if you say you like me, I may not be angry."
Song Luan replied feebly, "You talk a lot."The original quiet courtyard suddenly heard the sound of neat and simple footsteps, and a familiar and frightful air could be felt.
Song Luan decisively said to Huai Jin, "Quickly, hide."
Huai Jin looked dazed, "What's the matter?"
Song Luan didn't have time to explain to him. She was so anxious that she cried, "Hide!"
Although Huai Jin didn't know what happened, he always obeyed and believed what she said.
He opened the wardrobe unwillingly and quickly got into it.
Song Luan was out of strength and fell to the ground. At this time, she was in a mess. Her collar was half open, it revealed her flushed neck. It looked alluring.
At the same time, the door was vigorously kicked open.
Zhao Nanyu was dressed in black. He had an expressionless face. His whole body exuded a cold breath.
He held a long sword in his hand, and fresh blood beads were dripping on the blade.
Song Luan could not help guessing that he had just finished killing someone.
Zhao Nanyu also had a strong smell of blood.Song Luan looked at him blankly. This was the first time that she saw him holding a sword.
He was murderous, gloomy and cold. There was no trace of a gentle scholar aura around him. It was like the Shura who had just finished taking everyone's life.
Black boots stopped in front of her, the man squatted down, looked at her pitifully, and gently rubbed her delicate face with cold hands.
Song Luan raised her finger and gently pulled his hand. Her face was flushed as she enunciated, "Take me away."
=============== Chapter 54
Song Luan probably figured out that the plot of catching her cheating in the original book happened with the original owner and Huai Jin. Zhao Nanyu was full of murderous aura now that it was not impossible to stab Huai Jin to death in rage.
She and Huai Jin couldn't explain clearly in one or two sentences about why there were together in this house. Besides, Zhao Nanyu had always been biased against Huai Jin, and she dared not take risks.
Zhao Nanyu held her in his arms and gently touched her head, "Wait."
His voice was low and hoarse, and his expression was cold. The more he was like this, the more frightened Song Luan was.
Sure enough, Zhao Nanyu walked straight towards the cabinet where Huai Jin hid. Song Luan's heart suddenly felt like it lifted in the air, and her heart was tense. She pulled the corner of his clothes, with a subtle cry, "I want to go back."
Song Luan remembered the picture of Huai Jin's last tragic death in the snow, which made it hard for her to bear. This simple and kind boy should not meet such an end. Song Luan also knew that the fate of others in the original book could be changed.
Zhao Nanyu sighed softly. He stopped his pace and said, "What do you want me to do with you?"
Song Luan nested in his chest, hooked his neck with her arms, and distinctly smelled the strong smell of blood on his body. She buried her face and said pleadingly, "I'm dying...let's go back."
Zhao Nanyu lightly removed the tender arms on his waist. He was very unhappy to hear such sullen words from her mouth.
After a long silence, he finally gave in. He turned around and went out in a different direction. "I'll listen to you once."
Although the door of the cabinet was closed, Zhao Nanyu's sword, which he had been holding in his hand, flew directly into the cabinet wood. The tip of the sword struck the middle of the wardrobe and made a sharp sound.
Huai Jin shivered in the corner of the right side of the cabinet. He curled up into a ball.
He was really trying hard not to jump out when he almost could have died. When he couldn't hear any sound, Huai Jin dared to breathe loudly. He pushed open the door of the cabinet and crawled out. The sword that Zhao Nanyu threw away was only a finger away from him. The cold wind crawled along his back to the back of his head.
His face turned white with anger, "This dog man kicked me, and even went after my life! Watch out, I'm pissed off now!"
He could't eat any food tonight.
Hua Jin's eyes were red. He had never seen such a fierce battle since he was a child.
He was very frightened.
He just thought that if he would turned into a ghost, he would haunt Zhao Nanyu forever.
***
Song Luan's body was very hot. She was restless as she touched her hands and feet. She was so uncomfortable to the point she groaned heavily.
Zhao Nanyu held her shaking hands, "Don't worry."
Song Luan had been patient for a long time since the time she was with Huai Jin. She dared not take off her clothes.
She was like a hungry ghost under Zhao Nanyu's arms. His body was cool and comfortable.
It was already dark and the night wind of early winter stroke their faces, like a knife cutting in their faces. The cold wind kept pouring through Song Luan's collar, and she shivered. Although it was cold, the temperature on her body also dropped.
Zhao Nanyu was afraid that she would catch cold. His guards handed his cloak.
He covered her with his cloak. Song Luan was wrapped from the cold wind tightly, and the cold couldn't touch her.
The black cloak was thick and warm, and it seemed that there was a clear fragrance of Zhao Nanyu's.
Zhao Nanyu came riding a horse. He first threw Song Luan on the horse's back. Then he climbed after her, he put her hands around his waist, and immediately waved his whip. The horse screamed and ran out.
Song Luan was soon taken home by Zhao Nanyu. The servants saw the young master holding a woman in his arms while hurrying into the residence, but they didn't see what the woman looked like.
Zhao Nanyu kicked the door open and said in a cold voice, "Go and make the antidote."
"Yes." The shadow guard, who was hiding in the dark, immediately responded.
The room was then warmed with charcoal.
Song Luan rolled around the bed, trying to untie her clothes. Zhao Nanyu came forward to take off her coat for her, which made her feel a little better.
After a while, the antidote was brought in.
Zhao Nanyu was very patient and fed the medicine into her throat one spoon at a time.
The antidote worked very well...After a while, the heat in her body gradually subsided, and her strength gradually came back.
She sat up slowly and asked, "How did you find me?"
Her servant was obviously separated from her by Song Yu. Song Luan was actually very desperate at that time and thought she couldn't wait for him.
Zhao Nanyu said, "I went out to look for you before you came back."
In fact, there were guards hiding in the dark with her that time. There was a secret passage in the room chosen by Song Yu. She took Song Luan to another room using the dark passage.
The shadow guards waited outside for a long time and became suspicious. It was already late when the shadow guards rushed in, and the room was already empty.
Zhao Nanyu found the room along the dark road. But when he arrived, the ugly man was not dead yet.
Song Luan had no experience in stabbing people since it was her first time, so she didn't stab at the critical area.
He laid on the ground and cried with pain. Seeing Zhao Nanyu, he thought he was the man who came to save him.
Zhao Nanyu also laughed at him at that time, and asked him, "Where is Song Luan?"
"Who is Song Luan?"
The man didn't know her name at all, and Song Yu never told him.
Zhao Nanyu laughed, "It was the woman just now."
The man swallowed his saliva and remembered Song Luan's delicate and beautiful face. He said with hatred, "She ran away after stabbing me! Brother, you save my life. My wound still hurts. I tell you, that woman is beautiful. When I catch her, I don't mind sharing her with you."
Before he finished his words, a sword light flashed in his eyes. The sword in Zhao Nanyu's hand cut his throat cleanly.
The man gasped on the spot.
There was no chance to speak those obscenities in his mouth.
Song Luan thought it over and decided it was necessary to explain to him, "I was cheated by my sister."
Zhao Nanyu touched her hair and said, "I know."
Advertisements
Before, Zhao Nanyu didn't really paid attention to Song Yu. He only thought that she was a selfish fool, and that she would only use stupid ways to harm people.
This time, if she said she solely planned everything, Zhao Nanyu wouldn't believe her.
Song Luan looked at him with ease, and went on saying, "She tried to hurt me, and then I ran away. After that, you came over."
She tried to make light of it in a few words.
She didn't want to mention Huai Jin.
It's for Huai Jin's good not to mention him.
Zhao Nanyu pondered for a long time, and then laughed as he praised her, "Well, you did good."
Song Luan's tension in her heart loosed a bit. It was good she didn't get Huai Jin involved.
If she hadn't met Huai Jin, she didn't know what would happen.
But Song Luan still dared not tell him Huai Jin saved her on the way. The male lead's jealousy and cleanliness were very serious, Huai Jin saw her disheveled appearance, and had that strange look on his face.
She was afraid that Zhao Nanyu wouldn't believe if she tells him. He would probably even think that Huai Jin and Song Yu worked together to do this.
Song Luan's request for Zhao Nanyu this evening couldn't be denied. The effect of the drug still played a role. Compared with their usual love-making, Song Luan was more conceding.
It was another sleepless hour until midnight.
The sound of low sobbing didn't stop until the middle of the night.
***
Song Luan heard news about Song Yu three days later.
When Song Yu was praying for blessings in the Buddhist temple, she was kidnapped in private.
Killing or spilling blood in a temple was not allowed, so she was dragged down the mountain and was beaten until she was almost half-dead. The Song family spent a lot of energy to save Song Yu's life, but now, she couldn't get married.
After the marriage was cancelled, Song Yu was sent to nunnery, and she had to commit to living a secular life.
Song Luan knew that there was still a little bit anger in her own heart, so she was very relieved when she heard what happened to her. Song Yu deserved this fate.
These days, Song Luan found that it became more difficult for her to go out. Grandma Lin was watching her tightly. She had wanted to slip out, but all her plans came to nothing.
Zhao Nanyu's people followed her. As soon as she stepped out of the gate, several people suddenly appeared in all directions.
Song Luan couldn't stand it anymore. She was angry with them, "Don't follow me! I'm not going anywhere."
Not only that, she also found that most people around them seemed to pay more and more respect to Zhao Nanyu. At this time, Song Luan knew that he had been promoted to imperial censor of the capital.
Song Luan's heart sank. If she remembered correctly, soon after Zhao Nanyu became the imperial censor of the capital, the Song family collapsed and the new emperor ascended the throne after the emperor died.
When these things happen, many unfortunate events happened.
But in the original book, it should had been several months before Zhao Nanyu became the imperial censor of the capital. To her surprise, the timeline in the book had also changed.
After the new emperor ascended the throne, the male lead became powerful and gradually grew into a human that resembled a shura.
However, Song Luan did not care about these at present. She had to solve the problem of her personal freedom.
At night, she stood in front of Zhao Nanyu, and coughed twice to get his attention. She needs to discussed it with him, "Can you withdraw your bodyguards? I don't like too many people going out with me."
"Where are you going?"
Zhao Nanyu had given orders that the bodyguards should stop her to areas where she was not allowed.
Song Luan was silent.
Zhao Nanyu pinched her chin and pulled out a cold smile. "Do you want to go to Huai Jin?"
Zhao Nanyu's jealousy was heavier than anyone else in the world. His love was million times heavier than others.
After a moment's pause, he lied to her and said, "Don't look for him. I've already killed him."
=============== Chapter 55
Song Luan's face was pale and her lips were trembling. It seemed as if there was a basin of cold water pouring directly from her head. Her heart felt like it was constantly falling. Her knee was shaking uncontrollably, "You say...what?"
Zhao Nanyu used a little strength to pinch her chin. He glanced at her lightly. His eyes were cold. "I killed him. Are you distressed?"
Zhao Nanyu couldn't tolerate Song Luan's concern for other men.
He remembered that she liked that boy named Huai Jin very much. She redeemed the man from slavery, bought him a yard, and raised him for several years. In the past, he felt nothing, but now he couldn't tolerate it at all.
As long as he thought of Song Luan's smile, and her closeness to that man, his heart was like being bitten by ants. He would feel pain for long periods of time.
Song Luan's ears were buzzing. Zhao Nanyu's words were like a heavy blow. It hit her head straight. She couldn't breathe. Her throat was hoarse and her eyes were red. "You killed him?!"
She raised her face, and her red eyes wide open as it stared at his face.
She couldn't calm down and asked him in a low voice, "What are you doing by killing him?! How can you?!"
Song Luan's words were not clear. She was trembling while trying to open her mouth, "Do you know...do you know that it was him who saved me? Is your heart so cruel? Why?"
She was about to cry.
After transmigrating, Song Luan actually regarded herself as an outsider. She regarded everyone as characters in the book–just virtual people, but gradually, these people left a mark on her heart.
Zhao Nanyu gently wiped the water from the corners of her eyes with his thumb, "You haven't answered me. Do you love him?"
Song Luan couldn't stop sneering, "Yes."
And she gave him a provocative look. "Yes, I love him. What do you want to do then? Do you want to kill me too? You..."
Haven't you already thought of killing me since before?
Zhao Nanyu then asked, "Since he saved you, why did you lie to me?"
Song Luan's fear of Zhao Nanyu was natural.
She always had nightmares these days.
In her dream, the sky seems to be stained with bright red blood. Zhao Nanyu stood on the high wall, coldly watching the corpses below him. He held a sharp sword in his hand, and his white clothes were stained with blood. His flawless face was also splashed with blood.
He had no expression, no waves in his eyes, and his dark pupils were like a pool of stagnant water, gazing at the world in a gloomy and silent way.
He was the male lead of this world. He had the biggest golden finger given by God.
He was cruel.
He was violent.
He always had the upper hand, and no one could stand against him.
Song Luan in the dream looked at him quietly, and a familiar feel came from the inside of her body. That kind of feeling was like being spilled with sulfuric acid. It was corroding her body gradually. She could even hear the sound of her kidney being eroded.
Song Luan felt pain every time she dreamed of it.
She stood not far away from Zhao Nanyu. She stretched out her hand and wanted to ask him for help. But when she looked carefully, she found that the sword in the man's hand had already penetrated her heart.
"You're angry." Song Luan said with a pale and weak expression.
Song Luan shook her eyes. She staggered, and just barely used the table for support until she could stand still.
She even pulled off her wrist. Her whole body was cold.
Zhao Nanyu touched her face. "I didn't kill him. I just lied to you."
Song Luan's back was sweating as he said those few words.
Huai Jin didn't die.
Her legs became softer, and she fell helplessly into his arms. Song Luan looked at the man holding her with complicated eyes.
When she closed her eyes, Song Luan could still remember Zhao Nanyu blocking the whip for her that day.
Sometimes, when she felt that she was about to fall in love with him, Zhao Nanyu's actions would always dissuade her.
The net that he had casted in the sky made her breathless.
***
Song Luan was angry.
She was timid, but she also had a temper.
She found that she and Zhao Nanyu didn't always quarrel. He seldom loses control. Every word he said and every expression he did was just right.
Even if Song Luan was angry with him, she couldn't hurt his vital point. It was like punching a cotton.
Song Luan felt that instead of making a scene with him, she might as well behave as if she didn't care about anything.
And these days coincided with the change of the current situation in the court.
Zhao Nanyu was busy every day. There was once that he didn't come back for three consecutive days.
As for this, Song Luan didn't even ask.
Every day, she only read books and played with her gold and silver jewelry.
Occasionally, she would cook a meal for little Zhao. She was very comfortable.
Zhao Nanyu stayed in the palace all this time. His cold facial features fell deep into the darkness. His expression was hard to distinguish.
He asked the people behind him in a cold voice, "Did she ask anything about me?"
His subordinates lowered their heads and didn't dare to look at him. They said, "She never asked."
Zhao Nanyu tightened his jaw, his outline was cold and hard, "Didn't she ask even a single word?"
"None."
Advertisements
The cold wind burst and the first snow fell down slowly.
The aura around Zhao Nanyu suddenly felt a little cold. It seemed that Song Luan had a good life at home alone, and it never mattered whether he was away or not.
The subordinates raised their eyes and opened their mouths.
The man suddenly cooled down. He gritted his teeth as he said, "Roll."
He was in a bad mood, and the subordnates were afraid to say more. They left at a high speed.
Zhao Nanyu still stayed in the palace even after several days later. He hadn't returned, nor did he let anyone deliver a message to Song Luan.
Song Luan did not show any dissatisfaction, but third lady Zhao had something to say.
Third lady Zhao truly felt that Song Luan had repented, and she hoped that these two people would live a good life. They shouldn't quarrel. This cold war would not only hurt her feelings, but this would not help them in the future.
Between husband and wife, there can never be two people who are brave, one must always be soft.
Her husband, Zhao Sanye, was a jerk three years ago. But now, he changed since they were harmonizing together. She coaxed him. Men and women need to pay attention with unifying their yin and yang–both soft and hard.
Third lady Zhao didn't favor Zhao Nanyu. He was her stepson, so matter how good he was, they wouldn't get close.
And Song Luan was a person who could easily be heard from gossips and rumors. Everyone said that she didn't have any heart at all. This time, even if the people knew about their cold war, they didn't care much about them at all.
***
When Zhao Nanyu was away from home, little Zhao lived in the same room as Song Luan. And like his father, his hands and feet were cold. In this winter, Song Luan had to cover him.
Every day, Song Luan wrapped him like a dumpling. She was afraid that he would start sneezing.
She also learned how to sew a cloak, so she bought a white fox fur to make it.
Song Luan's agenda these days was to make little Zhao even beautiful. 
It snowed for several days in the capital. The floor was covered with white snow, and a thick layer of sunlight shone towards it. The snow soon turned into a glittering water beads as it dripped down.
Little Zhao had less homework these days. He only need to practice two words a day, and he was often found in the residence of Song Luan. 
The child's words were still as few as ever. His answers were always concise and clear. But whenever Song Luan pampered him, he would have that embarrassed look in his face.
After being together for so long, Song Luan discovered that little Zhao only looked cold, he was in fact, very clingy. Whatever Song Luan was doing, he would watch and stare at her.
Today, Song Luan made a big snowman with little Zhao in the snow. Although both of their hands were freezing, they were happy.
Little Zhao's fingers were red, so she brought him back to the residence. She warmed a soup for him, and covered him with clothes. She cleaned his hands as she asked him while smiling, "Isn't it cold?"
He shook his head. "It's not cold."
He then handed her the soup to share, and said, "Here, mother."
"You are so filial!"
He blushed and lowered his head.
Song Luan held his hands in front of the fire for a while. After he was warmed up, she dared to ask him, "I think you've been depressed for the last two days."
Song Luan thought that little Zhao had been depressed because of his heavy school work, but then realized that not only was Zhao Nanyu not at home, but Zhao Chao also rarely came to teach little Zhao.
Zhao Chao was not young, so his mother was desperate trying to to get him to find a marriage candidate.
Song Luan heard that the matchmaker introduced Zhao Chao to a well-matched and intelligent girl. If it was successful, it would be not long before they could drink Zhao Chao's wedding wine.
In the book, Zhao Chao was deeply rooted towards the female lead. But now that the female lead didn't appear in the capital, she was not sure if he would fall in love with other girls. Zhao Chao was, after all, a figure who was determined.
Song Luan also heard that the girls who met with Zhao Chao for several days had failed. His mother hadn't let him go these days, and it looked like he was going to have to get married this year.
As a result, Zhao Chao didn't have much time to teach little Zhao.
Little Zhao, with his head down, said with low and muffled voice, "Mother, I think of my father."
Little Zhao, who was clingy, hadn't seen his father for ten days. He was not used to it.
Song Luan's fingertips stiffened, and she smiled, "Your father is busy in the palace. You'll see him in a few days."
However, she didn't ask about his whereabouts, nor did Zhao Nanyu send someone to her. Song Luan wouldn't take the initiative to send him a message. The one who would surrender first was definitely not her.
Her love that accumulated for a few days towards Zhao Nanyu had easily vanished.
Little Zhao hugged her waist, burying his face. His voice sounded aggrieved, "I...I...I..."
He was confused.
Song Luan touched his head, and whispered, "I know you miss him. Wait for him to come back, okay?"
Little Zhao closed his lips. He looked up, then asked her, "Can you take me to palace to see father?"
Visit the palace? It was not impossible.
But Song Luan also knew that Zhao Nanyu was probably busy fighting for power during this time. It was not easy to be an imperial censor.
At this time where the emperor can change, if there were any carelessness, it would result to a disaster.
Before that, the sixth prince knelt in the Wenhua hall for many days, which moved the emperor. The old emperor first issued an edict praising his filial piety, and then released the queen from the cold palace.
Zhao Nanyu was busy cleaning up the remnants of the queen in the Qing palace. Anyone could see that the emperor wouldn't live long, but the imperial edict of establishing the crown prince hadn't been issued yet.
Song Luan sighed. She didn't want to see Zhao Nanyu, so she said, "Silly child, how can the palace be so easy to enter? We'll just wait at home."
He was depressed and lost.
Song Luan's heart softened. She looked down at him and said, "You can write so many words now, so you can write a letter to your father. "
Little Zhao didn't say anything, Song Luan knew that he was sad in his heart, but she still insisted that they shouldn't go to the palace.
It was in the afternoon that little Zhao was lying on the bed beside her. She took off his coat and covered him with a quilt and held him.
Little Zhao said, "Mother, I'll write to my father in the evening."
Song Luan was secretly relieved. Fortunately, he didn't continue to say that he wanted to enter the palace.
She closed her eyes and thought in silence that maybe after this winter, the capital would change.
Zhao Nanyu was about to embark on his path as a powerful minister. There were less than three months left before the original owner was poisoned to death in the book.
Song Luan didn't feel discomfort in her body recently. She just felt pain whenever she dreamed. The pain was like having all the organs eroded.
It really didn't feel like a dream.
Zhao Nanyu's poison to the original owner was very tricky, and the poison was also chronic. It devoured the body's life year by year.
It was written in the book that the original owner would live in pain every day, and all the organs in her body seems to be stirred by a knife. The pain made her speechless, but he couldn't die for a long while even if she wanted to.
This kind of poison would torture her to death.
Song Luan was in-between awake and asleep, she would...not be suffering from this kind of torture, Zhao Nanyu had been merciful to her.
When Zhao Nanyu gets the power, she could escape.
The mother and the son slept until the early evening.
The room was warm. Incense sticks were lit in the censer, and the light fragrance drifted from it.
Song Luan put on her embroidered shoes and dress. She called the maidservant in. Although she lowered her hands and feet, the little noise still woke up her son who was sleeping on the bed.
He rubbed his eyes. He looked cute and adorable.
He called out to her mother, and then stretched out his hand, "Hug."
Song Luan whimpered three times in her heart because of her son's lovely appearance. She put on clothes for him and carried him up.
The servant girls swarmed in and began to prepare their meals.
Song Luan held him in her arms. She went to the desk, placed the little kid on the chair, and said, "Write to your father. I'm afraid he couldn't wait to receive your letter."
Little Zhao nodded obediently. He took the pen in a proper posture.
Naturally, Song Luan would not read what he had written. When little Zhao was writing a letter, she went outside the yard to fold some plum flowers and put them into a vase, which made it very beautiful. The fragrance of the plum blossom was pleasant.
Little Zhao wrote the letter quickly, put it in the envelope, and handed it to her, "Mom, I've finished it."
"So fast?"
"Yes."
Once upon a time, when Zhao Nanyu went out, his brother-in-law would write to him, but his words were not too many and he would not say sweet words. When will he come back?
Whenever Zhao Nanyu traveled outside, little Zhao would always write him a letter. The words were not too many. He would not say sweet words. The content in the letter was always the question 'when would father come back?'
Song Luan put his letter away with a smile, and planned to wait until tomorrow to let the servant deliver to the palace.
There was another heavy snow on new year's day.
News came out the palace that the emperor fell ill again, and several young princes visited the palace.
Song Luan almost thought Zhao Nanyu was going to spend the Spring Festival in the palace. She guessed that he did not want to see her.
But on the afternoon of the lunar new year, Zhao Nanyu rode back from the palace to Zhao's residence. The gatekeepers were surprised.
Zhao Nanyu, with a cold face, had just crossed the gate. The people around him respectfully came up to him and said, "Young master, please come inside."
He had not been home for many days, so he should go to see his grandparents first.
Zhao Nanyu had a trace of impatience. He clenched his fingers and put away his murderous breath. He spit out two words coldly, "I know."
The situation in capital was tense, and old man Zhao had something to tell him so he called him over.
Most of the men in the Zhao's family was in the room. The elder brother who was not in the capital had also returned.
The old man said to them earnestly, "You must be careful with your words and deeds these days. Remember not to stand in line at will. It is always the right way to protect yourself. Don't let any of you fall into this murky water, or this will affect the whole family."
Since ancient times, the dispute of seizing the emperor position had been bloody. It would involve countless deaths and injuries.
All the descendants nodded and said yes.
The old man cast a special glance at the absent-minded Zhao Nanyu and said, "Ah Yu, do you hear me?"
Zhao Nanyu lowered his eyes and said, "Yes."
"That's good."
From the courtyard of old man Zhao, Zhao Nanyu went straight to Song Luan's residence. Through a door, Zhao Nanyu could hear her laughter.
The house was full of lights. He didn't know what she had said to little Zhao. but she fell on the bed laughing.
Zhao Nanyu pushed the door open with both hands, and the cold wind came in with the snow.
He stood by the door, his figure was tall and imposing. He had cold features. His dark eyes was unfathomable as the deep pool.
Zhao Nanyu stared at Song Luan who fell on the bed laughing. The burning charcoal made the room warm. She only wore a light pink dress. Her collar was slightly open, her collarbone was half exposed, and her mouth was slightly open. It seems that she was a little surprised.
Zhao Nanyu had to say that Song Luan's ignorant and beautiful appearance really made him want to ravage her.
=============== Chapter 56
When Song Luan saw Zhao Nanyu, she put away the smile on her face, then arranged her clothes, and greeted him with her face lowered.
Little Zhao wasn't wearing any shoes when he stepped on the carpet with his socks on. He ran to Zhao Nanyu in a hurry. He hugged his thigh tightly and looked up at him. The charcoal fire in the room made his face a little red. He smiled with twinkling eyes, "Father."
Zhao Nanyu touched his face, picked him up, and looked up at Song Luan, who was silent. He walked over and asked in a low voice, "Have you had dinner?"
She shook her head, "Not yet."
Song Luan suddenly stood up and put on a coat. "I'm going to ask someone to set up the meal."
She hadn't seem him for ten days. Song Luan felt that Zhao Nanyu seemed to have lost weight. However, this was not surprising. This period of time was a critical moment, obviously he would be busy. She only pitied little Zhao's newly written letter.
Because it's new year's day, the evening meal was especially rich. The red candle illuminated the room brightly.
Song Luan also went to the kitchen in the afternoon to stew pigeon soup, cooked a bowl of wine and dumplings.
It was warm in the room. Zhao Nanyu took off his outer cloak, and only wore a blue inner cloth.
After drinking half a bowl of pigeon soup, Zhao Nanyu didn't eat much more. He seemed to have something on his mind.
Since the beginning, he had a frown on his face, and looked a little gloomy.
Song Luan pretended that she didn't see anything. She just ate her own food, and didn't even talk to Zhao Nanyu. It's not that she didn't speak on purpose, she just had nothing to say.
The happiest one here was little Zhao. In the past, it was only him and his father, but this year was different because his mom was also here.
After dinner, Song Luan hid in the inner room, and looked for a needle and thread from the drawer. She planned to embroider a pair of socks for her son. Her needlework was messy, but this was only for practice.
Zhao Nanyu's face became more ugly, but still did not say anything. He just went to little Zhao's desk, and began to check his homework. These days, although Zhao Chao came less, little Zhao didn't dare to relax even a little bit.
It was already late when he finished checking his homework.
Song Luan washed her face with water. After that, she slowly moved to Zhao Nanyu. Her face was light and calm. "Where are you going to sleep tonight?"
She thought Zhao Nanyu would not like to stay in her room. He was probably still angry since he didn't send anyone to bring a message for so many days.
Zhao Nanyu opened his lips and whispered, "I'll sleep here."
He's staying. Song Luan subconsciously pinched her palm, and her face was a little white. She nodded and said it was good.
Grandma Lin took little Zhao down to wash. She and Zhao Nanyu were the only ones left in the room. She began to feel nervous. Even if she lowered her face, she could feel his eyes staring at her.
Song Luan raised her head.
She opened her mouth, and was about to say something, when the man in front of her strode forward, picked up her waist with one hand, and threw her directly on the bed.
As soon as she was about to get up, a black shadow hovered on top of her.
Zhao Nanyu had been patient for a long time, but he couldn't restrain himself any longer. The trapped beast within him was completely released from its cage. He was treated coldly for more than ten days, and was furious.
His face was as cold as ice. His big palm strongly clasped her wrist on the bed, gently folded it and pressed it on her head. Zhao Nanyu lowered his head and kissed her. Song Luan didn't look at his face and narrowly avoided his kiss.
Zhao Nanyu's dark eyes flashed with anger. His one hand clasped her delicate white jade wrist, and the other free hand firmly pressed her chin, forcing her eyes to face him.
He asked in a low voice, "Hate me?"
Song Luan admitted and did not deny it.
Zhao Nanyu didn't seem to want to talk to her. He bit her lip into a small hole, tasted the sweet and bloody flavor, and was satisfied.
Zhao Nanyu was untying her dress belt when Song Luan took advantage of this to break free to push him away. She held the quilt in front of her chest, and looked guarded.
Zhao Nanyu sneered twice. He was stabbed by her unwillingness, and it made him pale. He raised his hands to extinguished all the candles in the room, and they were suddenly plunged into darkness.
Song Luan turned back her back to him...her mind was confused, she just didn't want to let Zhao Nanyu touch her tonight.
After she had gone to sleep, Zhao Nanyu was still awake. The moonlight was bright, and the light of the night happened to shine on her cheek. All of a sudden, he saw her eyes began to silently shed tears.
The woman seemed to have a nightmare. She looked uneasy, so Zhao Nanyu reached out his arms to wipe her tears with his fingers.
He sighed, "What should I do with you?"
He couldn't scold her.
It's like raising a little ancestor.
Zhao Nanyu's heart was covered with pain, but this little ancestor didn't have him in her heart.
***
The next day, Song Luan woke up early. She didn't sleep well that night. She had been dreaming intermittently.
In the dream, all the organs in her body got corroded, and it was very painful. But after she woke up, she didn't feel any discomfort.
Song Luan hated her dreams. Most of the time, the pictures she dreamed about were the ones that happened in the past. She started to feel uneasy.
In the end of her dream, Zhao Nanyu didn't poison her, but stabbed her to death with a sword instead?
Song Luan was too lazy to think about it again, less she frightened herself. All of a sudden, she heard Zhao Nanyu getting up from the bed, so she quickly closed her eyes and continued to pretend to sleep.
The man beside her opened the quilt and got out of bed. After putting on his clothes, he looked at her side.
Zhao Nanyu stared at her silently for a long time. Suddenly, he raised his finger to her collar and lifted it as if to look at something. The jade pendant he gave her was still on her neck.
He took back his fingers, and soon Song Luan heard the sound of closing the door.
As soon as Zhao Nanyu left, she immediately opened her eyes and sat up on the bed. She almost forgot the jade pendant he had given her. At first, she was reluctant to wear it, but later, she was coaxed by Zhao Nanyu to wear it. Then, she was used to wearing it these days.
Song Luan put on an outer garment, went to the window, and opened a small crack. The sky outside was still snowing. The red plum blossoms in the yard were full of frost and snow, and the branches were covered with a layer of white snow.
It was a beautiful scenery of red and white colors blending together.
The cool wind came in through the crack of the window. After a short while, Song Luan felt cold, so she closed the window tightly.
She untied the red rope on her neck, carefully put the jade pendant in the palm of her hand, and looked at it carefully for a moment. She quietly put it in the locked drawer in front of the dresser.
When she opened the drawer, there was letter and a book inside. This letter was not written by Song Luan, she had it on her body when she transmigrated. She thought it was written by the original owner, and and never gave it to Zhao Nanyu for various reasons.
Advertisements
Song Luan placed the book and the letter together. She felt that it won't be long for these two things to be delivered to Zhao Nanyu.
She didn't know if there was too much cold wind, but that night, Song Luan began to cough. Zhao Nanyu looked at her several times.
Song Luan's throat itched, and she managed not to cough. "I'm fine."
Zhao Nanyu continued to write, but Song Luan's cough could not be suppressed.
The man put down his pen and turned out of the door.
Song Luan thought that he was annoyed by the noise and went to the study room by himself, and she felt a bit upset. After a while, the door was opened, and Zhao Nanyu came in with a bowl of sweetened chilled pear soup.
Zhao Nanyu handed her the bowl and said, "Drink it."
After a pause, he said, "It's cold these days, so take care of yourself. If you want to see the plum blossom, let the maidservant help you take two branches and put them in the room."
It turned out he knew what she did every day.
Now was not the time to feign affection, Song Luan took the soup he handed and drank it slowly. Her voice was more comfortable than before, and she whispered, "Thank you."
Song Luan had a vague feeling that he would need to continue to endure the whole evening.
Taking into account that Zhao Nanyu had been abstinent for many days, plus he was also a vigorous young man, Song Luan knew she couldn't escape this time.
He was hurt by Song Luan's action last night, so he let her go just once.
Tonight, Zhao Nanyu blindfolded her eyes. He didn't want to see her indifferent eyes full of alienation.
In the end, Song Luan didn't have the energy to lift her hands. She had weak fingers and had no strength.
Zhao Nanyu hugged her with sweat.
After a while of vigorous love making, Zhao Nanyu was kind enough to untie the black tie that blindfolded her eyes. He wrapped a finger around her black hair and played with it.
Song Luan soon slept. In her memory, Zhao Nanyu seemed to have said a word to her, but because she slept like the dead, she didn't hear it clearly.
***
After this love affair, Zhao Nanyu went out early, and returned late every day. Sometimes he was too busy that he just slept directly in his study. He didn't come to her side for several days.
Song Luan thought that Zhao Nanyu was deliberately snubbing her, but she really didn't care. She liked it when Zhao Nanyu ignores her. As a result, although both were at home, they met less often than before.
Zhao Nanyu's birthday was on the fourth day. Song Luan had forgotten all about it, and knew it only when grandma Lin mentioned it in her ear.
At this time, there was no time to prepare his birthday gift. Song Luan pretended that she didn't know, and had nothing prepared from the beginning to the end.
Song Luan still remembered that the male lead didn't like celebrating his birthday. He felt it was troublesome, and considered it to be an ordinary day. There was no difference between the average days.
In the daytime, Zhao Nanyu did not appear in front of her. Song Luan thought in her heart that maybe he had forgotten his birthday.
At night, she had just climbed into bed and covered herself with quilt, when the door of the room was pushed open. Zhao Nanyu's chest was stuffy, and he looked very uncomfortable.
He approached her with a cold face, sat down by the bed, and looked at her directly, but said nothing.
Song Luan's fingers quietly grasped the bed sheet under her body. Her knuckles were pale. She thought Zhao Nanyu was looking for her to settle accounts.
Song Luan waited for a long time, but he didn't open his mouth, so she asked instead, "What's the matter?"
Zhao Nanyu's face was pale. He smiled and said, "Nothing. Just came to see you."
He should not have expected her to remember his own birthday. Zhao Nanyu thought, in his heart, maybe he was not as important as that boy named Huai Jin.
Seeing that she was uncomfortable, Zhao Nanyu immediately stood up, "I have something to do, go sleep."
"Okay."
Looking at his thin back, Song Luan suddenly felt a little uncomfortable, and somehow began to feel guilty, as if she had really done something very excessive.
She put out the light, and laid upright on the bed for a long time, unable to fall asleep. Trying to close her eyes, Zhao Nanyu's pale face was reflected in her pupils. He looked very lonely and pitiful. It was strange that her heart easily turned soft, and even pitied him.
The character of the male lead was very typical which made everyone love and hate. He had a miserable childhood, was not valued by his relatives, and was often bullied and humiliated by others. But at the same time, he was also a ruthless, and could kill people without blinking an eye.
Probably no one would live for him in his life.
Zhao Nanyu probably wanted to talk, but eventually stopped. Maybe he wanted to tell her about it?
Song Luan was so confused that she rolled on the bed for two times. With a deep sigh, she got up, dressed again, and went to the kitchen.
Song Luan cooked a bowl of noodles with shredded chicken for Zhao Nanyu. She put it in the food box, and prepared to send it to his study.
It was too cold outside. In the middle of the journey, Song Luan went back to find her own cloak and covered herself with it. Most of her face was hidden in the fur collar, revealing a pair of round eyes.
When she came to the study, her shoes and socks were soaked with snow, which made her feel uncomfortable.
Song Luan raised her hand and knocked on the door. There was no movement inside. She knocked twice again, and Zhao Nanyu's voice fell through the door and into her ears. The voice wasn't pleasant.
"Who?"
Song Luan moistened her throat and said softly, "It's me."
There was silence for a long time, and before long, the door in front of her was opened from the inside.
Zhao Nanyu dragged her into the room.
He was so quick and powerful that the food box in Song Luan's hand was almost knocked over.
Zhao Nanyu's eyes were dark, and he asked, "Why did you come here?"
Not long ago, Song Luan seemed to have asked him similar question before.
She took out the shredded chicken noodles from the food box. The soup was still hot. It was still steaming. She didn't say it was longevity noodles, and gently spoke, "Oh, I'm afraid you're hungry, so I cooked a bowl of noodles for you."
Zhao Nanyu's breath in his chest seemed to vanish. His hoarse voice followed her words, "Yes, I'm really hungry."
For the first time in many years, someone remembered his birthday and cooked him noodles.
Old man Zhao didn't remember it, nor did the old lady.
In this family, no one cared about his life and death.
Although Zhao Nanyu didn't like noodles, he ate the bowl of noodles made by Song Luan.
He ate everything to the point that there was no soup left.
Song Luan seldom comes into his study. Maybe she didn't smell the sandalwood in his study, but her chest suddenly felt stuffy, and she felt like vomiting.
Her face turned pale. Song Luan wanted to leave the room as soon as possible. "I'm sleepy, too. I'll go back to my room to have a rest."
Zhao Nanyu's observation skill was amazing. He pinched her wrist and stopped her. "Why do you look paler?"
Song Luan was tormented by this disgusting feeling of wanting to vomit. Her eyes were redder than a rabbit. There were some tears hanging from the corners of her eyes.
She angrily waved his hand. "The smell in the study is too bad. I'm going back!"
Zhao Nanyu let go of her hand, and looked at her with some thoughts. He tied the belt of her cloak, and ordered his servants to send her back.
After they left, Zhao Nanyu told his entourage outside the door, "Please bring grandma Lin here."
He remembered that this was the second time that Song Luan felt like vomiting for no reason.
=============== Chapter 57
Zhao Nanyu stood by the window in the quiet cold wind for a moment.
Before long, grandma Lin arrived. His back was turned to her, and his voice was cold. "Has my wife's monthly period come?"
Grandma Lin lowered her eyes and did not dare lift her head. There was no candle in the room, so the area was dark. She could only see the figure of the young master.
She replied, "Not yet."
When the young master asked this question in the middle of the night, he must have been suspicious, so after a moment's hesitation, grandma Lin added, "But madam's monthly period is not so accurate."
Zhao Nanyu also knew about it, and that Song Luan didn't care much about her body.
Zhao Nanyu nodded and said in a deep voice, "You should serve her carefully these days."
Grandma Lin already had a worry in her heart. Was young master suspicious that madam might be pregnant? Yes, they had a good relationship a few days ago, so it wouldn't be surprising that madam would get pregnant.
She thought silently, this was also a good thing. She was only hoping that this time Madam would not treat her child the same as she treated little Zhao before.
"Don't worry, young master."
***
Song Luan herself was not aware of this. She occasionally felt some nausea, but was so used to it that she didn't take it seriously.
After several days of continuous snow in the capital, it finally stopped.
The sun was now shining. There was a thick layer of snow in the yard.
Song Heqing gave her a message that he wanted to see Song Luan, so she dressed in thick clothes, and walked out the residence in fear. She thought that maybe there was something wrong with the Song family.
After waiting in restaurant, her heart slightly skipped a beat. Song Heqing's face was a little thinner, and the outline of his face was a little sharp. His brows were frowning, and looked very worried. He looked at his arrogant sister and stopped a few times.
He coughed twice and said apologetically, "Ah Luan, what the fourth sister did..."
Song Luan guessed that her brother, who was eager to protect his sisters, already knew what Song Yu had done. She took a sip of tea and said, "Brother, it has nothing to do with you."
Song Heqing grimaced, "I didn't know that she was so hostile to you! Doing dirty tricks that could harm your life.."
He watched over his fourth sister as she grew up. She was a timid girl, and always hid behind the other sisters. He couldn't see that she would be so vicious.
When Song Heqing heard about it from Zhao Nanyu, he didn't believe it.
Song Luan didn't understand his brother's intention to come to her for a while. Did he want to say two good words to her? Make fourth sister and her reconcile?
"I didn't expect my fourth sister to do such a thing." Song Luan looked at him and said, "But brother, who did you hear this from?"
Song Heqing vaguely replied, "Your husband."
At first, he didn't know about it. Song Yu did it so covertly that Zhao Nanyu almost killed her.
After Song Yu was caught in the temple, Song Heqing, as the eldest brother, couldn't bear to see his sister spend the rest of her life in the nunnery. He had intended to ask his father for mercy and protect Song Yu. However, she must not stay in the capital any longer. It was the best way to marry her far away.
At this time, Zhao Nanyu came to visit him and told him what Song Yu had done.
Although Song Heqing was very good to each sister, he preferred Song Luan most.
Although the little girl was not very good in character, but when she was a child, she liked to plunge into his arms and act coquettish.
Even though Song Luan's reputation was in a mess, in Song Heqing's eyes, these were nothing. His sister was still so beautiful. What's the matter with raising this kind of cute devil?
In Song Heqing's opinion, the only fault of her sister was that she's too high-profile, and didn't know how to cover it at all.
When Zhao Nanyu also told him about Song Luan's injury, Song Heqing was very angry. He didn't go to his father to plead for Song Yu, and even refused to take care of her.
He was mainly concerned about his sister's injury. Was she okay? These days, Zhao Nanyu was resting in the palace. He certainly had no time to take care of her. At this point, Song Heqing was quite critical.
No matter how many affairs were in the palace, Zhao Nanyu shouldn't have stayed away for more than ten days, leaving his sister alone!
Her sister's fairy like figure should be spoiled in the palm of his hand.
"Why does he tell you about this?" Song Luan pouted, and said unhappily.
Song Heqing gently coaxed her, "Okay, Okay...I just want to ask whether the wound on your body is already healed?"
Song Luan didn't feel any pain anymore. Zhao Nanyu probably added fuel to scare her brother, so she said in a sullen voice, "I'm okay."
"Good? You didn't lie to your brother?"
"Do I lie to you to get money? That's great." Song Luan felt more comfortable when she saw that her brother didn't want to mention Song Yu's words.
She coughed twice, "Brother, are you going to ask me this today?"
Song Heqing took out a small box from behind him and placed it in front of her. His chin nodded to its direction, indicating that she should open the small box.
Song Luan took the key from his palm and opened the box with expectation. Her eyes were almost blinded by the gold and silver jewelry in it. She couldn't turn her eyes, and could only stare at the golden jewelry in the box. Her eyes narrowed into a slit, "For me?!"
Song Heqing couldn't help but looked at her wealthy little fan. "Your mother asked me to bring it to you."
Song Luan couldn't put it down, and held the box tightly. "My mother is so nice!"
I had a doting mother. It's really nice to live!
Song Heqing suddenly smiled, and looked at her seriously. Then, he said slowly, "I think your mother still doesn't like Ah Yu very much. But in fact, I think he's good. He has a bright future. He's tolerant to you. If you have a chance, go persuade your mother..."
Zhao Nanyu was rising in ranks. It was obvious that someone was deliberately trying to put him in a high position. Song Heqing felt that the man behind Zhao Nanyu was mostly the sixth prince.
In the eyes of the emperor, it seemed that he had never been such a good person. He would never stop asking mocking questions to Zhao Nanyu. The emperor wouldn't even reward his meritorious deeds.
If Zhao Nanyu made a mistake, he would be severely punished.
But for a second thought, the sixth prince, who had just been granted the title of emperor, may not have the ability to make him jump to the position of the fourth grade official.
Song Heqing couldn't figure it out. Anyway, Zhao Nanyu's rise to power was also good for the Song family.
"From the first day of my marriage, my mother wanted me to leave him." Song Luan said.
Song Heqing was not surprised. Aunt Lin had only had money and power in her eyes. She thought that the most noble man in the world was worthy of her daughter. It was no wonder that such a person was not satisfied with just Zhao Nanyu.
"What do you think?"
Advertisements
Song Luan looked out of the window at the sky. On the high eaves stood groups of birds chirping happily. Her eyes were suddenly sad. She suddenly realized that she still yearned for a free and normal life.
She couldn't have any attachment to the repressed and overwhelming controlled life.
Zhao Nanyu was a good man. He was beautiful. Song Luan had never seen a man more beautiful than him in her two lives. He had a bright future, and the best fortune. He had no other shortcomings except being arrogant and ruthless.
But it was precisely Zhao Nanyu's defect character that Song Luan couldn't tolerate.
Strong love would trap her.
She didn't want to be a pretty girl in a cage.
Song Luan felt that it was time to reveal her heart to her brother. She said one word at a time, "I also want to leave."
Song Heqing was surprised that he blurted out and asked her, "Are you willing to part with your son?"
She couldn't give him up.
He was such a good boy.
Song Luan was dejected and murmured in a low voice. "I can't."
There was no way that the Zhao family would let her take her son to the Song family.
Song Heqing felt a headache. He rubbed his eyebrows and swallowed his saliva. He asked her tentatively, "Ah Luan, are you...cough...are you fascinated by other men outside?"
He then added, "Well, what you want to do, your brother won't stop you, but there is a limit to everything. Don't take it seriously."
Song Luan was shocked by Song Heqing's three views.
"It has nothing to do with other men," she explained. "I can't get along with him!"
"Do you really mean to leave?"
"Well, after the Chinese New Year. I'll talk to him."
After the end of the year, court affairs would already be settled.
Song Heqing also wanted to persuade her with two more words, but seeing that she was determined, he closed his mouth and stopped talking.
Personally, he still felt that there was room for the couple to turn around. And what he didn't say was that Zhao Nanyu might not want her to leave.
Men are also very keen at looking at other men. Zhao Nanyu looked at his sister like a wolf every time.
How could he let someone go easily?
The two brothers and sisters had lunch together in the restaurant. Song Luan also drank a glass of wine, so she was a little dizzy, and had a faint blush in her cheeks. She was out for a while that her temperature on her face dropped.
Song Heqing sent her to the carriage while delivering a message that her mother wanted to convey to her: "You should pay more attention to your health. Don't eat or play too much. You can rest assured that I am on your side always. I will take care of you."
Moreover, aunt Lin lived a very happy and comfortable life. She fiddled with treasures all day long, and went to shops to buy new clothes.
Song Luan nodded, "I know. Brother, you should also take care of yourself. Do not try to be brave."
After the new emperor ascends the throne, she didn't know what would happen to the Song family, but it would certainly be better than the original book. They would not end up in exile.
Song Heqing grinned and touched her head. "You also take care of yourself."
After a visit, Song Luan's mood was relieved greatly. She jumped on the snow and played by herself. The red embroidered shoes deliberately left footprints one after another in the snow.
Song Luan walked several times in the snow until she noticed that her shoes were wet, so she reluctantly returned to the yard.
When she came into the room, Zhao Nanyu's was already there. He was wearing a crescent colored tunic and a small sachet hanging from his belt. His eyebrows and eyes looked very picturesque.
Little Zhao was lying on his shoulder with the corners of his mouth turned down, and his mood seemed to be depressed.
Song Luan went over and picked up little Zhao from his arms and pinched his tender cheek. "What's the matter?"
Little Zhao was embarrassed to say it. It was because his father did not let him go out to play snow. He was just unhappy.
Zhao Nanyu coughed and said, "Doing as he pleases."
Song Luan ignored Zhao Nanyu and patiently asked her son, "What do you want to do? say it to mother."
He lowered his voice and whispered in her ear, "I want to make a snowman, but my father won't let me."
Zhao Nanyu explained for himself, "He will be sick again if he plays today. It's snowing very hard."
"So it is." She lowered her head and gently coaxed the child, "You don't want to get sick, do you?"
"Okay." He put his arm around her neck, "Okay, I see, mom."
He looked at his mother. Since she liked to make many little snowman, he want to send her one. He didn't have any interest in playing.
"Well, don't pester your mother all the time. You haven't finished your homework."
"Father, I know. I'm going."
Little Zhao jumped to the ground, and was led by a maidservant to the study of the front yard.
Song Luan's arms were empty, and she was not used to it for a while.
Zhao Nanyu, with sharp eyes, looked at Song Luan's soaked toe and asked, "Why are your shoes wet?"
"Ah? Really? I didn't notice either." Song Luan looked down and pretended not to know.
Zhao Nanyu took her to the bedside and sat down. He squatted in front of her and took off her shoes. Her socks were wet, and he sighed, "How old are you? Why do you still play?"
Song Luan was not very comfortable. She tried to take her little feet back. "Get up, I'll do it myself."
Zhao Nanyu pinched her thin white ankle and took off her socks. Seeing her her tender white feet, his eyes turned dim and he gave her a smile. "I'll help you."
He found a pair of clean socks and slowly put them on for her. Song Luan could see his fair face as soon as he lowered his head. The man looked sacred, as if he was doing a very important thing.
After putting on her socks, Zhao Nanyu took a pair of shoes for her and put them under the bed. She said softly, "Now it's okay."
"Thank you."
"We're husband and wife, don't be so polite."
Song Luan's psychological pressure suddenly increased a lot. Why did she feel that he was taking the initiative!? Why did I sense that his meaning was getting deeper and deeper!?
"Aren't you busy?"
Zhao Nanyu was silent, after a while, he raised his eyebrows. "I'm almost busy."
Song Luan didn't care about him. She just wanted to get some information about the palace from his mouth, such as whether the emperor already decided on a prince?
She hesitated and continued, "Today I heard from my brother that the situation is unstable and the emperor had killed many people. Will you be okay?"
"Don't worry. It won't affect me." Zhao Nanyu said with a smile.
Seeing that he couldn't pry things out of his mouth, Song Luan laughed, "You're okay, that's good."
Zhao Nanyu's lips rose in a good mood.
When it was time to have dinner, the doctor that Zhao Nanyu asked for had arrived.
The doctor was followed by a little boy. They came here on foot, so their bodies were shaking from cold. Zhao Nanyu told the maidservants to pour a cup of hot water for them and then went into the inner room.
Song Luan's face was hidden in the quilt, and was sleeping sweetly. She hadn't woken up from her afternoon nap, when Zhao Nanyu approached her and pulled her out of the quilt. "It's time to wake up."
Song Luan opened her eyes vaguely, and looked up. It was dark outside the window. Slowly, she got up from the quilt and found two people sitting outside who she had never seen before.
"Are these two...?"
"Doctors." Zhao Nanyu replied, and said, "Just regular visits. You don't have to be afraid."
When he said this, Song Luan was relieved. She thought that there was something wrong with her failing body. She was very cooperative and handed her hand to the doctor so they could feel the pulse.
The room was quiet and only the breathing could be heard
After a long time, Song Luan only heard him say, "Congratulations, madam. This is the pulse of joy."
She hadn't recovered for a long time, and her brain was confused by his words. Later, when the doctor and Zhao Nanyu said something, she didn't listen to anything at all.
Zhao Nanyu was more calm than her. He rewarded the doctor with a large amount of silver, and ordered people to send the doctor out of the house.
Song Luan swallowed her mouth, opened her eyes wide, and looked at him, "Am I pregnant?"
Zhao Nanyu's eyes were filled with an imperceptible smile. The corner of his lips were raised, and whispered, "Yes."
"How can I get pregnant? I...I...I drank bozi soup before, and..and..." She was incoherent and didn't know what she was saying.
Zhao Nanyu put his hand on her shoulder, as if sensing her uneasiness and fear. He said, "Isn't this a good thing?"
Was it a good thing? Was it really a good thing? Song Luan's brain was confused, but she couldn't say that she didn't want children.
Zhao Nanyu's smile gradually stiffened, "I want little Zhao to have a sister, don't you like it?"
"That's not what I mean."
He said coldly, "You're going to raise a baby well."
Song Luan wanted to say all the thousand words in her throat, but could only call out his name, "Zhao Nanyu."
"Go and talk. I will listen." Zhao Nanyu could see Song Luan's love for little Zhao, so he knew she would treat her future children well. He also really wanted a willful and lovely girl that resembled like Song Luan.
Song Luan wanted to tell him that she didn't like having a child.
She even had some indescribable joy in her heart.
When she was about to speak, she felt like she just swallowed it back to her stomach.
"It's alright."
=============== Chapter 58
The news of Song Luan's pregnancy was not hidden. Third lady Zhao and old lady Zhao soon learned about it, and they sent a lot of supplements.
Although these actions made Song Luan nervous, she was nevertheless, happy. Third lady Zhao had nothing to do, so she stewed soup and sent them everyday to her residence. When she remembered how Song Luan treated herself by going on a hunger strike when she was pregnant with little Zhao, she was afraid that she would be silly again, and came to her residence to talk to her.
"Did the doctor say how many months the baby has been?"
At this time, Song Luan's abdomen was still very flat, there was no sign of pregnancy yet.
She shook her head. "I don't know."
She was so dizzy that she didn't have time to ask.
Third lady Zhao sighed again, clenched her hand, and said to her, "The first three months are the most important. I was very careful when I was pregnant with Ah Yan, and I didn't dare to move when I was laying in bed."
Song Luan touched her stomach and felt a strange feeling in her heart. She was pregnant with a new life in her body. It was amazing.
Third lady Zhao laughed, looked at her face, and continued, "Look at all the nonsense I've said, you have also given birth to children. I am sure you already understood this."
Song Luan whispered back, "Well, I'll pay attention."
At first, It was a little difficult to accept when she knew she was pregnant, but after a few days had passed, her mood gradually calmed down. Apart from being a little more tied up with Zhao Nanyu, she was still happy about the arrival of her new child.
When the third lady saw that she listened to her words, she was very pleased.
She drank a cup of hot water, pondered for a moment, and then said, "Ah Luan, I can see that A Yu has no place in your heart. Even though I am not his biological mother, I have watched him for so many years. I know the nature of this child best."
She slowly added, "Although Ah Yu is stubborn, I can see that he really likes you, loves you, and wants to live a good life with you."
Song Luan didn't expect that third lady Zhao would talk about this to her. She was surprised and embarrassed, as if her mind could be easily seen through.
Third lady Zhao laughed. "You know that I don't have a close relationship with Ah Yu. He seldom comes to me. The day before yesterday, he came to talk to me for the first time. He was unsure if you want the child, and he told me to come and persuade you."
Song Luan whispered, "I don't want this child."
Third lady Zhao's smile deepened and she held her hand harder. "I think so too, but how can a mother not like her children? A small life is hidden in your stomach. I'm afraid it's too late to be happy."
"I misunderstood him. I thought he didn't like children."
In the original book, Zhao Nanyu had no other offspring in his life, other than little Zhao.
"It's true that Ah Yu is a bit cold tempered, but I think he will like it as long as you give birth to it."
Song Luan was relieved. Now it's useless for her to think about the every details of this book. Before, she always separated herself from the world, just like spectator who only knew all the endings in advance. This child in her stomach made her more aware that she was in a real world.
Everyone has his own destiny and his own belonging.
With the condition of her body, the servant girls became more careful when they waited on her.
Song Luan originally wanted to make two small clothes for her unborn baby, however, her needlework skills were so poor that she had no choice but to give up the idea.
But grandma Lin's needlework was unique. These days, she had begun to sew shoes and socks for her unborn child.
Song Luan had no interest in these things, but this time she looked down on the side of grandma Lin, like a curious child, "Is this sewing too small?"
Socks looked smaller than her palm, could her future baby wear this?
Grandma Lin said with a smile, "I'm afraid it's still big."
"Ah? I'm also worried that the child won't fit in!" Song Luan didn't know what she was thinking about. Suddenly she began to smile and squint."It's okay. Little Zhao can wear this."
Grandma Lin didn't speak. She bent her head and sewed the socks in her hand. After her madam had a baby, her heart became naive. Little Zhao couldn't wear these socks.
The day before the Spring Festival, there was a custom to hold the lantern festival in the capital.
Song Luan clamored to go out after knowing of this. She did not dare to sneak out of the house rashly this time, after all, she still had a baby in her stomach.
Fortunately, Zhao Nanyu didn't intend to arrest her this time. He wrapped her up like a dumpling and took her out of the door. Zhao residence was not far from the street full of lanterns, but he insisted that she go by carriage.
Song Luan was a little reluctant. She was not happy when she lost her face, and discussed with him, "Can we walk?"
"The snow has hardened the road. I'm afraid you'll slip."
"I'm an adult! How can I not walk well?"
Zhao Nanyu strained his face and pursed his lips.
Song Luan pulled his sleeves, acted coquettish in front of him, and said in a soft voice. "You're here, can you just look at me?"
Zhao Nanyu blushed. He pressed his hands to her lips. With a low "hum" voice, he took her hand and said, "Let's go."
The street was full of colorful lanterns. On both sides of the street were full of stalls, and most of them sold lanterns. Each one was more beautiful than the other. The animals painted on them were vivid and dazzling.
The little peddler had a nice accent, "Young master, do you want to buy a hairpin for your wife? The beauty of your wife is so beautiful that she must wear a hairpin."
There were all kinds of hairpins on the red cloth. They were chic in style and exquisite in workmanship, but most of them were made of silver.
Song Luan's eyes looked around, picked out a silver butterfly-like hairpin, raised her face, and said to Zhao Nanyu, "I want this one."
Zhao Nanyu, with long fingers, took out the hairpin and looked at it carefully. He looked gentle as he immediately inserted it into her hairbun.
The two people were very close. Song Luan smelled his body, and her white tender ears turned red.
She asked him, "Is it beautiful?"
Zhao Nanyu fixed her hair at the edge of her forehead and said, "It's beautiful."
Song Luan smiled, and asked the stall owner, "How much is it?"
"200 Wen."
Zhao Nanyu silently took an ingot of silver from the money bag and handed it to him, saying, "No need to give the change."
Song Luan was in a good mood as long as she could go out to play. It was rare to be able to tease him, so she said, "This young master is really rich."
Zhao Nanyu rubbed her head with a smile and did not reply.
Song Luan had been used to his reticence for a long time. It's okay if he didn't speak, because he always says something she doesn't want to hear.
Advertisements
On this day, there were many young couples who went shopping with their children on the street, each with a bright smile on their faces.
Through the long street, you can see an arch bridge. There were young girls standing on the bridge. Most of them were shy, but they came out to see the people they like.
Song Luan saw an acquaintance on the bridge, who she never liked very much.
It seems that the matchmaker didn't succeed in the several marriages he was arranged with.
Zhao Chao was surrounded by a young girl with a round face, bright eyes, and perfect teeth. Her face looked as if it was flying in clouds. She looked down shyly, did not dare to look at him, and tightened her handkerchief.
Zhao Chao's face was relaxed. If you look carefully, you could even see the impatience between his eyebrows. He didn't seem very interested in the girl in front of him.
Zhao Chao was really tired. These days, his mother had been asking him endlessly to find a woman. She was very powerful and did not give him a chance to breathe.
His eyelids looked at the woman in front of him boringly.
Zhao Chao had a good eye for people, but he was also rather crafty. He was afraid that beautiful girls would have the same virtue as his second sister-in-law, but women with bad looks won't work either.
A weak temper was no good, and a crying one would bore him to death. It was even worse if she was hot-tempered.
So...for one thing, Zhao Chao scared away many girls' homes. His mother was so angry that she didn't give him anything to eat.
Zhao Chao was very fond of this girl at first. He liked her both in appearance and figure, but her personality was so boring that he couldn't spit out a word when they stood on the bridge for a moment.
Gradually, Zhao Chao lost his patience.
Song Luan stood at the head of the bridge, pointed to Zhao Chao not far away, and asked the man beside her, "Is that girl your cousin likes?"
The wind was still strong at the edge of the lake, Zhao Nanyu held her in his arms, and covered her with his cloak. He looked down at her and said, "No."
"I don't think it's true. There's no one who likes to stand by and not move."
"Well."
Song Luan was in a good mood, and her complexion improved a lot. Her cheeks were white and red, and her red lips were moist, making one want to bite and taste.
Song Luan opened her mouth and wanted to ask him about Zhao Chao. But who knew that the man in front of her would suddenly embraced her waist, and lead her to the corner.
There was no lantern and candle light at the corner of the wall. Only by the light of the moon could people see what's in front of them.
Zhao Nanyu's heart fluttered for a moment. His thin, white, and slender fingers ran across her cheek, and stopped on her chin.
His lips were raised as he lowered her head, and took a bite on her lips.
The kiss was not light or heavy, but it still gave Song Luan a slight tingling sensation. She inhaled and hissed.
Zhao Nanyu lightly tasted her lips, and immediately released her chin. He licked his lips with satisfaction, and smirked as he laughed, "Sweet."
Song Luan wiped her mouth and pounded his arms angrily, "You scared me!"
Zhao Nanyu smiled, but as if he didn't taste enough, he pressed her shoulder and trapped her firmly on the wall. He couldn't help but kiss her again.
This kiss was so delicate and touching that Song Luan's head swelled, and she almost couldn't breathe.
Her little mouth was red and slightly swollen.
Song Luan was so angry that she didn't want to pay attention to him. With a look of stinginess, she complained in a low voice, "You are so annoying."
Zhao Nanyu wanted to take her hand, but Song Luan was not willing to give him face, and shaked him off. "I want to walk in front of you."
If she walked beside him, she may be caught in the dark again.
Zhao Nanyu obediently followed her behind, but only kept less than a two-steps away.
Before returning to the lakeside that they had been before, Song Luan ran into Zhao Chao.
She looked at him coldly, and was unwilling to smile at him this time.
Zhao Chao didn't expect to meet her here. He was surprised and said, "Second sister-in-law?"
He was still wondering if Song Luan had taken advantage of the great festival and made an old mistake, hooking with three and four men.
Zhao Chao looked at her, and his eyes gradually became cold. Seeing second elder brother on her back, he was stunned, "Second brother also came out."
Zhao Nanyu said, "Well, she likes to have fun."
Zhao Chao found that his second brother seemed to be in a very good mood tonight. Zhao Nanyu had a smile on his eyes.
Zhao Chao didn't go home these days. He stayed at his friend's house to take refuge, so he didn't know that Song Luan was pregnant.
He said, "Did second elder brother and second sister-in-law have dinner yet?"
Zhao Nanyu said in a deep voice, "Not yet."
Song Luan was also a little hungry. Maybe because she had a baby in her stomach now, her mouth was very picky. She didn't want to eat anything that was too sweet, too spicy, too greasy or too bland.
Three people went to the restaurant together. Song Luan couldn't wait to order the roast duck that she had been talking about for a long time. Her mouth was watering, and could almost flow out.
Zhao Nanyu gently reminded her, "Be careful. You might vomit again."
Song Luan just wanted to eat it. "I won't vomit."
She patted her stomach with a smile. "This child has been very good these two days, not making any trouble for me when I eat."
If she eats more, the baby would look better.
Zhao Chao raised his eyebrows and said, "What's second sister-in-law saying?"
Zhao Nanyu answered for her, "She is pregnant."
Zhao Chao's eyes...became delicate for a shortwhile. He looked at Song Luan with complicated eyes, it gradually went down, glanced at her abdomen, and then took back his eyes.
He pulled up a farfetched smile, "Congratulations, second brother."
Zhao Chao clenched his hand. There were a lot of words he had to say to his second brother, but since Song Luan was present, he composed himself.
Zhao Chao looked at the joy of his second brother's face, and his heart sank.
Song Luan was only thinking about her roast duck. She didn't pay any attention to the expression on Zhao Chao's face, but Zhao Nanyu saw it.
His smile on his lips was stiff. His intuition told him that Zhao Chao wanted to say something to him, and it wouldn't be good words.
Zhao Chao quietly said two words to him–tianqing.
Zhao Nanyu suddenly stopped, and stiffened.
He almost forgot that Song Luan's body still had the residual poison of tianqing that he once used as poisoned.
=============== Chapter 59
When Zhao Nanyu knew about Song Luan's pregnancy that day, he was only happy and just asked the doctor what he needed to pay attention to. He forgot about the matter of poison.
At the beginning, he wanted to slowly torture her to death, so he put the poison in her body. He didn't think at first to give Song Luan a way out to live, but now, it self-inflicted himself.
Song Luan suddenly felt that the man's face became ugly. She turned her head to look at him.
She found that Zhao Nanyu's face was a little pale, his body was stiff, and his eyes were covered with thin blood. She asked him funnily, "What's wrong with you?"
Zhao Nanyu didn't even dare to look at her. His voice was hoarse. "It's okay."
He touched her head and said in a soft voice, "There will be fireworks under the gate in a moment. Do you want to see it?"
Song Luan put her chin in his hands. Her legs were still shaking with excitement, and her eyes were bright, as she laughed and said, "Yes."
She had not seen what the ancient fireworks looked like, nor did she know that this world would be so lively with fireworks.
"I'll let you go out first."
"Okay."
Song Luan also saw that he and the Zhao Chao seemed to have something to talk about, and that he deliberately pushed her away.
However, she didn't care much about what the cousins wanted to talk. It was more comfortable for her to play alone.
She stood up and clapped her hands. "Then I'll go to see the fireworks first."
Zhao Nanyu called his guard in. He was a very ordinary looking man with a thumb sized scar on his forehead. His facial features were sharp, and looked a little fierce. He told his guard, "Take my wife to the window sill and take good care of her."
"Yes."
After Song Luan went out, Zhao Nanyu was silent for a long time, and didn't open his mouth.
Zhao Chao frowned and didn't know where to start. Of course, he hated Song Luan. His prejudice was deep-rooted and wouldn't be eliminated by just her changes in the past few months.
What's more, Zhao Chao didn't expect Song Luan to get pregnant. His second brother didn't seem to be someone who loves children.
After deliberation, Zhao Chao opened his mouth and said in a low voice, "Second brother, I..."
Zhao Nanyu raised his head and poured a glass of wine into his throat. His eyes were fierce and he interrupted him cleanly. He asked, "When will your master return to the capital?"
Zhao Chao was speechless. His master was a taoist who traveled all over the world. He lived in no fixed place every year, even he couldn't him.
When he got the news last time, he only had time to write a letter asking about tianqing's antidote.
He didn't get an answer, and his master disappeared again.
He shook his head and hesitated, "I'm not sure about this. The old man rarely sends me news. I have checked his medical books before, but still can't find the solution."
It was originally a poison made by his master on a whim. He had not even used it on people before, so he didn't prepare an antidote. However, Zhao Chao saw in his own eyes the effect of the poison experimented on small animals. Those animals slowly exhausted their vitality, died of depression, and suffered from death.
He comforted himself that Song Luan didn't intake much, and the amount was not enough. She should be saved, but he was afraid that his master would be the only one who knows about the antidote.
Zhao Nanyu crushed the cup in his hand. The sharp porcelain pieces cut his fingers, and the bright red beads of blood dripped down from his hands. His face was pale, his facial features were slightly ferocious, and his red eyes stared at Zhao Chao.
His voice was hoarse and he felt pain, "Do you have any way to detoxify it completely?"
Zhao Chao couldn't lie. He lowered his head and whispered, "I can only wait for my master to come back."
Zhao Nanyu gave a low smile, it looked quite penetrating. He clenched his fingers into fist and smashed it on the table. He lost his posture and roared in a low voice, "So when will your master come back?!"
The answer for this was already expected. Zhao Nanyu had been looking for taoist priest, and almost all the guards had been sent out just to find the taoist, but there still had been no news.
Suddenly his wrist had no strength. He sat on the chair with a dispirited face, and he gasped slightly. His throat was hoarse, "What will happen?"
Zhao Chao was dumbfounded for a moment. He was not happy to see his second brother like this. After all, Song Luan's baby in her stomach was also his second brother's flesh and blood.
"You know, second sister-in-law is weak, and the remaining poison in her body had been suppressed by drugs. The child will be born with poison. Whether the baby can live or not, or whether their limbs are intact or not, are all variables. Moreover..."
He stopped suddenly and didn't go on.
Zhao Nanyu took a sip of the cold tea that had been cooled off, and then he said, "Moreover?"
Zhao Chao lowered his eyes and said in a low voice, "And the problem is not whether the child is healthy or not, it's whether second sister-in-law can survive this childbirth."
Song Luan was short of Qi and blood. She had an accident when she gave birth to little Zhao. The most important thing was that, Song Luan's body was not as good as it was four years ago.
Judging from his second brother's deep love for Song Luan, he was afraid that he couldn't accept losing Song Luan.
Zhao Nanyu didn't speak, or maybe because he couldn't speak. His heart seemed to be squeezed tightly. He was gloomy as he felt he was being choked by air.
He didn't give up and asked, "Is there really no way?"
Zhao Chao didn't answer, "Second brother, how much do you like her?"
How much did he like her? Before, he was a person who once hoped that she would die early, but now, her arrogance, willfulness, and occasional tantrums had become very cute.
He wanted to have a firm grip on her life, and let her live in the world he made.
She liked silk, gold, silver and jewelry, so he wanted to bring all of them to her eyes.
"I want her." Zhao Nanyu only answered these three words.
Zhao Chao was surprised, but still had regrets. His second brother was still planted in Song Luan's hands.
He raised his eyes, looked straight at his second brother, and said in a low voice, "Second brother, this child can't be kept."
Even if Song Luan gave birth to the baby safely, she may die within a few months, or even die while giving birth. A newborn baby would definitely unable to resist the toxicity of tianqing, and no amount of antidote would do anything about it.
Zhao Nanyu's smile had become worse, "Is there really no way? I don't care what the baby looks like. I'll take care of him for the rest of my life."
These days, he could also see that Song Luan has this child in her heart. She even learned how to make socks and shoes for the baby. She also had more smiles on her face.
Song Luan didn't like him very much, but if he asked her to abort the child, she would really hate him.
Zhao Chao also knew that his second brother was reluctant to give one of them up. Now he regretted giving the poison to his second brother, because it made everything difficult to recover.
He said, "Listen to me, second brother.." after a pause, he said, "Second sister-in-law couldn't stand this poison."
Advertisements
If the poison couldn't be cured, her body wouldn't recover.
In any case, the child was not allowed to survive.
Zhao Nanyu nodded numbly, "I know."
Compared with the unborn child, he couldn't risk losing Song Luan.
On second thought, it was not a bad thing to be hated by Song Luan. Her love for him was not deep enough, it was her hatred that was deep. She would remember him for the rest of her life.
For the rest of his life, he would only be nice to her.
***
Zhao Nanyu did not cheat her, the gate of the city was really setting off fireworks.
The wind was strong at night, Song Luan was standing in the window sill. Her crimson dress was fluttering with the wind, and she felt a little cold.
Under the restaurant in the street, there were a lot of people looking up at the fireworks. This scene was more lively than any other ordinary festivals.
She leaned on the railing, and one man stood behind her, like a door guard.
The ladies of the aristocratic families around her did not dare approach her. Song Luan rubbed her hands with cold fingers, and she was planning to go back inside the room.
As she turned around, she was met with a familiar face.
Huai Jin was dressed in red clothes, and his excessively beautiful face was particularly dazzling in the crowd. He was about to rush to her, but was stopped by the strong man beside Song Luan.
Huai Jin's thin arm and legs naturally couldn't twist the ferocious bodyguard. Song Luan coughed twice, "Let him go."
The bodyguard let go of Huai Jin.
Song Luan thought that Huai Jin looked like a homeless child at the moment, waiting for her every day.
She went up to him, looked at him, and sighed, "Did you come all the way here?"
Huai Jin nodded honestly. Although he was timid, he would not lose his memory even if he was beaten!
Song Luan laughed out with a loud voice. No matter which aspect she looks, Huai Jin looked like a young boy.
She came up to him and said, "Huai Jin, don't you have something you want to do?"
He always followed her, but didn't have his own life.
Huai Jin pursed the corners of his lips. His original home was in Nanman, but it was destroyed long ago.
After being sold, he already had planned to spend his life in a muddle.
But later it was Song Luan who fished him out of the mud. He would never forget her bright and dazzling appearance when she stood in front of him.
Huai Jin just wanted to follow her. He had a mean mouth, and also had no other friends.
He didn't feel happy to celebrate the new year.
"No. I don't know what I want to do."
Song Luan frowned, "Do you miss learning?"
Huai Jin shook his head. "I don't need to."
"Do you want to do your own business?"
"Well, this sounds good." Huai Jin remembered that Ah Luan's favorite thing was money!
Song Luan was relieved and asked, "Are you rich?"
Huai Jin nodded heavily and said, "Of course, I have saved a lot of money in recent years, although it is still not comparable to your small treasury."
Song Luan laughed happily. "Then you can open a shop. When you meet a girl you like, marry her, and live a good life."
Huai Jin pretended that he didn't hear anything. He lowered his head and looked at his shoe tips.
Song Luan touched her flat stomach, and said, "Huai Jin, I have a baby again. You don't have to worry about my life. I treat you as a friend, so naturally, I hope you can live well in the future."
She really did not want to have any more emotional involvement with other men. Zhao Nanyu was enough for her.
She really did not want to have any more emotional involvement with other men. Zhao Nanyu was enough for her.
Moreover, she was scared with Zhao Nanyu, but from beginning to end, she only treated Huai Jin only as an ignorant younger brother, without the kind of love between men and women.
Huai Jin raised his head, his eyes were wide, "What? What are you talking about!?"
Song Luan repeated with a smile, "Well, I have a baby again, so you can see that I have a good life. Don't worry about me. You are still young. It's important to live your own life well."
Huai Jin stared at her stomach indignantly. He hated Zhao Nanyu, hated that hypocrite! He just thought that Zhao Nanyu wasn't worthy of Song Luan, even though when these two people stand together, they looked like a good match.
He reached out his hand to touch her stomach, but it only fell in the air. He took it back immediately for fear of hurting her.
He murmured discontentedly, "You see...what did I say at the beginning!"
At that time, he should have worked hard to persuade Song Luan to throw something on Zhao Nanyu's face.
The more Huai Jin thought about it, the more angry he was. Now Song Luan had a child again, so she couldn't escape anymore.
"Well, well, don't be angry. Go back and think about opening a shop." She looked kindly at Huai Jin, and then said, "It's so cold, you should wear more clothes when you go out."
Huai Jin turned his back angrily, "If you drive me away, I will never pay attention to you again."
Song Luan didn't go after him. If Huai Jin would listened to what she said, it would be a good thing.
When she went back, Zhao Nanyu was the only one left in the room. As for Zhao Chao, she didn't know where he went.
Song Luan didn't care where he was, so she didn't even bother to ask.
She yawned lazily, threw a peanut into her mouth, and ate it. She asked, "When are we going back to the residence?"
Zhao Nanyu pinched her wrist, which made her feel some pain. His eyes were slightly red, and it somewhat resembled a pool of blood. It was frightening to see.
Song Luan asked, "What's the matter?"
Zhao Nanyu choked, and it took a long time to say, "I'm fine. Are you tired?"
Song Luan said, "Yes, I want to go back to sleep." and then added, her words suddenly became softer, "Maybe there is a baby in my stomach, but these days, I've been sleeping more than staying awake. I even eat more than before. I think I have gained a lot of weight."
Zhao Nanyu listened to her patiently. His heart became more and more uncomfortable, and his chest seemed to be blocked by something.
"You're not fat. You still look beautiful."
Song Luan blushed and said with a smile, "You're embarrassing me."
Zhao Nanyu reluctantly smiled, "I'm not lying to you. You can look at yourself."
Her facial features...he likes everything.
When he went down the stairs, Song Luan secretly held his hand. Zhao Nanyu stopped for a moment and immediately held her more tightly.
It was still early, so the streets outside were still busy.
The two of them walked hand in hand. As they approached the gate of the Zhao's residence, Song Luan suddenly stopped and stood in front of Zhao Nanyu.
She raised her neck so she could see his eyes clearly.
Song Luan took the initiative to plunge into his arms. She put her hands around his waist, sniffed his fragrance, and closed her eyes, "Well, I'm really happy today."
And she gently whispered, "Thank you."
He was willing to take her out to play, and was also patient with her.
Zhao Nanyu stroked her hair. Before he could open his mouth, Song Luan then said, "If you are not strict with me in the future and often take me out to play, I may like you a little more every day."
If Zhao Nanyu heard these words in normal days, his mood would certainly be very good, but tonight he was so heavy that he couldn't even pretend to smile.
He had to answer one word, "Okay."
Zhao Nanyu hadn't figured out how to tell Song Luan about the baby, but the longer he drags on, the deeper Song Luan would feel for the unborn child.
Song Luan suddenly thought, it seems that this life with Zhao Nanyu was not so terrible. What if she could change him? Won't let him become ruthless in the end just like in the original book?
She admitted that the presence of the child did put some of her thoughts away.
Song Luan figured out some things, and her mind became broad-minded.
Tonight, she thought that Zhao Nanyu was even more beautiful, more pleasing to the eye, and looked more white and tender.
She stood on tiptoes and gave him a dragonfly-like kiss on his lips. Her face was not thick enough, so after kissing, she blushed and her neck felt tensed.
Zhao Nanyu bent his lips, but his smile only contained bitterness.
***
That night, Zhao Nanyu didn't say the word 'abort the child'
He only sat in his study until the dawn came.
The next day, his eyes were red, and he was a little stressed.
Zhao Nanyu was exhausted as he walked to the bedroom, and opened a small box. Inside, there were clothes for children that he had ordered his servants to prepare in advance. His fingers caressed them and his fingertips trembled slightly.
Zhao Nanyu looked coldly at it, and locked all these clothes into the box. He would never open it again in his life.
Eternal pain is not better than short pain. It was better for Song Luan to hear this news as early as she could.
He took a heavy step, seemingly felt his feet was filled with heavy lead, as it slowly moved towards her residence.
Song Luan was lying on the rocking chair in the courtyard, covered with a thin blanket. The warm sunlight fell gently on her face. She looked at ease, as if she had gone to sleep.
Zhao Nanyu sat down beside her, did not wake her up, and only quietly looked at her. He bent down to her eyebrows, and gave a kiss.
Song Luan opened her eyes and looked at him hazily.
Zhao Nanyu asked, "Did I wake you up?"
Song Luan shook her head. "No, I'm dreaming!"
Advertisements
"What dream did you have? even sweetly laughing."
"I dreamt that the child kicked me!"
How could a child who was only two-months-old kick people? Dreams are just dreams.
Zhao Nanyu lowered his eyes, "Is that right?"
Song Luan was pregnant for the first time, she didn't understand anything, and she felt everything was fresh. She touched her stomach happily, "Don't look at the baby as a small one now. I think he must be very skinny in the future."
Song Luan took his hand and put it on her stomach. She said happily, "Try to see if the baby will say hello to you."
Zhao Nanyu's hand stayed on it for a long time. "This baby can't kick people yet."
Song Luan replied, "I know. I just want you to say hello to him in advance. Talk to him more, and he will be close to you in the future."
Zhao Nanyu's eyes were still full of pain, but Song Luan couldn't see his heart. She could not see the words in his eyes. "Ah luan, we don't want this child."
He didn't ask her if it was okay, because he had already made up his mind.
Song Luan was dumbfounded for a long time, and she was stupefied. "What are you talking about?"
What do you mean by no?
It was foolish. Who doesn't want a new life blooming in their stomach?
Zhao Nanyu dreaded her gaze, and avoided it. He swallowed his throat, his voice was bitter, and said sourly, "This child...really we can't keep it."
 
=============== Chapter 60
Song Luan admired herself that she could asked him calmly, "Why?"
Zhao Nanyu hugged her tightly as he clenched his teeth. He explained to her very slowly, "I asked the doctor. You are not in good health."
Song Luan couldn't breathe. Her face was as white as paper. She wanted to break free from his arms. However, the man's strength was so strong that she was trapped in his arms. "Is that why?"
She didn't believe it very much. It was true that she was weak, and was suffering from many diseases. But these days, she had been taking the medicine well. She was not like that time when she fainted because of chest tightness.
"We won't keep the baby. I can't risk your life."
Song Luan's red eyes blinked as she stared at him, "I am not so vulnerable, I will not have any accidents."
She raised her face and tried not to let the crystal clear tears fall from her eyes, and said, "It's always you who are making decisions. This time it's my turn to make my own decisions."
Zhao Nanyu guessed that she would not compromise easily, so he gritted his teeth and continued, "You are obedient."
He reached out his finger and wiped the water from the corner of her eyes. "It's enough that we are both still alive."
Song Luan's nose and throat were sour that she couldn't speak. The hot tears rolled down one by one, and they couldn't stop. "Why don't you listen? Yeah!? Why is it up to you to decide everything, and everything is up to you?"
This child was only a little old in her stomach. How could she have the heart to give this baby up because of his words or the doctor's words?
She lifted her sleeve, wiped her tears, and sobbed. "I will take good medicine, and take good care of myself. I promise you that there will be no problems with me and the baby."
Zhao Nanyu's eyes were flushed. While holding her, he said slowly, "We still have little Zhao. I can't risk losing your life."
After thinking about it, Zhao Nanyu touched her cheek and said slowly, "It's okay if I can't have more children, but I can't bear to lose you."
Song Luan pulled the corners of her mouth and sarcastically laughed.
She nodded silently, and tried again to smile at him, but it was uglier and came across as sardonic.
She asked, "If I don't get better all my life, will I never have children again? If I accidentally get pregnant again, it will still be the same situation again. Every time I get pregnant, I have to run away?"
Zhao Nanyu shook his hand and hugged her tightly, as if he never wanted to let go. His heart was in pain. His throat ached and his brain swelled. "I don't like children very much. Little Zhao is enough for us."
One child is enough.
From now on, he would never think about having a daughter.
Nothing in this world was more important than her life.
Song Luan's heart was as gray as death, and her expression was numbed as she was encircled in his arms. Her eyes were blank and she looked empty at the distance sky. Her eyes could not shed tears.
Suddenly she remembered that this body was poisoned. Although she knew all the details, she had asked Zhao Nanyu who had poisoned her before.
There was no antidote for the poison in her body. These days, Zhao Nanyu said that she liked her, but he didn't show any intention of giving her the antidote.
Song Luan touched her stomach and laughed bitterly. It's not long since she yknew her unborn child. She gradually accepted, and even expected the child's arrival, but she will soon be unable to keep her.
Song Luan closed her eyes, and she was still very sad. She was also learning how to take care of her children these days.
She wondered whether this baby was a boy or a girl. She wanted to prepare a lot of beautiful clothes for her baby. She wanted to make this baby look beautiful in the future.
But this dream, was personally crushed by Zhao Nanyu.
Song Luan's heart suddenly filled with an inexplicable hatred. If Zhao Nanyu hadn't poisoned her, her body wouldn't have fallen into such a state, and her child wouldn't be implicated.
Before that, she had thought that she would stay by his side in the future, even if they were not deeply in love, because they already had two children.
Life needs to run her out and destroy her happiness.
For a long time, she thought she and Zhao Nanyu could get along well.
But now she suddenly did not think so. If Zhao Nanyu insisted on banishing the child, she wouldn't even have the room to resist, since her hands couldn't even bind a chicken.
In the past, Song Luan, an outsider, didn't empathize with the characters in the book, and didn't even understand this original owner's behavior. She felt hypocrital. And when she became the person in the book, she found that everything was so helpless.
This matter regarding her child would become a thorn in her heart, which could never be pulled out. It would be inserted into her heart quietly, and would forever hurt her.
She would need no reason to hate Zhao Nanyu, because just seeing other people's children would make her remember that they once had this baby.
Song Luan opened her eyes and said, "Zhao Nanyu, are you sure you won't regret it?"
"I won't."
Song Luan gave a weak smile and said twice, "That's good, that's good."
As expected, he was a man who treats his own flesh and blood with the same ruthlessness.
***
In the evening, abortion medicine had been decocted in the kitchen, and a bowl of it was carried into her room by the maidservant.
Zhao Nanyu took the bowl and put it on the table. He didn't sleep all day. The blood in his eyes became more and more serious. He kept silent and looked at the woman sitting on the bed.
Song Luan wore a thin tunic. She was holding her legs as she shrinked in the corner of the wall. At that time, she was so tired that she actually went to sleep.
Song Luan's sleeping was very strange.
She didn't know that she had been talking in her sleep, and her words were endless and incomprehensible.
Song Luan hugged herself, and felt cold all over her body. Her eyes were swollen, and she looked pitiful.
Zhao Nanyu took the medicine and went to the bedside. His face was so pale. The soup in his hand was still steaming hot. He opened his lips and whispered, "Take the medicine."
After a long time, Song Luan raised her face and looked at him with grape-like black eyes. Her white wrist stretched out from the quilt with trembling fingers.
Zhao Nanyu sighed softly and sat down beside her, "I'll feed you"
Song Luan swallowed a lump on her throat, her shoulder subconsciously hid, and she pitifully whispered, "Can I not drink?"
Zhao Nanyu said, "Don't be afraid. I'll be with you."
Of course, he must taste the bitter fruit he planted himself.
Song Luan tried to avoid when the medicine was fed to her mouth. She lowered her face and put her hand on her abdomen. "I'll drink it in two days. I want to stay with this baby more."
Advertisements
It was just a slip of tongue, so she couldn't drink the bowl of medicine.
Zhao Nanyu couldn't dare to be cruel to her, so he didn't force her too hard. He put the medicine back on the table and said, "Okay."
He added, "Are you hungry?"
Song Luan didn't eat much at noon, so she should be hungry now.
She shook her head and said bitterly, "Do you think I can eat it now?"
Zhao Nanyu sighed, "If you have no appetite, you still have to eat. What should you do if you are hungry?"
Song Luan snorted and didn't want to talk to him.
Zhao Nanyu was not annoyed. He told the maidservants to bring in the dinner. Song Luan didn't even look at it. But after a while, she realized that it was her own baby who was starving.
She picked up her chopsticks and ate two mouthfuls of rice, though she still didn't eat much.
Zhao Nanyu seemed to have no appetite. His chopsticks stopped at the same time she stopped.
[After dinner]
Song Luan didn't want to pay more attention to him, so he disappeared from her eyes.
Not long after he left, Song Luan got out of bed slowly. Her legs were weak. She moved to the dresser step by step, and took out the locked box with some strength.
There were all her valuable jewelry, mostly gold ornaments, with some cash.
The box was very heavy. She twisted her eyebrows and thought for a moment.
She picked some from a pile of golden jewelry. It looked like it was very valuable, since it was wrapped in a rag.
Recalling the picture of Zhao Nanyu delivering medicine to her just now, Song Luan's chest became stuffy, and felt suffocated.
She didn't give up, nor did she believe that there was no medicine.
She thought there would always be a way.
She just wanted to escape from this place now.
These gold and silver jewelry could be converted with a lot of money. With money, she could find a doctor by herself.
Song Luan still remembered that the original owner had a lot of valuable jewelry in Huai Jin's small yard. She could go to Huai Jin, change the money, and run away.
As for Zhao Nanyu, he would have no time to take care of her during this period of time. After the new year, the emperor would be very ill.
The ruler of the capital would change. Sixth prince ascended the throne, and as his confidant, Zhao Nanyu would be busy at that time. He would have no energy and time to find her.
She could understand Zhao Nanyu's perspective.
The man in the original book was a paranoid psychopath in the later period. He took care of the female lead who he liked as his own property. He prepared everything by himself, and the woman never even got hurt.
Therefore, Zhao Nanyu wanted to control her life and death. He wouldn't let her take little risks, or let her suffer in childbirth. It was completely in line with his personal settings.
Song Luan understood him, but she couldn't help but blame him.
She couldn't change the mind of a twisted person, so the only way was to run away.
She wanted to stay away from Zhao Nanyu.
=============== Chapter 61
Song Luan knew that there were eyes around her that Zhao Nanyu planted. There may be more than one.
She packed up the package in advance, which was full of gold and silver jewelry that could be exchanged for money. She only took a set of clothes.
Zhao Nanyu undoubtedly knew her very well. In the past two days, there were several people who she had never seen before stood in front of the courtyard gate. They were big and fierce.
Song Luan heard that Zhao Nanyu's cousin came to find her once, but was stopped outside by these men. As for herself, whenever she went out, she was followed by a tail that she couldn't throw off.
When third lady Zhao came to talk to her as usual, she asked her curiously, "What's the matter with those people guarding the courtyard gate?"
Third lady Zhao thought in mind, that they looked like prison guards. Ah Yu, even if Song Luan's unborn child was important, wasn't this too much of a fuss? No one in the house was going to hurt her? Why be so careful.
Song Luan pulled up the corner of her mouth and laughed sarcastically. "I'm not sure. I just heard him say that the situation in the capital is not constant. It's safe for more people to guard this baby."
Third lady Zhao didn't know anything about the affairs in the court. Third master Zhao was a fool again, she couldn't find out any news from him. She nodded, "I see. I thought something was wrong."
She didn't plan to stay any more. Seeing that her face was okay, she was relieved. She got up and said, "I'll go to the old lady. Now that you're pregnant, you won't have to pay any monthly greetings."
Song Luan nodded.
Not long after third lady Zhao left, grandma Lin led little Zhao into the room.
Little Zhao was wrapped up like a dumpling. As soon as he entered the house, he took off his cloak and patted the snow on it. His face was white and tender. He went to Song Luan and looked at her with dark eyes, "Mother."
Song Luan touched the top of his head and said, "Little Zhao is here."
"Yes." He leaned on her carefully, while remembering that his mother was pregnant, so he did not dare to hold her tightly, nor dare to pounce on her arms.
He opened his eyes and looked at Song Luan and asked, "How long will it take for my brother to come out?"
Song Luan held his hand in the air, then her eyes bent. "How do you know it's a brother? What if it's a sister? Wouldn't you like a sister?"
After thinking about it carefully, he replied, "I'll like it too."
In fact, he preferred the baby to be a brother, because he didn't like little girls very much. He had a girl cousin who kept on chattering. She seemed to have endless words to say to him every time. Although he had never said it, he still thought that his cousin was very annoying.
Song Luan held his face and looked at him quietly. She didn't know what else to say for a moment. After a long silence, she hugged him in her arms and kissed him on the cheek. "You will always be your mother's darling."
Little Zhao was a bit uneasy, so he hugged her neck.
***
Song Luan didn't sleep well for two days. She easily wakes up, and only had shallow sleeps, because she constantly had bloody pictures in her mind.
The snow on the eaves was melting.
When Zhao Nanyu was about to go out in the morning, Song Luan was pale when she woke up.
She slowly sat up from her bed, with her hair covered. She looked at the man's back and asked, "When are you coming back today?"
"In the evening."
Once he comes back, she was afraid that tonight would be the day that she drinks the bowl of abortion medicine.
As soon as Song Luan lowered her head, her eyes turned red, and she said in a hoarse voice, "Okay. I'll wait for you to come back."
Zhao Nanyu turned his head and leaned down on her brow, gently kissing her. His eyes was filled with pity, "Hmm."
After he left, Song Luan couldn't sleep. She got out of bed and opened the closet. She took out the package that was hidden inside–the locked box and the book.
Song Luan's desire to leave him had never been so strong. The guard standing at the courtyard gate was just the beginning of his ruthlessness. In the future, Zhao Nanyu would become more severe, and his desire for control would be even more serious than now.
Even as the plot moved forward, Zhao Nanyu was still the male lead of this book and the center of the world. His hegemony, his stubbornness and his indifference would not change.
Grandma Lin didn't know what happened with them once she got the orders from Zhao Nanyu. Because of his orders, she never sewed clothes, shoes, and socks for children in front of her.
When she was having lunch, she saw that Song Luan had eaten two bowls of rice, and her heart was finally at ease. "It's better for madam to think about it."
Seeing that she had only eaten a little in these days, her thin figure became even more thin.
Song Luan rarely smiled at her, "Today, I have a good appetite."
She could only have the strength to climb over the wall when she's full.
After lunch, Song Luan put the book in her sleeve.
At first, she walked in the yard for two times, then went straight out. She looked at the man at the gate of the yard and said, "Well, I'm going to the study. If you want to follow me, follow me."
"Yes."
Song Luan looked at the guard who really followed her like an iceberg, and she became more angry.
Fortunately, she didn't intend to run openly, she just wanted to put and leave the book in the study.
Through a path and a door, she would arrive at the front yard. She could see Zhao Nanyu's study as soon as she turned the corner. There were people guarding outside his study, and most people wouldn't be able to get in.
She was majestic, haughty, and was too famous for her reckless temperament by being easily provoked at first sight. Moreover, this beloved lady was now pregnant, and even if they wanted to stop her, they wouldn't dare to do it.
The guard of Zhao Nanyu's study gave way to her.
Song Luan went into the study. After closing the door tightly, she took out the book in her sleeve and placed it squarely on his desk.
Song Luan looked around in the study and found that there were several more paintings on the wall.
The people in the paintings were all her.
The skill of the painter was obviously excellent, and the painting was wonderful.
Song Luan pretended that nothing happened and went back to the courtyard. The sky was getting dark. Soon after, Zhao Nanyu would be back from the palace.
There were people watching inside and outside the yard. Only one place was safe–the back wall that she had climbed once before.
Song Luan changed into a light suit of clothes. As soon as there was no one around, she slipped under the back wall with a bit difficulty. It's amazing that there was a ladder in the corner.
She had no time to think about it, so she changed the side of the ladder and climbed out of the yard flexibly.
All of these things went smoothly and inconceivably. Song Luan was a little uneasy and her heart sank.
Advertisements
***
Zhao Nanyu was still on his way back to the house when his confidant brought news. "Madam has gone out from the backyard, and her subordinates followed her secretly. They didn't lose her yet."
Zhao Nanyu closed his eyes and was not surprised. He seemed to have anticipated all this.
"Take care of her."
"By the way, madam went to your study once today."
"I see. You go down."
"Yes. "
Zhao Nanyu opened his eyes, and there was a trace of violence in his eyes. Across the curtain, he said in a cold voice to the people outside, "Hurry up."
The coachman did not dare to delay and waved his whip.
Zhao Nanyu got off the carriage and went straight to the study. He walked very fast, and arrived at the study that seemed to be rippling with a shallow fragrance.
He went to the desk, two long fingers picked up the book she had left. The red paper and black characters made his eyes ache.
The thin paper gradually twisted in his hands. Zhao Nanyu looked at it word by word. His face gradually turned white. There was a melancholy air between his eyebrows. He took great efforts to restrain his irritability to kill people.
On the edge of the book was a jade pendant that he personally made her wore around her neck.
Shaking his hands, he put the two things in the drawer. With a sneer, he pushed open the door and asked in a hoarse voice, "Where is she?"
***
Thanks to Song Luan's good memory, she still remembered where Huai Jin lives. She didn't dare to run very fast with her baby in her stomach.
It's getting dark.
Counting the time, Zhao Nanyu should have gone back to her house. If he was faster, he would have seen what she left behind on his desk.
The street was quiet and empty. Her heart suddenly jumped, and she was still a little afraid.
She was trembling all the way.
She was about to arrive at the end of the street, when suddenly, a group of people appeared at the end.
Zhao Nanyu was dressed in black, his face half hidden in the dark. He sat high on his horse's back, and his eyebrows seemed to be covered with a thin layer of frost and snow.
Song Luan's legs became soft when she saw him, and she fell to the ground.
Zhao Nanyu got off the horse, stepped on his boots, and approached her step by step. He squatted down, raised her chin, and looked at her. "Where do you want to go?"
Even if you run, how can you still run to your old friend's house.
Song Luan suddenly shed tears, silently crying. She hiccuped, and didn't know whether she was scared by Zhao Nanyu's appearance.
Most of the time, her tears didn't work for him. He picked her up, and patted her on the back, "Let's talk about it later."
As soon as she got up, all the gold and silver jewelry that Song Luan had been holding fell out. Zhao Nanyu picked up one of the gold ingots and looked at it. He raised his lips and laughed. There was a little irony in his smile. "Do you want to change these for money?"
He pointed to the inscription under the gold ingot, as he touched her face, and kindly said, "See? These are all gifts by the Emperor, no one would dare to accept them."
Zhao Nanyu pretended to sigh, "Well, even if you run out like this, what can you do?"
No money, no friends.
He started cutting her wings a long time ago.
Song Luan's scalp felt numb and frightened. She looked at him in disbelief, "You ... you you.."
Zhao Nanyu took a fierce bite on her lip, then took her back to the residence.
=============== Chapter 62
Song Luan was properly placed in the room. She curled up, buried her face between her legs, her body trembling slightly.
Soon after, Zhao Nanyu opened the door and walked to her with the medicine. His tall body covered the light in front of her. Song Luan raised her face, her eyes were flushed, and she pitifully tugged his sleeves, shaking. "Can you think of a way? I can't. I really can't."
She couldn't kill her own child by herself.
Zhao Nanyu felt uncomfortable, and was numb after being hit by the truth. "Do you remember that you were poisoned before?"
"Yeah."
He poisoned her.
"The remaining poison is unclear. Even if you and your child are safe in the future, he will not live long, or he will be born disabled."
Song Luan whispered, her nails pierced her palms, but she could not feel the pain.
So this was it ah.
It turned out that no matter how hard she tried, it was useless.
Zhao Nanyu hugged her and fed the medicine into her mouth little by little. She obediently drank the whole bowl of medicine, pouring the bitter medicine through her throat into her abdomen.
Before long, there was no blood on Song Luan's face, her lips were pale, and bursts of pain surged, as if someone was holding a knife while stirring her lower abdomen. It was so painful that she could not speak.
Her bottom skirt was stained red with blood, and the smell of blood in the room became stronger.
Crystal tears flowed uncontrollably from the corners of her eyes. Zhao Nanyu hugged her, his heart twisted and he said in a hoarse voice, "You'll be better soon, Don't be afraid."
Song Luan raised her neck and eyelids laboriously.
She originally wanted to say "I hate you", but after thinking about it, the decision he made was reasonable.
"It's so painful. It hurts, Zhao Nanyu."
He wiped the tears from the corners of her eyes, and said to her ears over and over again. "I am here. I am here."
The blood was constantly flowing, which shocked Zhao Nanyu. "It's okay. It will be well soon."
The extreme pain made her delirious. Why did this happen to her? Did she do something wrong?
She blinked at Zhao Nanyu, angrily, "You can't keep me, I still have to go."
"You also saw what the book I left for you?" She laughed lowly. "I said before that I like you, but that was all just a lie."
Song Luan was suffocated for too long. She was bound by the plot of the male lead, and the severe pain in her lower abdomen made her feel that she was about to die.
She simply said everything she wanted to say at once, "I don't like you, no one will be better for you."
Huai Jin and He Run were much better than him.
She couldn't shake the line of fate of the original owner.
"I'm not afraid of you. My father is a high official and my brother spoils me. After I get better, I will leave you without looking back." Her voice became lower and she gritted her teeth, "I just want to find a good man."
Song Luan looked at the painful expression on Zhao Nanyu's face.
After venting, the pain in the lower abdomen gradually improved.
She was sweating profusely, and she was lying in the arms of Zhao Nanyu with a pale face. She did not resist the intense pain. Song Luan closed her eyes and fell asleep.
The blood under her body finally stopped. Zhao Nanyu washed her and put on a set of clean clothes for her.
His brain swelled and his eyes tightened. With every breath, his throat and heart seemed to be cut open by a knife, and he couldn't stand upright in pain.
The faint yellow candle illuminated her beautiful face. Zhao Nanyu looked at her face obsessively. He suddenly remembered the words written on the book she gave him, and remembered who she wanted to find today. Every word she said poked his heart.
Zhao Nanyu's eyes were deep and bottomless, and his cold palms covered her ankles.
He whispered in her ear, "Mhm, you're mine."
***
Song Luan slept in bed unconsciously for three or four days while being fed with water every day.
She still somehow remembered the deep hoarse voice in her ears whenever she was half-awake.
When she opened her eyes, it was already the second day of the new year. Because it was snowing heavily outside, the windows and the doors were tightly closed. Song Luan sat up from the bed, her face pale as paper, and her slender fingers squeezed the sheets under her. Her eyelashes trembled as she raised her eyelids to look around.
There was no one in the room.
There was no discomfort except for having no strength and stamina.
She moved her legs and heard a series of Jingling bells. Song Luan lifted the quilt and looked at the silver chain on her ankles.
She was stunned for a second before she laughed.
See, all her guesses and worries were coming true.
The male lead is a sick dog.
The door was opened with a squeak. A man in a dark suit came in, and the wind that came from the opening of the door dissipated some of the room's heat.
Song Luan's blank eyes suddenly became clear. She tried to pull the chain around her feet.
Her face was ugly, and her tone was rather harsh, "Untie it."
Zhao Nanyu sat down beside her in silence, gently stroked her face, and smiled weakly, "You finally woke up."
His eyes were also haggard, and his lips were pale. It seemed that his life was not easy when she was in bed for two days.
The unborn child was also Zhao Nanyu's flesh and blood. He once sincerely looked forward to this baby's coming.
The poison was caused by himself. The child was killed by himself.
His heart was not made of stone, how could it not hurt? The tip of his heart felt like it was in a thorn-like barb. If he wanted to take it out, it would hurt more.
Holding a bowl of porridge, Zhao Nanyu continued, "Eat something first."
Advertisements
Although Song Luan had no strength, she looked up at him with her chin up, "You untie it."
Since Zhao Nanyu acted like he had not heard it, Song Luan lowered her head and bit him fiercely on his wrist. Her sharp teeth deeply pierced his flesh skin, and blood started to trickle down.
Zhao Nanyu didn't seem to feel pain, because his eyebrows didn't even wrinkle.
Song Luan was a little frustrated. She seemed to understand the reason why Zhao Nanyu was so cautious. In fact, she was so delirious now that she couldn't remember everything he had said.
She smiled weakly and looked at Zhao Nanyu's eyes very calmly. No could even find any resentment against him in her eyes. "What I said that day was nonsense. You can untie it. I won't run."
Song Luan took a deep breath and said, "I'm like this now. What do you want to do?"
Her words were like a sharp sword, which pierced directly to his heart.
Song Luan reminded Zhao Nanyu from time to time that it was he who harmed her.
Song Luan wanted him to understand that she wouldn't sneak away in the future. Nothing good would come out from it.
Wasn't she still married to him?
The blood color on Zhao Nanyu's face gradually faded. He lowered his eyes, took out key, and untied her shackles without saying a word.
Song Luan didn't look at him. She laid down again, with her back to him. "I don't want to eat."
Zhao Nanyu thought that she would wake up crying and yelling at his nose, but she was calm as if nothing had happened, and he couldn't see any resentment in her eyes against him.
She had no feelings for him.
Zhao Nanyu forced a smile in his pale face. "How would you eat these days? Don't harm your body."
Song Luan turned around, looked at him straight in the eyes, and mockingly smiled, "If you go out, I'll eat."
Zhao Nanyu humbly replied, "Okay."
As soon as he left, grandma Lin came in with her lunch. She waited carefully as she watched her eat two bowls of porridge before taking off the table.
Song Luan put on a coat and got out of bed. The house was full of charcoal and fire, and she didn't feel cold at all. Song Luan wanted to open the window to let in air, but she was stopped by grandma Lin, "Madam, it's cold outside. It will harm your body."
She nodded, the body was her own, but she couldn't let other people worry about her health...
Zhao Nanyu also knew that Song Luan didn't want to see him. She still stayed and ate in her room three meals a day.
After a few days, seeing her face gradually become more and more rosy, Zhao Nanyu said, "The Lantern Festival is coming soon. The street will be very busy that night, and you will certainly like it. "
Song Luan showed a lack of interest, "Oh."
When she woke up, she found that his jade pendant was perfectly worn on her neck. Song Luan was indifferent to this, because whatever she does, she couldn't defeat Zhao Nanyu.
He held her from his back and gently put his hands on her waist. Zhao Nanyu put his chin on her shoulder. "Don't you like it?"
Song Luan's body turned stiff, her eyes didn't know where to look, "I'm wondering if the baby is a boy or a girl?"
She and Zhao Nanyu are not bad in terms of looks. If it was a girl, she must be very lovely. If it was a boy, he should be as smart as little Zhao.
Zhao Nanyu choked and couldn't speak. When he recovered, he was about to open his mouth, when he heard Song Luan say, "Well...well, we won't talk about this."
It's just a two-way street.
***
The news of Song Luan's miscarriage was known to everyone in the house, just like when she got pregnant.
Third lady Zhao almost fainted when she heard the news. The last time when she went back to see her, wasn't she and her baby doing okay? How could the child disappear in a twinkling of an eye? Ah Yu was so strict again. It shouldn't be.
She wanted to visit, but Ah Yu refused her.
Third lady Zhao saw that he was also haggard.
For more than ten years that she lived with him, Ah Yu's being depressed was really rare. She patted him on the shoulder, and could only comfort him by saying, "You are still young. There will be children in the future. Don't be too sad."
Zhao Nanyu gently pulled the corners of his mouth, but couldn't laugh.
No, not in my life.
"When Ah Luan is better, I hope mother can talk with her." Zhao Nanyu said in a low voice.
Third lady Zhao felt that her stepson was rather pitiful, so she nodded, "Don't worry."
"Thank you, mother."
***
This year, Song Luan lived a quiet life.
On the third day of the new year's day, the old lady asked her to have dinner with her. Song Luan cleaned herself up very beautiful and put on her makeup to suppress her pale face.
Compared with the few days ago, she was much thinner, and her clothes all looked big on her body.
She didn't know if the old lady pitied her, but this time, her eyes softened a lot, and she didn't say anything weird.
Both the first lady Zhao and the second lady Zhao were talking happily. Song Luan only drank chicken soup, and didn't intend to get into their topic, but they always wanted to mention her.
The second lady pretended to ask, "Is Ah Luan in good health? This miscarriage is not a trivial matter. If it was not taken care well, it might grow to a serious disease in the future."
Song Luan placed down the spoon in her hand and laughed at the second lady, as she said bitterly, "I'm good. Don't be disappointed."
The second lady's face changed and she gave her a look. "Why do you talk like that? Your aunt cares about you."
Care? Song Luan just wanted to sneer.
Even the old lady didn't make fun with her miscarriage, but this second lady had a mouth in her ear.
"Then, I'm bothering you."
The old lady interrupted them coldly, "Enough. Let's eat our meal."
After the meal, the second wife still didn't intend to stop. Her voice was so loud that she didn't know who she was talking to, "My son has three children. He is younger than Ah Yu. In the past two days, I heard that one of his concubines was pregnant again. He also had a good wife. She was generous, good-natured and obedient."
When the two wives, and others around them sighed, they didn't forget to glance at Song Luan. "If a man marries a wife, she should be a virtuous person. If the wife is not good-natured, the husband can't take it."
The first lady glanced at her secretly and said with profound meaning, "I remember that Ah Yu never had a concubine?"
Who didn't have a concubine room in this world? If a man takes a good concubine, he must take her in a sedan chair.
The first lady didn't want to get involved in Zhao Nanyu's affairs. Whether he accepts a concubine or not had nothing to do with her.
Now that her eldest son had returned to the capital, Song Luan was shamelessly seducing her eldest son. Although she had not intensified her strength, her nature had not changed. What if she wanted to hook up with her son again?
With Song Luan's beauty, it was not impossible for her eldest son to be confused. Therefore, the eldest lady wanted to use the opportunity to coax the old lady to give Zhao Nanyu a concubine and give Song Luan a stumbling block, so that she had no energy to hook up with others.
The truth was, Song Luan couldn't wait for Zhao Nanyu to take a concubine. Who could stand him?
She said with a smile, "This wife is not jealous. I'm weak and often can't serve my husband well. I also want to find two young girls to serve him."
The old lady coughed twice. "Well, don't worry about this."
Song Luan understood that the old lady had a plan in mind.
Before leaving, the old lady asked her servant to bring her a box of first-class ginseng from the house. After all, it was her wish. Song Luan didn't refuse, and she took the things and said thanks in a low voice.
When Zhao Nanyu returned home late at night, Song Luan was still awake. She sat barefoot on the bed, while holding her chin, as she told him about today's affairs like it was a joke. "Lord Zhao [m] respectful but rather distant tone to address Zhao Nanyu [/m] has a lot of good fortune. Grandmother is planning to take two concubines just for you."
Zhao Nanyu didn't seem to hear what she said. He quietly put on her socks for her and placed them back in the quilt. "Don't get cold."
Song Luan, as opposed to him, kicked off the quilt with a smile in her eyes. "Are you not moved when you hear about the many beauties?"
Zhao Nanyu's eyes were fixed on her face. He wanted to find a trace of jealousy and unwillingness in her eyes, but there was no such thing. Her eyes were as clean as a spring water, clear, and smooth. It seems that she just really wanted to tell him the news.
"It has nothing to do with me."
Song Luan exclaimed, "You are really heartless."
Zhao Nanyu looked pale while curling up his fingers. He couldn't help saying, "You don't care about me much."
Song Luan blinked at him, "I care."
A liar.
In fact, her acting skills were very poor. Maybe she didn't even want to hide it from him.
Zhao Nanyu's eyes darkened, and was hurt by her strike.
His breath seemed to have a bloody smell, and his throat was extremely hoarse. "Okay, sleep."
Song Luan was lying in the innermost part of the bed with a quilt rolled up. The paper lamp on the head of the bed illuminating a dim light.
She said, "Let's go out and have a look on the day of the Lantern Festival."
Zhao Nanyu's heart trembled, and he put out the light, and said, "Okay."
"Let's go with my brother together."
She just wanted to see Song Heqing, since she was kept in the house. She didn't know when she could go out again, since she had seen Zhao Nanyu crazy appearance once. Tying her foot and wrist with chain was really not good. She didn't want to experience it again.
Wasn't he fond of good and flowery words? Then she would grant it.
She said thousand times ten thousand words, all of them were fake. Because of her clumsy acting skills, she didn't believe that Zhao Nanyu couldn't see it's a lie. If he was willing to fool himself, she didn't care.
With more than ten days to go before the Lantern Festival, Song Luan was not interested in his affairs. During the day, she slept more than she wakes up.
The day before the Lantern Festival, she saw the gold and silver jewelry in the cabinet, and was stunned for a moment. She remembered what Zhao Nanyu had said, and his expression at that time to her.
She carefully threw all the things picked out from Zhao Nanyu's storeroom to the other side. After throwing them, there was not much left in the box.
When Zhao Nanyu came back, he saw that she had thrown all those things away without saying anything. She was wearing thin clothes, and was standing by the window to get some air. He wrapped his cloak around her tightly. "Be careful of the cold wind."
Song Luan was locked in his arms, and could smell his scent, "I'm not cold."
"I'm afraid you'll be cold."
Song Luan shut up immediately.
He bought her some snacks that she liked to eat. Song Luan didn't touch it, only giving a glance before ignoring it completely. He turned around and ordered people to throw it away.
Zhao Nanyu looked dimly in the corner, his face becoming tensed, and said nothing.
In the evening, Song Luan tossed and turned in the bed. She was not yet sleepy.
Zhao Nanyu held her in his arms, kissed her lips, and hummed softly.
Song Luan closed her eyes while laying in his arms, and fell asleep faintly.
This lullaby was often sung by his mother when he was a child.
Zhao Nanyu looked down at the woman in his arms and held her tighter.
=============== Chapter 63
Song Luan's sleeping habit seemed to have improved. The next day when she woke up, she found that her whole body was wrapped around him.
Zhao Nanyu was still not awake, so she gently took back her legs and feet, slowly retreating from his arms.
Song Luan's eyes focused on the man in front of her. The corner of his eyes had a tint of blue and black, as if he hadn't had a good sleep for a long time. She stretched out her fingers and stroke his eyebrows and eyes, and it gradually fell on his thin lips.
His eyelashes are long and curly, his nose, eyes and mouth are delicate. His face is a kind of morbid white.
His collar was slightly open and his collarbone was visibly seen.
It was still dark outside the window, and only a faint light could be seen in the distance.
Song Luan was just about to take her hand back, when the man suddenly opened his eyes and held her fingers. His dim eyes gradually became clear, and his deep and magnetic voice flowed into her ears. "Why did you wake up so early? Did you have a nightmare?"
Song Luan took her fingers back, looked at him, and shook her head, "No."
Zhao Nanyu got up. Even though the room was dark, he didn't put on the light. After putting on his clothes, he turned to her and said, "It's still early. You can sleep more."
Song Luan's eyes did not move away from him. He was a lot thinner than before, and his long clothes looked a little empty on his body. Looking at his back, she suddenly said, "Are you going to the court?"
"Not yet." Zhao Nanyu explained to her in a low voice, "But I'll be back soon after I go out to work."
Song Luan got up slowly from the bed. She licked her mouth and explained to Zhao Nanyu, "I'm hungry. I'll get up and have breakfast before I go to sleep. "
Zhao Nanyu pressed her shoulder. "Okay, I'll tell the maidservants to prepare breakfast."
Song Luan looked down, and her long black hair covered half of her face. He couldn't see the expression on her face.
By the time she got dressed and washed, the sun was already shining.
Zhao Nanyu filled a bowl of millet porridge for her and pushed it to her, "Have a taste."
Song Luan took a sip and almost threw out the food. Her eyebrows wrinkled tightly, as she said, "It tastes so bad."
It's very salty and had a burnt smell.
Zhao Nanyu's eyes darkened and took the millet porridge in her hand to his side, "Then don't eat this."
Grandma Lin coughed twice, but she couldn't say anything when the young master was here. The young master personally went to the kitchen this morning. She didn't know if it was on a whim.
His first time cooking porridge was not good.
Naturally, Song Luan didn't know about it.
Zhao Nanyu had no appetite these days. Seeing that he had eaten only a little bit, she placed down her chopsticks.
Song Luan was supposed to pretend that she didn't see anything. However, she was too soft hearted, and couldn't resist saying, "Eat more."
His body was becoming thinner. It looked so unfamiliar and strange that it made her distressed.
After Zhao Nanyu heard her, he ate an extra bowl of rice.
***
Later, old lady Zhao sent two maidservants who were close to her. The two girls were very young, around 15 or 16 years old, a perfect age to marry.
It was said that the maidservants belittled their identity. They were beautiful as flowers, and had a good figure. They all showed their perfect demeanor with a smile.
The old lady knew her grandson. Zhao Nanyu looked good in talking, but he didn't acutally obey the discipline. If she took two concubines directly for him, he would not accept it. He wouldn't even touch those concubines, and would send them back to her fully intact.
So the old lady planned to take these girls as Song Luan's maidservants. Song Luan was also fragile, delicate, and sickly, while Zhao Nanyu was very energetic. How could she bear it?
After seeing the beautiful maidservants around Song Luan as time goes by, he wouldn't help but yearn for them.
The two maids, Chunyu and Donghui, were named by the old lady herself. They were brought up as maids in Zhao's family since childhood. They were knowledgeable, reasonable, clever, and sensible. The most important thing was that they had a clean family background, and they treat people wholeheartedly.
Obedient girls were those who please their elders. Song Luan's persistence to disobey and contradict elders irritated people around her.
Song Luan held her head, and looked at the graceful Chunyu and Donghui on her spare time. This made the two girls upset.
When they served in the old lady's yard, they had heard of the young lady's prestige, and that she often quarreled with the old lady. Therefore, even if the young master was bright and good-looking, they wouldn't dare to rejoice in their hearts, for fear that they would be caught and scolded by the young lady.
In the past six months, they saw that Song Luan's temper had restrained, so they dared to come by her side and serve her.
Young master, that was as gentle as the clear wind and shining moon, had an excellent appearance. No one would not be moved. If their body could be given to this young master, what was it to take some risks?
Song Luan coughed twice and said in a cold voice, "Since you have chosen to serve me, you will abide by my rules from now on."
They nodded, "Yes."
Song Luan didn't want to talk to them anymore, so she waved her hand and said, "Okay, you go out first."
When they left the room, grandma Lin came up to remind her, "Madam, you better guard against them. I see that they did not come with good motives."
Although they were not as beautiful as Song Luan, they were far better than ordinary girls.
The old lady's mind was clear, even if it was to open branches and leaves as soon as possible through a concubines room. Grandma Lin felt that the old lady was determined because she was dissatisfied with Song Luan. She wanted to take advantage of this opportunity to fill the young master's room.
She shook her head. Others could not see clearly, but she could see that the young master's feelings for Song Luan was very deep. When she slept for a few days, he couldn't help but guard by her bedside.
While Song Luan was unconscious, the young master had sung a soft tune in her ear, while gently wiping her body with medicine. The young master never borrowed other people's hands to watch over Song Luan.
Song Luan laughed, "I know."
Then she looked at grandma Lin and asked curiously, "Is Zhao Nanyu really so popular?"
Why do little girls like to come up to him? even Song Yu wanted to die for him.
Grandma Lin hesitated and didn't know how to reply.
In those days, if the young master didn't marry her, he would still not have to worry about his marriage. Many of the nobles in the Marquis came to Zhao Nanyu's residence. They didn't despised his origin.
"The young master is good-looking and good-natured, so naturally he will be liked."
Song Luan did not agree with this. Zhao Nanyu's temper is not good! He had extreme jealousy, hatred, and anger.
Advertisements
But thinking about it carefully, he treated her well on so many days, but his extreme paranoia made her afraid.
"I see."
Indeed, in this world, Song Luan had never seen a man as better looking as Zhao Nanyu. His facial features seemed to have been carefully carved–delicate and elegant, and his temperament was excellent.
For most of the month, it snowed in the capital. Little Zhao hadn't seen Song Luan for many days. Only after her body was better, could the child be allowed to visit her mother.
After the year passed, little Zhao was already five years old.
During this period of time, Song Luan's body was taken care of by third lady Zhao.
The little kid was forced to put on red coat that he didn't like very much. He was tender and white, but his face was serious.
She was very joyful to see little Zhao in red. Song Luan chuckled and pinched his face. "Little Zhao is really brilliant."
In this world, only she and Zhao Nanyu had the honor to pinch little Zhao's cheek. Other people could not carelessly touch.
Little Zhao also knew that his younger brother or sister was gone. His father said that he was not allowed to mention it in front of his mother. He closed his mouth and did not even ask.
He opened his hand, and there was a pink camellia. "Here you are, mother."
He picked it specially for his mother.
Song Luan took the flower and praised him happily, "Oh, how beautiful. I like it very much."
"I'll give you some more next time."
She was moved and amused. Song Luan touched his head. "You don't need to pick it. The flowers won't live long after you pick it."
"Okay." Little Zhao was really obedient. Since his mother said so, then he would naturally follow. After a bit of silence, he added in a low voice, "Then I won't pick any more."
Such beautiful flowers should live long.
This time, little Zhao suddenly talked more in front of her. He stayed obediently in her arms and slowly said, "I saw my uncle during the New Year."
On the first day of the new year, he went to the Song family to pay New Year's greetings and met his grandmother and uncle.
He stayed for three or four days.
Little Zhao used to hate going to the Song family. No one talked to him or played with him, and his mother would keep him in the house.
Since his mother didn't shut him down, he felt that his uncle and grandmother also liked him very much.
"Is it? Is it fun there?" Song Luan asked him.
He thought about it and nodded, "Mm-hmm."
Although he liked to be quiet and alone, but the children over there were willing to talk to him.
Song Luan suddenly had some regrets. She didn't return to her mother's home during the Spring Festival. Aunt Lin must have missed her very much, and probably hated Zhao Nanyu more.
Aunt Lin had been dissatisfied with Zhao Nanyu. This time she had a miscarriage, which was enough for Aunt Lin to gnash her teeth with hatred, and wanted to tear him to pieces.
Song Luan knew that Zhao Nanyu was guilty. Since he didn't do it on purpose, her resentment seemed so unreasonable.
However, Song Luan was really afraid of that kind of intense and long pain. The pain in her body was tolerable, but her heart now felt painful and uncomfortable.
She tried very hard not to blame him.
Little Zhao looked up at his mother, and suddenly fell silent. His little hand gently tugged at the corner of her dress.
He took out a red and white envelope from her pocket and put it in her hand as if he was flattering her, "Mother, this is the red envelope given to me by my uncle and grandmother."
"Then you keep it."
"Here."
He wanted to give all his good things to his mother.
Song Luan couldn't laugh or cry. Although she liked money, she was also embarrassed to take her baby's lucky money.
She said, "You can keep it yourself. By the way, your mother hasn't given you a red envelope yet! Wait, your mother will give you a big red envelope tonight, okay?"
Little Zhao thought that gold and silver were not important to him, and he could not use it. Seeing his mother liked it, he wanted to give them to her.
He shook his head. "I don't want it. My uncle and grandmother gave me a lot of things."
Song Luan knew her mother and brother, and she always put gold in her hand every time they met. They were very generous.
Little Zhao stubbornly put all the money he received into her hand, and looked at her expectantly with a pair of big eyes, afraid that she would not want it.
Song Luan finally compromised and locked his lucky money in a small drawer. She said with a smile, "When you grow up, this money will be used to marry your wife!"
Although she didn't know if it was enough.
Little Zhao was too young to understand the words of marrying a wife, so he just nodded stupidly, "Okay."
Song Luan flicked his forehead and was amused by the child's rare stupidity.
Although little Zhao said he would not ask for her red envelope, Song Luan still wanted to prepare one for him that night. As a mother, she couldn't do nothing to prepare her children during the Spring Festival.
She called grandma Lin into the room and asked, "Is there anything little Zhao like in his daily life?"
Grandma Lin took care of little Zhao since he was born. She knew his hobby better than Song Luan.
She replied, "It seems that he doesn't like anything, other than reading books."
Song Luan was a little embarrassed and asked, "If I give him a chessboard, do you think he will like it?"
Grandma Lin replied truthfully, "As long as it is given by madam, he will like it."
Song Luan frowned and said, "No, I'll think about it again."
After thinking about it for a long time, Song Luan had an idea. Little Zhao would go to school after the new year. Although she was not good at sewing, she could still sew a small schoolbag.
Song Luan immediately told grandma Lin to prepare the needle and thread. She buried herself in sewing the whole afternoon before barely making a decent little schoolbag.
In the evening, Zhao Nanyu asked the servants to send a message that he would return late.
Song Luan didn't wait for him, and had dinner with little Zhao. Before long, grandma Lin brought in the medicine she used to drink.
Song Luan was used to the bitter taste of the medicine, so she could directly drink it without frowning. As Song Luan turned around, she saw little Zhao with red eyes, and an aggrieved face while looking at her.
She was surprised. "What's the matter?"
He wiped the water out of the corner of his eyes and said in a stuffy voice, "I'm okay, mother."
He just remembered the basin of blood coming out of his mother's residence that day. The smell of medicine reminded him of the scene.
Song Luan knew that he was distressed, so she took out the small schoolbag she made in the afternoon, and handed it to little Zhao together with a red envelope. "Have a look, do you like it?!"
He squeezed the strap of his schoolbag. It was just right. His books could fit into this bag. he wanted to use in school.
His appearance gradually changed, and he laughed again, as he nodded heavily, "Yes."
When Song Luan saw him happy, she was in a better mood.
Well, her baby was still her sweetheart!
Song Luan whispered to little Zhao, coaxing him to sleep.
Zhao Nanyu still did not return, so grandma Lin asked her whether to wait for him to come back?
She shook her head. "No. I won't wait."
Grandma Lin retreated from the room. Song Luan put out the paper lamp and closed her eyes. After half a column of incense, she was still awake. After a long time, Song Luan heard something coming from the door.
Zhao Nanyu, wrapped in cold air, pushed the door open. Someone carried hot water for him from outside. The girl pinched her voice and whispered, "Young master, I will wait for you to change your clothes, so you can go and take a bath."
This was the voice of Donghui.
Song Luan sat up from the bed, her eyebrows lifted, these two young animals that old lady Zhao sent really worked fast! On the first day that Zhao Nanyu arrived, they hurriedly came to his side.
Zhao Nanyu's face was like frost, and his voice was as cold as a thousand years ice. "Roll."
Donghui bit her lip, but she didn't give up. She didn't want to give up such a good chance, although it's very rare for young master to speak loudly, and also for him to say roll to people.
She was red eyed and looked like a willow. "Let me serve you."
Zhao Nanyu, white and frightening, glanced coldly and said angrily, "Grandma Lin, take her out from me. Those who do not obey the rules of the master will be killed directly."
Grandma Lin's heart leaped suddenly, but she didn't expect that Zhao Nanyu would be so ruthless on the first day. He even wanted to kill her directly.
Donghui was so scared that she knelt down and begged for mercy. "Forgive me, master."
Zhao Nanyu waved his hand, "Take her out."
Her life was spared. She was not killed.
Song Luan eyebrow gradually unfolded as she listened. Since she couldn't sleep, she put on her shoes, and got out. She wanted to spectate this joke.
Zhao Nanyu was already sitting in the bath bucket behind the screen. His clothes were hanging high on it. Song Luan twisted her eyebrows. She did not know if it was her own illusion, but she could smell the scent of blood.
As soon as she reached the screen, the man inside said sharply, "Get out."
Song Luan raised her eyebrows and poked out her head. "Oh, I'll roll."
Zhao Nanyu didn't expect it would be her. So late, he thought she would have gone to bed. As soon as he returned to the yard, grandma Lin told him that Song Luan didn't wait for him, and went to bed on her own.
Zhao Nanyu was stunned for a moment, and explained in an unnatural tone, "I don't know that it's you."
How could he be willing to let her go?
Song Luan was about to leave, but she was grabbed by her wrist behind her back. She fell into the bath tub in confusion, and the warm water wet her cheek.
She wiped the water in front of her eyes and opened her mouth to speak, but was frightened by the shocking scar on his chest.
Zhao Nanyu was injured. It seemed that he was stabbed by someone.
Song Luan moved her lips and said, "You...are you okay?"
Zhao Nanyu put the palm of her hand on the wound on his chest and pressed it hard. "It's a little painful."
It would be strange that such a cruel self-mutilation wouldn't hurt!
Song Luan gave him an angry look, and tried to climb out of the tub.
However, even though he was hurt, he still had great strength. He immediately took her back to his arms, leaned wearily against her, and whispered, "Why didn't you sleep? Are you waiting for me?"
After a little silence, Zhao Nanyu gently stroke her back and said, "I can't sleep."
He couldn't sleep these days. All of his dreams were pictures of her covered in blood. He couldn't make a noise in his dreams every time.
Song Luan didn't say anything or resist, so he hugged her tighter.
He coughed twice, and whispered hoarsely, "Don't be afraid. I'll sing you a lullaby later."
 
=============== Chapter 64
Song Luan's wet clothes clung to her body, and her hand was forced to press on his wound.
Her palms were now stained with his blood.
She got up from the bath tub, wiped the blood on her hands with a cloth, and sniffed it, but she could still smell the metallic taste.
As soon as she changed her clean clothes, Zhao Nanyu came out with a bare chest.
To stop the blood from flowing out his wound, he got the medicine from the cabinet, sprinkled it on his bloody wound, and took a breath of pain. Song Luan pretended not to hear his gasp, she only stopped for a moment, dried her hair, and crawled back to bed.
Song Luan didn't know how he got the injury. He was a handsome scholar that didn't need to dance with knives and swords.
She had no intentions asking Zhao Nanyu. She was not interested in his affairs.
Most of Song Luan's face was hidden under the quilt. Even if she tried to closed her eyes, she still couldn't sleep.
After Zhao Nanyu wrapped his wounds with bandage, he laid on her side. The light fragrance of Song Luan filled the tip of his nose, and he put his arm around her waist. He took the woman into his arms, and hummed softly.
Song Luan didn't know where he learned the tune, but it was really nice and calming.
Zhao Nanyu slept but got woken up in the middle of the night by Song Luan's nightmares.
She unconsciously grabbed him by the corner of his clothes. Her petite body that curled up, went straight into his arms, and her tears were almost on the corner of her eyes.
Her consciousness was not clear. She was in a daze, as she choked and said, "It's painful. It really hurts..."
All her bones felt cold, and everything inside her body couldn't breathe.
The cramps in her lower abdomen felt like it was being pricked by people one by one.
Her dream only reflected the vast expanse of dark red colors. The whole world seems to be pasted with blood.
Hearing her voice, Zhao Nanyu's face suddenly turned pale. He couldn't make a noise. He could only hold her tightly while he murmured in a low voice, "Don't be afraid. It doesn't hurt, it won't hurt any more."
Song Luan obviously couldn't remember what he said last night. She stretched out and got up from the bed. The sunshine was just right, and the winter sun was a little dazzling.
Song Luan found that the two beauties sent by the old lady yesterday were missing. She asked grandma Lin casually, "What about the two girls?"
Grandma Lin replied, "Donghui is not sensible. She bumped into young master last night and was disposed of. As for the other one, she was sent back to the old lady by the young master."
Donghui was beaten by a board before being sent out of the house. The young master's ruthless methods made people cover their mouth. The person being beaten couldn't make a sound. Her blood was blurred and it made everyone who witnessed it feel frightened.
It's more about killing a chicken to scare a monkey.
Last night, the young master asked the servants to wash the blood on the ground, for fear that it might scare his wife.
None of the servants mentioned this to her.
Song Luan was indifferent, but she sighed in a pitiful tone, "I think those two girls are quite beautiful."
They were just too anxious, and didn't find the right time.
"Not half as beautiful as Madam." Grandma Lin said.
Song Luan looked at the face reflected in the mirror. This face, which looked exactly like her face before she transmigrated, was still beautiful and moving, although it lacked some vitality.
She touched her cheek in a trance. She wondered if she had a chance to go back?
Little Zhao got up late. He then put on his clothes and came out of the house.
After Zhao Nanyu came back last night, he had already fallen asleep. He did not see his father, and he was dejected.
He consciously climbed up on Song Luan's legs, looked up at her, and asked, "Mother, where is father?"
Song Luan was embarrassed and said, "Mother doesn't know."
"I haven't seen father for many days."
A few days before the new year, he was at his grandfather's house. After he was sent home, his father had to take care of his unconscious mother.
He was too busy to see him.
Listening to the children's complaints, Song Luan did not know what to say.
"Well, maybe he'll be back in the evening." She said, "then you will see him."
Because little Zhao felt sad, Song Luan deliberately teased him, "It turns out that little Zhao only likes his father, not me."
Little Zhao's face was red as he stuttered, looking for an explanation, "No...no."
He raised his neck and gave her a kiss on the face and whispered in her ear, "I like my mother the best."
***
On the day of the Lantern Festival, the queen, who had no relationship with her, sent someone to invite her to visit the palace, and specially asked her to take her child with her.
Looking at the eunuch that came from the palace, Zhao Nanyu frowned, but he held Song Luan's shoulder. "Don't worry. Just talk."
Song Luan did not have a good impression of the imperial palace. She was still worried about the poison that Song Yu had done. However, she did not know what the queen was up to.
She asked, "Why did the queen look for me? I haven't even met her."
Although the queen was not abolished that time, all the details of her side were cut down. Her vitality was greatly damaged, and her royal son also lost the advantage of seizing the throne. Now, the only thing she could rely on was the sixth prince under her knees.
Zhao Nanyu was a closed friend of the sixth prince. Maybe the queen wanted to win him over.
"Don't think about it. She won't dare to do anything to you."
"That's good."
Little Zhao was sleeping on Zhao Nanyu's leg.
She thought that the carriage was stuffy, so she lifted the curtain. She felt the wind for a while, and forgot that Zhao Nanyu was still injured. He covered his throat and coughed.
Song Luan awkwardly asked, "How's your injury?"
"It's okay, don't worry."
His cough wouldn't stop, and hearing this, Song Luan's ears felt pain, so she quietly shut the window.
Advertisements
When they arrived at the inner palace, Song Luan found that the queen not only invited them, but also saw He Run and Song Heqing.
It was still early before the banquet would begin.
Song Heqing came out of the corner, looked at both his sister and his brother-in-law, and said, "I want to have a word with Ah Luan."
Zhao Nanyu nodded and left consciously, "Okay."
After he looked at his sister's thin body, he was very distressed.
After sighing, he cursed in his throat, "Zhao Nanyu, this dog, has made you suffer so much. Look at how thin my little sister is!"
Song Luan's eyes were red and her voice was low, as she said, "Brother, I want to leave."
Song Heqing touched her hair. If it was in the past, it would be easy to do what his little sister wanted. But now, it was different, Zhao Nanyu was no longer a petty official.
A few days ago, when his father was almost impeached, and was about to go to prison, at the last moment, Zhao Nanyu saved him.
Now the emperor was seriously ill, and sixth prince quickly took control of the power.
No one dared to disobey him.
Several princes were suppressed by him one by one, and the seriously ill old emperor did not stop them. The overall situation was mostly settled, and the only thing left was waiting for the imperial edict of the crown prince.
Zhao Nanyu also followed the rising tide. His method was extremely vicious. He killed many people.
On the day of Song Luan's miscarriage, aunt Lin went to the Zhao family to make trouble. She cried bitterly and scolded Zhao Nanyu. Not only that, she also tried to take Song Luan home and forced them to leave.
At that time, Song Heqing was also there. He didn't stop aunt Lin. His sister was so wronged that they need to help her.
Zhao Nanyu let aunt Lin beat and scold him, but he didn't let her take his wife away.
When aunt Lin made enough trouble, Zhao Nanyu's eyes became cold and his voice was hoarse. He threatened the future of the Song family and the lives of each members, meaning he would never let Song Luan leave him.
No one dares to disobey him.
Zhao Nanyu even laughed and said, "Even if Song Luan runs away by herself, you must send her back to me."
It was the first time Song Heqing saw Zhao Nanyu's crazy appearance after so many years. It seems that he met the God of death.
Aunt Lin was so angry at his words that she almost fainted.
Now facing his beloved sister, Song Heqing was very guilty, as he touched her hair. He couldn't speak.
It was silent for a long time before Song Heqing finally asked her, "Don't you like him?"
After all these years of marriage, their child was already five years old.
Still didn't like Zhao Nanyu?
Song Luan seriously thought about her brother's question. She raised her head, and there were all kinds of mixed emotions in her eyes, as she replied, "Yes."
Yes, I did.
Zhao Nanyu looked good.
He was not bad.
He accommodated her with many things, and she was really moved before.
After a pause, she added in a low voice, "But I don't like him now."
Liking him was a painful thing.
Song Heqing was not the only one who heard this, but also Zhao Nanyu, who was leaning against the wall.
He was pale and lifeless.
Song Luan also saw something wrong with her brother.
She remembered that Zhao Nanyu had gradually taken control of power, so she laughed and said, "Brother, it's okay. I'm just complaining to you."
Song Heqing felt even more distressed. "You don't have to be so sensible."
His sister should be pampered, and no one could wrong her.
She was wronged because of her family's failure. If it was in the past, he could rush up and scold him, this dog, Zhao Nanyu.
Song Luan said with a smile, "I'm not sensible!"
It was already an hour, but the two brothers and sisters still hadn't talked enough. Zhao Nanyu couldn't help but emerge from the dark, coughing twice, "The child is about to wake up."
Song Heqing didn't want to see Zhao Nanyu, a small beast with a human face and a heart. "I won't disturb you. Brother-in-law should be anxious."
Zhao Nanyu suddenly said to her, "Your father was demoted."
Song Luan's eyelids jumped.
As if she didn't hear him, she raised her finger to the young man in a white-crescent clothes not far away. "That young man is really handsome."
Zhao Nanyu looked down at her with a faint expression, and continued with a smile. "Your brother is also implicated."
"Well, I don't know which son he is from. I'll ask him later." Song Luan then continued to provoke him.
Zhao Nanyu's face didn't change, as he continued, "Although you don't say it, you are scared of me, and still resent me in your heart. It doesn't matter whatever you do, but you can't think about being separated from me, even in death."
Song Luan stopped talking and remained silent for a long time. Her face was cold, "Are you threatening me with my family?"
Zhao Nanyu nodded and admitted, "Yes."
What about being mean and shameless? He didn't care as long as her wings were uprooted, could he rest assured.
She was so angry with him that her cheeks bulged.
The man was really shameless.
Song Luan wanted to kill him, really.
Zhao Nanyu chuckled again. "You don't have to ask. The gentleman you mentioned just now is Shen. He has a fiancee."
Song Luan smiled and tried to poke Zhao Nanyu's painful foot, "It's fine, I like men who aren't single."
Zhao Nanyu's eyebrows were bent, "Naughty again."
He took her by the wrist, led her into an empty room, and locked the door.
Zhao Nanyu pressed her on the door plank. His eyes were indiffierent, but they were very frightening. His fingers caressed her cheek silently.
Song Luan spoke first, "I'll climb that wall."
"You are very cruel to me!"
=============== Chapter 65
Song Luan was packed up by Zhao Nanyu like a meal.
Zhao Nanyu's bottom line of vinegar should not be provoke. Her mouth was bit a painful, the rouge on her lips were eaten clean by Zhao Nanyu.
After lunch, the queen deliberately left to speak with the ladies, so Zhao Nanyu was left with little Zhao.
She followed the noble girl into the hall. The queen was majestic, elegant, and graceful. She had on a heavy make-up, but still looked very beautiful.
The queen said with a smile, "Come, seat down, ladies."
Song Luan sat in the second position on the queen's right hand side.
The queen's eyes fell on her and asked, "Miss Song, how can you be alone?"
"The child is naughty and has a little tantrum. His father is coaxing him now." Song Luan looked calm. "I hope you don't blame me."
The queen gathered her smile and said, "Naturally, I won't blame you, but I always listen to your mother saying that little Zhao is lovely, so I want to see him."
Naturally, the queen's mother would not be aunt Lin, but her father's wife.
"I heard that you were seriously ill. Are you better now?"
Song Luan replied, "I'm alright."
The queen nodded and laughed, "That's good."
The queen's purpose was not pure, and her original goal was not Song Luan, but her son.
These days, she had a hard time. She lost everything and even implicated her family. Her good stepson was not good. Zhao Nanyu, as a good aide to her stepson, wrote incisively and vividly the four words of 'cutting off the roots'. Her family's foundation was greatly damaged, and most family members were uprooted. Her efforts over the years were wasted.
Even if the sixth prince ascended the throne in the future, she would still be a noble empress dowager, but Zhao Nanyu would not let go of her son.
The tenth prince, who was only 15 years old, and the baby who she painstakingly given birth to, was stabbed on the way to Jingzhou, and almost died.
She was not reconciled, and gnashed her teeth with hate. Fortunately, the tenth prince survived, otherwise the queen would take Zhao Nanyu's own son to pay for her son's life.
Song Luan was not as valuable as little Zhao in her eyes. She remembered that Zhao Nanyu's marriage with Song Luan was not because of love. This third young lady of the Song family was arrogant, and was far from the knowledgeable and reasonable woman that Zhao Nanyu would like. Even if she could hold Song Luan's life in her palm, she may not be able to get what she wanted from Zhao Nanyu.
The queen also felt sympathy for Song Luan. She was not spoiled by her husband. Her original healthy body was also deteriorating due to a disease. She wouldn't survive without medicine.
However, the queen also admired Song Luan, who lived happily and wantonly during the past few years of marriage. She had heard of her affairs. It's a pity that the generation of Song family was gone. She was afraid that Zhao Nanyu may start settling old accounts with this young wife.
The queen was suddenly curious. What would Zhao Nanyu do with his wife, who only made him wore many green hats?
"How many unmarried sisters do you have in your family?"
Song Luan was stunned, "Yes?"
But what do you mean by her family?
With a sigh, the queen picked up her tea cup and took a sip of tea. "The sixth prince has only married the imperial concubine, and there is no one around to serve him. I am thinking of taking a side concubine for the sixth prince. Your sister will be very good."
Song Luan's first thought was Ayun, the round faced girl.
As she hesitated in answering, the queen added, "I only mentioned it casually. Naturally, you should discuss this matter with your mother."
"You are right."
As they were talking, a little eunuch rushed in from the outside and whispered a few words in the queen's ear. The queen's face changed slightly, and she barely kept her calm. "There is something else I need to attend to, I'm afraid this would be the end of the conversation."
Song Luan got up, saluted, and left.
Looking at the queen's look, what seems to be going on in the palace?
What could it be?
***
The sixth prince was in a good mood recently. When he saw little Zhao who was hanging on Zhao Nanyu's neck, it was hard not to tease him. He pinched his face and said, "Ah, I haven't seen you for months, and you've become more and more beautiful."
Little Zhao twisted his face, and didn't smile.
The sixth prince was amused by his disdain appearance towards him. He took him from Zhao Nanyu's arms. "Why? Don't like me? I want to hold you."
Little Zhao lost his small face, and he almost wrote 'I'm not happy' on his face. He held out his hand to Zhao Nanyu and waved his small hand, "Dad, hold it."
Zhao Nanyu chuckled and took him back. Sixth prince couldn't help but sighed, "This child is really like you. He looks lovely and cold-blooded. Pity me. I gave him a lot of treasures for the new year, but he refused to give me a single hug."
Little Zhao heard his speech, buried his face in his father's shoulder, like a small tortoise, retracting oneself into the shell.
Zhao Nanyu patted his back with his big palm and said, "This child also has a temper."
Sixth prince raised his eyebrows. After pondering for a moment, he said, "Bring him to my palace some other day. Ayun will certainly like it when she sees him."
Zhao Nanyu knew that the little girl who looked like a little tail that followed him all year round was called Ayun. She looked very naive and didn't know anything about the world.
Ayun held a great place in the sixth prince's heart.
The sixth prince would soon get married. It seemed that the bride wouldn't be able to keep his heart.
Zhao Nanyu said faintly, "My child is not for you to play."
The sixth prince looked at him with a smile, "Don't be stingy, Mr. Zhao."
Zhao Nanyu stepped two steps back. "If you like, go have your own child."
Sixth prince's smile at the corner of his mouth suddenly froze. He turned the buddhist beads on his wrist for a moment.
He had a child, but didn't survive.
He looked up at the sky in the distance. It seemed that it was also in winter. Yes, in the deep winter of last year, Ayun vomited what she ate, and she didn't know she was pregnant for several months, and didn't understand anything.
Finally, he found out that it was wrong.
He made her see the doctor, and found out it was a happy pulse.
At that time, Ayun took his arm and her eyes were brighter than the stars in the sky. She asked, "Will I really have a baby?"
As a father for the first time, his heart was naturally rejoicing.
Advertisements
But he definitely couldn't have this child with no name and identity.
The sixth prince didn't want to continue to recall the incident, so he withdrew his sight. He laughed and changed the topic, "By the way, how is my mother's good son now?"
Zhao Nanyu said lightly, "Alive, but not in the future."
People who were almost disabled would have no chance to be emperor in their life.
The sixth prince sighed in a mournful tone. "Speaking of this, my younger brother is also a good boy. He's worthy of being a royal prince."
Which of the imperial cities was not covered with blood? They just thought that they didn't kill enough people yet. Zhao Nanyu's hands were automatic. The hands and feet of the people were neatly discarded.
The sixth prince said with a smile that had an unknown meaning, "If the queen mother knew this, she would be crazy."
That was her dearest son, the son she raised in the palm of her hand.
Zhao Nanyu said calmly, "I have already blocked the news. The queen should not know anything."
They could only find out that something happened on the way to Jingzhou, when he hadn't died yet.
"Of course, I will tell you the good news in person." The sixth prince laughed together with him, and asked excitedly, "I almost forgot to ask you, what do you want to do with the people of the Song family? I remember you wanted to kill them all."
All killed? It didn't seem very good. He didn't know if he had changed his mind now.
Zhao Nanyu frowned and seemed to be thinking seriously. He didn't speak for a long time. The sixth prince was impatient, so he said in a slow voice, "It's not impossible to kill all of them. But it wouldn't be righteous of me to do so, after all, they showed their sincerity to me."
"Don't touch them." said Zhao Nanyu, frowning.
This time...his answer was beyond his expectations, and it was quite generous. How could the hatred of being humiliated in those years be written off? Great, he's worthy of being his cousin.
The relationship between the sixth prince and Zhao Nanyu was known to no one but the old emperor.
His mother was the sister of Zhao Nanyu's mother. The two sisters did not live a very good life, although their appearance were outstanding, they were easily targeted by people with bad intentions.
The Emperor may have really loved his mother, and was very fond of it for a time, but it brought disaster. His mother died miserably, and the sixth prince survived only after her mother died.
For so many years, his father, the emperor ignored him, almost as if he had no son. But ah, the name written on imperial edict for the throne was his name. It's funny when he thought about it.
"Your Highness." The attendants came out.
"What's the matter?"
"The emperor invites you to go to Wenhua hall."
Sixth prince thought that his good father would sleep forever. But whether he was awake or not, a lot of things should come to an end.
Zhao Nanyu's heart jumped, "Go. Don't be soft hearted."
Sixth prince clenched his lips, and said, "I will not."
Outside the Wenhua hall, the queen wore a splendid clothes as she waited anxiously outside the hall. Without permission, she couldn't enter even if she was a queen.
The sixth highness prince saluted her, "Mother is well."
The queen was forced to wear a false smile, "You are here."
"I'm going to go ahead."
"Good boy, take care of your father for your mother. "
At this time, both mother and son were still acting, maintaining superficial peace.
"This son will surely bring his mother's sincerity to his father." When his voice fell to the ground, he pushed open the door and slowly walked in.
There was a strong smell of medicine in the room. The light was very dark. Sixth prince came to the bed and knelt down slowly in front of the emperor. Looking at the half dead appearance of his father, he even had a shallow smile on his face, "You are looking for me."
"Cough, cough, cough...I...cough, cough."
The sixth prince helped him up. He did not know when he had a bowl of medicine in his hand, but he was afraid that the emperor would burn his tongue when drinking it, so sixth prince blew it himself, and then gave the bowl to his mouth.
"I know you don't like me very much."
The emperor was choked to the throat by the soup, and the juice dripped on his chin. He opened his mouth and wanted to say something.
Sixth prince gently wiped the corners of his mouth, "If you have anything to say to my mother, go and say it."
Suddenly, he pinched the emperor's chin with his fingers, poured all the medicine into the emperor's throat, and watched him swallow them all with his own eyes.
"You can go at ease. Don't worry, your son will not let you go alone."
His beloved woman and doting little son would go down with him one by one.
The emperor glared with his round his eyes, and soon, his fingers fell.
Sixth prince closed his eyes. Somehow, his eyes were moist, and he wiped a few precious tears off his face.
He laughed at himself.
The cat cries and the mouse pretends to be merciful.
***
The next day, the news of the emperor's death spread throughout the capital.
Song Luan was also shocked when she heard the news. In the original book, the time of the old emperor's death was one month later than now, but nothing else changed, the final winner was the sixth prince.
Another month passed in a flash. After the new emperor ascended the throne, he promoted many of his cronies. Zhao Nanyu was promoted to be a high-ranking official of the third grade, holding heavy power in his hands. He was cruel and a ruthless official that killed many people.
In a short month, no less than 20 people died in his hands, and people were in panic.
At the same time, there were also many people who had taken part in this month's book folding. They handed over more and more copies of the book, and complained of Zhao Nanyu's cruel behavior in tears.
In the Jinluan palace, the new emperor threw these folding notes to Zhao Nanyu and said with a smile, "I can't see how many of them are. I'd like to trouble Mr. Zhao to share my worries for me."
Zhao Nanyu picked up two books at random and looked at them. He pulled up the corners of his mouth and laughed. He commented on four words, "These are bullshit."
The new emperor laughed, and then cursed with a kind of hatred: "These old men!"
Before the next day, anyone who participated in reporting Zhao Nanyu's performance was escorted to Dali Temple overnight. Zhao Nanyu picked up all of them and explained innocently, "The emperor wanted to punish you, and I can't do anything."
"Bah."
Zhao Nanyu stood with his hands on his back and said with a smile, "It's not easy to suffer in the prison of Dali temple. You'd better save your strength."
Although his clean hands were stained with many lives, they indiscriminately didn't kill innocent people.
Spring was expected to be cold, and the early spring was no different than winter. It made people's teeth chatter. The cold wind was like a knife, it hurt a bit on the face.
Song Luan had a restless temperament, always thinking of strolling and running out. She didn't know if the wind was blowing too much, but after returning to the room, she coughed and her chest hurt faintly.
It took a long time for her face to return back to normal.
That night, when Zhao Nanyu came back, she smelled blood again. Song Luan covered her nose, and was so disgusted that she jumped back several steps. "What are you doing now!?"
Killing people and stealing goods?
According to the plot of the original book, it was only a half of the the male lead's life story.
After all, it's a two million word novel. It was impossible to finish without pouring dog blood all over the sky! The male lead achieved his wish and rose step by step. He began to settle old accounts one by one, and countless people died under him.
Of course, those people were more or less self-made.
The original owner was one of the avenged.
According to the time line of the original book, in fact, there were less than two years to go before the original owner's life was over.
Zhao Nanyu had just returned from Dali temple, and his body was inevitably stained with dirty things.
The dungeon was dark and humid, and the ground had been dyed red with blood. Today, he also made an exception. He voluntarily punished them by himself, and blood was splashed on his clothes.
He had been used to it for a long time, but Song Luan couldn't stand it.
Zhao Nanyu said in a low voice that he was sorry, and immediately ordered his servants to fetch water. After washing and changing clothes, he appeared in front of her again.
Song Luan was now indifferent to him. She was obsessed with making all kinds things for her son.
Zhao Nanyu hugged her waist from behind, buried her head in her back neck, and deeply sniffed the fragrance of her body.
"You go away, you're heavy."
Zhao Nanyu lowered her face and held her closer. "I'm a little tired."
Song Luan pushed him away without being angry. "I'm very tired too."
She just didn't want to be his crutch.
Zhao Nanyu sighed and let go of her. He went to the desk by herself, rubbed his eyebrows and began to deal with official documents.
Song Luan raised her eyelids and secretly peeked at his face. Although the male lead was small in heart, he was not angry because of such little matter.
She had seen Zhao Nanyu's cruel and merciless appearance during his anger. That time, she went to the palace to meet her brother, and was going to go home right away, but as soon as she arrived at the gate of the palace, she saw Zhao Nanyu dealing with people. The shrill screams of the person couldn't even soften his heart.
Zhao Nanyu turned a blind eye to him. After he beat him to death, he mercifully said, "Take Mr. Du to the hospital."
Song Luan hid in the carriage, and was scared to death. The man had been beaten to the point that he couldn't speak. His whole body was covered with blood. She felt that even if he was sent to the hospital, he would not live.
After this incident, Song Luan's fear of Zhao Nanyu became deeper.
After a short time without disturbing him, Song Luan nervously came up to him, and called him with his first and last name, "Zhao Nanyu."
She tightened her fingers and said, "Can I ask you something?"
Zhao Nanyu hadn't heard a word from her for a long time, "Go ahead."
"I want to go back to my mother's house."
If the female lead was by his side at this time, they would have started a sweet life of a million words in the novel.
Zhao Nanyu bowed his head, and continued writing. He did not answer her.
Song Luan was fierce that she took the brush in his hand and said, "Do you agree or not?"
Zhao Nanyu raised his head and Song Luan felt guilty when she looked in his eyes.
***
"If you don't promise, I will go back."
Zhao Nanyu chuckled sarcastically and said, "You're dreaming."
Song Luan knew that he was not good at speaking. Regardless of what he said, she would go back to her mother's home this time, and would not intend to come back in time.
There was no big change in the plot, and the time of the original owner's poisoning was nearing, which would happen in the spring of this year. After the poisoning, the body would be tortured for two years before it would die.
There's nothing to believe in that man's mouth. According to Zhao Nanyu's character of holding grudges, Song Luan believed that after she transmigrated, she was still under the influence of poison.
Tch. To love and to kill each other. How wonderful! 
=============== Chapter 66
Song Luan was sitting beside the bed, but Zhao Nanyu ignored her, and only continued to practice his calligraphy calmly.
Even if Song Luan wanted to quarrel with him, he could stop her with just three or two words. As long as she didn't push his buttons, he wouldn't get angry, and would just watch her act mischievous like a fool.
A few days ago, Zhao Nanyu took care of her even when the situation in the capital was uncertain. Now that the overall situation was settled, he had already gotten the power that he wanted. How could he possibly let her go? The number of people guarding in the dark also hadn't decreased.
Song Luan took off her shoes and socks and tucked herself in the quilt. After sleeping for a while, she felt so hot that she stretched her bare feet out of the bed.
Zhao Nanyu knew that she couldn't sleep, so he didn't write nor read any words anymore. He went to the bedside and took off his clothes. Song Luan was still angry at him. After thinking about it, what should she do with this little pervert?
She turned around in silence and faced him. Her bright eyes were looking at him expectantly.
Before she could make a sound, Zhao Nanyu had already opened his mouth, and said, "I'll send someone to take you back at noon tomorrow, and you'll come back in the evening."
Song Luan's words were forced in her throat. She softened her voice and squeezed out a very sweet smile on her face. "How can this be enough? You can give me two more days. It's not that I won't come back."
Zhao Nanyu embraced her shoulders, and pressed her small head in his arms. He closed his eyes, hooked his lips, and said, "Then you can't go."
Song Luan swallowed her anger, and forced a smile, "You're my magnanimous husband."
Zhao Nanyu laughed and said, "Okay, I'll send you in the morning. Isn't that a long time? It will be enough."
"I'm so angry that I can't make sense with you."
It's useless reasoning with him.
It's strange that Zhao Nanyu could always guess what she's thinking. She arched out her arms, but was pulled back by the man behind her as soon as the quilt was covered.
That night, in Song Luan's long dream, there was a woman she had never seen before. She was wearing her familiar bright red dress, and her hair was decorated with flower ornaments.
She was gorgeous and exquisite.
She stood on the tower with her hair tied high. The cold wind swayed her dress. The expression on her face seemed very sad. No, it was not just sad, but it was a kind of despair.
The desperate smile on her lips seemed to show she didn't have any attachment to this world.
Her hands were tightly tied behind her, surrounded by a circle of armored soldiers, their sharp knives facing her. It's as if one single movement of hers would trigger the ten thousand swords in front of her to pierce her heart.
With the sound of 'zhu', a sharp arrow passed by Song Luan's ear, and the woman on the tower was shot directly. The person who shot the arrow was very skillful because it precisely pierced the center of her heart.
Song Luan couldn't tell whether it was a dream or not, but she could almost hear the sound of the arrow cutting through the cloth.
The arrow seemed to have been shot in her heart. Her chest was suddenly filled with severe pain. In betweens of being awake and being asleep, she saw the young taoist who she had met once. His expressionless face whispered faintly on her ear, "Did you see that? That is you."
Song Luan covered her chest, and was unable to stand straight.
She was woken up by Zhao Nanyu.
When she woke up, her head was covered with sweat and her face was pale. Zhao Nanyu's dark eyes looked at her motionlessly, and his eyes were even more worried. He asked, "Why are you crying?"
He gently wiped her tears, as he sighed, "If you really want to stay with your mother for a few more days, it's not impossible."
In the dream, although the sharp arrow that penetrated the heart disappeared, her chest still felt a little dull, and there was a kind of stagnant air hovering above it.
She suddenly stretched out her hand and hugged Zhao Nanyu's waist. She desperately looked at him and said, "My chest hurts."
Who was that young taoist? He obviously knew more than she did. What was this weird dream? Why was the woman who was pierced by an arrow on top of the tower in her dream familiar?
Zhao Nanyu's face changed slightly, and the blood color of his lips faded a little. He said, "I'll ask Zhao Chao to come and see you."
This time he invited not a doctor, but Zhao Chao.
Zhao Nanyu's face was as white as paper. With his eyes closed, he could still remember the symptom of tianqing.
At first, it would start with only a trivial pain, but slowly, the ache would gradually deepen, corroding her internal organs step by step, and the person under this poison would die slowly in great pain.
Song Luan looked up at him and said, "Can you call someone else? Your brother still hates me."
"He dares not."
"Okay."
Zhao Nanyu moved, and was planning to get up and dressed, but Song Luan's chest was stuffy, and she was still very uncomfortable, so she held his waist and refused to let go. "Don't go. Stay with me for a while."
Holding him could make her feel at ease.
Zhao Nanyu was shocked, but he nodded, and said gentle words to her, while his fingers gently brushed her hair. "Do you want to sleep for a while? Don't worry, I won't go."
"I'll just hold you. I don't want to sleep." She wrapped her hands and legs around him, clinging closely to his lead body, rubbing every inch, "You are so comfortable."
Fragrant, warm.
Zhao Nanyu's mood gradually changed by her constant rubbing, his eyes became dark, "Don't move."
A man who hadn't had sex for two months couldn't stand the slightest provocation.
His ferociousness could leave her half dead.
***
Zhao Chao's marriage meetings came one after another, but his mother had no way to force him. His parents were in a hurry, but he himself was not, so he didn't take it to heart.
When his second elder brother invited him to live in Huai Shui Residence, Zhao Chao was happy in his heart, because he didn't need to listen to his mother's thoughts.
After he arrived, Zhao Chao found that his second brother's face was not very good, and the air pressure around him was heavy. He unfolded his fan and half jokingly said, "Second brother can get angry in the morning?"
Zhao Nanyu pursed his lips. "I don't have the heart to laugh with you. You carefully check the pulse of your second sister-in-law."
Zhao Chao's fingers stopped, and he began to show his upright smile, "What's the matter?"
Zhao Nanyu took a deep breath. His throat was hoarse, and his original voice couldn't be heard. He said, "Are you sure that the amount of poison I took before is not enough to kill her?"
In fact, he stopped the drug early summer last year.
Advertisements
Before Zhao Nanyu fell in love with Song Luan, he still wanted her to die.
Song Luan's temperament began to change obviously. At that time, he thought she was pretending, so he still didn't show mercy.
It was when spring had passed that he completely put off his killing intention. He stopped the poison in the early summer.
Zhao Chao was silent, and could only say, "My master is eccentric. He only makes poisons, not antidotes. But last time when I checked sister-in-law, I didn't see any signs of poisoning."
Either the time was short, or the quantity was insufficient. Zhao Chao was not clear which one it was.
"Go and see her," Zhao Nanyu said.
In any case, he would not let her die.
Zhao Nanyu pulled up the corner of his mouth and laughed. He couldn't let her die in his own hands.
Song Luan came out of the house, her clothes were light and flowing. It showed her full waist.
She stood in the sunlight, the golden light poured down, and it evenly sprinkled on her body. Her skin looked fair and beautiful.
Zhao Chao shook for a moment. He quickly retracted his eyes, stepped back two steps, and said, "Second sister-in-law."
Song Luan pretended to smile at him. "Third brother."
She didn't want to get angry with Zhao Chao, fortunately, he didn't look at her with eyes full of scorn.
The two didn't have much to talk about, so Song Luan took the lead in saying, "I heard from my mother that you have been meeting with a lot of girls these days. Is there anyone you like?"
Zhao Chao frowned. "You don't have to worry about it."
Song Luan had no intentions of worrying about it. She just had nothing to say. The atmosphere was too awkward, so she just picked up a random topic. She didn't know that it would irritate him.
"My mouth talks a lot." Song Luan said.
Zhao Chao asked, "I heard from second elder brother that second sister-in-law is not feeling well these days?"
Song Luan put on her make-up, so he couldn't see how she looked. "It's the old symptoms."
Zhao Nanyu knew that she didn't want to see Zhao Chao, but he was not willing to let her see a doctor, so he held her hand and said, "Let the third brother check your pulse first."
Song Luan didn't want to make trouble, so she sat down and stretched out her hand.
She had a speculation in her heart that before she fainted, the pain in her heart was only just a prelude.
At present, there was no way to change the ending of the plot directly related to the original owner. The days of the original owner's poisoning would not change.
It would be one day this spring.
Maybe it was today.
He put his finger on her pulse and held his breath. After a while, Song Luan found that Zhao Chao's face gradually became ugly. He gave her a deep look, and hesitantly spoke, "Second sister-in-law..."
Zhao Chao found that Song Luan's heart had been eroded very badly.
It's clear that there was no diagnosis last time.
"What happened to me? I feel very good. Both my waist and legs do not ache. I can eat and drink. I can also jump."
Why did Zhao Chao look at her with that expression that she was dying? Didn't he know it's bad and unlucky?
She hated this kind of look that made her believe she would die!
Zhao Chao did not know how to make a sound for a moment, so he had to shut his mouth.
He only gave her a silent response.
It took Zhao Nanyu a long time to find his voice. His bones turned white, as he asked, "How is she? Please tell the truth."
"Not so good."
Zhao Chao didn't want to say those words in front of Song Luan. He once hoped that Song Luan would die. But now, he couldn't bear to, what should his second brother do?
Killed the woman he loves? He couldn't stand it.
Song Luan looked at Zhao Nanyu dead-white face. His lean body seems like it would be blown by the wind. He was really worried about her.
Song Luan took Zhao Nanyu's arm and said, "I'm really good. These are all old problems. Don't make a fuss about it. Oh, I'm in a hurry to see...poof.."
Before she could finish talking, Song Luan's throat was filled with blood, and the corners of her mouth slowly oozed with blood, which accidentally got on Zhao Nanyu's clothes.
Truly.
The original book was now retaliating against her!!! Not a single thing.
[The dazzling sunshine was a little bright. The wind in early spring was cool. The magnolia flowers on the branches and the petals were swinging with the wind. Song Luan held the tree trunk, and a mouthful of blood spurted out from her lips.]
Song Luan looked at the magnolia flower blooming in the yard. She was very sure that she was poisoned. She slowly moved her eyes to Zhao Nanyu's face and wanted to tell him that he didn't need to be sad.
Save your energy and wait for me to die.
=============== Chapter 67
Song Luan really didn't feel much. Even at the moment of vomiting, she felt relieved. At last, she didn't have to be afraid.
Zhao Nanyu really poisoned her. She couldn't avoid fate.
When she actually faced this moment, she was rather indifferent.
However, Song Luan's desire for survival was still strong. She didn't want to die.
No matter what era she was in, she didn't want to die.
Life is so beautiful.
She also had a lot of things she hadn't done yet.
She didn't have a good relationship with others yet and still couldn't bear to die like this.
She relied on Zhao Nanyu, and still had the strength to smile at him. "I don't think I can go back to my mother's home today."
She couldn't breathe, and her heart was dull and painful. At this moment, she felt the whirling feeling that she had only read in the book.
Her hands and feet were cold, and she had no strength. The corner of her eyes were moist, her little hand took his sleeve, and shook him. Her voice became smaller and smaller, "I don't want to die."
I really don't want to.
Why was it her? She only read the book and was inexplicably transported.
Even if she transmigrated, why did it have to be in a rubbish script setting! She couldn't change anything, because she transmigrated too late.
Song Luan began to think...was it at the beginning when she made a bad comment under the book 'The Powerful Minister'? She wrote a dog blood comment, and got retribution?
She had always been working hard. Song Luan was more and more aggrieved, clearly she did nothing wrong.
Thinking of this, Song Luan cried. Her hot tears rolled down in string. Her cheeks were moist and her eyes were red.
Zhao Nanyu thought that she was crying because of pain. He held her and took a deep breath, as he said in a low voice, "You won't die. Don't talk nonsense."
He was not disgusted with her dirt. He gently wiped the blood from the corners of her mouth with his sleeves.
Song Luan was carried into the room by him. She knew that he was also very sad. His eyes were full of blood, and his face was completely bloodless.
Such a man with everything under control could panic.
After suddenly vomiting blood, Song Luan felt that her chest was not so stuffy.
She still had no strength. Her upper and lower eyelids were fighting the drowsiness.
Zhao Chao just took the pulse for her. Without his second brother's command, he immediately said, "I'll go to make the medicine."
He couldn't come up with an antidote, so he had to prescribe some soothing drugs.
Song Luan was only vomiting blood now. She would gradually feel the pain later on. The poison would slowly permeate her organs and corrode her lungs.
This attack would last for several years.
As soon as Song Luan laid on the bed, she went to sleep, and didn't have to think about anything.
She felt that Zhao Nanyu had been by her side. This person had everything under his control, but now he looked helpless.
They had looked for Zhao Chao's master for more than a year already, but still couldn't find him.
Whenever they managed to catch a clue, they would soon lose track.
It was getting dark, and Song Luan was sleeping for a day. The ups and downs of her chest gradually calmed down, and her breath slowly subsided.
Zhao Nanyu held her hand and sat by the bedside all day. There was no light in the room. His face that looked slightly sharp, was deeply immersed in the darkness.
She could not see the expression on his face.
When Zhao Nanyu gave her a dose of medicine, Song Luan was very obedient and swallowed it all.
After a long time, Song Luan finally opened her eyes and blinked. She slowly sat up from the bed, while murmuring, "It's so dark."
"I'm going to put on the light." Zhao Nanyu's voice was hoarse, and she was startled.
The candle was lighted, but it was not very bright. Song Luan could now see his face clearly.
Under the warm light, the white and delicate face of Zhao Nanyu was reflected. His clothes had not been changed, and her blood was still on his white robes. Song Luan swallowed her saliva and said, "Why didn't you change your clothes?"
Zhao Nanyu loves to be clean! His cleanliness-obsession is very serious. He always had to change a set of clothes whenever he came back from work.
"Forgot."
"Then go to the bath, and change clothes. I'm awake. I'm fine." Song Luan tried to use her usual tone of speaking.
Zhao Nanyu nodded, "Okay."
Listening to the sound of the water, Song Luan was in a complicated mood. She opened the quilt and got out of bed. She put on her shoes and went out directly. As expected, it was a mess.
Several vases on the bookshelf were broken, and the desk was in disorder. It seems that no one came in to clean it up.
Zhao Nanyu changed his clothes and didn't see her. He looked at her thin back, his jaw tightened, and stared deeply.
Her back was ethereal, as if she would leave any time.
"Why did you get out of bed?" He asked.
Song Luan smiled. "I'm not made of glass."
She said in a tone of indifference, "Isn't it just spitting blood?"
Her mentality was really good! Great!
Zhao Nanyu took her cold hand and touched it gently. "Go in."
Song Luan stood still, and smelled the light fragrance of his body. She pointed to the debris on the ground, and asked, "Did you lose your temper this afternoon?"
Advertisements
She remembered that the vase on the shelf was very valuable. When she planned to run away, she thought about whether to take it with her, but gave up the idea because it was too big.
Now that it was broken by Zhao Nanyu, she felt that it was a pity. It could be changed for money.
Zhao Nanyu admitted.
Not only did he lose his temper, but threw a great fit. He scared the maidservants, thus they were afraid to step into the room to clean up the debris.
Zhao Chao told him that there was no other way but to wait.
Song Luan sighed and lamented, "I haven't ever seen you throw things."
He could always keep calm, at least on the surface. No one could see anything wrong, even if he was really angry, he would only secretly make some means to take revenge.
Zhao Nanyu's lips rose slightly. He wanted to smile but couldn't.
Song Luan turned around, and looked up to see his facial features clearly.
He is good-looking, everywhere is beautiful, flawless and perfect.
"Ah Yu."
She hadn't called him that for a long time.
Zhao Nanyu stroked her soft hair and asked, "What is it?"
"Don't smash expensive things next time." She was a little distressed.
Zhao Nanyu was slightly dumbfounded. He didn't expect that she could still say unimportant words.
"Okay."
Song Luan slept for a day, and was naturally not sleepy at this time. She rolled around on the bed with the quilt.
Zhao Nanyu was amused at the way she wrapped herself in a cocoon. He pulled the person out of the cocoon, and said, "Drink the medicine."
"Zhao Chao's medicine?"
"Yes."
"Is his master a legendary doctor!?"
"Yes."
Okay. She would obediently drink the medicine.
Without needing to coax her, she held the bowl up her neck and drank the medicine completely, just like she was drinking water.
But Zhao Chao's medicine was really bitter, her facial features wrinkled together, and she felt a little nauseous. This medicine was worse than all the medicine she had ever drunk before.
Sure enough, the legendary doctor was different.
"Well, you've been with me all day. Are you not busy with your own work? You go to work quickly! Don't worry about me. I'm fine."
Song Luan didn't ask anything. She guessed that after she transmigrated, Zhao Nanyu had still continued to poison her.
She seems to know everything.
She felt a little pity for herself and Zhao Nanyu.
The man loves her, but in the end, she would be killed by him.
Fate made them.
Song Luan remembered deeply how the original owner died. The sharp edge of the dagger was aimed at her heart, and it was held by Zhao Nanyu's hand.
It hurts to think about it.
She may have dug up the man's grave in her last life, took out his body, and whipped it. This might be the reason why she was suffering in this life.
It's too miserable.
Zhao Nanyu was still looking at her with deep eyes.
"You have a rest."
"But I'm not sleepy. "
"You have to rest." He insisted.
Song Luan couldn't help but hammer him with her fist, "Then why don't you rest!?"
Zhao Nanyu raised his lips and said, "You asked me to go work."
Song Luan looked up at him with her head raised. "Well, I changed my mind. You are not allowed to go."
"Good. "
She was so stupid that she didn't know she was in his pocket.
Song Luan hummed, and laid back on the bed, her back facing him.
***
Song Luan's chance to go back to her mother's home was ruined last time. Zhao Nanyu looked over her intensely. She was always guarded.
Most of the time, it was Zhao Nanyu who accompanied her personally.
He wouldn't say a word, just holding her wrist was enough.
But Song Luan's condition was not much better. She often coughed up blood. She dared not let Zhao Nanyu see her handkerchief with blood in her hand. His eyes were too terrible and eerie.
The male lead himself was an extremely dark character, Song Luan was really afraid of his blackening on the spot.
But as she coughed more and more times, she coughed up more blood than before.
Fortunately, the medicine of Zhao Chao began to take effect, and Song Luan's frequency of coughing up blood decreased at a speed visible to the naked eye.
She had no chance to breathe. She had been suffocated for a long time.
Taking advantage of the fine weather, and the fact that Zhao Nanyu was not at home. She made a kite and flew it in the yard.
After two laps, she was sweating and panting.
The kite flew too high, the line broke in half, and her tiger kite fell outside the wall.
Song Luan subconsciously wanted to climb up the wall, and take down the tiger kite on the elm tree outside the courtyard. She raised her foot, but took it back again.
If Zhao Nanyu saw, he would break her dog legs.
This man was getting darker and darker. In the middle of the night, sometimes when her throat was dry, and wanted to get up and drink, she would always come face to face with his clear eyes.
Dark and deep, with eyes full of countless extreme emotions, looking straight at her.
Song Luan's scalp felt numbed, and her heart palpitated.
He was more domineering than ever before. He didn't let her go outside, or anything that exerted her strength. He regarded her as a fragile doll.
Song Luan instructed the bodyguard, "Go and help me get the kite back."
"Yes."
Just as she was about to take out her handkerchief to wipe the sweat from her forehead, she saw an extra hand. A plain handkerchief was handed to her, and the man sighed, "You."
Please tolerate this poor woman who would someday die.
Song Luan wanted to say this sentence very much, but because of Zhao Nanyu's sensitivity these days whenever he looked at her, she just swallowed back.
She was not as flexible as before.
Everything was moving towards the original plot.
To be honest, Song Luan didn't want to die in his hands. If there was no way to go in the end, she would silently avoid it, and she would come to greet death from a distance.
The male lead had a glass heart, and will be in extreme sorrow.
The sorrow would blacken his heart.
What if he cried while holding her?
Song Luan really couldn't imagine the male lead's crying appearance, she suddenly laughed out loud.
Zhao Nanyu raised her chin with two fingers. "Are you in a good mood?"
=============== Chapter 68
Song Luan's face was tender and smooth enough that it could pinch water. After coughing twice, she whispered, "Yes."
Even if the weather was good in spring, it was still cold. Zhao Nanyu wrapped her in his arms with his cloak, kissed her forehead, and sighed, "It's cold outside. It's better to stay indoors."
Her body couldn't stand a slightest oversight.
Song Luan obediently shrunk in his arms. "I'm suffocated by staying in the room every day. And I'm much better these two days. Coming out to breath is nothing."
Zhao Nanyu didn't say anything to her, but punished the servants around her. His voice was a little cold, "Didn't I say? Don't let her out without my permission."
However, if Song Luan really wanted to do something, no one could dare stop her. They had all seen the appearance of this young lady losing her temper before.
Zhao Nanyu rubbed his eyebrows and called in his guards. He said in a cold voice, "Look for two obedient girls to serve her."
Obedience meant to listen to his words, and those servants should not be afraid of Song Luan.
"Yes. I'll do it now."
Song Luan was already asleep.
After returning to the room, she had wanted to read two books. She took one from the bookshelf, and the dense words in it made her feel dizzy and drowsy.
Zhao Nanyu returned, and saw that she was lying on the cushion. Her whole face was buried in the book. He went over and covered her with a blanket. He gently pulled out the book in her hand. Her cheeks were a little reddish, and her mouth was slightly pursed. She didn't seem to be sleeping very well, because of her turning around and changing her posture every once in a while.
Zhao Nanyu hugged her for fear that she would catch a cold. However, this woke Song Luan up, her long eyelashes moving, as she opened her eyes slowly, feeling confused. She rubbed her eyes, yawned, and asked, "Did I just fall asleep?"
"Yes." He then asked, "Are you still sleepy? Do you want to go back to sleep?"
Song Luan looked out, and seeing it wasn't dark yet, she shook her head and said, "I won't sleep."
As her mind cleared up, she put her arm around his neck and said, "This book can make people dizzy."
"I'll buy you some folk scripts tomorrow."
Zhao Nanyu also knew that she was not a reasonable person, and couldn't bear to stay inside her room. It was unfortunate that he was busy these days, and couldn't accompany her.
Song Luan still had a high fever at night. She was still talking nonsense in her dream. Her face turned pale again, losing a lot of blood color. These days, she had lost a lot of weight. She didn't look as plump as before. She was so weak that she could be broken with a mere twist.
Zhao Chao was not in the residence, so Zhao Nanyu called the doctor to come and prescribed a dose of antipyretic medicine. Song Luan gradually got better after drinking the medicine, and the temperature on her forehead didn't drop until the latter half of the night.
After tossing in her sleep, it was almost dawn.
Song Luan's consciousness was dim. She didn't respond much to what happened outside. She didn't even open her eyes, she just felt that she didn't sleep well. She couldn't even remember the words she hummed in her mouth.
She woke up feeling fresh the next day. Zhao Nanyu must have wiped her sweat last night.
She sat up quietly from the bed. In front of the window coffin silently stood a man with a lean body, and a gloomy aura.
When he felt Song Luan's gaze, Zhao Nanyu turned around and saw her sitting on the bed.
The deep shadow in his eyes gradually dissipated. "Awake?"
Song Luan's brain was still in a daze. "Yes."
She opened her mouth, and wanted to explain that she was really not that weak. After a second thought, it seemed that it wasn't needed, because even she did not believe her own words.
Song Luan sighed. Zhao Nanyu would be stricter with her in the future.
She did not expect that her body's immunity had become so bad that when she just got hit by a bit of wind outside, she fell ill immediately. It was really terrible.
She finally understood why the original owner wanted to die. She slowly felt that all the organs in her body were damaged. She felt the pain from her five internal organs, which felt worse than that being disabled.
A chilling air spread through her mind, when Song Luan thought of the days to come.
Her fingers were shaking uncontrollably. Zhao Nanyu held her hand in the palm of his hand and asked, "Is it cold?"
"No." She had a hoarse voice.
Zhao Nanyu asked again, "Are you hungry?"
"I'm hungry. I want to eat dumplings."
"Good."
Soon, a bowl of hot dumplings was brought to her.
Song Luan was really hungry, but when she ate only a few dumplings, she felt full already.
She put the bowl back and refused to eat any more.
"Eat more. You only ate a few." If she went on like this, she would be very thin.
"I really can't eat it."
Even if Song Luan pulled his sleeve and acted coquettish, it didn't work. Zhao Nanyu gently pinched her jaw and forced her to open her mouth. "If you eat this bowl, I won't force you."
Song Luan was forced by him to eat more. She frowned, and tried to avoid the spoon. She looked at him pitifully and said, "I can't eat anymore. I'm going to throw up."
She felt some nausea. It was very uncomfortable.
Zhao Nanyu sighed and finally let her off.
Song Luan disliked the smell of dumplings in the room, so she had to get out of bed and open the window. Zhao Nanyu held her hand down to keep her from moving, "Still want to open the window? Being ill again is not enough, right?"
Song Luan shook her head, looked at him innocently and said, "The smell of the dumpling is too strong, I want to open the window for it to go out."
Zhao Nanyu wrapped her up tightly, then reluctantly agreed. He went to the window and opened a little crack for her.
Song Luan was still suffering from a low fever.
She guessed that Zhao Nanyu would not let her out of the room until the weather was warm.
The people who had been waiting on Song Luan's side had also been replaced by some iron hearted little girls. She didn't know where they came from, and guessed that these people were all good at martial arts.
Song Luan couldn't help but miss her former servant girls. They were soft and cute. If she pretended to be a ruthless lady, they would relent and obey what she wanted. Unlike now...
Advertisements
No freedom! No right!
*Sobbing, sobbing.*
But Song Luan was also good at understanding, thinking that Zhao Nanyu might be doing this for her own good, what could she do? Just put up with it.
***
After the Spring Festival, little Zhao officially went to private school to study. Naturally, a little boy like him didn't have to live in a boarding house, and he could go home every day, but Zhao Nanyu was strict and regularly checked his homework every day.
Song Luan could only see this child five or six times a month. As soon as the new year was over, he was as tall as a branch, and his height was much taller.
However, the child's temper did not change much. He was indifferent to outsiders and didn't smile a lot.
Only when he saw his mother, would he smile.
Before that, Song Luan was still having a fever. She was afraid that she would pass the disease on him, and didn't allow him to come.
After the fever completely subsided, and she no longer coughed, little Zhao came to see her again.
Zhao Wenyan also came, and he looked calmer than before the last time she saw him. There was no malice in his eyes, but his mouth had nothing good to say.
She hadn't seen outsiders for a long time, so when someone came to talk to her, she felt very happy!
She winked at Zhao Wenyan and tried to speak to him in an elder's voice. "Ah Yan, I heard your mother say that your marriage is settled?"
She covered her mouth and laughed. "Congratulations."
Third lady Zhao once came to check her fever, and casually mentioned it. Song Luan could see that third lady Zhao was very satisfied with her future daughter-in-law.
In the original book, Zhao Wenyan didn't get a wife from the beginning to the end. It was only the original owner in his eyes. This time, when Song Luan heard that he could have a good home, she was really happy for him.
Zhao Wenyan smiled, "Thank you, second sister-in-law."
***
Besides congratulating him, Song Luan also wanted to know which wife Zhao Wenyan would have in the future?
"I don't know who the lucky girl is."
"I thought my mother told you everything. Do you still need to ask me?"
Song Luan laughed, "You don't want to say it."
In fact, she was not so curious. She would have known sooner or later.
Song Luan just couldn't understand Zhao Wenyan's temper? She laughed and shook her head.
She couldn't understand what these young people were thinking.
Zhao Wenyan couldn't get everything out in one breath. "She's a knowledgeable and reasonable lady. In short, she is better than you! She is more sensible than you, and she recognizes more words than you."
The original owner who only loved beauty, and only had interest in gold, silver, and jewelry. Of course, she couldn't recognize too many words.
Song Luan, who transmigrated, was also stumbling to understand the font of this dynasty, so she couldn't complain. She would fall asleep every time she read a book. It's not too much to say that she was half illiterate.
"Okay." Song Luan didn't care.
Zhao Wenyan seemed to be frustrated. He stood up, and turned to leave. As soon as he got to the door, he remembered what he had come for. He turned around angrily and put the things he had brought on the table.
"This is what I..." He said, but immediately changed his tone. "This is the tonic my mother asked me to give you. Don't ask too much. This medicine is a good one. Just take it. It's disgusting to see you look sick."
Weak...like dying.
Song Luan said, "Thank you."
"You should mind your own business. Don't worry about others." He pointed to the box he had brought, "There is a valuable snow lotus in it. You don't...waste my mother's kindness."
"I thank mother in Ah Luan's behalf." Zhao Nanyu came back from the outside in a cold air.
His eyes turned around to look at Zhao Wenyan, and finally fell on the snow lotus plant he had brought. "Mother really took too much trouble."
This was not what the third lady asked him to bring, but Zhao Wenyan spent a lot of money to buy it.
=============== Chapter 69
Zhao Wenyan disdained lying ever since he was young, so he seldom tells lies. When he met his brother's sharp eyes, he felt guilty, and coughed twice. He said, "Second brother, I have something else to do. I'll go first."
Zhao Nan Yu nodded. "Okay."
Zhao Wenyan just barely escaped from the room. He always felt even his careful thinking could not hide anything from his second brother.
Zhao Wenyan didn't know what he was thinking when he got the snow lotus flower, because when he first saw it, he couldn't help but buy it for her.
He also heard about Song Luan's illness during the Spring Festival. However, his second brother didn't let anyone come to see her. Zhao Wenyan didn't want to ask for trouble, so he kept silent.
He had just finished the exam and just returned home. He heard again from his mother about his second sister-in-law's illness, so he came to have a look.
Zhao Wenyan still thought that Song Luan was still beautiful even if she was ill. Her delicate body made people feel distressed.
He didn't fall in love with his second sister-in-law. He just felt that she was not as annoying as before. Zhao Wenyan discovered that Song Luan had a delicate and graceful side. She was weak and dignified.
The people in Huai Shui residence were so tight that he couldn't find out what was wrong with Song Luan, and how her face turned so pale.
It's the early spring, but Song Luan was dressed so tightly, and the room was full of carbon fire.
Just now when Zhao Wenyan stayed inside for a while, his forehead was already sweating. He didn't know how his second brother could endure it.
When Zhao Wenyan left, he didn't close the door. The wind blew into the room, and Song Luan shivered as she stood right in the wind.
She felt that she was more and more afraid of the cold after she became sick again.
Zhao Nanyu closed the door for her in silence. His slender fingers gently picked up the snow lotus on the table, and said with a cold smile, "Ah Yan is arrogant. It's rare for him having this sort of behaviour."
Song Luan rubbed her hands. Sure enough, she didn't notice the irony and sourness in his voice. She took the snow lotus from his hands, and said, "If it wasn't for third lady Zhao, he wouldn't have come here."
Zhao Nanyu laughed and flicked his finger at her forehead. "Silly."
She believed what others say.
Song Luan stared at the snow lotus in her palm for a long time. After looking at it for a long time, she put it back into the box, licked her lips, and narrowed her eyes and said, "I'll stew this flower tonight."
Snow lotus was a noble and rare plant. She had only seen this in books before.
Zhao Nanyu took a sip of tea and said, "What about little Zhao?"
"I told him to go inside." She was talking to Zhao Wenyan just now, and the arrogant child refused to go. Song Luan was afraid that little Zhao would hear something he was not supposed to, so she let the child go.
With a sigh, she said, "I'll go in and see him."
Little Zhao straightened his back and sat upright in front of the desk. His small face, which was originally white and tender, was a little red. He took off his jacket and outer shirt, so he would feel comfortable.
Song Luan's temperature was lower than that of ordinary people. Naturally, she didn't feel the hotness in the room. Zhao Nanyu was extremely tolerant. He had never complained or wiped his sweat. Therefore, Song Luan thought that the temperature in the room was just right for anyone.
She took out a handkerchief from her sleeve, took little Zhao to her lap, and gently wiped the sweat off his forehead.
"Open the window when it's hot. Don't be stupid. If you sweat, you'll get sick."
Little Zhao's face was still red, "It's not hot."
"You're sweating and you say you're not hot?" Song Luan pinched his face with a smile. "Lying is not good for children."
Song Luan immediately got up and held him in her arms. She went to the window and propped up the window pane. The cool wind rushed into the room and dissipated the heat inside.
He pulled Song Luan's sleeve and said, "Mother, close the window. I'm not hot."
Father said that mother's health was not good, and shouldn't be exposed to cold air...
Song Luan touched his head, smiling, "How many words have you just written? Can I have a look? I'd like to see if we've made progress in memorizing the characters."
Little Zhao ignored her, and wriggled out his body from her bosom. His mother intentionally changed the topic and refused to close the window, so he went by himself, and climbed on the bench.
Song Luan patted him on the back. "What's wrong with hugging? You don't like me anymore?"
When he heard her words, he did not move. His expression was mournful and his eyes were down. He looked at her as if he was wronged, with a pair of wet black eyes. "Close the window."
This child was also very stubborn. Song Luan realized this a long time ago. With Zhao Nanyu's character, she couldn't change her son's stubbornness.
After opening the window for awhile, the room was not as hot as before.
Song Luan closed the window again according to little Zhao's wishes. He put his little head on her shoulder and said to her in a small voice, "Yesterday, the teacher praised my words."
He copied how his father wrote. It was good to be able to learn the shape at this age.
Song Luan went to the table and took out his copy of the font and found that it was really good, much better than hers.
She praised, "It's really good, little Zhao!"
The child's eyes were bent with a smile. It was a happy day to be praised by his mother.
Song Luan said, "I'll ask someone to frame it tomorrow and hang it on the wall?"
He was too shy to raise his head, while he blushed, and said shyly, "No...no."
Song Luan pursed a smile, teasing the child was really interesting. She liked to make the expressionless-son laugh.
Her son was the most lovely.
However, after holding him for so long, Song Luan's arm felt a little sour. Zhao Nanyu opened the curtain and walked in from outside. His eyes were cold. He looked at little Zhao.
He was not happy, while looking at him with deep eyes. He said in a deep voice, "Come down from your mother."
Song Luan put him down, and glared at Zhao Nanyu. "What are you doing to him?"
Zhao Nanyu frowned and said, "He is not young anymore, but he always clings to his mother."
He felt that his voice was too heavy just now, so he squatted down, and waved to little Zhao. "Come here."
Little Zhao stepped on his little boots and ran to him. Zhao Nanyu caught him and lowered his voice, "Shouldn't we become more sensible when we're a year older? Don't pester your mother all the time."
Advertisements
Little Zhao silently listened, and didn't say anything.
Zhao Nanyu thought that the child hadn't seen his mother for so many days, so he (LZ) was having a temper with him(ZN).
He stood up and said slowly, "Okay, don't be angry. I'll test your homework."
Song Luan knew that ancient people were intelligent. They went to school at the age of three, and got married at puberty.
She interrupted, "He passed the exam, and he did well in his studies."
Zhao Nanyu raised his eyebrows and laughed, "Did you test him?"
His mocking smile towards her was too obvious.
Song Luan's face turned red when she was teased by him. Although she was a high intellectual in modern times, she was half illiterate when she came here.
She said, "Well! I tested him. What about it?"
Zhao Nanyu pressed his hand against her lips, and said with a smile, "Well, since you tested him, I won't test his homework."
***
The weather was completely warm after the cold spring had passed.
However, the carbon fire in Song Luan's room was still burning. No one dared to extinguish it. Song Luan had no spirit after staying in the room for a long time, she wanted to go to the yard to bask in the sun.
As for kite flying, she dare not even think about it. Zhao Nanyu certainly won't allow her to fly a kite. The two servant girls around her were also watching closely.
Zhao Nanyu spent most of his time at home, but his confidants came to the Zhao residence to discuss important matters with him, and they were mostly in his study.
After Song Luan slept in the sun with a warm blanket, she stretched her arms, and said, "I'll go to the study to see him."
The two maidservants wanted to stop her, but Song Luan waved her hand impatiently, "What can happen on the way? If I don't walk around, my muscles and bones will be loose."
The maidservants thought for a while, the body of madam was better than before, and her face finally had a rosy color, so they didn't refuse again.
It was not good to go to Zhao Nanyu's study empty handed, so she carried two plates of pastries as she went.
Zhao Nanyu seemed to have guests, but he had instructed the bodyguards outside the study not to stop her from going in.
The study looked very bright, with the windows and lights open.
In front of Zhao Nanyu stood a handsome young man with a cold jaw line. His face was tight and expressionless.
He was dressed in black and had a sword pinned to his waist. It seemed that he was a military officer.
There was also a scar in the center of his eyebrow, which was not deep nor shallow. The size of the scar equated to a length of a nail plate, which made him look fierce.
The man raised his eyes and looked at her coldly, obviously disgusted.
Song Luan pretended that she didn't see it. She couldn't count the people who hated her. Why bother about this extra person?
She put the cake on his desk and laughed. "I didn't know you had a guest, if I did I wouldn't have come."
Zhao Nanyu squeezed her hand. It was cold, and it seemed that he couldn't warm it enough. He then embraced her into his arms. "It's nothing."
"I won't disturb you anymore."
Zhao Nanyu pulled her back. "Don't worry about it."
And he said to the man in front of him, "Lu Ji, you should have a cup of tea first."
Lu Ji was a little surprised. Even a military officer, who didn't listen too much of outside rumors, had heard of Song Luan's deeds.
From the bottom of his heart, he hated women who didn't act in accordance to women's principles.
In the recent years, Song Luan's arrogant and insolent attitude spread around the city. So, Lu Ji, thought to himself that when he came back to the capital, he had to restrain himself from killing her. Wow. His hatred is deep.
Why does Mr. Zhao treat such woman so well? It's not worth it.
Lu Ji guessed that it might be because of her beauty. She was thin and delicate, and her eyes seemed to be full of light, which made people feel pity for her.
Song Luan knew the name of Lu Ji. He was the confidant of the male lead, and the commander of the imperial guards.
Because his mother left her sick husband and eloped with another man, he had been lonely since childhood. This was also the reason why he hated Song Luan.
Song Luan didn't want to stay here, nor being stared at by his disgusted look."You let me go. "
"Come on. Stay a little longer."
Zhao Nanyu refused to let go of her hand, so Song Luan had to stay. Her face was red with anger towards him. She looked very cute.
Lu Ji glanced at her and silently withdrew his sight.
Good figure, good color, no wonder Mr. Zhao liked her.
Zhao Nanyu didn't like her being seen by outsiders, so he covered her face,
Then he said to Lu Ji, "Go back first."
"Yes."
Song Luan was bored playing with his fingers. She looked over and around, opened and closed her arms, but she didn't think it was fun. It was just too boring.
Although Zhao Nanyu's face was cold, Song Luan knew that he was in a good mood.
Zhao Nanyu laughed, "Zhao Chao's master is on his way back to the capital."
Her poison would be solved.
Song Luan yawned, and didn't hear him clearly, "What? What are you talking about?"
Zhao Nanyu said again with good temper.
Song Luan had no hope of detoxification, but the surprise suddenly knocked her brain out.
Would she be saved??? In the book, the original owner didn't drink the antidote until she died.
At the same time, Song Luan was also a little worried. After all, the plots that happened before, no matter how she tried, anything related to her would not change.
She was afraid it would be the same this time.
Thinking of this, Song Luan couldn't help hugging Zhao Nanyu, "I'll be okay, right?"
She certainly didn't want to die. If she could live long, that would be good.
At night, Zhao Nanyu hugged her as he slept. At first, Song Luan was not very willing to sleep being embraced by him, but later, she found that sleeping in his arms was comfortable, which made her compromise.
She arched uneasily in his arms for two times to find the most comfortable posture, and then closed her eyes.
After a while, Song Luan opened her eyes, because she had a stomach ache. Her face turned pale, cold sweat came out of her back, and her facial features were slightly distorted.
Zhao Nanyu soon noticed her slight change and asked, "What's the matter?"
Song Luan whimpered, her voice came out of her throat, as she stuttered, "I...I...feel uncomfortable. My stomach hurts."
It's not a stomach ache. She didn't know which part of her body was being attacked.
She grabbed Zhao Nanyu's sleeve, as if he was a painkiller.
Zhao Nanyu's warm palm covered her stomach, "Is it here?"
Song Luan shook her head and gasped, "No."
His hand moved up. "Here?"
"No." Her eyes were red. "I don't know where the pain is..."
Zhao Nanyu, with a pale face, had to hold her and rub her stomach gently.
After an hour of incense, Song Luan's pain gradually stopped. She fell into his arms feebly, and her hair was wet with sweat.
Zhao Nanyu pinched her waist, his eyes flashed with pain, and the shadow in his heart deepened.
When she met his terrifying eyes, she couldn't help but shrink back.
Looking at it from this angle, his eyes were even more grim.
He pinched her neck gently, bent his head, and bit her white lips, as he murmured, "I'm sorry."
But it's a false repentance.
Not enough to tolerate Song Luan leaving him.
=============== Chapter 70
Song Luan was waiting for the legendary doctor.
She was not a pessimist, but this time she only had little expectations in her heart. Which was also not too bad. If there was no good result in the end, she could bear it calmly.
In the past few months, the relationship between her and Zhao Nanyu began to clear up. Maybe because there was nothing to do, but as long as the weather was fine, she would wander to Zhao Nanyu's study, even reaching to the point of watching him write.
Song Luan went to find him that day, and there was no one guarding outside.
Standing in the distance, she could hear a terrible cry coming from inside. The sorrow was extremely desperate, and she could feel its hoarse and broken voice.
Song Luan slowed down and approached the door. Looking through the slit, she saw a half dead man lying on the ground. Zhao Nanyu held one end of the whip in his hand. His clothes were stained with blood. Not only that, but also his hands were dyed red with blood.
His murderous spirit was raging and majestic.
Zhao Nanyu, with his back to her, raised his foot and stepped on the man's wound mercilessly. Looking at him from above, he said, "If you hand it over, you don't have to suffer so much."
The man's face was twisted and his teeth clenched. "I really don't know."
Zhao Nanyu was not ready to waste any more words. The man had a tight mouth, and he couldn't pry anything out from him. Zhao Nanyu had been in Dali temple for several years, and was good at punishing people.
This man had long been tortured by him, and wouldn't live any longer.
Zhao Nanyu didn't mind sending him a ride. He could suppress the irritability in his heart even after seeing blood. He took the sword from his servants carelessly, and pierced his throat with a sword.
Song Luan's heart shook, and she hurriedly took a deep breath to stabilize her body. She was about to pretend that she hadn't seen anything, but when she was about to leave quietly, Zhao Nanyu suddenly turned his head, as if discovering there was someone.
Zhao Nanyu raised his hand and the door in front of Song Luan was opened.
His face was also splashed with bloodstains, and the spirit of killing was rampant. Zhao Nanyu was only slightly surprised to see that it was her. After calming down, he handed the sword in his hand to the person on his side. He slowly wiped the blood on his hands with a handkerchief, and walked up to her and sighed, "How come you didn't make a sound?"
Zhao Nanyu didn't want her to see this bloody scene, she was already afraid of him. However, it didn't matter if she saw it. Sooner or later, Song Luan would have to find out that he was not a good man.
He already had the weight of a lot of human lives in his hands. He didn't think it was anything important.
Song Luan felt nauseous, and wanted to vomit. Subconsciously, she avoided his hands as she turned pale.
Zhao Nanyu's eyes dimmed.
She was terrified.
Zhao Chao's master just arrived at the gate of the capital, and was respectfully invited by Zhao Nanyu.
Xu Daozi was wearing a black taoist robe with a duster in his hand. His face was kind, and his smile was shallow. If people ignored his clothes, he could pass as a very kind old man.
After traveling abroad for more than a year, Xu Daozi knew nothing about the situation in the capital. He never inquired or asked. His only apprentice couldn't find him, and Xu Daozi never disclosed his whereabouts.
He thought it was his uneasy apprentice who wanted to see him. When he entered the gate of Zhao's mansion, he found out that it was someone else.
At the moment, Song Luan also looked at the smiling old man with white beard. Zhao Nanyu solemnly said to Xu Daozi, "Please, taoist priest."
Xu Daozi examined her pulse, and his pupils opened slightly. He was surprised and said, "Tianqing?"
Zhao Nanyu tightened his jaw, and his face was frozen, "Hmm. That's right."
As he began to pack up his things, he shook his head and said, "Not good."
Tianqing was originally a poison made by him on a whim. He had a strange temper. After living for several decades, he had produced a few poisons, but there was no antidote for any of them.
Even he couldn't find the solution himself.
Tianqing was made in a hurry at that time. Xu Daozi was very satisfied with the poison. Its toxicity was abnormal enough to be comparable to sulfur, but it was different from sulfur.
Tianqing would slowly corrode the organs in the body, causing pain for two or three years before death.
When the viscera were hollowed out, people would naturally not live.
Looking at the pale girl in front of him, he felt a little pity for her. It seemed that the little girl was still young, her face was crisp and her eyes were clean like a pool of spring water. She was very beautiful.
It was a pity that such a person would die.
Xu Daozi slowly turned his eyes to Zhao Chao on his side, raised his hand, and slapped him on the forehead without mercy. "Explain to me what's going on?!"
How could such a poisonous medicine be used on a girl who hadn't the strength even to bind a chicken?
"Master, we will talk about it later."
"Stay here, taoist priest." Zhao Nanyu stopped him.
Xu Daozi was not a patient person. He was very tired from travelling.
His apprentice said that he wanted to bring him here, and didn't even give him face.
He felt so bad tempered that he went straight to him and said, "I know what you want to ask. There is no cure. At most, she can live for two or three months."
If she could bear the waves of pain, this poisoned little girl could still live for three years, but her delicate appearance didn't seem to be able to survive that long.
Most of the people who had been hit by tianqing would eventually commit suicide. No one could stand the pain day after day. And that kind of heart piercing pain would increase slowly but surely, until even breathing would become a kind of torture.
Song Luan accepted the news calmly, but her tears still fell without any warning. Xu Daozi saw the little girl crying, and he coughed unnaturally.
Zhao Nanyu's fingers in his sleeve were tightly clenched together. His knuckles turned white and his thin lips moved. He couldn't make any noise for a long time.
Song Luan wiped her tears. She thought that this was the fate of the original owner, even if she was a transmigrator, even if she knew in advance, the plot still couldn't be changed.
There was nothing to do.
Song Luan admitted that she was afraid of death, but it was not impossible for her to face this calmly. Maybe she would go back if she died in this world.
"I'm fine. I'm fine." Song Luan was relieved by Zhao Nanyu's pitiful and pained eyes.
Xu Daozi softened his heart, and said, "Don't be sad, little girl. It's not only two or three months, it could also reach two years. You should take good advantage of it."
Two years, exactly the same time as the original owner.
What were the days of those two years, Song Luan had seen the description of the text with her own eyes.
Advertisements
Zhao Nanyu refused to believe a word that came out of Xu Daozi's mouth.
He still went everywhere to find a doctor for her, and put up a notice offering a reward. Song Luan only smiled when she learned of it. She was not discouraged. She did not feel that Zhao Nanyu was doing useless work. Since she was not dead yet, she would not give up easily.
It's a pity that after drinking too much medicine, the effect would not be as good as before.
All the warlocks and imperial doctors were helpless, just as Xu Daozi said.
Zhao Nanyu was too listless to pretend to be warm and pleasant, and his temper was getting worse.
Song Luan knew that he had thrown a lot of angry tantrums behind her back. His eyes wouldn't bend anymore, and the number of times he laughed became less.
He would only smile when the two of them were together.
Every day, he would bring some trinkets from outside to make her happy.
Song Luan slept less and less, and the faint pain in her body made it difficult for her to fall asleep.
She hugged Zhao Nanyu's waist tightly, and sniffed the familiar scent on him, which made her feel more comfortable.
Every time she slept, she would always dream about Zhao Nanyu ruthlessly plunging her heart with a knife.
She had a premonition that this picture in her dream would come true one day. Zhao Nanyu would kill her in the end. What was the reason? She couldn't guess now.
The dagger was placed in Zhao Nanyu's study in the upper right corner of his desk.
Zhao Nanyu saw that she was unhappy, so he invited her mother to come over. It was good to make her happy.
Aunt Lin looked at her daughter's poor and emaciated appearance. She cried straight out, wiping her tears and scolding Zhao Nanyu. Her mean words were, "That cheap one! He dares to torture you like this. If it wasn't for your father's disapproval, I would have taken you back. What do we want from the Zhao family? Zhao Nanyu haspower, otherwise I would have killed him."
Aunt Lin spoke indignantly about Zhao Nanyu.
Song Luan held her mother's hand and said in a soft voice, "Mother, I'm hungry. Did you bring some delicious food?"
"You're right. Zhao Nanyu was really not good. I've only been eating light food recently, and I need some oil in my mouth."
Aunt Lin said uneasily, "You are ill. It's good for you to eat light food."
She sighed and looked at Song Luan with loving eyes. "What a wonderful daughter I have, how could she be tortured like this in the Zhao family?!"
At the beginning, she would rather send her daughter to a nunnery, than make her marry Zhao Nanyu.
Song Luan didn't know how to persuade her. Aunt Lin really loved her, and her eyes were swollen.
She sighed in her heart, a little guilty. "Mother, let's not talk about those unhappy things. I'll tell you, yesterday, Zhao Nanyu got me a snow-white cat from nowhere, but the cat didn't seem to like me very much, so the cat ran away secretly."
At this point, she chuckled, "Zhao Nanyu looked for it in the middle of the night, but he couldn't find it."
Aunt Lin said, "You're too careless."
She still had the leisure time to take care of a cat.
But aunt Lin was worried. Her daughter was thin, and her complexion was not good. Her body smelled of medicine, as if she had just been released from a medicine jar.
Recalling her daughter's bright and beautiful appearance before, aunt Lin was very sad, and scolded Zhao Nanyu!
Aunt Lin scolded Zhao Nanyu from the beginning to the end. To sum it up, this man was not a good thing.
Song Luan covered her mouth and laughed secretly. As soon as she did, she felt pain in her back. She had no choice but to endure it, so she held her waist, and said, "Mother, don't say anything."
"Good, good, I will stop."
Aunt Lin accompanied her for an afternoon and told her everything that happened in the Song residence. For example, the fifth sister had just entered the harem. The queen dowager picked her into the palace herself.
It seems that she was quite favored by the new emperor.
Her brother Song Heqing took in concubine which provoked the relationship between her brother and sister-in-law.
Song Luan's brain ached.
She remembered the fate of Ayun, and she hadn't seen her for a long time. The new emperor was a typical cold hearted ruler in the original book.
Song Luan was eating melon seeds and asked, "What's the matter with my brother taking a concubine?"
Aunt Lin frowned. "That girl was the daughter of a condemned minister. Your brother saved her because of their old love. Who knows what will happen later?"
"Sister-in-law must be very sad."
Imagine if Zhao Nanyu took a concubine, she would also be very sad, thinking about this kind of thing made her heart a little sour.
"No! she cried several times behind your brother's back, but she didn't dare to let anyone know. Your sister-in-law is too soft and is being bullied in silence."
Aunt Lin's tone suddenly sharpened. "If anyone dares to stand against me, I'll kill her with a knife."
But aunt Lin was very happy in the Song residence.
Song Luan could only listen. Aunt Lin was not Song Heqing's biological mother. It was even more difficult for her to take care of his house affairs.
Aunt Lin didn't stay for dinner, and she said she didn't want to see Zhao Nanyu, because she was annoyed whenever she saw him.
***
The gauze lamp was emitting warm light, but Song Luan didn't think it was bright enough.
She got out of bed and lit two lamps, which made the room brighter.
It was a very difficult night to fall asleep. Zhao Nanyu laid on her side with one hand around her shoulder. His voice was very pleasant and his face was gentle. He tried to tell her jokes.
Song Luan's back and abdomen ached. She looked at him with watery eyes, as she listened to him attentively. Zhao Nanyu's jokes were really not funny, but Song Luan laughed at his hard work, and serious attempts to make her happy.
It was better not to laugh, because whenever she did, her chest began to hurt.
She covered her chest, took a deep breath, and complained in a low voice, "Don't tell me jokes. I'm afraid I'll die without a breath."
Zhao Nanyu squeezed her shoulders. He hated to hear her say this kind of thing.
Song Luan leaned against his arms with her eyes closed, and said slowly, "I am very happy that my mother came to see me today."
No need for him to coax her.
She was easy to coax, and was easy to satisfy.
Zhao Nanyu's words became less, and his voice became worse. He probably had a hard time during this period.
Song Luan slept every day. She woke up whenever her body was in constant pain.
When she was unconscious, there was always a voice in her ear saying, "If he kills you, you will be free."
She was tired of listening to it.
When she woke up, she still clearly remembered the sentence. Death was a kind of liberation.
She walked barefoot. Nothing in the room was not covered with expensive carpets. When she stepped on it, it was not cold at all. She slowly walked to the window, her eyes not knowing where to fall.
(T/N: Paragraphs with brackets below are the events that happened in the book. In this case, it's the memory of when Zhao Nanyu was still a child.)
[The young boy was tightly held in his arms by his mother. The woman's face was blue, her whole body was cold as it gradually stiffened, but she still did not forget to protect her child. The cold wind and rain hit her face. She shook her hand and handed the jade pendant to the young boy's palm. "Ah Yu, you must live well."]
[The boy had a very beautiful face. Even in his shabby clothes, his cold temperament couldn't be blocked. The man with sharp lips and sharp cheeks kicked him away, "Do you really regard yourself as a young master? Even if you are recognized, it would just be evil.]
[Zhao Nanyu! What are you?! Do you deserve to touch me?!]
Song Luan remembered the description of Zhao Nanyu's desolate past in the book. Was he pitiful?
Pitiful.
Song Luan suddenly felt like she had always been too persistent. If she could accept the plot arranged in the original book, then she would die very well.
The pain in her chest became more and more acute. Xu Daozi didn't lie to her. She could live two or three months at most. Even if she didn't die, she wouldn't be able to stab herself.
Zhao Nanyu opened the door and saw the woman curled up against the window. His eyebrows wrinkled as he held her up. Song Luan opened her tired eyes, and she said softly, "Zhao Nanyu, I know the poison in my body came from you."
The man's body suddenly froze, and there were thin bloodstains in his eyes. His eyes seemed to look redder than before.
Song Luan stared at him intently, lifted her hand, and pulled out the hairpin on her head. She placed it in his palm, and said with a smile, "You can give me salvation from this poison."
It took less than a month for the poison to show serious symptoms. She had already suffered enough.
Whether she was awake or asleep, she was in pain.
Zhao Nanyu's eyes in that moment became very vicious, almost ferocious.
=============== Chapter 71
Zhao Nanyu squeezed the hairpin she had handed to him. The other end of the silver hairpin was sharp, and it was easy to pierce a person's throat with it. In a low voice, he asked, "When did you discover it?"
Song Luan slowly said, "It didn't take long for me to guess." She smiled, and looked relaxed, "I'm too uncomfortable. Please help me."
Zhao Nanyu hugged her tighter, refusing to let her go from his arms. He gritted his teeth and said, "I won't."
As expected, Song Luan had long guessed that he would not agree, she only sighed and said nothing.
She had other plans, but Zhao Nanyu seemed to know all her thoughts since long ago. All the sharp objects around Song Luan were put away, not giving her any chance to die.
In fact, Song Luan was very timid and afraid of pain. She didn't have enough courage to commit suicide. However, the pain in her heart made her toss and turn, and there wasn't a moment where she was comfortable. The desire for relief gave her the courage to die.
She rummaged through all corners of the cabinet, but could not find anything that could be used to kill herself. Song Luan sat on the ground with disheveled hair and a dispirited expression.
When Zhao Nanyu came in, she took the initiative to put her hand around his neck, gave him a kiss on his face, and said in a low voice, "Don't you love me? I'm begging you."
Zhao Nanyu was indifferent, carried her back to bed, and covered her with a quilt. He looked at her eyes and asked, "What would you like to eat tonight?"
Song Luan was like a disinflated balloon. In the past two days, Zhao Nanyu deliberately refused to talk about it. She kicked aside the quilt and said, "I don't want to eat. I'll starve to death."
Starvation was also a way to die, but it was not very respectable.
"Didn't you want to eat roast duck last time? Let's eat this tonight."
While touching her hair, he said, "But you can't eat it when it's too hot, or you will not be able to stand it."
Song Luan swallowed very hopelessly.
***
As Zhao Nanyu tried everything possible, Song Luan's body did not see a slight improvement, and it decayed more and more. She could not sleep without relying on the tranquilizing soup, but if she drank the medicine, she often could not wake up easily.
Once, Song Luan had slept for a full day and had not woken up. At that time, Zhao Nanyu's face was extremely ugly. He shook her hand and probed her nose. Fortunately, she still had a faint breath.
After this happened, he wouldn't let Song Luan drink tranquilizing soup.
Zhao Chao sent medicine to relieve the pain. For the first time, Song Luan was surprised to find that it didn't hurt much.
But Zhao Nanyu didn't seem to be very happy either. This medicine couldn't cure it at all, and its effectiveness was limited. If it was used too much, it would gradually not work, and the power of the side effect was also great.
***
As spring was about to pass, Zhao Wenyan's wedding date arrived as promised.
Song Luan ordered someone to dress her up, especially putting on beautiful new clothes. The delicate makeup covered her tired face. Zhao Nanyu didn't want her to join in the event, but Song Luan refused. She was rarely so happy, so he turned a blind eye.
Zhao's residence had not been so lively for a long time. Many guests came to the wedding day.
After the ceremony, the bride was led to the bridal chamber.
Song Luan knew some people among them, and she counted them with her fingers.
Zhao Nanyu, Zhao Wenyan's elder brother, naturally couldn't walk away. He was busy dealing with all the people.
Zhao Wenyan in red wedding clothes looked very decent. His lines were softer, and there was shallow joy in the tip of his eyes.
He took both the gold title in the imperial list, and the bridal chamber candle. Naturally, he was happy.
After watching the excitement for a while, Song Luan felt tired, and even yawned twice. The third lady Zhao said to her, "Are you tired? Go back and rest. It's enough to have me here."
Song Luan held up her eyelids, shook her head, and said, "I can still hold on. I haven't seen the bridal chamber yet. I'll wait."
Third lady Zhao couldn't laugh nor cry, "What's so good about the bridal chamber?"
Third lady Zhao's face was stiff from smiling all day on her son's wedding day. She had to meet every guest with a smile.
Song Luan's eyes were full of laughter. "I just thought it's fun."
Third lady Zhao let Song Luan sit on the couch, and ordered her servant girl to carry tea and water. Zhao Nanyu entrusted Song Luan to her on this day, she certainly wouldn't let her have an accident.
As she fanned her, she said, "I told them in advance that we should not make too much trouble this year. I remember the year when you and Ah Yu got married, there was a lot of trouble. "
At first, only a very few people knew about Song Luan's marriage to Zhao Nanyu, and at that time, their cousins and brothers were in cahoots, and made trouble.
(T/N: The italicized paragraph below was the event of Song Luan and Zhao Nanyu's wedding. I just felt I needed to do a quick note since I was confused at this time when translating. I thought it was Zhao Wenyan's wedding event.)
Several ignorant teenagers stood by the door, listening carefully.
There was no sound in the room, and they began to whisper, "What's going on?"
"My cousin doesn't know what to do in his wedding night, and he can't talk sweet nothings at night, right?"
"Yes, yes, I have seen the appearance of sister-in-law with my own eyes. It's not an exaggeration to say that she is a fairy in the sky. She is very beautiful."
After waiting for a while, they still didn't hear anything. There was a courageous suggestion, "Let's knock open the door and have a look? Give them a fright!"
"You're going to die, in case they have..."
"No, it can't be that there is no sound at all?"
Several pairs of black eyes looked at it, and finally nodded, "I'll count down–three, two, one!"
A group of young people burst open the door of the new house, and a group of people giggled as they raised their eyes to see two people sitting on the side of the room. They didn't look nor paid attention to each other.
Their cousin was sitting at the desk by the window, writing with a brush in his hand, and no one knew what he was writing.
The new sister-in-law had already changed her wedding dress. She was dressed in scarlet clothes and sat at the round table with her back straight and upright. When she saw them, she still did not change her face and continued to eat.
The teenagers found that the new sister-in-law seemed to be a cold beauty. She refused to smile, and her cold eyes were comparable to their cousin's.
The young and ignorant young man said, "Cousin, how can you be so far away from sister-in-law! If we don't see what we want to see, we won't leave tonight."
Zhao Nanyu frowned, "Don't make trouble."
"Well, we can't do that. We won't let you do it easily today."
Advertisements
Zhao Nanyu's eyebrows twisted deeper. After careful thinking, he felt helpless, "What do you want?"
It's not that the teenagers were unaware of the strange atmosphere in the room. Several people didn't dare to make too much noise. "We want to see cousin drink wine with sister-in-law!"
Zhao Nanyu walked to Song Luan with a cold face, and sat down slowly. He filled two glasses of wine with his own hands, and said in a low voice, "Come on."
Song Luan endured the anger and drank the wine with him.
"I've drunk the wine, but how come I still have to kiss you!"
With a 'pa' sound, Song Luan threw the empty wine cup on the table and sneered. She was quite dissatisfied.
"All right, stop it and get out." Zhao Nanyu said lightly.
The crowd retreated from the room. After closing the door, they heard the quarrel in the room.
"Zhao Nanyu, what do you mean?! Are you trying to humiliate me!?"
Song Luan listened to third lady Zhao and smiled twice. It turned out that this happened when they got married.
"Girls should be thin skinned. They really can't be too aggressive."
"Well, my daughter-in-law is also timid and obedient. As long as she has Ah Yan in her heart, and can treat him well, then the stone in my heart will be lifted."
Song Luan failed to see the bridal chamber as she wanted, because Zhao Nanyu went out from the hall and looked for her. "It's late. Go back and have a rest."
"Oh, don't be so cold and heartless. I'll go back when I have enough fun."
"No."
Song Luan stomped her feet angrily. She was sleepy a while ago and had to endure it, but now that she was not sleepy anymore, Zhao Nanyu had to come and take her back.
It's annoying.
"I won't go. If you have the ability, you carry me back." Zhao Nanyu did not say much. He took her leg, lifted her to his shoulder, and forcibly carried her back to the residence.
Song Luan complained, "You are so rude! I hate it."
Zhao Nanyu held her down nonchalantly, "Well, I'm rude."
Song Luan grabbed a handful of his hair and said angrily, "I haven't seen the appearance of the bride yet."
The bride was hidden under the red veil, and she couldn't see anything.
Zhao Nanyu squatted in front of her, took off her shoes and socks. "You can see her tomorrow."
The new daughter-in-law would come to greet them.
Song Luan was blocked up by him.
After drinking medicine, she rolled up her quilt and turned her back to him. He did not feel tired at all, but soon fell into a deep sleep.
The next day, the bride came to offer tea.
Zhao Wenyan's wife was also beautiful. She was a beautiful girl with bright eyes and bright teeth.
The little girl timidly called her second sister-in-law, as she handed the big red bag she prepared in advance.
Third lady Zhao coughed twice and asked, "Were you tired last night?"
The little girl blushed and said, "No..no."
And she quickly explained "My husband was very understanding with me."
She was so young that she had just reached the maturity age.
Ruan Sheng looked at Song Luan carefully. The second sister-in-law deserved her reputation. She was really beautiful.
Song Luan was also aware of her gaze. She was caught off guard and laughed at her mischievously. "I know I'm beautiful, you'll have to stare at me all the time."
Ruan Sheng was caught on the spot and blushed.
Song Luan thought that this sister-in-law was really lovely. Who didn't like cute girls? No wonder Zhao Wenyan, who had both a bad temper and arrogant personality, couldn't help but like her.
***
Song Luan got along well with Ruan Sheng. It seemed that Ruan Sheng also liked her a lot, since she often went to her room to talk with her. She was in a good mood.
But Zhao Chao's painkillers have begun to fail. The pain in the chest only subsided in less than half a month, and then it returned. This time the pain was a hundred times worse than before.
Song Luan couldn't get out of bed anymore. Zhao Nanyu also did not allow others to see her. He stood alone in front of her bed and wiped her sweat with a handkerchief.
She couldn't sleep all night, and living became a kind of torment, just like the picture she had dreamt of–the woman lying in bed became her.
When Ruan Sheng finally came to see her, Song Luan looked pale and seemed to be about to fall down any time. She leaned against the pillow and talked to her with great effort.
As long as she exerted strength, it would only hurt more.
Her eyes were moist. "Sheng Sheng, would you do me a favor?"
"What is it?"
"Next time you come, bring me a knife, okay?" Zhao Nanyu refused to kill her, but she didn't want to continue to suffer.
Ruan Sheng shook her head in tears.
Song Luan pulled out an ugly smile and said, "Look at me now, it's more painful to live. I don't want to lie to you. I want this knife so I can die."
She added, "It doesn't matter if you don't agree."
She didn't want to embarrass Ruan Sheng, but there was no way.
Ruan Sheng was in a dilemma. She didn't know what to do.
Zhao Nanyu walked in at this moment. Without even looking at Ruan Sheng, he directly told her to get out.
Song Luan regretted that she would never see Ruan Sheng anymore.
"Don't be angry with her."
"If she does bring you a knife, I will kill her myself."
She knew that Zhao Nanyu would do it once he said it.
Song Luan was in extreme pain at night.
She opened her mouth and bit his flesh fiercely. There were several teeth marks left on Zhao Nanyu's wrist. He was a monster who was not afraid of being bitten.
"I can't sleep. I can't. You let me die." Song Luan was sweating with pain and staring at him with red eyes. Her words were extremely hurtful. "I hate you. Why should I bear this? You can just simply give me relief!"
Zhao Nanyu gave her medicine, so Song Luan was able to have a good sleep.
His heart was already numbed with pain.
Song Luan was getting thinner and thinner. She couldn't eat much food these days.
Now it was useless to give her a knife because she had lost the strength to commit suicide.
She leaned in Zhao Nanyu's arms, and wondered in anger, "Zhao Nanyu, please feel sorry for me. It's better for me to die than to live like this. Can't you take it as a good thing?"
"Don't you like me? Are you lying to me? Are you willing to see the person you love suffer from this kind of torture?"
Song Luan didn't want to cry. She couldn't control her tears, and they kept pouring out.
She raised her neck and dropped a soft kiss on his lips. "Well, okay?"
"You poisoned me. What do you regret?! Isn't it okay to kill me?"
Zhao Nanyu couldn't breathe, his brain was dull and his eyes were sour. He couldn't say a word.
After saying these words, Song Luan fell into a coma from pain. It was dusk when she woke up again. Zhao Nanyu led little Zhao's hand and walked in.
Song Luan's heart relaxed at the moment. She knew that Zhao Nanyu had decided to let her go.
Zhao Nanyu let go of little Zhao's hands, and said in a hoarse voice, "Go and talk to your mother."
Little Zhao's eyes were red and swollen. It seemed that he had already cried. Song Luan held him and said, "You grew tall again."
Little Zhao wanted to be held by her, but he dared not touch her. His black and white eyes obstinately stared at his mother, for fear that once he closed his eyes, he would never see his mother again.
Song Luan's only comfort was probably her son.
"You should study hard. Don't ignore people in the future. Don't act like your father because your face won't be cute at all."
"Mother."
"Although I want you to study hard, I don't want you to turn into a bookworm. You still need to make some playmates. Little Zhao is so lovely that many people will like you." Song Luan said slowly.
When he cried, Song Luan wiped his tears with her sleeves. "Don't cry. Your mother likes you best."
She did not have the spirit to continue to talk anymore. Zhao Nanyu called grandma Lin to carry little Zhao out.
The moment the door closed, all the remaining light disappeared.
Zhao Nanyu walked forward two steps. He held Song Luan's back and helped her up.
Song Luan leaned lazily against his chest, looking relaxed and serene.
The man took out a dagger from his sleeve, held the handle as he trembled slightly.
Song Luan closed her eyes lightly, and her breath was weak. "I don't blame you."
As she had dreamt countless times, Zhao Nanyu would stab her heart. The plot never spared her even a little bit.
In a trance, Song Luan felt that there were crystal drops falling on her cheek.
His tears slipped past as the warm light reflected on his white face.
His arms hugged her so tightly that it could almost suffocate her. He sighed silently, "It will be alright soon."
=============== Chapter 72
The sharp point of a knife aimed at her heart. As long as it was pierced in, Song Luan would be killed on the spot.
Zhao Nanyu tremblingly held the hilt of the knife. His forehead was sweating, his voice was extremely low and hoarse, as he breathlessly said, "I can't do it."
The dagger fell to the ground with a 'dang'.
Song Luan held up the last bit of her strength to bend down to pick up the dagger on the ground. With such a simple action, she was sweating with pain. She gently put the dagger in his palm and said, "It's painful. It's painful even when I'm sleeping."
All this time, she wanted to die. Her organs were decaying, her chest felt like there was a big hand pressing down on her, her heart was being clenched tightly, and everything inside her was stirring wildly.
Even breathing was a heavy pain.
Zhao Nanyu's tears fell on her cheek, Song Luan suddenly realized that her death was a relief for her, but a torture for Zhao Nanyu.
It must be hard to kill someone you yourself love.
But she really couldn't care about his mood anymore.
She raised her chin and looked at Zhao Nanyu with red tearful eyes. She covered her chest with one hand, curled up and breathed heavily. "It really hurts. Please save me."
The sharp tingling spread from the soles of her feet and to her brain, her limbs and bones, and every place couldn't avoid this sharp and extreme pain.
Song Luan screamed indiscriminately. Due to the loss of strength, her groaning was lower than her usual tone, and her original beautiful facial features were gradually distorted as it turned bloodless.
Five pale fingers grabbed Zhao Nanyu's sleeve, "Kill me....please kill me."
Zhao Nanyu gently kissed her eyebrows, then he slowly closed his eyes, and opened them right after.
He clenched the dagger tightly, his eyes were numb, and with a 'hissing' sound, the tip of the knife plunged into her flesh, and it directly pierced her heart.
Song Luan fell into his arms, the corners of her lips showed a satisfied smile.
It was almost exactly the same as the picture she had seen in her dream. She died in his arms by his hands.
Zhao Nanyu pressed her head on his shoulder, while he hoarsely whispered, "It's alright..it's alright. It doesn't hurt anymore, don't cry."
"Okay, you won't feel anymore pain, right?"
At the moment when she was stabbed to death, Song Luan's soul seemed to be pulled violently, and pictures of memories came together all at once.
Song Luan remembered a lot of things, like how she was very self-willed. Zhao Nanyu said more than many times that she liked to walk on the ground barefoot, but she had never heard of it. Every time, he would shake his head helplessly while chuckling, then would grab her foot, lower his body, and put on the shoes for her.
In the winter, the snow in the capital was so heavy, and the weather was colder than usual. Zhao Nanyu made her a big snowman. At that time, she didn't have time to ask how long it took him.
He must have suffered in the cold to make such a big snowman like that.
This man had been tolerating her small temperament, and her arrogance. He is taciturn, domineering, and tolerant.
Song Luan hadn't felt relaxed for a long time. Her soul was floating in the air. Many memories that do not belong to her were all in her mind.
Suddenly, her soul was pulled out of the world.
***
Song Luan opened her eyes again. She was lying in front of her desk. The light in front of the computer was on. The computer page was still in the interface of the book 'The Powerful Minister'. It showed that the book was finished.
She was in a trance for a moment, no...the book was clearly not over yet. She shook her hand and opened the book.
She read =============== Chapter by =============== Chapter, and her heart sank. The book was written almost according to everything she had experienced.
The end was when she died.
The comments at the bottom of the book exploded.
[The author is an absolute idiot to write this book.]
[Author, your mother is dead, do you hear me?!!]
[Now I want to transport myself back before I opened this book a few hours ago, and strangle myself..wuwuwuwu]
[What I did so wrong to be tortured like this.]
[Oh wow...that is so sweet]
Song Luan sat dumbfounded in front of the computer, looking blank and innocent. She let Zhao Nanyu stab her to death, and she didn't expect to come back.
Everything she had experienced was like a dream–so unreal.
Song Luan touched the jade pendant on her neck and was stunned for a long time. This was the jade pendant Zhao Nanyu forced her to wear. It turned out that it was all real.
She felt empty, and a little uncomfortable.
Song Luan turned off the computer, threw herself on the bed, and looked at the ceiling with her big eyes open. She didn't fall asleep the whole night, only when the dawn arrived did she fall asleep.
She couldn't tell where she was. Once again, she saw the woman who had been killed by an arrow on the tower, but this time she was wearing a gorgeous wedding dress and a pretty smile on her face. She seemed to be very happy.
The man in white was holding her hand and pressed close to her ear. No one knew what he said to her. The woman in the wedding dress had crooked eyes and was coquettish with laughter, and later reached out to playfully beat him.
Song Luan tried hard to see the man's face, but his face was blurred. She couldn't see it clearly.
Song Luan seemed to be trapped in this fantasy again, almost unable to wake up. It was only when the mobile phone rang that she woke up. Song Luan opened her tired eyes, went to the bathroom to brush her teeth, washed her face, and muttered incoherent words in hunger.
She put on her shoes and planned to go out, only to find out that she was wearing pajamas. She changed her pajamas in a trance and went out with her purse.
Just as Song Luan walked out of the gate of the community, a man in a taoist robe was sitting next to the sentry box, "Fortune-telling?"
Hearing this voice, Song Luan subconsciously turned her head and looked past. Her pupils shrunk suddenly.
He was the taoist priest who she once met in Fulu temple.
The man raised his face and laughed at her. "Lady, get a divination."
Song Luan rushed to him and squeezed her finger. "Who are you?"
Who the hell was he?! Even if he knew more, why did he exist in both worlds?
Advertisements
The taoist laughed. "My identity doesn't matter."
Song Luan couldn't help but stepped forward and grabbed his hand, fearing that he would disappear again like last time. "You know what's going on, right?"
Why did she transmigrate in the book? Why did the content of 'The Powerful Minister' change after she came back? Was it a dream of hers?
The taoist priest gently brushed her hand away. There was no emotion on his young face. He raised his eyebrows, and was slightly surprised. "It seems that you haven't remembered."
"What are you talking about?"
The taoist thought, "Let me tell you a story."
"I don't want to hear stories! I just want to know what's going on."
The young taoist wanted to tell her a long story.
An imperial decree tied the emperor's beloved little princess to the son of the southwest king.
The little princess was unwilling to marry.
Although the little princess was not happy to marry a man whom she had never met, she had heard of him, the youngest son of the southwest king.
He was a well-known general, capable of both literary and martial arts skills, and the most important was that he lived an excellent life.
There were beautiful women of all nationalities who wanted to marry him in the southwest border town.
On the wedding night, the little princess sat uneasily on the wedding bed, stirring her handkerchief to relieve her inner tension. She waited for a long time for the slightly drunk bridegroom to arrive, and when he arrived, her red veil in front of her was slowly lifted away.
The little princess saw a beautiful and elegant face, like a fairy in the sky, beautiful and majestic.
She was stunned as she gazed at his beauty. The man laughed at her and said, "I've been waiting."
The son was very polite, even on his wedding night. He didn't seem to like her very much. He talked to her as if he were dealing with guests, rather than as his wife.
The innocent and romantic little princess was moved. She wandered in front of him all day long. Finally, one day, the noble son of the southwest king fell in love with her simplicity.
The relationship between the husband and wife heated up rapidly.
The little princess was still too silly, she was fooled by the eldest son, and was then captured.
In the third year of winter, the southwest king initiated a war, and his most promising youngest son became his aide against the capital.
The two men worked together in and out, and the southwest king soon won over the capital.
The guards of the capital had no choice but to retreat.
The little princess was caught. Those desperate people took her as a last straw.
They took her to the tower, and threatened the youngest prince with the life of his wife.
The prince took the bow and arrow of the bodyguard behind him.
He didn't even have a moment's hesitation, when the arrow feather flew directly over to her.
Song Luan said coldly, "I said I don't want to hear the story."
She didn't like the story at all, or any stories with tragedies.
The taoist asked, "Do you want to go back?"
She didn't like Zhao Nanyu much, but she thought of how pitiful he was, and was afraid that he would go crazy.
She also wanted to meet her brother, and her lovely child.
"It's not impossible to go back." He said meaningfully.
As soon as the voice changed, he spoke again, "Let's finish the story with you. The little princess made a poison oath before she died. She never ever wanted to meet him again. "
If they meet again, she would never fall in love with him again.
It's the curse of the little princess.
If she still makes a fool of herself, and still falls in love with him, she would die.
The taoist lazily looked at Song Luan's back. It was the third time that the man had killed her.
He would never recognize the woman he loves, even if he lives again and finds her.
He would live in torment, and alone.
That person's obsession is too deep, even entangling a woman's lifetimes.
A man whose obsession runs deep would be cursed forever.
***
Zhao Chao felt that Zhao Nanyu was crazy.
Song Luan was already dead, but he didn't let anyone touch her body, and didn't even bury her. No one was allowed to enter the room.
The Song family did not know about it until a few days later. Aunt Lin paid a lot of money to hire the people from the escort agency . Her mother hired them to escort Song Luan's corpse. She then called all the servants of the Song family to break into the Zhao residence.
Zhao Nanyu was teaching little Zhao at this time. Except for his pale face, no one could see anything out of the ordinary.
Aunt Lin's voice had been hoarse for a long time. Her eyes were red. She had to rely on the help of her maidservant to stand firm.
She was always a woman with exquisite makeup, but after her daughter's death, her heart was now dead.
She raised her hand and slapped Zhao Nanyu heavily. Her eyes were full of hate, as she gnashed her teeth. "You give my daughter back to me, even if it's her corpse, I won't leave it to you. She won't be allowed into your Zhao family's grave."
Her poor daughter, how old even was she to lose her life?!
At that time, she really shouldn't have been married to Zhao Nanyu, that fierce animal.
"You can't take her away," Zhao Nanyu said brazenly.
"I'm her mother! I tell you, Zhao Nanyu, my daughter married you for eight years. How could a good person die like this?! Hmm?! How many times did you hurt her!? Why do you still have the face to continue to hold on to her, pretending to be affectionate and diligent. I feel sick after watching it." Aunt Lin laughed bitterly. "I'm afraid she will find it ridiculous when she sees it."
Zhao Nanyu turned a deaf ear as if all these words were not attacking him. He picked up little Zhao and covered his ears. "You are not allowed to listen."
Little Zhao buried his face in his neck, wanting to cry but couldn't.
Zhao Nanyu looked at the distance with empty eyes, raised his right hand, and looked in the sun. That day, he killed his beloved woman with this hand.
The sun shone on his shoulder, but Zhao Nanyu still felt very cold.
The only thing she cared about in this world was their son. She loves this child, so he should take good care of him. Otherwise, she would blame him when she comes back in the future.
Aunt Lin hated him very much. She pointed to the people she had brought, and yelled, "Go and bring me my daughter's body."
A group of people rushed in, and aunt Lin also broke into the room. Her daughter was lying in the middle of the bed with a quiet look. Her wounds and blood were wiped clean, and her lips were smeared with rouge.
Zhao Nanyu approached her step by step. His guards surrounded Song Luan's body.
He looked at Aunt Lin calmly and said, "I said, you can't take her away. She is mine."
Aunt Lin took Song Luan's body in her arms, turned over her collar, saw the wound on her chest, and cried out loud, "Why did you do it!?"
Zhao Nanyu gave a very shallow smile. He stepped forward, snatched the person back, and hugged her in his arms. He lowered his head like whispering to his lover, "It's my fault for letting others disturb you."
Zhao Nanyu glanced at aunt Lin, "You disturbed her sleep."
Aunt Lin nearly fainted, as she shakily pointed with her hand. She almost couldn't breathe, "You are crazy. You are really crazy."
Even in Ah Luan's death, he would not let her rest in peace.
Zhao Chao couldn't bear to see it, and said in a voice, "Second brother, please let second sister-in-law rest in peace."
Zhao Nanyu gave him a look that became fierce and vicious, "You shut up."
"Second brother, the corpse will stink and rot. She can't stay long. You might as well let her go."
Zhao Nanyu didn't listen to any of them, "Didn't I tell you to go away?"
No one could disturb him and Song Luan's alone time.
She just fell asleep, and would wake up soon.
=============== Chapter 73
Aunt Lin couldn't stand successive attacks and was finally carried back to the Song Residence.
Rumors spread around in the capital. There were many people in restaurants and teahouses talking about him killing his wife. Their tone were both furious and afraid. There were differences in the rumors.
Some people think that Zhao Nanyu was justified in killing his wife. After all, Song Luan didn't give him less green hats to humiliate him. A woman who didn't abide by women's principles, was considered vicious, and should be killed.
Those who spoke for Song Luan were only a few. It was nothing more than criticizing Zhao Nanyu for his cruel methods. No matter how she was as his wife, why should she be killed? At any rate, she was a beautiful woman, and had also given birth to a son for him.
He was so heartless that he did not recognize any old love with her.
Moreover, if this kind of thing spreads out, no matter how excellent he was, where could they find a family to marry their daughters to him as his step-wife in the future?
They didn't know how much Zhao Nanyu hated her dead wife that he ruined his future to this extent.
Zhao Nanyu was favored by the new emperor. In just a few months, he eradicated dissidents, eliminated snobbery, and killed many people. Many people wanted to use this matter as a leverage against him.
They did not lack courage. The civil servant, who was motivated by his situation, handed the book to the new emperor. The new emperor just looked at it with a smile and put it aside. He lazily wrote back a few words, "I know."
At noon that day, Zhao Nanyu was called into the palace.
A crowd of spectators were waiting to see the good play.
Zhao Nanyu's face was sickly white, and his lips were pale. The imperial suit looked big and empty on him.
The new emperor pointed to the book on the table with a smile, and spoke to him like this matter was a joke, "These old men really want you to die. Also, what you did was too blatant."
With a smile, he said, "The reputation of having killed a wife is not good either now or in the previous dynasty."
The new emperor remembered that Zhao Nanyu spent so many months with his wife that even he rarely stayed in the palace for so long. The new emperor also heard that Song Luan was not in good health, as if she was gravely ill. After seeing so many doctors, it was still helpless.
He patted Zhao Nanyu on the shoulder and sighed, "You have never been anxious. Why are you so reckless this time?"
Why did he have to move his hand for Song Luan when he knew she didn't have enough days to live? If he didn't like her, he could just watch her die. The emperor couldn't understand this contradiction.
Zhao Nanyu's hand was lightly resting on his heart. He seemed to be in pain. His appearance looked very weak, and his eyes were dark and empty. "She hurts too much. I can't bear to see her continue to suffer."
She couldn't sleep all night. She fainted in the middle of the night, and woke up with pain.
Song Luan was even in tears in her dream.
The new emperor was surprised, "It's a pity that a good person like this fell sick."
His unintentionally words were like a sharp knife that accurately stabbed into Zhao Nanyu's heart.
It wasn't someone else who wanted Song Luan to die.
It was him when he wished for her death before.
The new emperor had never seen Zhao Nanyu look so pathetic. He was so weak that he looked like he could fall anytime. He seemed too sad to speak, and his voice was so hoarse that the emperor couldn't understand what he said.
The emperor didn't know how to comfort him. Originally, he wanted to remind him not to do too much. It's very easy to take a person's life. He just had to remember to keep a low profile. He couldn't make the whole capital know.
But Zhao Nanyu was like this now, so he couldn't say anything more.
The palace man bowed from the side hall, and whispered a few words in the emperor's ear. The emperor sneered a few times, and his face was cruel, "She won't eat it? Then don't give it to her for three days. If she is hungry, she will eat it naturally."
The palace man got the order and immediately withdrew.
The emperor also had a lot of messy things to deal with. At this time, he was in a hot temper and full of anger. He asked, "Do you want to drink?"
Zhao Nanyu shook his head gently. "I have to go back and teach my son his homework lessons."
The emperor pondered for a long time and said, "One day I will bring him in. I also like this child very much."
It's not him that liked the child.
He just thought that Ayun would like him. Maybe she wouldn't get angry with him when she meets this little kid.
Zhao Nanyu's eyelids did not move, "Then you go to the Zhao residence to see him."
Zhao Nanyu was the only one in the world who dares to speak to him like this.
***
Song Luan's body was burned away by a fire. No one knew how the fire broke out in her residence. When people reacted, the fire was already strong and the beams of the house were all burnt.
Their faces changed greatly, and they rushed to fetch water. The fire burn Song Luan's bedroom clean, and her body was burned to a pile of ashes.
The servants looked at Zhao Nanyu. They didn't dare to breathe, in fear that they would be the one to die next.
The timid servant girl sobbed in a low voice, her whole body was shaking uncontrollably, and her sobbing voice broke the silence.
Zhao Nanyu turned and looked at her with dark eyes. "Why are you crying?"
The servant girl hiccuped as she wiped her tears. She couldn't say that she was scared of him, so she knelt down on her knees with a plop.
He was too frightening at the moment, just like the devil who had just climbed out of hell.
When he looked at them, it was especially terrifying.
Zhao Nanyu blankly looked at the ruins in front of him, and his heart was full of wounds.
He waved his hand and said, "Clean it up."
Since then, no one in residence dared to mention Song Luan's name. Her name seems to have become a taboo.
Zhao Nanyu didn't seem to have changed much from before. Zhao Chao knew that his second brother's heart was dead, completely dead.
That day, his second brother drank too much and asked for a tianqing poison.
He said, "I also want to taste what kind of pain it is?"
He wanted to taste his own sins.
Of course, Zhao Chao wouldn't give it to him, "Second brother, you still have little Zhao. What will he do if you're like this? He's only five years old this year."
Zhao Nanyu said with a smile, "Don't worry, I won't die." He said hoarsely, "She will come back."
Advertisements
No one could take her away from him, no one could.
After waking up, Zhao Nanyu recovered his cool and noble appearance again. His temperament was cold and hard, making others dared not go close to him.
A month later, little Zhao got sick.
The disease was more severe than ever before.
Zhao Nanyu was worried about him. He stood by his bed and held the child in his arms. Under the candlelight, he did not turn his eyes away from looking at his son. In fact, the child's appearance was not like Song Luan.
Only he could vaguely see her resemblance from him.
Zhao Nanyu's eyes were sour. She liked to look at him with innocent eyes, and shook his sleeves every time she wanted to act coquettish.
Little Zhao's mouth sob a few words, but Zhao Nanyu did not hear clearly.
Zhao Nanyu knew that the child depended on his mother. He was cold-tempered, but he was soft like a bun in front of his mother. He was obedient and sensible in everything he said.
In the latter half of the night, the temperature on little Zhao's forehead finally dropped. Zhao Nanyu's brain hurt a little. He didn't sleep too much these days. Even though it was late at night, he was still not sleepy.
Song Luan loves their son. If she knew that this child was ill, she must have complained that she had not taken good care of him.
When the sun came, little Zhao opened his eyes, his voice was soft and sticky, and he said, "Dad."
Zhao Nanyu put his palm on his forehead, "Your fever's gone."
People who are sick are always more vulnerable. Little Zhao threw himself into his arms, his tears poured out from the corners of his eyes, and one by one, it fell on Zhao Nanyu's sleeves. "I dreamed of mother. I miss her so much."
Zhao Nanyu also missed her very much.
He touched his head placidly, "Then don't get sick easily. Your mother will be distressed when she comes back."
Zhao Nanyu had even thought that when Song Luan comes back, she must be watched closely, and she would never be given a chance to leave him.
Even if she was dead, she would lay by his side.
***
The story of the little princess went on and on. She dreamed about it for five days. On the sixth day, she couldn't stand it any more, and rushed downstairs. The young man in taoist clothes still sat there.
The man was not surprised at her appearance. In anticipation, he asked, "Do you remember?"
She didn't. She really had no memory.
That was, every time she thought about it, she felt sad for a long time.
Song Luan was a little angry, and this uncomfortable anger went to the young man. "You're still so young, and you act like a god."
The young man had a compassionate look, "You'll go back."
This was a destiny that couldn't be stopped.
She would remember everything.
She would like everyone except Zhao Nanyu. She would never fall in love with him again.
The young man thought it would be his gift to her.
Song Luan didn't want to talk to him any more. She turned around and left.
All of a sudden, Song Luan's back brain ache, and she could only see black in front of her eyes, as she fainted.
***
After opening her eyes again, Song Luan found herself lying in a back alley. When she raised her eyes, she saw an antique house. Her eyes were blank and innocent, and she didn't realize what just happened.
She had been able to calm down this time, and looked at the clothes she was wearing. It was very good. It looked like a costume.
Song Luan slowly climbed up against the wall, not wanting to run directly to the river.
The river reflected a familiar face. Her own appearance was exactly the same as the previous body's face.
Did she transmigrate back again? Last time it was her soul that crossed over, this time it was her body.
But this world was clearly a false world, a world created with the author's pen.
Song Luan, who was still muddleheaded, walked in the street, for a moment she didn't know where to go. Her striking appearance walking in the street was very eye-catching, so she couldn't help but speed up her pace.
Suddenly, a sedan chair rushed out from the corner. Song Luan retreated too quickly and fell to the ground. The servant who carried the sedan chair rushed forward, helped her up politely, and apologized in a low voice. "Miss, I'm sorry."
When Song Luan raised her face, the servant screamed, "Ah Ghost!"
He crawled back trembling. The man in the sedan chair said in a displeased tone, "What are you crying about?"
"My lord....It's the young lady of the Song family...the ghost of the third lady of the Song family has been found."
The third young lady of the Song family had been dead for months. The Song family and the Zhao family had completely turned their faces and had no contact with each other again.
It seemed that the Song family did not even intend to recognize their nephew. In a word, the two families were like water and fire.
Zhao Wenyan rubbed his eyebrows. "Nonsense. Be careful with your mouth."
"Young master, I really didn't talk nonsense. If you don't believe it, come out and see, It's really her."
Song Luan also understood that it was Zhao Wenyan, Zhao Nanyu's brother, sitting in the sedan chair.
She was a bit at a loss. To be honest, she had not figured out how to explain to him.
Zhao Wenyan lifted the curtain, and his face was full of sharpness.
When he saw the person in front of him, he was surprised, and couldn't say anything, "Second sister-in-law!?"
He was confused, so he pinched his shoulder. After a long time, he managed to keep his mind steady. His face was white, as he stuttered, and said, "You...you're not..."
Wasn't she dead? Her body was burned.
He had seen her body with his own eyes. Now who was this person in front of him? There could never be someone that looked exactly like his second sister-in-law.
Song Luan waved her hand and ran away before he could react.
She hadn't figured out what to do. If she was taken back to Zhao residence by Zhao Wenyan, would she be treated as a monster?
She could fool the rest.
But how could she fool Zhao Nanyu? She was stabbed to death by him! He knew whether she was dead or not!
So, Song Luan ran away.
Zhao Wenyan still had time to go after her in the future, so he didn't bother to chase her.
The servant spoke carefully and asked, "Sir, let's go and tell the young master about it."
Zhao Wenyan thought, "No, I can't tell my brother."
He didn't believe in bringing back the dead.
Moreover, if this person was really his second sister-in-law, she looked like she didn't want to return to Zhao's residence.
She didn't want to go back to his brother.
=============== Chapter 74
Song Luan didn't know where she could run. She had no money, nor any valuable jewelry.
A person who should have died reappeared, of course, Zhao Wenyan's face would be scared white by her.
She wandered around the street for two times.
It was getting dark. Song Luan's stomach murmured and protested. The smell of steamed buns reached her nose from far away. She moved closer, looked at the steamed buns, and swallowed.
She was hungry and starving.
I really want to eat...wuwuwu.
There were two more hands in her sight, and she heard a girl's faint voice. She pressed her voice for fear that others would hear her. "Boss, I want two steamed buns."
"Ok."
Song Luan turned her head. Even though the face in front of her was a little black, she still recognized the person at a glance, "Ayun?"
The little girl's hands shook. The two steamed stuffed buns almost fell. Her eyes were in panic, but when she recognized Song Luan, she was relieved, "Miss Song?"
Song Luan coughed twice, "It's me."
She pointed to Ayun's dress and asked, "How did you get it?"
Her clothes were ragged and tattered, like those worn by beggars. Her face and arms were all covered with ashes.
Ayun wanted to pull her by the corner of her dress. But after realizing that she was very dirty, she didn't touch her, and said trembling, "Miss Song, can you pretend that you haven't seen me. Don't talk to Mr. Zhao after you go back."
If Zhao Nanyu knew her whereabouts, he would go and tell that man.
She's only been out for a few days!?
She's not going back.
Li Han had better be dead.
Song Luan's face was not comfortable. It seemed that Ayun didn't know about her death yet?! Anyway, she was like a celebrity. No one even talked about her when she's dead? It shouldn't be!
Oh, yes, Ayun seemed to be more pitiful than her. No one could have told her the news that she had died. Otherwise, with her courage, she would have fainted.
"Did you sneak out?" Song Luan guessed and asked.
She had little admiration for Ayun in her heart. It's hard for her to escape from the palace. She didn't know how she got out.
Ayun lowered her face, "I...I.." She hesitated, and couldn't speak. She was afraid that Song Luan would tell her whereabouts.
Ayun was so anxious that she was about to cry.
Song Luan held her hand. "Don't cry. I won't tell anyone else. "
She didn't know what to do.
Ayun put away her tears and said several thanks. "I had a lot of trouble just to slip out."
She was kept in prison for several months. Li Han ordered that no one was allowed to see her. The maid who delivered her meals every day was silent like a mute.
She glared with her round her eyes and complained, "He didn't give me food, and I was hungry for days! I can't stand it, so I ran out. Don't worry, I won't give you any trouble. I'll go now."
Song Luan took her hand and said, "Wait."
"Why...what's wrong?"
Song Luan asked awkwardly, "Do you still have money?"
Ayun shook her head. "There's no money, but I brought a lot of gold and silver jewelry with me."
She took out the golden jewelry in her arms and said, "Look! I brought them all."
She also thought that she couldn't do without money. She didn't have silver, but she could exchange these things for silver.
"Well, do you have a place to go?" Asked Song Luan.
Ayun shook her head.
Song Luan had the cheek to open her mouth, "Let's be a companion!"
"Ah?"
"To be honest, Zhao Nanyu didn't give me any food, so I came out secretly."
So far, she could only be a companion with Ayun! At least she didn't have to starve to death.
Ayun didn't believe that, "But I think Mr. Zhao likes you very much."
Song Luan pretended to wipe her tears. "Every family has a hard time. In fact, he wanted to kill me before I ran out."
Song Luan remembered that she was not without money. Most of the small coffers she had saved in the past were still in the Zhao residence, and couldn't take them out. A small part was in Huai Jin's yard. She didn't appear in Huai Jin's sight. It's not good to frighten the little boy.
The two women were talking. Jin Wuwei walked fiercely down the long street, searching door to door. It seemed that he was looking for someone. Song Luan thought that since he was sent by the palace, he must have come to find Ayun.
She took Ayun to squat in the corner and pressed her face between her legs to prevent her from showing her head.
Jin Wuwei has a sharp knife pinned to his waist. His face was heavy. He interrogated every person, one by one. It seemed that if he couldn't find who he was looking for, he would never give up.
He didn't find anyone, so they went to the next place to search. Song Luan and Ayun now had a chance to breathe. If Ayun was found, she couldn't run away.
It's very annoying.
Song Luan took a hairpin given by Ayun and pawned it for 20 liang in the pawn shop. She didn't know that the gold hairpin was worth more than 20 liang, but now she couldn't care about that much money.
Song Luan also wittily picked the worst business shops. Seeing the plaque, they all went to do business with the impending bankruptcy pawnshop.
Ayun's things must have been given by the slag emperor.
When Ayun heard her, she foolishly said, "He didn't give it to me. I bought it with my own money."
Song Luan was curious, "How much did you spend?"
Advertisements
Ayun thought about it and said, "One hundred taels!"
Although it was Li Han's money, Song Luan's flesh ached, there was so much losses!
When she becomes rich, she would help Ayun redeem the gold hairpin.
Ayun was obviously afraid of being alone. She held her hand all the time and hid behind her carefully. It's not hard to understand, since she had been hiding around for fear of being found.
"Miss Song, where are we going now? What should I do?" She looked at Song Luan with her eyes wide open. "Otherwise, let's go down to the south of the Yangtze River? My former home was in Jiangnan. It's beautiful."
she won't be chased if she went there.
"It's too late. Let's find a place to live."
"Oh, good."
Two people found a poor inn, and they carefully stayed inside.
Ayun's body was dirty. After taking a bath and changing into a new dress, Song Luan could see the appearance of the lovely round faced girl before. However, she seemed not satisfied with her beautiful clothes. "It's easy to be recognized. I'd better put on the clothes I just wore. It was bought by me from a little beggar."
Not before long, the streets would be covered with her portraits. Ayun really didn't want to be caught back. She would be locked up for a few months.
She poked her fingers and was not very happy.
When she was a child, Li Han was much more lovable than he was now. He never did anything that made her sad.
When he said he would come back for revenge, she was unwilling, because when she was a child, she heard that the Imperial Palace was a place of cannibalism.
At that time, Ayun just sent him to the wharf and had no intention of returning to the capital with him. But then her home was gone and there was no place to go, so she came back with Li Han.
Why are men so fickle? Li Han called her every time, but he was merciless whenever he tortured and bullied her.
If she didn't obey, he won't give her food, and even didn't feed her with water. Such a man was really cruel.
So Ayun pretended to be dying. The maidservants lied to find the doctor. Then, she changed into the maid's clothes, and hid in the empty bucket and escaped from the palace.
Song Luan comforted her, "Don't be afraid. I will smear your face with dirt tomorrow."
Two people were huddled together in a bed at night. Song Luan was sleepless and had a lot of things in her mind. She thought of Zhao Nanyu and his tears again. However, in addition to some blockage in her heart, the throbbing she had for Zhao Nanyu seemed to disappear.
But she didn't know what Zhao Nanyu would do. Would he think of her as a fake? Or would he believe in ghosts and gods?
After daybreak, Song Luan and Ayun packed up and went to the gate of the city. They went to the corner to have a look. The guard at the gate was extremely strict, and the portrait of Ayun was already pasted on the wall. There were still pictures of her in men's clothes on it.
Song Luan took Ayun out of the gate and rented a remote courtyard for several liang of silver. Although the price was a little expensive, the yard was clean. At least they didn't have to clean it.
They stayed there for the time being. Song Luan did not dare let Ayun go out to buy vegetables.
However, whenever Song Luan went out, she would wear a veil every time. She was afraid that she would frighten people who knew her, just like the day she met Zhao Wenyan.
She had no idea whether Zhao Wenyan would tell Zhao Nanyu what he saw.
Ayun was a good breadwinner. She had no temper and was soft spoken. She ate whatever food that was available. Song Luan found that her appetite was amazing. She could eat two bowls of rice for each meal.
A few days of comfort did not pass, because on the night that they had just gone to sleep, the yard door was banged loudly. It was as if they were going to kick the door open.
Ayun shivered in the quilt. Song Luan could see that this little girl was really afraid of the slag emperor. She thought of the gorgeous cage she saw, and trembled all over.
Abnormal men should really be feared.
Like every time Zhao Nanyu said he'd break her leg, she was also afraid of him.
What's more, Zhao Nanyu seemed to have been blackened after they spent time together. Did he get anxious? When he looked at her, it felt like he was going to lock her up in the name of love.
Suddenly, they heard a loud knock on the door.
Song Luan touched her head and put on her clothes. "You hide in the haystack behind the stove."
Song Luan had not forgotten to draw freckles on her face. Holding a lantern, she opened the gate of the courtyard, pretending to be impatient. "Who is it? I can't sleep after knocking on the door in the middle of the night!"
She faced a cold and heroic face right after she opened the door.
There was a group of people standing behind him. His sharp eyes fixed on Song Luan's face for a long time, before confirming that she was not the person in the portrait, "Excuse me."
Song Luan acted as a shrew intensely. "Can you do anything by disturbing me?! Do I have to be afraid of you just because you are in a group? Do you know that your acts are disturbing people? I have to get up early to do business tomorrow. Go and roll!"
After listening to her, the man waved to his subordinates, "Go in and search."
Song Luan's face changed. "What are you doing?"
She simply ignored her image and yelled, "Come on, rob me!"
She opened her collar slightly. "Indecent ah! The imperial courts ordered officials to be indecent!!"
Originally, none of her neighbors wanted to join in the fun, but when they heard the four words of 'the imperial court's order', the neighbors came out to see the excitement.
With a sneer, the man pulled out the knife from his waist and said, "Go in."
The crowd dispersed again.
The group of people who searched the room did not go gentle at all.
After a search, someone came out to report.
"My lord, no one has been found."
The man looked calm. "It's in this area. We'll search the remaining houses tomorrow."
"Yes."
Song Luan was terrified. When the guards went far away, she locked the door of the yard tightly, and pulled Ayun out of the haystack. "We can't stay here any longer."
Ayun was still shaking, "How do you think they found me here?"
Song Luan instantly thought that it was the gold hairpin that they pawned! The hairpin was not ordinary at first glance, which was why she subconsciously thought that it was sent by the slag emperor!
Ayun was too naive. She was afraid that the slag emperor just made her happy on a whim and 'sold' the hairpin to her.
There was only little money left from them. Song Luan wanted to move, but she was in a tight corner. In addition, Jin Wuwei already came and went in this street, so he didn't set foot on their land boundary again.
They relaxed.
***
Gu Yan met Zhao Nanyu, and he politely greeted him.
Gu Yan, a five-and-three rough man, had to sigh to himself. Zhao Nanyu was really good-looking, too white, and had light vitality.
He was busy catching people at the moment, so he didn't have time to exchange long greetings with Zhao Nanyu, so after two words, he was about to leave.
Looking at Jin Wuwei behind him, Zhao Nanyu raised his eyebrows and asked, "Are you looking for someone?"
Gu Yan nodded, "Yes, I'm going to get someone."
Zhao Nanyu shook his head. "It's too reckless. I'm afraid the news will spread to her before you arrive."
The battle was too big.
Gu Yan pondered and thought that there was some truth in what he said. They had searched the yard once before, but they didn't find out anything. It should be that they had already scared the snake.
"What Mr. Zhao said is reasonable, but if we don't bring more people, I'm afraid we won't find her."
Zhao Nanyu pulled the corners of his mouth. "You can't catch even a weak woman?"
He couldn't remember what the woman Li Han wanted to recapture. He only remembered that she was timid.
"Then I will go first." Gu Yan stopped suddenly and asked, "Mr. Zhao, why don't we go together?"
Zhao Nanyu paused for a while, then faintly said, "It's still not possible."
=============== Chapter 75
Gu Yan didn't force him. He heard that Zhao Nanyu's wife had just passed away.
Although it was rumored that Zhao Nanyu settled old accounts with his wife and killed her, but Gu Yan didn't think so, because Zhao Nanyu looked very wistful.
Gu Yan bowed his head, and said goodbye.
Jin Wuwei blocked the water around the small courtyard with a knife where Song Luan and Ayun lived, and the light from the torch illuminated half of the sky.
"My lord, it's set up."
Gu Yan made a gesture, and immediately someone came to knock on the door.
Naturally, no one would come open the door for them. Gu Yan had lost his patience and gave a look, so Jin Wuwei kicked the gate of the courtyard directly.
Song Luan, who was hiding in the house, was more or less aware that they had been discovered by them. It was really unexpected that in ancient times when information and communication were not yet developed, the slag emperor could still find someone so quickly.
She walked up to Gu Yan, held her head high and laughed contemptuously. "If you like me, please tell me directly. It's really meaningless for you to break into my house again and again."
Gu Yan didn't know what to do. He asked his subordinates to hold her up. "I suggest you shut up."
Lest if you're not afraid to die.
Song Luan used to play the role of an arrogant lady. How could she be frightened by such a battle? She sneered and said, "Wait, I'll go to the government office tomorrow. What are you guys bullying a woman for?"
She couldn't bear to see Ayun be taken back. The slag emperor both had grudges against ghosts and animals, and also kills people. It's blood abuse.
Gu Yan's people once again searched, and got nothing. Their faces were very ugly. There was no reason why a little girl could not be found.
Gu Yan looked at Song Luan with cold eyes and gnashed his teeth. "Turn this place over for me. I don't believe I can't find anyone."
Song Luan met his cold eyes, and didn't feel afraid at all. She hid Ayun in the opening of the stove. No one would think to look over it.
The group of people tossed the room for half an hour, and Song Luan's wardrobe was already messed up.
It wasn't a big place, so it didn't take long for them to turn it up.
Gu Yan clenched the handle of the knife tightly, and his knuckles snapped a few times.
He turned his eyes to Song Luan. He had never seen her face well before. Now that her face was illuminated by the light of the torch, he felt a little familiarity.
He asked, "Have I seen you before?"
Song Luan's heart jumped and pretended to be calm. "Ha ha, how old are the ways to pick up women these days!"
Sure enough, Gu Yan shut up and didn't mention it again.
Song Luan felt that she was going to piss this man to death.
"Mr. Gu, I don't know where she is hiding."
"Don't miss even a single thing. Search carefully."
Song Luan remembered that this person was the elder brother of the original owner's closest friend, the eldest son of Gu family, Gu Yan.
Gu Yan, who was disgusted with the original owner, cut off her contact with her sister several times. It was estimated that because of the things that the original owner did, he hated her and did not want to see her.
Song Luan was glad that he had not seen her, otherwise it would be troublesome to be recognized.
Gu Yan couldn't bear it. He pinched her neck, and only gave a little space to breathe. "Where is she? If you don't talk, I'll kill you."
Song Luan didn't believe that he would dared to kill, so she raised her face, closed her eyes, and said, "Okay, okay, you can kill me. Just kill me, lest I live in this world and be humiliated by you. I can't even understand what and who you are talking about. It's baffling."
She was devoid of any sense of shame, just like a pig not afraid of the boiling water.
He had lived for almost thirty years, but had never seen such a shameless woman.
The women in his eyes were all knowledgeable, clever, sensible, and none of them were as shrewd and unreasonable as she was.
Gu Yan reluctantly let go of her, but Song Luan began to play mischievous, and seized his hand. "Do you want to kill me? I'll tell you, if you don't kill me today, you'll be a bastard! You are a scumbag!"
Gu Yan made a gesture to his opponent, "Block her mouth." After a pause, "By the way, please bring Mr. Zhao here."
"Yes."
***
Zhao Wenyan struggled for many days, but he hadn't decided whether to tell him about what happened to his second sister-in-law.
Seeing his second brother-in-law living like a corpse, he felt very sad.
It's late at night, and Ruan Sheng was still sitting under the candle light embroidering shoes. He walked over with an unnatural tone. "It's late. Don't be busy. You can do it tomorrow."
Ruan Sheng said with a smile, "Go to bed first. I'll make my nephew-in-law shoes first before I head off to sleep. You don't have to worry about me."
Little Zhao was only five years old, and just lost his mother. His father's heart also went with her.
Zhao Wenyan thought for a long time. He even forgot to think about their son. The child was not very talkative, but after Song Luan passed away, his talking became lesser than before.
Zhao Wenyan was biting his teeth while he went to the study to find his second brother.
Zhao Nanyu just coaxed little Zhao to sleep.
When he opened the door, he saw his younger brother. He was expressionless as he asked, "What's the matter?"
Zhao Wenyan nodded, and asked, "Second brother, is she really dead?"
Zhao Nanyu's sharp eyes swept toward him. His face seemed to be covered with layers of black gas. No one dared to mention Song Luan in front of him for a long time.
Zhao Wenyan cowered by his death gaze. He was afraid, so he added, "I bumped into a person who looked exactly like second sister-in-law in the street."
Zhao Nanyu looked at him for a long time and said, "Zhao Wenyan, I don't have the heart to make jokes with you now. You'd better not tease me with her affairs, okay?"
Even his own brother wanted to strangle him directly.
Zhao Nanyu originally thought that he wouldn't feel pain anymore, but when he closed his eyes, he remembered that Song Luan had been stabbed to death by him, and the sudden fire that had left her body to ashes...
There was nothing left.
Advertisements
The feeling that he couldn't hold on to her was really painful. Zhao Nanyu didn't want to taste it again.
If it were really like Zhao Wenyan had said, that she came back, Zhao Nanyu would think that he had gone mad. It wouldn't be normal.
He would definitely locked up Song Luan, so she could only stay in his sight forever.
Zhao Wenyan explained, "How can I make fun of you about my second sister-in-law? I really saw her."
"So what about her?! Zhao Wenyan, don't you tell me that you let her go when you saw her?" Zhao Nanyu's voice suddenly sharpened. "What about her, where is she then?!"
Zhao Wenyan bowed his head and said to himself, "She ran away. As soon as I saw her, she ran away."
It rained this morning. The eaves were still dripping with rain. The sound was clear and crisp.
"Young master, it seems that Mr. Gu is in trouble. Please go to the outskirts of the city to help him."
Zhao Nanyu passed by Zhao Wenyan, and said, "I'm going."
When passing by Ah Yan, he did not forget to leave a sentence, "When I come back, you can tell me clearly."
This evening, he met Gu Yan on the road, but he didn't expect that a delicate woman was so difficult to catch, and she was still not caught at this point.
***
When Song Luan heard that Gu Yan was going to ask Zhao Nanyu for help, her brain couldn't react. Her mouth was blocked to death, and she could only make a 'wuwuwu' voice.
She couldn't speak, so she had to kick Gu Yan with her feet, and act like a shrew.
Gu Yan refused to pay any attention to her at all. Song Luan opened her teeth and bit the hand of the man who covered her mouth, then she was relieved.
"Mr. Gu, who are you looking for? You can't go anywhere else?! It's dark. I'm really weak. I want to sleep."
Before Zhao Nanyu came, she would then slip away or leave the area.
There was no other choice.
Gu Yan tolerated her extremely hard work and wished to sew her mouth up. "Shut up."
Song Luan continued to speak to him in a good voice, "Well, you keep looking. I'll go to the inn and have a rest."
Gu Yan's eyebrows jumped, "Get out of here."
Song Luan was overjoyed and said, "Okay..."
She felt that she was really a wizard. She let Ayun cover herself in black cloth and hid in the stove! Nobody could find her.
Song Luan just stepped out of the threshold, when Gu Yan changed his mind, "You stop."
"What is it?"
"After you get out of here, be obedient from now on. Why don't you shut up when you need to shut up?"
Song Luan blushed with anger. Gu Yan was playing with her. He didn't want to let her go.
When Zhao Nanyu arrived, he saw only a woman with a disheveled hair, squeezing her neck to face Gu Yan's eyes. He was too far away to hear what she said.
What Song Luan said was still those haughty words, "If you are a man, kill me, otherwise you let me go."
Zhao Nanyu glanced around. "Hasn't Mr. Gu found anyone yet?"
When Song Luan heard this voice, her whole body shrank. She moved quickly to Gu Yan, hiding behind him, and using this man's tall body to hide herself tightly.
She poked out a pair of eyes, and only dared to carefully look at his side. Zhao Nanyu was more raging than before.
Song Luan quietly retracted her own line of sight back, praying that Zhao Nanyu's attention would not turn to her.
Gu Yan said with a heavy face, "No, it's well hidden."
Zhao Nanyu raised his eyebrows. "Have you searched every corner?"
"Yes."
"Kitchen?"
"I did."
"Are you sure? There's nothing missing? As long as the place is possible for people to hide, we have to demolish them. Kitchen, stove, and cottage, all over again."
Someone whispered, "You can't hide a beautiful girl in the pit, right? How dirty will it be. The opening of the stove is so small that it can't hide a person. As for the cottage, let alone the little girl, we can't even stand it. How can one be able to hide?"
Gu Yan murmured, "Listen to Lord Zhao, and go find her."
Song Luan really despised Zhao Nanyu. He was worthy of being a male lead. He had all kinds of martial arts skills, and was good at finding people.
It didn't take long for the disheveled and dirty-face Ayun be pulled out.
She had two tears hanging on her face. She was scared.
She was so timid that she cried out on the spot and hiccuped, "I don't want to go back."
Ayun saw Song Luan hiding behind Gu Yan, and suddenly fell silent.
She felt that Miss Song was miserable, because Mr. Zhao was standing here.
Song Luan made a gesture to her.
Ayun immediately understood, sucked her nose, and silently turned her eyes from her side.
Ayun who was caught was unable to run away.
"Miss, I've seen you in the palace. The emperor has been waiting for you for a long time."
She pointed to Zhao Nanyu, "I want him to send me now."
Zhao Nanyu hooked his lips, sneered, and brushed his sleeve. "My child is very sick. Since you have found her, I'll leave first."
He didn't give any face.
Ayun also felt very good. It was good that he chose to leave, so Miss Song would be okay.
Suddenly someone asked, "Commander, what about this shrew?"
He was just bitten by her, and this man still held a grudge...
Shrew
Poor
Woman
Gu Yan had a headache. If the emperor knew that this woman was helping her hide, the emperor must have wanted her to die.
He pulled Song Luan out of his back and said, "Weren't you just rude? Why are you as good as a dog now?"
Zhao Nanyu was just about to leave, and didn't mean to spare a glance at the other side, but when he did, his eyes changed dramatically, and his facial features were somewhat ferocious. He stopped immediately.
Song Luan's heart sank. It was over, she was discovered.
She rolled her eyes and scolded Gu Yan, "You are the dog."
Gu Yan sneered, but before he could speak, a gust of wind swept in his ear, and the woman on his side was dragged to the other end.
Zhao Nanyu's hand was like a pair of pliers, as he grasped her wrist hard. His dark eyes were staring at her, his hands seemed to tremble, and his hoarse voice quivered, "Song Luan?"
Song Luan couldn't tell...her inner feelings were a little sour, sad, and there was a little joy of reunion after parting, but it seemed that she didn't feel any heart-thumping feeling.
She opened her mouth. "It's me."
Song Luan felt that his eyes were a little scary. Oh, how could she feel that he had blackened!
=============== Chapter 76
The plot of the book had long been changed.
Song Luan was dragged by Zhao Nanyu's wrist. She was actually very ignorant, and didn't expect that she would be caught by Zhao Nanyu so soon.
Gu Yan's eyebrows moved. The martial arts practitioner's ear power was excellent.
He could hear him say 'Song Luan' clearly. His eyes became deep, and he was puzzled. Wasn't that woman dead?
Zhao Nanyu pulled Song Luan behind him, blocked her face, and said slowly, "Mr. Gu, I'll take her first."
As for the others, he didn't want to take care of any of them.
Gu Yan didn't stop him. His task had been completed. The unreasonable woman behind Zhao Nanyu had nothing to do with him.
It didn't matter who she was. However, if she was really Song Luan, Gu Yan still remembered that his sister seemed to have a good relationship with her.
Gu Yan arched his hands and said, "Go slowly."
Song Luan felt that her wrist were red now, and it was really painful to be held by him.
She followed him and murmured in a low voice, "Can you be gentle?"
Zhao Nanyu was silent and threw her directly into the carriage. With a heavy face, he said to the coachman in a cold voice, "Go back to the residence."
Song Luan's hair was disheveled, and her dark hair messily fell on her shoulder. She shrank in the corner silently, trying to reduce her sense of existence.
On the other side, Ayun shrank as Gu Yan looked at her, "Young lady, I'll see you off."
Ayun pointed to her dirty clothes. "Let me change clothes before I go. He must be unhappy to see me dirty."
Gu Yan examined with his eyes, and said, "Hurry up."
Ayun was very happy, "Okay."
She ran back to the house and got out of the back door of the kitchen.
The wall was small. She often took Li Han to climb the wall when she was a child. This height was nothing to her.
Suddenly, a cold voice came from behind, "Young lady, I advise you to go back honestly. The emperor has been waiting for a long time. I fear that his anger would be even worse."
Gu Yan now refused to let her change clothes. He took the dirty little girl back to the palace.
***
The atmosphere in the carriage was too depressing. Song Luan felt that she was about to be suffocated. She turned her eyes and carefully looked at Zhao Nanyu. This sight happened to match his dark eyes. She was shocked by the stare.
Song Luan continued to shrink back into the corner, as if it was too late to repent, "In fact, I am not Song Luan, why don't you let me out of the carriage?"
Zhao Nanyu did not say a word, approached her, and casually tied her scattered hair.
Song Luan's hair hurt a little when he pulled it. She bared her teeth and said, "You loosen it. I don't like to tie it up."
Zhao Nanyu held her hand, while the other hand that was holding her hair also slightly hardened.
Hearing her take a breath of cold air, he said, "Don't move."
This hoarse voice sounded terrible and frightening.
Song Luan shuddered slightly and had goose bumps on her arm. She knew Zhao Nanyu was really different from before.
Pretend tenderness no longer exists.
He was violent, authoritarian, and ruthless.
After her messy hair was tied, she didn't look so crazy at last.
Zhao Nanyu's slender fingers slowly climbed up her cheek, and the crazy obsession in his dark eyes was revealed. He murmured, "You are back at last."
Song Luan guessed that the young taoist must have done a good job for her to crossed back over.
Song Luan was brought back to the Zhao family by Zhao Nanyu. She found that her original residence seemed to have disappeared.
Maybe it was the same as the ending in the book–it was burned.
Song Luan stayed in a strange room.
Looking at Zhao Nanyu, she summoned up her courage and said, "Are you not afraid?"
"What should I be afraid of?"
"I've been dead, don't you want to ask what's going on?"
"No."
"I'll tell you."
"No."
He didn't want to listen. Song Luan always uses various reasons to leave him.
Song Luan felt that his stubbornness was worse than before, and her brain hurt a little. She didn't want to tell him that the world was just a world in a book.
On the first night when Song Luan was taken back, nothing happened. Zhao Nanyu simply held her and slept with her all night. In the middle of the night, Song Luan felt a little out of breath. She woke up with a red face and found that the man holding her was not sleeping. It seemed that he had been watching her all the time.
It was not until the next morning that Song Luan realized that it was wrong. The door of the room was locked. She had wanted to open the window, but she found that the window was also nailed to death. It was airtight.
There was no light in the room, and it looked a little dull.
Song Luan was so angry that she wanted to lose her temper. At first, she couldn't find anyone to lose her temper. When Zhao Nanyu came into the room, she asked, "What do you mean by locking the window and locking the door?"
Prison Play?!
She wasn't sick anymore.
Zhao Nanyu rubbed her face with a smile. "Ah Yan told me that he saw you, but you ran away cleverly, so I think you probably don't want to come back."
Song Luan pointed to the wooden window that had been nailed to death. "So you lock me up just because of this?"
Advertisements
Zhao Nanyu frowned and thought about it carefully, then he said slowly, "I think it's very good."
Song Luan's ears were red and her teeth were trembling. "Didn't you poison me to kill me? Is it wrong for me to run?"
Zhao Nanyu nodded and thought for a long time. He went to the desk, took out the dagger from the drawer, and put it into her hand. "I hurt you, so now, you can stab me back."
Song luan couldn't do it. Both of them knew this in their hearts.
Zhao Nanyu didn't seem to be joking with her. "It doesn't matter. I can do this by myself, and you will be satisfied."
"Don't be like this. It's boring."
She would really be fooled by his bitter tricks again.
Zhao Nanyu sighed. His face that was bright as the moon seemed to be very sympathetic. He said, "If you leave me, where do you want to go? No money, no guide, you don't even have an identification id. Where can you go?"
Song Luan muttered, "I can go to my mother."
Zhao Nanyu slowly opened his smile. His smile was extremely eye-catching and beautiful. He said, "Did you forget? You're a dead person. Will your mother believe it? Won't they be scared to death? Wouldn't they think you're a monster?"
Song Luan felt cold in the back of her head.
After a burst of fear, she asked, "Just tell me?"
Zhao Nanyu looked pitiful, as if he was really sad. He opened his lips and said, "No one in the world will regard you as the third miss of the Song family except me. You have no identity and can't go anywhere."
"In their eyes, the real third lady of the Song family had been burned away."
Song Luan understood what he said. It was easier to understand. She was now dead. She couldn't do anything.
When she appeared on the street openly, she was afraid of being recognized by some acquaintances.
"What do you want? Lock me up for a lifetime?! Zhao Nanyu, can you wake up?"
Why did she die once, this person was even more crazy!
Zhao Nanyu lowered his eyes. "You don't like it, so I won't."
He raised his clear eyes, looked at her, and continued, "I'm not locking you down. I just want you to be with me."
He spoke in a pitiful tone.
Song Luan's temper improved a lot, and restrained her anger. "Can you tear down the lock on the door and the board on the window?"
"No."
Song Luan's eyes widened. Zhao Nanyu used to say a lot of nice things to her whenever he refused!
Woo woo woo, he really changed.
Song Luan couldn't make a sense about him, and decided not to let him hold her that night.
Lying on the bed barefoot, Zhao Nanyu had just fallen asleep on her side. Her feet kicked him and muttered, "I hate you. You go away."
Zhao Nanyu took advantage of the situation and pulled her white feet into his arms. He said in a deep voice, "Who do you hate?"
Song Luan took a deep breath, and then kicked him rudely, "I hate you."
Zhao Nanyu untied her collar, bent down, and smelled the fragrance of her white neck. He opened his mouth, took a bite on her shoulder, and chuckled in a low voice, "Go on."
Song Luan was too scared to move. Her toes curled up and her body was tense.
However, Zhao Nanyu didn't let her go. His belt and clothes fell to the ground one by one, and his chest was thin and the lines were smooth and powerful.
"Why don't you talk?"
She's afraid, couldn't he tell!!! Please let her go, woo woo.
Song Luan was imprisoned in his arms and could not move. Her face flushed red and she murmured.
Zhao Nanyu's actions became more and more excessive, and his strength became more and more fierce.
It seemed that she had to make up for it at one time. Song Luan was sweating, and her thin sweat was slipping down from her forehead. She sobbed for mercy. "I don't hate you, don't hate you, okay?! You should be gentle."
"No gentleness."
Song Luan was the meat on the chopping board. She was tortured by him.
She completely put down her backbone, choked, and coquettishly begged. "Wuwuwuwu, please forgive me. I'm wrong."
In the warm night of the spring, the sound in the lotus gradually subsided after midnight.
Song Luan was covered in quilts, and her shoulder was full of green marks. She looked pitiful.
She couldn't move her fingers. She didn't know where Zhao Nanyu learned so many tricks.
She's so ashamed!
Shameless smelly man.
When Song Luan woke up again, she saw his beautiful and excessive face. She tilted her head and looked at him for a while, feeling empty.
It's calm.
Calm as if she wasn't moved by him.
Thinking of what he had done last night, Song Luan boldly poked her finger in his face, and whined, "Bad thing."
Seeing that he didn't wake up, she poked again in anger, "Bad thing, I'll ignore you!"
Hmpf!
=============== Chapter 77
The door was closed and there was no light in the room.
A long time had passed since Ayun was thrown in. There was a heavy footstep that seemed to come nearer.
"Oh, where is this dirty cat from?" His tone seemed to be mocking, but not entirely.
His eyes were cool as he glanced at the person in front of him. Just as he was about to reach out and wipe the dirt off her face, Ayun subconsciously dodged back.
Li Han's eyes suddenly turned ferocious, but still smiled, "What's the matter? Little dirty cats don't have a long memory?"
He firmly buttoned her chin, and with a casual smile, he took out a square of a handkerchief from the cuff and wiped the dirt on her face, "Miserable, dirty, not beautiful."
Li Han spoke to her again. Ayun was scared to death, but she raised her head and looked at him directly. She said the words in her heart, "Li Han, you are an ungrateful white-eyed wolf!"
If not because her parents were soft-hearted, could he live up to now!?
No one in the world probably knew that she was a few months older than Li Han.
At that time, she had never seen this younger brother before. Ayun had lost her temper, cried, and wanted to drive him away.
Later she thought it would be nice to have a playmate, and he was the best looking child she had ever seen.
Who would have thought how bad this person becomes when he grows up?
Li Han said with a casual smile, "Now you are the only one who dares to call me that taboo. How dare you."
He suddenly used his strength. "Don't you like the rich clothes and luxuriant food? Why escape? Do you want to marry someone else? If you just remember to eat and not to fight, then everything will be fine. You haven't learned enough, haven't you?"
When Ayun was 15 years old, she had a sweetheart. The man was kind and simple, and his family background was ordinary. Not to mention how rich he was, he had several acres of good farmland and could eat a full meal.
That was enough.
At that time, Ayun was waiting for him to come to propose marriage, but he suddenly died.
Ayun was very sad. After crying for three days, her eyes swelled into walnuts.
Not long ago, she learned that Li Han had done many cruel things secretly.
In Ayun's eyes, Li Han was a dark man who could smile at everyone. She never thought that he was so calculating, aggressive, and could kill people.
"The maid who served you last time was killed by me. She deserves to die for not guarding you properly." The room was hazy, and he blocked the only light shining on her. "Don't worry, if you don't move or run away, I won't kill anyone. "
***
Zhao Nanyu had not locked the door. However, Song Luan did not intend to leave. As he said, she was now a person with no identity, probably only a paranoid man like Zhao Nanyu would believe that she was Song Luan.
Most of the people she knew had seen her body and witnessed the fire.
In their eyes, she was already a dead person.
She knew that Zhao Nanyu had a way to get her identity back, but he never mentioned it. Perhaps he wished that she would not be seen for the rest of her life by anyone other than him.
Without the name of the third miss of the Song family, she had no parents, no brothers, and no one to rely on. She could only grow like a dodder flower on his high branches.
Zhao Nanyu would bring her strange things every day, treated her as a child, and deliberately coaxed her to be happy.
Song Luan had been very calm in the face of him. Sometimes he wouldn't let her out of his sight. Song Luan was angry but gradually realized that she didn't have much emotion for Zhao Nanyu.
This seemed to be a good thing, but her heart unexpectedly felt some uneasiness, always feeling that something went wrong.
Zhao Nanyu seemed to have fallen out with the Zhao family. These days, some Zhao members went to his bedroom and scratched the crack of the window. Song Luan heard the second lady's swearing words.
Zhao Nanyu was expressionless as he told the guards to drive her away.
She didn't know what happened to the Zhao family.
Song Luan propped up her chin and looked out of the window at the sky. Her face was melancholy, and many strange pictures flashed through her mind.
***
Song Luan complained in her heart. Why did he have to tell her the story of the princess and the prince? She died so miserably in the end. It was not good at all.
She remembered that in the past dream, a familiar voice said in her ear that the woman who was tied to the tower and was pierced by an arrow was her.
Song Luan only took this sentence as a joke. Was she so miserable? Always dying through the heart!?
It's a pity that she could never see the man in her dream.
Song Luan did not like to recall the story of the princess. She naturally rejected it. She didn't like it.
But she couldn't stand all the pictures that drilled into her brain. Those memories felt like they belonged to her originally.
Song Luan stood up, raised her hands, and stretched out. Turning her head, she found that the man lying on the desk was unconsciously asleep.
Zhao Nanyu seemed very tired these days. His eyes were black, and his expression was wary.
When Song Luan had just walked by, the man lying on the desk moved. He immediately opened his eyes. His eyes were a little dimmed, but when he saw Song Luan, he raised his lips and smiled at her.
The afterglow shone diagonally, this sudden smile was a little sweet.
Song Luan coughed twice. "If you are tired, go to bed."
It's easy to get sick if you sleep on the table.
Zhao Nanyu rubbed his eyebrows, and his sight gradually became clear. He spoke with a strong nasal voice, "I'm not sleepy."
As the day grew dark, he asked, "Are you hungry?"
Song Luan's face blushed. Zhao Nanyu and her tummy knew each other. She was about to wake him up just to tell him about this.
She couldn't see anyone in Zhao's residence. Even when she was hungry, she didn't dare to call her servant girl in.
Song Luan touched her empty stomach, and her voice was like the sound of a mosquito. "Yes, yes, I am hungry."
"I'll have the food prepared."
Advertisements
"Wait." She stopped him suddenly.
Zhao Nanyu turned and said, "What's the matter?"
Song Luan didn't care about keeping her face.
She blushed and stammered, "I want to eat salted duck."
Song Luan had to follow Zhao Nanyu vegetarian diet for many days, which made her greedy for meat.
Zhao Nanyu pursed his lips and said, "Okay."
He knew that his thoughts and ideas were not right and normal now, but he thought this moment was nice.
Song Luan had no branch to rely on and even could not go out of the door. She could only stay in his small world.
His strong desire for control had been suppressed for many years, and once this was opened, it was out of control.
Why didn't he know that he was so egotistical before? But there was no way, his love had always been selfish.
The servant girl bowed her head and did not dare to look at him all the way.
Song Luan ate two bowls of rice and had a good appetite. Zhao Nanyu filled her with a bowl of sweet soup. He was so happy that he put something in her mouth for fear that she would not be full.
Song Luan hiccuped, and she suddenly said, "Ah Yu, you can't let me stay in this room all my life, can you?"
Some people knew her in the capital, so long as she won't leave, won't it be okay?
Zhao Nanyu saw through what she was thinking and said, "Don't even think about it."
With a slightly sarcastic smile, he continued, "Even if I don't do it, you still can't get out of the gate."
She did not have a pass certificate and would only be detained at the gate of the city.
Song Luan smiled sweetly. Zhao Nanyu was trembling for a moment, so she took the initiative to sit beside him, grabbed his wide sleeve, and shook it gently. Her voice was sweet and greasy, "You help me get an identity, okay?"
Zhao Nanyu was now a man who covered the sky with only his one hand. It's easy to make a fake identity for her. It depended on whether he was willing or not.
It showed that he was not willing to do so.
Zhao Nanyu had a bad taste. He liked her to beg him.
"I know you're suffocating. When we move out, we'll be fine."
"Move out of here?!"
Zhao Nanyu wanted to keep her as a concubine!? Song Luan didn't care about the false name, it was good to be out of sight, so she could feel relaxed.
He nodded to her, "Don't worry, the new residence is about to be built, and you won't be wronged."
The Zhao family was going to separate.
Because of this, they quarreled with each other. Zhao Nanyu's grandfather was still alive, so it was not reasonable to separate the family.
Third master Zhao thought so, but he couldn't shake his son's idea. He scolded Zhao Nanyu several times, but he could not discipline him entirely.
Song Luan still misunderstood what he meant. She decided to hit the iron while it was hot. She looked at Zhao Nanyu with tears in her eyes, as if she wanted to cry to arouse his pity, "Woo, since you want to raise me as a concubine, I can't help but think you have to compensate me."
When Zhao Nanyu heard the word 'concubine', his face was not very good-looking, but his smile did not diminish. He raised his eyebrows and asked, "What compensation do you want?"
Song Luan squeezed out two false tears. "I won't hate you for such a big injustice, as long as you will get me something that can prove my identity."
It was really hard for a person with no identity to go anywhere and do nothing.
Zhao Nanyu pulled her to him with a deep smile and wiped away her tears with cold fingers. "Do you have other requests?"
Song Luan foolishly climbed up the pole he handed her, and said, "In the future, you will not go to my side. I am afraid that I will be sad if I meet you. Also, it is not easy for me to live outside alone. You remember to give me more gold and silver."
The money that could be spent was much better than jewelry.
Zhao Nanyu listened silently, but his face did not show. He only said with a smile, "I thought you would ask me to send you little Zhao and let you take him."
Song Luan was stunned, pursed her mouth tightly as if she suddenly lost her voice.
Zhao Nanyu played with her fingers, pretending to be unintentional, and said, "In the recent months, although he doesn't say anything, he misses you very much in his heart.
"He probably thought he would never see you again, and he cried behind my back several times.
"Don't you want to see him?"
These days, Song Luan never mentioned this matter, not because she forgot little Zhao, but because she was afraid to frighten the child.
Song Luan looked back and nodded, "I want to see him."
Zhao Nanyu said, "When the right time comes, I will bring him to you."
He took a bite on her delicate earlobe and said with a stuffy smile, "You didn't act very well just now. It seems that you are very happy to be in an outside room ."
Zhao Nanyu's eyes seemed like they were flying high up the sky.
The way she pretended to cry was really lovely.
=============== Chapter 78
Song Luan was a little embarrassed when he exposed her. She laughed and tried to muddle through.
However, Zhao Nanyu didn't care about it. He stroked her face with gentle fingertips. With a complicated tone, he said, "You really make me helpless."
Besides hiding her well, Zhao Nanyu couldn't think of a better way.
Song Luan couldn't get out of his yard, nor could she see little Zhao. She had nothing to do every day and felt bored. She didn't even have a person who she could speak to. Zhao Nanyu never lets anyone except him get close to this room. Everything about her needs was done by Zhao Nanyu himself.
If things go on like this, Song Luan would feel tired, and wouldn't be able to breathe under his strong control. 
She was angry, but she didn't feel any sadness. Of course, Zhao Nanyu would kiss her or whisper sultry words in her ear, but Song Luan would only look at him with a pair of ignorant eyes as if she didn't feel anything in her heart. She wouldn't blush red, and her heartbeat wouldn't jump up and down like before. It's as if nothing happened.
After a few days, Zhao Nanyu was separated from the Zhao family. Whatever he wanted to do this time, no one could dare stop him.
Zhao Nanyu held her in his arms that day and took her to the carriage. All the people in the family were surprised. They didn't know when the young master had an extra woman? Her face was covered, so no one could see it.
The second wife did not like Zhao Nanyu very much. Her husband was suppressed by him intentionally in the court. She held a grudge for a long time. 
Seeing this opportunity, she said strangely, "Sure enough, it's different when a man gets power. It's not long after Song Luan's death that her husband found a new love? There is really no man in this world who's affectionate. It's just that I pity my good daughter-in-law. No one knew how she died, and she even bore a son just for others. It's truly in vain."
Song Luan couldn't help but want to poke out her head. Zhao Nanyu silently pressed her back. He didn't even pay attention to the second lady. He turned around and got on the carriage.
Song Luan wanted to laugh a little bit when she heard the second lady speak against her injustice. In the beginning, the second lady had always targeted her and regarded her as a thorn in her eyes. Now that she spoke for her, Song Luan didn't know the picture of the situation.
Little Zhao sat alone in the back carriage. His face looked pale, as he lowered his head. His gloomy eyes looked at his father several times. Song Luan wore a cloak and did not show her face. It was understandable that the child wouldn't be able to recognize her.
The new house was half an hour's drive from the Zhao family. Song Luan had never been out the door since Zhao Nanyu captured her. She lifted the curtain and took a deep breath of fresh air.
To this day, she knew that Zhao Nanyu couldn't let her go. Stubborn people are very stubborn in everything.
Song Luan felt that her requirements had become very low. Since she couldn't escape, she just prayed silently that Zhao Nanyu would not continue to lock her up.
When the carriage stopped, Song Luan was still a little reluctant to go down. She looked up at the imposing new house, and she naturally felt a sense of inexplicable fear in her heart. She felt that it was difficult for her to get out once she went in.
She reluctantly held the door frame of the carriage. Zhao Nanyu looked at her and asked softly, "What's the matter? Don't you like it?"
Song Luan certainly didn't like it!
She looked at him with a pair of reddish eyes and did not speak. She tried to soften his heart with such pathetic eyes.
Zhao Nanyu did not force her out of the carriage "Really not planning to get down?"
Song Luan was a little flustered, and complained in a low voice, "Then you can't lock me up anymore."
Zhao Nanyu also knew what she was afraid of, so he laughed and said, "Okay."
"Then you can't lie to me."
"I won't lie to you."
Song Luan couldn't rest assured even if she got Zhao Nanyu's promise. She knew that Zhao Nanyu was probably lying to her. 
Song Luan's house was very gorgeous and luxurious. There were three screens of huanghuali . The window was decorated elegantly for women, which looked very exquisite. The patterns embroidered on it were lifelike. A huge bed was placed directly opposite the dressing table. The red curtain fell from the top of the head of the bed, and several red candles were lit on the bedside table.
Song Luan collapsed on a blanket made of snow-white fox hair. Her table was filled with golden jewelry.
Zhao Nanyu asked her, "Do you like it?"
This room was really beautiful.
Song Luan truthfully said, "It's very beautiful."
She didn't tell him whether she liked it or not. Who would love cages? She didn't like gold cages.
"My Lord, the young master wants to see you." The voice of the attendant came through the door.
Song Luan's heart trembled, and she lowered her face to cover up her uncomfortable expression.
Zhao Nanyu said lightly, "Let him come."
Zhao Nanyu and little Zhao were talking outside. Song Luan stayed inside. 
She couldn't resist not listening and gradually couldn't sit still. She stealthily hid by the door and pricked up her ears to listen.
Little Zhao seemed to cry, and his voice was a little dumb, "Father, I don't like...I don't like that woman."
He would not recognize anyone but his mother.
Zhao Nanyu's eyes glanced toward the direction where Song Luan had been hiding. He took back his eyes and touched little Zhao's head. "Don't be rude."
"You really want to marry her?"
"Who told you all this?" Zhao Nanyu asked.
"I saw it today. You held her."
Zhao Nanyu did not explain, but said, "Don't worry about that much."
Little Zhao bit his lip, feeling sad to death.
After they talked, Zhao Nanyu sent someone to accompany little Zhao back to his residence.
Song Luan couldn't see what Zhao Nanyu wanted to do. How could he be willing to hurt his child's heart?
Even if she missed her son, she still held back and did not ask him.
She thought that Zhao Nanyu was waiting for her to surrender. That fact was true. Zhao Nanyu also knew that Song Luan's heart was not with him. He could only trap her.
Zhao Nanyu wanted to tame Song Luan and get her heart, but Song Luan didn't have him in her eyes.
Those light-colored eyes, every time she looked at him, they were only plain and flat, as if he was just an insignificant person.
***
In the evening, Zhao Nanyu received a visitor. He was this year's candidate who came third in the Han-Lin examination. He was a handsome man, and was dressed in white, and looked very gentle.
Advertisements
A piece of white jade hung around the man's waist and a folding fan in his hand. He was in high spirits as he pursed his lips and chuckled.
Song Luan's heart beat faster for a moment. When facing Zhao Nanyu, she thought she had lost the ability to love! No, she could still be moved by a good-looking man.
She took off her shoes and laid on the bed. Her feet were shaking happily. Suddenly, she wanted to see the flower scholar again.
She didn't know what to say, but she felt that the man she liked should be like this.
He was fair and elegant.
His hand holding the folding fan, his shallow smile...
Gentle, considerate, talented, and handsome young man. It seemed that the man of her dreams should be like this.
Song Luan drank some wine since she was in a good mood. After a while, her cheeks and neck flushed red.
When Zhao Nanyu finished talking about things, he saw her rolling on the bed with a smile on her face. When he came nearer, he could smell the wine on her.
Song Luan wanted to sit upright, but her body didn't listen to her. Zhao Nanyu held her, so she could sit still.
Song Luan moved to his side. 
She laughed foolishly and asked, "Who was that man just now?"
"Huh? Who?"
Song Luan's eyes turned disorderly, and her hands moved in the air. "The man in the side room just now. What's his name?"
It's enough to know his name. If she had a chance to meet him in the future, maybe she could go up to say hello.
After a long time without an answer, Song Luan became bolder and urged with impatience. "I want to know!"
Zhao Nanyu slowly fixed her messy clothes. He said with a smile, "Do you think he looks good?"
Song Luan closed her eyes and nodded heavily, "Very handsome!!!"
In her dreams, there was a gentleman, holding her hand, and they would look at each other with smiles as sweet as honey...
Zhao Nanyu's five fingers gently inserted into her hair and sighed, "You should not be allowed to drink."
Whenever she's drunk, she would always say these things he didn't like to hear.
Song Luan tilted her head and fell on him. "Shhh," she said, "I'll tell you quietly, you can't tell Zhao Nanyu."
He said with a low smile, "Okay, whatever you say."
"That man is handsome. When he looked over here, I suddenly felt hot." Song Luan giggled, "Although I knew clearly he couldn't see me at all."
That man she saw in the window...
This kind of heart was not loving, but just a momentary throbbing, the second shaking of god.
Her face and ears were red, and her hands were trembling from excitement.
Zhao Nanyu's chest was scratched out just from her few words. It felt like there was a big hole, and only blood continued to flow. He couldn't speak.
The most terrible thing was that he still had a decent smile on his face.
He looked down at the woman lying on his lap, her breathing almost calm. The warm light shone on Song Luan's porcelain white face.
Zhao Nanyu's hands gently covered Song Luan's eyes. If only she could see him alone.
It turned out, Song Luan just won't like him.
And her heart could throb for any other man.
Zhao Nanyu was very calm while accepting this reality. His chest was empty, his eyes felt like there was acid. It was uncomfortable.
He pinched Song Luan by the waist and threw her in the bed. He raised his hand to extinguish the candle fire and started ravaging her.
Song Luan moved her body uncomfortably. "You're heavy, get up."
Zhao Nanyu clasped her hands against the top of the pillow, bent his head heavily on her clavicle, and bit a mark before releasing his mouth.
His fingers slowly traced her rosy lips, and the half-awakened Song Luan suddenly opened her eyes. It was hazy, but after a hard blink, she gradually saw his face.
Zhao Nanyu pinched her chin and lifted it upward. He bit her lips.
Song Luan was expressionless, but her eyes were a little confused.
Having a husband like this felt so uncomfortable? She thought, muddled.
Zhao Nanyu saw her blank face, and his heart became cold.
His hand movements were fiercer.
=============== Chapter 79
Aunt Lin was seriously ill. Since the death of her daughter, the original bright and beautiful person had aged rapidly. She was not that old, but her white hair had grown more times. After pulling out one, another comes out.
Aunt Lin never wore gold and silver anymore. She wore plain clothes every day. She originally did not believe in Buddhism, but now she had set up a small Buddha hall in her room. Even if her body and bones were not good, she had to get up from the bed and kneel in front of the Buddha and pray devoutly.
Song Luan was the only child under her knees. Now that aunt Lin was seriously ill, only a few people had visited her. It was not surprising that Aunt Lin was shrewd and did not deal with other aunts of the Song family. The remaining children of the Song family were either married or young.
Song Heqing came to see her twice. After his beloved sister passed away, he also lost a lot of weight. Although he had never shed tears in the eyes of outsiders, his sadness was real.
He still couldn't believe that Zhao Nanyu would kill his sister. The man looked at his sister's eyes with love. He believed that Zhao Nanyu killed his sister because he still hated what his sister had done in the past to him.
But now the Song family was no longer what it used to be, and even his father's life needed saving. He couldn't avenge his sister, otherwise, he must pay with his life against Zhao Nanyu.
Aunt Lin was pale as she leaned against the back of the bed, coughing. "Have you ever dreamt of Ah Luan?"
Song Heqing gave her a drink of water and shook his head. "Never."
Aunt Lin then said, "I dreamt of her, several times. She told me that it was cold below. She had nothing to eat, and nothing to wear that was warm. She was bullied every day. My daughter, who is golden, is so miserable. I don't want to live now. I just go down with her. I can protect her when I go down."
Aunt Lin still remembered Song Luan's appearance when she was just born. She was much more beautiful than the other children. She didn't cry or made any noise. She kept her eyes closed. Her little white flesh hands were pinched into two small fists, and her two feet were kicking around. It was very lovely.
The doctor also told Song Heqing that if aunt Lin's pent up spirit was not untied, the disease wouldn't be cured.
But Song Luan was dead, and Song Heqing couldn't find a way to cure her heart disease.
However, words of consolation still had to be said.
"Take care of your body, only then can Ah Luan go with peace of mind."
Aunt Lin could not listen to any other words, nor could she find any hope to live on.
Song Heqing clenched his teeth and said, "If you go like this, Ah Luan's hatred will be unrequited."
These words were just a motivation for her to live.
Aunt Lin was also very clear on that matter, and she said with a sarcastic smile, "I can't avenge my daughter even if I live."
Aunt Lin remembered how Zhao Nanyu was holding the corpse of her daughter and even refused to let anyone touch her. It wasn't enough for him to kill her daughter, and he even burned her daughter's body in a fire.
The servant of the guard suddenly came to report, "Young master, that...there's a Zhao family member who came to visit."
After hearing this, aunt Lin looked grim and said, "Let them go back! If they refuse, just beat them to death!"
"But...but...but it's the young master Zhao Zhi who came here..."
Aunt Lin's face looked a little better. The Zhao family and the Song family had turned upside down a long time ago and had stopped contacting each other. Little Zhao never came to the Song family, so he was not familiar with the people here.
With a strong breath, aunt Lin said slowly, "Bring the child in."
He came into the room without any expression and knelt on the edge of the bed. "Greetings, Grandmother."
Aunt Lin looked at her grandchild who was half of Zhao Nanyu's blood. She had no good face and asked in a cold voice, "What are you doing here?"
Little Zhao raised his clean face, his eyes were slightly red, "Mother did not want me, and grandmother also does not want me?"
He was selling pity.
Aunt Lin was soft-hearted, so her voice was not as cold as before. After a little calming down, she said, "If you still want to come to the Song family in the future, no one will stop you."
Looking at this child with a face similar to Zhao Nanyu, no matter how soft she was, she couldn't say any more good words.
With his head and eyes drooping, he murmured, "My father is going to marry another woman."
Aunt Lin almost couldn't breathe and squeezed her hand tightly. "What?! How dare he..."
How long had Ah Luan been dead?! Zhao Nanyu couldn't wait to take wild hooves home. Maybe he was afraid that if Ah Luan was still alive, they couldn't get together!
Little Zhao's black eyes were still staring at the carpet. No one could see what he was thinking.
He just wanted that woman to die.
He only had one mother.
Knowing that he was too young to kill the woman on his own, he came to find his grandmother.
At a young age, he could use a knife to kill a person.
He hated the woman in his father's arms. Even though he couldn't see her, he saw how his father hid her so well. He must like her very much.
Little Zhao kneeled on the ground, and silently shed tears.
Aunt Lin was so angry that she said, "Well, Zhao Nanyu deceives so many people."
She looked at his eyes and gritted her teeth and said, "Your father is really good at it."
Song Heqing was afraid that she would say inappropriate words in front of the child. No matter what Zhao Nanyu was like, this child was innocent and pitiful.
If he knew that his mother was killed by his father, he would never be happy in his life.
He took little Zhao in his arms, touched his face, and sighed, "No one will not want you. If you are not happy, you can come to play with your uncle. Your father will not say anything if he knows."
He nodded, "Okay."
Aunt Lin was so angry that she hated Zhao Nanyu in her heart. In front of the child, she said, "What else can't your father do? Huh? He even stabbed your mother to death."
Before, little Zhao's tears were disguised, but after hearing her words, he cried, and a slap of tears rolled down one by one and fell on his sleeves.
Song Heqing wrung his eyebrows and said to Aunt Lin, "Keep your mouth shut!"
"Am I wrong? Can't he listen!? When he grows up in the future, he won't know anything. Maybe he will complain about Ah Luan! What can't be said? Zhao Nanyu dares to do it, but we need to be afraid of saying this?! What a joke!" Aunt Lin laughed as if she had gone mad.
Song Heqing had no choice but to take little Zhao out first.
After this, aunt Lin started to drink medicine.
She was stimulated.
Advertisements
After little Zhao came home, he began to lose his temper, refused to have a proper meal, and even threw things.
When the housekeeper reported this, Song Luan listened quietly. She clenched the chopsticks in her hand, and her heart leaped up and down.
Zhao Nanyu got up and said, "I'll go and have a look."
Song Luan grabbed his arm and looked at him eagerly, "I want to go too."
Zhao Nanyu touched her face affectionately, "It's not the time yet."
He used these words to send her away from little Zhao these past two days.
Song Luan thought that Zhao Nanyu wanted her to give in and watch her willingly stay with her. She had to live in his humble circle for him to be satisfied.
Looking at Zhao Nanyu's back, Song Luan thought silently that all the words in that man's mouth were all bullshit. She shouldn't believe a word.
Zhao Nanyu said that she would not be under his custody, but when she woke up from a hangover that day, she had a mute servant girl placed close to her.
At first, Song Luan thought it was Zhao Nanyu who ordered her not to talk to her. Later, she realized that her tongue was pulled out.
Song Luan felt a chill in her heart, even a little afraid. She felt very painful just thinking about this matter. However, it was not Zhao Nanyu who did it himself. He would not harm a servant girl by his own hands.
Most of the time whenever he says something, the people at the bottom would follow his orders.
Song Luan didn't know sign language, and the little maid didn't know how to read, so they couldn't communicate at all.
Song Luan asked the housekeeper why her servant girl's tongue was pulled out?
The housekeeper replied, "She made a mistake before, and the master pulled out her tongue and sold it." The servant looked at her pitifully. "If you don't like her, I will change her immediately."
Song Luan waved her hand. "No need."
Even if she changed a servant, the next one would also be mute. 
Song Luan couldn't figure out how Zhao Nanyu blackened so much. She was the only one who was in pain! His road to success was even more smooth than the original book.
She was lying in bed, while looking down at the love marks Zhao Nanyu left, and sighed.
Although Zhao Nanyu was not clear-minded before, he was indeed much better than now. 
He was a beast in bed. 
Song Luan couldn't remember exactly what she said that night, but she could guess that Zhao Nanyu didn't like to hear it, because later when he got up, his face was not very good-looking.
Song Luan didn't plan to go against Zhao Nanyu anymore. Her arms and thighs were twisted, and she gave in.
When Zhao Nanyu came by, the child's eyes were swollen. He seemed to have cried.
He asked, "What's the matter? Refusing to eat is the most childish means, you are not an ignorant child."
Little Zhao looked up and his eyes were still. He looked like Song Luan when she looked at him.
"Did you really kill mother?"
Little Zhao only remembered that after talking to his mother that day, she was already gone.
He didn't believe it, but he didn't think his grandmother would lie to him on such things.
Zhao Nanyu's long finger knocked on the table unintentionally, and he slowly opened his mouth, "Who did you hear this from?"
He said, "Someone told me."
Zhao Nanyu's eyes flashed a cold light in his eyes and sneered. He ordered his guards outside, "Go and find out who chewed his tongue in front of the young master and kill him."
"You don't have to check. My grandmother told me that. Are you going to kill her?"
After a long silence, Zhao Nanyu only said, "Your mother will come back."
The servant ran from side to side, his legs were almost broken, his mouth was dry and his voice choked a bit. "My Lord, Madam said that she had a stomachache and asked you to hurry back."
Zhao Nanyu looked at his son and said before he left, "Eat well. Don't mess around."
Simple eight words, but there was an edge of anger.
The hatred in the black eyes of little Zhao deepened a lot. Now he wanted to kill the woman who was hidden.
She deserved to be called 'Madam'?
His father's favorite person should be his mother, but now she could easily call his father away with a casual word.
Little Zhao's eyes dropped. He was silent as he thought that he would certainly kill her.
***
Song Luan waited anxiously for a long time for Zhao Nanyu to come back. Little Zhao refused to eat, Zhao Nanyu would certainly punish him heavily. She called him back, so he would not be punished.
After a while, there was a footstep outside the house.
Song Luan immediately laid on the bed, pretending to grunt twice.
Zhao Nanyu approached and saw through her disguise at a glance. Instead of exposing her, he asked, "Does it still hurt?"
Song Luan covered her stomach and nodded, "It hurts."
Zhao Nanyu sat down beside her. The sun was shining on his porcelain white face. His facial features were straight. There was a shallow smile in the deep of his eyebrows. He put his palm on her abdomen and rubbed it gently.
"Better?"
Song Luan was rubbed by him and was about to fall asleep. She replied, "Much better."
Zhao Nanyu's hand continued to rub her stomach and said, "I don't think it's good. I'll let the kitchen make painkillers for you. You must drink it all in a moment."
Song Luan frowned, "I don't want it. I don't want to drink."
She couldn't do anything because after the medicine was cooked, it was directly sent in front of her.
Song Luan covered her nose and drank most of the bowl. After drinking, there was no sweet candy offered to her.
She had a bitter face... Zhao Nanyu must have seen her act and was deliberately correcting her.
Song Luan raised her eyes and looked at him seriously. She said, "Zhao Nanyu, bring little Zhao to me."
Zhao Nanyu murmured.
Song Luan felt that he was perfunctory, but she still had a bitter taste in her mouth. Then she said, "Let's live a good life. I'll stay by your side and I won't run away. I'll be very obedient."
After hearing this, Zhao Nanyu's mouth rose slightly, but the smile was a little ugly, "Ah Luan, do you like me?"
Song Luan opened her mouth and was ready to say 'like'. However, her throat seemed to be choked, and could not spit out the two words.
She tried to say it, but couldn't make a sound. It was as if someone was pinching her by the throat.
The radian of Zhao Nanyu's mouth dropped slowly. He raised his hand to touch her lips and whispered, "Why don't you speak?"
He just wanted her to like him, too.
Song Luan was stunned, puzzled, confused, and was at loss.
Her heart won't throb towards Zhao Nanyu. His face was clearly what she liked, but now the feeling of blushing and heartbeat didn't happen.
Song Luan was even a little confused. Why was he so persistent in these words? She had said she won't run. Was there anything else she needed to do?
Zhao Nanyu imprinted a kiss on her lips, looking at her ignorant eyes, heartbroken.
Song Luan felt that he seemed very sad. Every time Zhao Nanyu kisses her, her mood would become very good, but this time it seems different.
Song Luan herself was aware of her heart. It was as it would never beat for him.
Song Luan stood on tiptoe and put her arm around his neck. She also gave him a heavy kiss on the corner of his mouth.
That's it.
Zhao Nanyu won't force her to say she liked him.
No worries after a kiss.
Her kisses were sweet and delicious.
=============== Chapter 80
Zhao Nanyu's chest seemed to be pierced by a sharp sword, all his limbs were cold, and his eyes were tinged red like blood. He covered his chest, and his other hand was strongly holding the edge of the bed. His throat tasted fishy. He couldn't resist the bloody breath out of his throat, and he spat out blood instantaneously.
Song Luan was so shocked. She helped him hurriedly as she asked, "What's wrong with you?!"
Zhao Nan took a look at her, the corners of his lips wriggled, but he fainted before he could say anything.
When he opened his eyes, his face was already covered with blood. There were fierce fighting sounds in his ears. Soldiers with swords were constantly fighting around him.
"Kill!" The general's armor was covered with blood, so he couldn't see his appearance.
Zhao Nanyu found that he couldn't control his body. He could only watch himself lift the sword and cut off the head of the man on his side. The vice general behind him widened his eyes in disbelief. "You...you betrayed the Lord!? You joined the rebels!"
With a sneer, he raised his sword and pierced the vice general's heart. His eyes were cold as he said, "Open the city gate."
The nearly ten thousand pro-army soldiers that were stationed in the capital had been under his command for a long time. His attendants immediately opened the gate of the city. A crowd of soldiers with red eyes rushed in and killed people to the imperial palace.
The man was dressed in black. His pale face was splashed with fresh blood. He was murderous. He held the hilt in his hand, and the sharp blade slowly crossed the ground. His eyes looked coldly at the people in the city tower.
Since the emperor was in power, the troops guarding the imperial palace didn't have a strong foothold. The commander of the guard army and the king of southwest who rebelled against the army were enemies. 
Even if the commander surrendered today, his future would be extremely bleak, so he took the fare-faced princess to the tower, tied her hands tightly, and whispered in her ear, "I have wronged you."
The princess and her husband (southwest prince) had been married for many years and their feelings were like honey. If there was an instance that a ruthless son of the world could be merciless, it could only be regarding the little princess' matters.
The commander didn't want to kill the little princess. He just wanted to save his life.
He said to the people below in a loud voice, "If you dare to go one step further, I will kill her."
The knife across the little princess's neck advanced a few points.
With a smile on the southwest's young prince's lips, he asked his attendants for a bow and arrow. He raised his hand, aiming at the woman in red on the wall.
Zhao Nanyu's eyes widened, and he saw his other self with his own eyes. Without hesitation, he shot the arrow out. His posture was perfect.
Most of the people didn't expect that the son of the southwest king, who had always loved his wife, would be so cruel and merciless that he shot his wife without hesitation.
The little princess was pushed down from the city tower by the arrow, and her body continued to fall. With a bang, she landed heavily, and her trickling blood flowed out of her head.
Zhao Nanyu looked at the face that was exactly like Song Luan, and towards himself who killed her with an arrow with his own hands. He shouted, "No!" 
Excluding himself, no one else heard him.
Without even looking at his wife's body, he said to the soldiers behind him, "I killed for the glory of all."
He was the most beloved son of the southwest king and the most popular son of the southwest frontier. He had a great cause and would never be hindered by small love.
After all, the guards could not resist the pressure of the army.
The golden city had become a purgatory, full of corpses. Every place seemed to have been washed by the blood, even the heavy rain could not wash it away.
The blood on his face had already condensed into deep red, and his cold aura was ruthlessly rampant. He had murderous eyes, so the deputy commander hesitated to talk to him.
He glanced at him coldly, "If you have anything to say, just say it."
"The princess' body...is still at the ground of the tower...what to do with..."
For so many years, they were considered a golden couple that could rival the gods and goddesses.
An innocent and kind-hearted princess with a gentle and handsome prince. They never quarreled, and there was love everywhere. 
Before the southwest king rebelled, he was also worried whether his beloved son would be exhausted by his love affair.
But what he did was beyond the imagination of the southwest king.
However this was good, it wasn't good for a prince to be weak.
His son had the correct mindset. It was only right that this should be given to him.
The corners of his lips narrowed into a straight line, and his face suddenly looked ugly. He gritted his teeth and said, "I'll go and have a look at the body myself."
The rainstorm began to rest, and only a drizzle came down.
The little princess laid on the ground quietly with her eyes closed. Her beautiful face, hair, and hands were covered with blood.
She was dressed in a finely embroidered wedding dress that she seemed to have made for herself, just like the day she married him.
The southwest prince still remembered that on the day she married him, she wore this dress with a sweet smile on her face, her cheeks and ears were flushed red, and her hands were tensely holding on to her sleeve.
Her heart was afraid of death but still pretended to be very strong and powerful.
She said, "I don't care who you are. I'm my father's favorite daughter. If you don't treat me well, I'll let him kill you."
"The princess is so fierce."
The little princess was teased red by his words, so she turned around, and hummed with arrogance, "You're good to be afraid. I dare you to bully me. I'm a real gold branch and jade leaf!"
She was pampered and was born to be spoiled.
It's a little girl who grew up in the hands of the emperor and queen. She had no idea.
Over the years, he did like her.
However, even if she was not killed today, the overall situation would make the little princess hate him all her life.
Let her go clean like this.
It's also a good thing.
The identity of the former princess was a curse. Zhao Nanyu knew that she would never wrong him, so it would be better if she died.
It was better if he sent her off than her dying in someone else's hands.
He squatted down, and his dark eyes stared at her lifeless body. The arrow was still stuck in the chest of the little princess. He raised his hand and pulled it out.
The rain made her face wet. He looked at her for a long time. 
Advertisements
He straightened up slowly, turned his back, and closed his eyes. "I'll bury you in Dingling tomb. After a hundred years, I'll be buried with you."
Zhao Nanyu looked at this scene while feeling numb in his body. He couldn't believe how he could do this to her.
He loved Song Luan so much that he couldn't bear to see her hurt and sad. How could he kill her?
As soon as the picture turned, Zhao Nanyu saw Song Luan again. She became his wife again, but with a disdainful smile on her face and a sarcastic look in her eyes.
Song Luan seemed to hate him very much, and even refused to say a word more.
And he didn't like his wife very much.
The two hadn't seen each other for three months, it was the longest time. He had a residence outside Zhao's family residence, so whenever he didn't want to go back to Zhao's residence, he would stay outside.
Song Luan's disgust for him was utterly obvious. She refused to speak well every time she was called. Her words were sharp and she never gave up half a word.
Not only that, Song Luan attracted other men, constantly provoking them, but never looked at Zhao Nanyu.
She even wanted to leave him for other men. Zhao Nanyu finally couldn't help but poison her.
Before Song Luan's death, he went to see her in a good mood. After being tortured by poison for several years, she was as thin as wood and even had no strength to get up.
Zhao Nanyu saw that he took out the dagger and pierced it into her heart with a sneer. The dagger was dirtied with her blood, so he threw the dagger and wiped his fingers with a handkerchief.
He poured oil on the outside of her room. The fire reflected his indifferent face. He laughed as he threw the fire torch on the ground.
The fire quickly became fierce, and it burned her clean.
Zhao Nanyu couldn't tell whether this was real or a dream. He couldn't believe he killed her again.
Seeing Song Luan's death again, Zhao Nanyu could no longer feel the pain.
His eyes were scarlet red as he looked at the burning house with no regrets of killing his wife.
...
Then, Zhao Nanyu saw the scene of him tremblingly killing Song Luan, who was in great pain.
He held Song Luan in his arms, his hands quivering, and a few tears streaked on his cheek. Even though his heart was like a knife, he killed Song Luan because he couldn't bear to see her in pain.
This was the third time.
For every three times, it seemed that his heart was gouged out.
Suddenly a strange man appeared in front of Zhao Nanyu's sight. He was wearing a Taoist robe, and his mouth was smiling. "You remember it all."
Zhao Nanyu's face was pale, and his throat was sour, he couldn't make any sound.
The young man smiled slightly, "Do you remember what the princess said before she died?"
He saw that she seemed to have said a word before she was pierced, but he didn't hear it.
The handsome Taoist kindly reminded him, "The little princess said that she never wanted to meet you again. If she met you, she would never fall in love with you."
"If she falls in love, she wouldn't die easily."
This was her punishment for herself, for being ignorant.
Zhao Nanyu's face completely lost its blood color, his lips turned pale, and his voice was ethereal, "So what?"
"And after you have accomplished your cause, you want to be with her in the next life." The Taoist said with a smile, "You are so stubborn that you have indeed won her again in the next life."
But this time, it was not easy for her to die. 
Zhao Nanyu strained his back, and his heart ached so much that he could not stand.
The Taoist continued, "I can't bear to see you continue to torture each other, so I helped you."
"She will never fall in love with you. Maybe she will fall in love with other men, but she will never treat you with the love that a man and woman have. As long as she does not love you, she will never end up in a bad end."
Therefore, if Zhao Nanyu wanted her for a long time, he couldn't be delusional and wished for her to like him.
This was also his retribution.
Several generations of retribution.
Love and gain could never stand together.
And he had to worry whether Song Luan would like other men for the rest of his life.
Every time Zhao Nanyu killed her, he could recognize her–the lover he had been looking for a long time.
Only after killing her could Zhao Nanyu remember everything.
***
Song Luan stayed in front of the bed, and after a while, she yawned. She was sleepy, but she couldn't fall asleep even if she was.
Zhao Nanyu hadn't woken up yet. He murmured words, but she couldn't hear clearly what he was saying.
The doctors were slow to come. They arrived in the middle of the night.
The doctor rushed to the house with the medical box. After probing his pulse, he said, "Madam, he just fainted. He will wake up after taking the medicine."
That's it!?
Song Luan didn't believe it. She pointed to the man who was still unconscious in the bed, and said, "But he vomited blood."
The doctor shook his head and said, "It should not be."
He coughed. "Maybe it's because he was so angry that he vomited blood."
Song Luan didn't know much about this either, so she nodded and said, "I'll give him the decoction."
No one dares to give her such rough work, so the servant girl cooked the medicine for her and brought it in. 
Song Luan blew the medicine cold and sent it to Zhao Nanyu's mouth. However, the man was in a coma, so she struggled to feed him.
He even vomited the medicine out.
Song Luan lost her patience after feeding him once or twice. She placed the medicine aside and pinched his face. "You drink this medicine or not."
Was it because she didn't say she liked him? He vomited blood to scare her.
She wanted to say she liked him, but she couldn't make a sound.
Song Luan thought about this messed up thing. She fought with her eyelids and finally fell asleep on the edge of the bed.
***
Suddenly, Zhao Nanyu opened his eyes and turned around. He found Song Luan was lying sound asleep on him.
Zhao Nanyu thought of all the evils he had done before. 
He killed his wife himself for the sake of the emperor.
In order not to be shackled by love, he got rid of the person he loved.
He did get the throne, and also the boundless loneliness.
Zhao Nanyu's throat still had a musty smell. He coughed twice. Although the voice was very low, he still woke up the woman lying on him.
Song Luan opened her eyes vaguely and said, "You are awake."
Zhao Nanyu startled her today. He was unconscious for a while after vomiting blood, and even after inviting the doctor to see him, he still did not wake up.
Song Luan tried to give him medicine on the way, but she couldn't feed him. There was also no response from him.
Song Luan was afraid that he would die, and that big mouthful of blood he spat out scared out her three spirits and six spirits.
In her eyes, Zhao Nanyu was a strong man who wouldn't get hurt.
What's the matter! He kissed her and spat blood after? Then she won't kiss him again.
Zhao Nanyu slowly sat up, and his eyes were dark. He suddenly grabbed her wrist and chuckled in a low voice. His laughter sounded a bit grim.
Song Luan looked at him and felt that he was crazier.
She touched his forehead, a little worried about him, "What's the matter with you? Are you still sick?"
Zhao Nanyu looked at her, who didn't remember anything. He laughed and said softly, "I'm okay."
Just after finishing these three words, he vomited out a mouthful of blood.
Song Luan hurriedly found a handkerchief and wiped the blood from the corners of his lips. "You...What the hell is going on!"
How angry he was that he vomits blood at every turn!
Zhao Nanyu threw up because he couldn't bear the chest pain.
He had been in hell. Although they were entangled for such a long time, Zhao Nanyu did not intend to let Song Luan go.
Song Luan belongs to him.
She could only belong to him.
If Song Luan falls in love with other men in the future, whether it's the scholar who visited earlier or an elegant young talent, Zhao Nanyu wouldn't resist the desire to kill them just by thinking about it.
Song Luan was wearing a single dress, her collar was slightly open, and her white shoulder was half exposed. She looked ignorant and innocent.
Zhao Nanyu hugged her, and his eyes were gloomy, "I can't let you go."
You can't go.
You can't fall in love with others.
You can't leave me.
Zhao Nanyu did not want to kill her again and again, and then live in endless pain.
Song Luan was pinched a little bit by him, "You are not in a good mood."
The male lead was amazing.
Whenever he was in a bad mood, he bullied her.
So angry.
Zhao Nanyu laughed and said, "Well, it's not very good."
In the end, Song Luan's mood was not very good either. Zhao Nanyu, who was ill, was very brave and energetic enough to make her soft.
Her waist was broken and her legs were tightly tied around his waist.
The strength to cry was gone.
Zhao Nanyu lowered his head, sucked the tears from the corner of her eyes, and pinched her waist. The only phrase that lingered around his ears was: "she will remember."
Zhao Nanyu's fingers combed through her hair, and whispered, "Don't remember."
"My favorite person is you."
"I will love you very much."
Song Luan, who was already in a dream, could not hear these words.
The woman in his arms shrank and murmured twice. He stretched out his arms and held her neck tightly. 
He rubbed her body and licked her lips. "Ah, you are so warm."
=============== Chapter 81
Song Luan could remember some things, which were all in her dreams. It was both intermittent and long, but every time she woke up, she couldn't remember very clearly, and her brain would hurt after thinking too much. As time went by, Song Luan was not willing to continue to think about it.
Song Luan was a little dependent on Zhao Nanyu. It was cold in late autumn. She always hugged him at night, and her whole body arched into his arms to get some warm heat. 
As long as Zhao Nanyu didn't force her to say that she likes him, Song Luan felt that she could live like this.
However, Song Luan noticed Zhao Nanyu's restraint these days. He didn't talk much these days. So, they often had nothing to say together.
Song Luan couldn't tell whether this was a world in a book. It didn't matter if it was. She couldn't go back to modern times.
After becoming a powerful official in the book, Zhao Nanyu only cared about power and was not very interested in women. He would return from the palace very late every day, and would not say even a few words with the original female lead.
Song Luan felt that she hadn't seen a man other than Zhao Nanyu for a long time. Before, there would have been his counselors or students visiting the residence to talk about things.
Song Luan still remembered the elegant and handsome scholar who she saw by the window that day.
After he vomited blood that time, Zhao Nanyu's time with her in the room had become longer. He hugged her all day long, and his fear of long absence even reached into Song Luan's mind. She felt that Zhao Nanyu's possessiveness had reached its peak, and was even reluctant to let her leave him for half a step.
Zhao Nanyu had already agreed to let her see little Zhao, but with a condition, he would teach her to write well.
Song Luan couldn't understand the complicated font of the dynasty. They were as difficult to understand as the seal script, and they were very complicated to write. She only recognized the simple ones, and she only read picture books with few words.
Therefore, Song Luan still had a headache when practicing calligraphy.
However, Zhao Nanyu, who stood by the window to write and read a book, looked like he was enjoying himself. The windowpane was propped up, and the golden sun rushed to sprinkle on his bright face. He was wearing a crescent colored robe, with a jade crown and hair, delicate features, and a blue sachet tied around his waist.
This sachet was embroidered by Song Luan, and her embroidery work was in a mess. Naturally, the sachet was not very good. When Zhao Nanyu took it out to wear it, she lost her temper and said that she would lose his face, but he did not care.
Zhao Nanyu raised his face and waved to her, "Come here, I'll teach you how to write."
Song Luan ran to his side and was held in his arms. His broad and warm palms tightly wrapped her small hands and taught her to write one by one.
Song Luan turned her face slightly and asked curiously, "What's the meaning of this word?"
Instead of answering, Zhao Nanyu asked her, "Do you remember how to write it?"
Song Luan shook her head and replied truthfully, "No."
Only once, how could she remember?
In a trance, Song Luan always felt that this was the first time they had such a quiet leisure time before. He taught her to practice calligraphy hand by hand. And he would smile calmly towards her even though she did not know what she said to him.
On second thought, it seemed to be her imagination again.
Zhao Nanyu took the trouble to teach her over and over again. He was very patient. Song Luan's wrist was sour and wanted to drop her pen and say no more.
But whenever she thought of her son, her temper would be pressed down.
In this short time, Zhao Nanyu taught her less than ten words. She was very ashamed that she didn't recognize any of them.
Zhao Nanyu was a strict teacher when teaching people how to read characters. If she didn't write correctly, he would beat her palm with a ruler. 
Although the strength was like scratching, Song Luan still felt very ashamed, so she complained in tears that he bullied her.
Zhao Nanyu's eyes darkened. "What kind of bullying is this."
Song Luan put her slightly red palm in front of his eyes. "You see, my hands are swollen."
Zhao Nanyu pursed his lips and chuckled. He took her hand. "I'll find you some ointment to apply on."
...
After applying for medicine, Song Luan was still not satisfied. Her cheeks were full of anger. 
Zhao Nanyu handed her the ruler to her. "You can beat me with a ruler, if that will relieve you."
Song Luan took the ruler and hit him twice in the palm of his hand. She didn't dare to use her strength, nor dare to take an inch.
The two people made a fool of themselves and went to bed right after. Song Luan didn't know what happened later, but when she came back to her senses, she had already been thrown into bed.
The strong and fierce man was extremely energetic, and Zhao Nanyu was particularly keen on this activity these days.
Song Luan's belt was thrown on the floor. Her long hair was also scattered, her cherry mouth slightly open, and her chest heaved up and down.
Her sweat continued to trickle down her forehead, and her white and small ears were slightly red.
Zhao Nanyu's hands were on her two sides, his deep eyes that resembled the inner depths of the cold pool were staring right through her.
Song Luan felt that he was trying to eat her. She covered her chest with hindsight and said, "You need to put on a light face on broad day light."
Zhao Nanyu nodded and threw his belt out of the bed. Song Luan pulled his hand to keep him from moving. She played coquetry with him with sweet words, "Lord Zhao, this is harmful to your body, you should be a little bit more restrained."
Zhao Nanyu's hand slowly moved down to her abdomen. His warm palms caressed her, as he chuckled softly. He almost bit her earlobe and said, "Luan Bao, let's have another child."
Song Luan was called 'Luan Bao' and her whole body became soft. Soft and sweet words like honey could come out from his mouth.
It turned out that Zhao Nanyu wanted a child.
But Song Luan still couldn't forget the pain she had when she had a miscarriage. The overwhelming despair made her unable to breathe.
Song Luan shrank back in a small voice, "I'm a little scared."
Zhao Nanyu felt pain in his heart. He kissed her lips with pity and said softly, "It's all my fault. I won't hurt you this time. Let's have a child."
She was in good health and well-being, and it would never happen to her again.
Every time Zhao Nanyu recalled her pale body lying in his arms, and his palms covered with her blood, he would feel pain.
All the sins he had done today and before, he couldn't blame others for it. He could only blame himself for his lack of heart.
Song Luan bit her lips and bowed her head without saying anything. She was still unwilling.
Zhao Nanyu said with a smile, "Maybe you already have our child in your stomach now."
A long time of hard work would always be rewarding.
Song Luan stared at him and said seriously, "You don't like children so much."
Advertisements
"The child depends on the mother. As long as it is born by you, I will like it very much."
Song Luan covered his mouth and snickered, "You can say love words."
He used to scare and threaten her.
From the evening until it was completely dark, soft moans came and went. The maid who was guarding the door blushed and her heartbeat fast. 
For several days and nights, the beautiful girl in the room had been tossed about like this. No one knew how her small size could tolerate such strenuous activity. It's really hard for her.
After a long time, the candlelight in the room was lit. The man put on a coat and opened the door. His expression was slightly cold, as he ordered, "Prepare water."
The servant went to the kitchen and carried the hot water to their room.
Song Luan, who was served by Zhao Nanyu, leaned in the tub with her eyes closed. She didn't have to do anything. 
After bathing, he wiped her dry. He took her clean clothes and put them back on the bed, and tucked in the quilt corners for her.
If one day, Song Luan also remembered the past, she would hate him.
For the first time, he killed her for the sake of the country.
Zhao Nanyu's hand was on her waist. Song Luan habitually drilled into his chest, her small head in his arms, her limbs on his body, as murmured in her sleep, "Ah, I want to eat sugar gourd."
***
As soon as the light of day broke, little Zhao was called by his father. 
Zhao Nanyu looked at the child whose height was already on his waist. His heart softened. "You'll see your mother in a moment."
Little Zhao thought that his father was forcing him to recognize the woman as his mother. He lowered his head and felt lifeless. "This son knows."
Soon after, he was finally led to the courtyard where he was never allowed to venture.
Little Zhao was standing outside the gate of the courtyard.
The servant girl behind him urged, "Young master, please hurry in."
"Shut your mouth." The tone was low, young, and majestic. The coldness radiating out from his body made people respect him.
Little Zhao looked at the courtyard carefully and sneered twice. The hatred in his heart became deeper and deeper. The yard was almost the same as the place where his mother lived before.
The garden was also planted with flowers that his mother loved.
Little Zhao raised his small face, his footstep was slow as he walked to the door. He didn't wait for a reply when he pushed the door from the outside. Since the servant girl was scolded once, she dared not open her mouth to urge him a second time.
Song Luan who was in the room felt inexplicably nervous as she walked around the table. Today, she wore a pink short skirt with light make-up. She looked very elegant.
Little Zhao stood for a long time and finally walked into the room expressionlessly.
He had made up his mind that he would never give any face to the people in the house today.
Before he came, grandma Lin had advised him to be more polite to the new wife. She was beloved by his father that she could blow a deaf ear in front of his father, and it could probably cause the father and son to be separated from each other.
But the new wife would have a baby sooner or later, and his status would fall by then.
Little Zhao laughed instead, his eyebrows rose, "Why is she so worthy?"
This was something.
Grandma Lin sent him out of the door with worried eyes.
The room was very quiet, he could hear the sound of his footsteps.
The woman was sitting by the window, her feet hanging in the air, and her embroidered shoes were swaying in the air. Her back faced him, her long hair spread on her back, and only her side face could be seen in the dim light.
Even if it was only half her face, it was enough for little Zhao to recognize her.
The child was frozen in place, motionless, and his eyes were filled with water and his cheeks were stained wet with tears.
He couldn't say clearly, "Mother, mother?"
Song Luan turned around, her heart beating like a drum. She took a deep breath, and she gradually relaxed. She put on a bright smile in front of little Zhao, "Well, it's mother."
She then said, "It has been a long time, did you miss me?"
Yes, of course.
Sometimes he would cry secretly in bed.
In front of his mother, he was only a fragile child. He often shed tears, felt wronged, and was even afraid.
His eyes were red, as he ran to his mother's side, abandoning shyness. He tightly hugged her legs, crying out to the point he was breathless.
Song Luan embraced his back and gently coaxed him, "Don't be afraid. Your mother is back."
Even when Zhao Nanyu entered the room, he still couldn't stop crying. His eyes were red and swollen, his cheeks were moist, and he was still hiccuping.
There was a smile in the corner of Zhao Nanyu's eyes as if he was laughing at his son.
Song Luan held his son in her lap and looked at Zhao Nanyu. "What do you have in your hand?"
"Sugar gourd." He added, "Here you are."
Song Luan swallowed. She really wanted to eat sugar gourd these two days. She reached out to him impolitely, "Since it's for me, please give it to me."
Her son was crying. Since she and her son was half in one, it would be fine to share it with him!
Zhao Nanyu raised his eyebrows and laughed, "You are only allowed to eat it yourself, and the rest are not allowed to eat it."
Neither could their son.
Except for himself, of course.
Song Luan smashed her mouth and said, "I know, stingy."
She took a small bite. It was a little sour, but she liked it! 
Sour flavors were the best!
After eating one, she lowered her head and asked her son, "You like to have a taste? It's delicious."
"I don't want it. You can eat it."
Song Luan ate two more in one breath. Later he realized that there was still a big man standing in front of her. 
Since he bought it, It was not good not to give him a taste.
Song Luan pretended to pass the sugar gourd in front of him, "What about you? Would you like a taste?"
She remembered that Zhao Nanyu didn't like to eat these snacks, either it was too sweet or too sour.
Unexpectedly, he nodded.
He stooped slightly, took another bite on the sugar gourd she had bitten, tasted it carefully and swallowed it down his throat.
Song Luan blinked. Ah, she asked curiously, "Don't you feel that it's sour?"
Zhao Nanyu was still in the mood. "It's not sour, but it's sweet. "
Sweet fart, she hadn't tasted the sweet part yet!
After a long time, Song Luan realized that the one he ate was bitten by her.
Hey, talk about hygiene.
=============== Chapter 82
After little Zhao cried enough, he straightened his back and sat on her lap. His black eyes that were washed by tears were now clean and clear. His eyes were motionless, as he looked up at his mother.
Not only the appearance was the same, but also the aura was the same–fragrant and sweet.
Song Luan was worried about scaring little Zhao, but the child's bearing capacity was much better than she thought. He just refused to climb down from her lap. She pursed her mouth tightly and asked nothing.
Song Luan changed her hand to support his waist and lowered her face. She looked gentle. "Look at you. Your eyes are swollen with tears. People will laugh at you when they see it."
"I'm not afraid of them laughing."
Song Luan wiped the tear marks from the corners of his eyes with her finger, and coaxed him, "Let's stop crying, okay? Mother will be distressed."
This was her first time seeing little Zhao cry so fiercely. His tears flowed down like the river for a long time.
Little Zhao choked and nodded, "I won't cry anymore. I won't cry."
But he couldn't help it. Just hearing his mother's voice, he couldn't help but cry again. He thought he had lost his mother.
His father would have other wives in the future, and he would have to call someone else mother.
Little Zhao vented all the grievances he had been holding back these days in front of her. Song Luan continued coaxing him, holding him, and gently patting his back.
She raised her eyes and glared at Zhao Nanyu. She didn't know how he took care of the child in recent months. Her heart was broken when she saw her son crying like this.
Zhao Nanyu didn't say anything to stop him from crying. Instead, he took out a handkerchief from his sleeve and handed it to Song Luan, "Wipe it for him."
Little Zhao obediently lifted his cheek that was wet with tears, and Song Luan softly wiped his cheeks clean. She gently placed a kiss on his forehead.
It took a long time to coax little Zhao.
Song Luan had already ignored the presence of Zhao Nanyu in the room. She was full of concern for little Zhao. She asked, "Have you had a good meal these days while I was not around?"
Little Zhao was a picky eater before. At first, he didn't want to eat the food, and later, he couldn't eat the food.
He hung his head. "Sometimes not."
"You can't do this in the future."
Zhao Nanyu, who had been silent, suddenly uttered a voice. His deep voice came from their backs, "You will be hungry if you don't eat."
His gaze swept across little Zhao. "You spoiled him and got used to it. If he gets hungry for two more meals, he won't be picky."
Song Luan imitated his tone and said, "You are the fierce one. You will only be satisfied if he does not go against your orders."
Zhao Nanyu laughed like a spring breeze. He didn't seem to care about being choked by her. "You think he's too fragile."
He was a child raised by him. His temper and character were like his. Although he was a lovely innocent child, he was not weak at all. At a young age, he learned to make use of his mother.
Zhao Nanyu did not know whether he should be pleased.
"Can you go out? I want to talk to my son alone." Song Luan lowered her voice and muttered.
Zhao Nanyu opened his lips and spewed out four words. "Cross the river and demolish the bridge ."
Song Luan was frightened by his eyes and trembled. After thinking about it, she didn't want to push forward and challenge his bottom line.
It's scary.
Little Zhao said, "Mother, there's something you don't know."
"What's the matter?"
"Grandmother is ill. I went to see her once. It seemed very serious."
In the beginning, Song Luan just wanted to die to end the pain, but she forgot that aunt Lin could not bear it. 
Aunt Lin loved her child since she was a baby. Since she was gone, aunt Lin naturally had nothing to live for.
She was dumbfounded, as she murmured, "Yes. I didn't know it."
After returning to this world for no reason, Song Luan began to hide with Ayun. Later, she was brought back by Zhao Nanyu. She rarely went out of the door again. All the news that came to her was through Zhao Nanyu's mouth. If he didn't want to tell her, she would not know.
Besides, Aunt Lin was not a child. How could Song Luan meet her now? Even if she stood in front of aunt Lin, it would be hard to believe.
After all, piercing a knife in the heart couldn't be fake.
Song Luan angrily looked at Zhao Nanyu and complained, "Why didn't you tell me about my mother's illness?!"
Zhao Nanyu looked innocent. "I didn't know."
He pretended to be aggrieved. "Your mother blamed me, then hated me. Our two families even became enemies. Even if I wanted to visit the Song family, your mother would blow me out."
Song Luan was suspicious. She remembered the fate of aunt Lin in the book was much worse than now. At least she was still alive. As long as she was, there was still hope.
She lowered her head and said in a murmur, "Is there any way I can meet my mother?"
Aunt Lin would be very happy to see her alive.
Zhao Nanyu said, "Yes, just wait for it."
Song Luan sincerely said thank you to him, and then muttered, "Actually, it's okay to invite my mother over."
Zhao Nanyu replied, "I'm afraid our servants will be driven away by your mother before they can arrive at the door. She won't want to come."
Little Zhao, who was in Song Luan's arms, flushed red because when he listened carefully, it turned out that his stomach was grunting loudly.
Song Luan snickered and quickly asked the servant to set the meal.
She stayed in her room and ate with them.
It was rare for the family of three to get together.
Looking at a table of light dishes, Song Luan suddenly lost her appetite. Before Zhao Nanyu was separated from the Zhao family, she was forced to follow the kitchen's menu of eating very light food every day. Now that she finally got away from the old lady Zhao's hand, how could she still eat so light?!
She couldn't eat much herself, so she put food in little Zhao's bowl for fear that he would be hungry.
Advertisements
"Eat more."
Little Zhao wrung his eyebrow. He seemed to be pondering.
Song Luan found that the child secretly picked out the vegetables from the bowl. She coughed twice, "I saw that."
Little Zhao reluctantly put the vegetables back in the bowl. He frowned as he placed vegetables into his mouth.
Song Luan took two bites, then put down her chopsticks. The taste was a little greasy, it made her stomach uncomfortable.
***
The servant girl who served close to her first discovered that something was wrong. Madam's monthly period did not come this month, and her appetite was not good. She had a bold guess in her heart, but she did not dare to say it.
She didn't know if it was her psychological prenotion, but she felt that madam's stomach began to swell up.
The servant girl didn't dare to hide it again, so she told the master about it.
After hearing this, Zhao Nanyu was extremely calm. He invited the imperial physician from the palace and confirmed that it was a happy pulse.
Song Luan was the only one who was confused about this whole process. Was she pregnant again? Why so fast?
In fact, according to Zhao Nanyu's strenuous energy, it was expected for her to be pregnant, but now she seemed to be in a dream of clouds. She couldn't believe it, so she subconsciously touched her stomach and blurted out, "You won't tell me to abort this baby this time?"
Song Luan didn't mean to ask this question, but she was very afraid. It was painful to drink the medicine and the blood pouring out did not stop.
Zhao Nanyu clenched his hands and hoarsely said, "No."
Song Luan nodded, but there was not much reaction. "Okay."
She wanted her baby to be a daughter so that her son and this daughter could play together.
After it was discovered that Song Luan was pregnant, there were more servants around her, including the old maid from the palace, and an experienced nurse. Song Luan was surrounded by these people all day long. Her stomach grew bigger day by day, which made her more thin and delicate.
She often slept in the daytime and after the sun went down as well.
Song Luan dreamed of the original owner again. What Song Luan thought before seemed to be different from the original novel.
She liked Zhao Nanyu. In her first year of marriage, when she was still pregnant with little Zhao, the relationship between her and Zhao Nanyu was not particularly bad. 
Zhao Nanyu would help her massage her legs at night, although they didn't talk much.
But suddenly one day, the original owner was kicked from behind and fell to the lake, she...couldn't swim, and struggled in the water. She was almost not rescued.
Fortunately, someone passed by the lake at that time, so she was quickly saved.
The original owner was unconscious and kept babbling nonsense.
"I hate you."
"Why are you lying to me?"
"Did you marry me just to take advantage of me?"
Finally, she was talking about her empress mother and her emperor father. She would occasionally jump to "son of the world" and "southwest prince".
It was three days before she woke up.
She was dead and lifeless.
After choking some water from the lake, the original owner was like a changed person. She didn't have a good face towards Zhao Nanyu. 
She ridiculed him as a villain and also said that he was not worthy of her.
It seemed that the original owner couldn't stand being with him any longer, and decided to leave him.
But Zhao Nanyu was like an invulnerable monster, no matter what she said or did, he would not be affected.
Song Luan watched the struggle of the original owner like an outsider. She was a little sad, but she couldn't tell where this sadness came from.
When she woke up, she found that she was just taking a nap.
Song Luan felt that there were many things she didn't know. 
Flashes of memories and pictures appeared more and more in her mind. She seemed to understand that it was not in a book, it was more like a story that happened in a previous life.
Zhao Nanyu saw that she was sleeping in the yard with nothing to cover her. His eyes were cold. 
The servant beside Song Luan immediately knelt. "It was this servant's negligence. Please forgive me."
Zhao Nanyu said coldly, "Go out."
Song Luan yawned but still felt sleepy. Zhao Nanyu untied his cloak, wrapped her tightly, and sighed, "You're still very capricious."
Song Luan was held by him and shrunk in his arms. "I'm not cold."
Finally, she patted her stomach very cleverly, "The baby said it was not cold."
Song Luan often made moves of intimacy with him. She would take the initiative to hold him, would hook his neck to kiss him, and would occasionally boldly stick out her tongue to lick his lips.
But whenever she did these things, her eyes were clean and didn't have any affection.
It was as common as talking in a meal.
Every time Zhao Nanyu looked at her blank eyes, his heart would feel pain.
The setting sun lengthened their shadows. The man's lingering eyes fell on the woman in his arms and asked, "What do you want to eat today?"
"Sour and spicy soup" Song Luan did not hesitate to answer.
She just wanted to eat sour.
"You've been eating sour foods for half a month, aren't you tired of it?"
Song Luan answered him with a straight and strong voice, "The baby in my stomach is not tired of it."
"Ah!" She suddenly cried out, "She kicked me!"
=============== Chapter 83
Song Luan didn't have enough time to be happy with her previous pregnancy before the child was aborted. In short, this was her first time experiencing a full pregnancy.
She felt very happy whenever the child in her stomach moved. She gently put her hand on it, stroked it slowly, and said, "She must be an active little girl in the future."
Not only Song Luan wanted a girl, but Zhao Nanyu also wanted a girl himself.
It's best if the daughter followed Ah Luan's appearance and sweet smile. She would call him father.
Zhao Nanyu's shallow smile spread through his eyes. His palm that was as cold as ice, touched Song Luan's abdomen, "Eh? Why isn't the baby kicking?"
Song Luan said, "Maybe she is tired."
The baby in the stomach only kicked two or three times, Zhao Nanyu could only feel that the baby was motionless, maybe the baby did not like this father?
This sentence would probably hurt his heart, so Song Luan didn't say it.
Zhao Nanyu also did not put it in mind, "There will be more trouble in the future."
He was right, the child seemed to be naughty. It was already tossing and turning.
Song Luan vomited after eating, and couldn't eat anymore. The only thing she could eat was probably sugar gourd because it was made from sour hawthorn.
She was skinny to the naked eye, and it was a little awkward to touch her skin and bones.
Zhao Nanyu looked at her and was worried. He didn't mention anything, and just quietly hired a cook from the palace.
Song Luan finally ate the hot and sour kudzu powder made by the cook. Before drinking a glass of water, she vomited it out again.
Song Luan was not very delicate, but she hated vomiting.
Zhao Nanyu poured a glass of water for her and looked at her with pity, "Rinse your mouth first."
Song Luan's face was still pale, while she held her arm, "I'm so uncomfortable." and she pinched the meat on his hand, "It's all your fault."
Zhao Nanyu didn't argue with her and let her vent her temper. "It's all my fault. What else do you want to eat? I'll have someone make it for you."
Song Luan shook her head. "I can't eat anymore."
She vomited everything that she ate.
Zhao Nanyu frowned and said, "You are too thin."
Song Luan pointed to her stomach. "She didn't want to eat, I can't help it."
Zhao Nanyu said, "When she comes out, let's see how I will deal with her."
If she was a daughter, Song Luan thought that Zhao Nanyu would be reluctant to punish her.
In the middle of the night, Song Luan poked the man on her side and said, "I'd like rice noodles with a lot of chili sauce meat."
Zhao Nanyu was sleeping shallowly, and when he looked out, it was still dark. He was afraid that the cook was still outside the residence. He got up from the bed, picked up his clothes, and put it on his body at will. He lit a lamp and whispered, "I'll go to the kitchen."
He didn't know how to cook, and he didn't eat spicy food very often. Seeing Song Luan eat rice noodles several times before, he thought it wouldn't be difficult to do it himself.
Song Luan swallowed her saliva, "Then you hurry up."
Fortunately, there were ready-made rice noodles and sauce prepared by the cook in the kitchen. Zhao Nanyu made a fire and boiled water, and when the hot water was hot, he placed the rice noodles into the pot.
After the rice noodles were cooked, he picked it up and poured it in a bowl together with the sauce.
Song Luan sat barefoot beside the bed. She saw him come in with a bowl. Her eyes were bright. She smelled the fragrance and her stomach was purring.
Song Luan didn't wear socks. She put on her shoes and walked around him. "Is that good? I thought it would take a long time."
Zhao Nanyu said with a smile, "Okay, you try it."
Song Luan licked her lips, picked up two noodles with chopsticks, and put them into her mouth. Only when she tasted the spiciness she craved was she satisfied, "It's delicious."
Zhao Nanyu was relieved, but said, "You can't eat too much."
It's too spicy. Eating too much was not good for her.
Song Luan felt full after eating half a bowl. It would be a pity to throw the rest, so she pushed the bowl to Zhao Nanyu, "Do you want to eat it?"
Zhao Nanyu tasted a small mouthful but was choked to the point where his face turned red. But even so, he still ate the remaining noodles.
Song Luan watched him quietly eat the noodles with tearful eyes. With both hands on her chin, she suddenly opened her mouth and said, "Have you ever eaten such spicy food before?"
Zhao Nanyu shook his head, "Never."
Song Luan said strangely, "I have a feeling that you have eaten this level of spiciness before."
This picture appeared in her mind, Song Luan racked her brain to continue thinking, but she didn't get any clue.
Zhao Nanyu's face was stunned. His black eyes were staring at her, pretending to be calm. "You remember wrong."
She remembered correctly.
It's just that it was a long time ago.
It was a long time ago, in their past life.
"Maybe."
As the day dawned, Song Luan's head fell like a chicken pecking at rice. Zhao Nanyu laughed and put the sleepy woman on the bed.
He was afraid that she would continue to think about it. 
She didn't love him.
She'd never like him again in her life.
However, Zhao Nanyu was greedy and occasionally thought that if she remembers everything, maybe she would think of the years when they were once in love.
Zhao Nanyu stood in front of the window with his hands on his back. The morning sun was dazzling. The golden light fell on his side face. His eyes were heavy, and no one could see what he was thinking.
Advertisements
When the servant girl came into the room with water, Zhao Nanyu suddenly said, "Go out, don't disturb her."
*
Zhao Nanyu was afraid that Song Luan would be bored. If he went out, no one would accompany her to talk, so he had to call third lady Zhao to accompany her.
At first, the third lady was shocked to know that she was still alive. Her face was as white as paper.
Didn't she pass away?
Zhao Nanyu didn't intend to explain to her, nor did he need to explain to anyone, because now the Zhao family had to rely on him alone. If one day he was in a bad mood and remembered the messy things the Zhao family had done to him in the past, he could turn over and settle old accounts against them.
The third lady forced down her fear and went into the residence.
Song Luan had a slightly protruding belly. She was choosing clothes at this moment when she turned her head and saw third lady Zhao. 
Zhao Nanyu didn't tell her that third lady Zhao would come.
She thought he was going to hide her for the rest of her life.
Song Luan put down the silk and satin in her hand, "Why are you here?"
Third lady Zhao didn't believe that she was still alive before she came. She only believed it when she saw her.
Third lady Zhao shook her hand and touched her face, "You...you, what the hell is going on here?"
"It's a long story."
She was still confused and also wasn't completely clear as to why.
She couldn't answer the question of Third lady Zhao.
Third lady Zhao looked at her stomach with tears in her eyes. "It's fine since you're okay. Now that you're pregnant, you should take care of your body."
Third lady Zhao still remembered Song Luan's weak body and bones. In the beginning, she was always ill and often couldn't get out of bed.
Song Luan laughed. "I'm much better now. You don't have to worry."
"You're still too thin."
"This child tosses around, and wouldn't eat well."
Third lady Zhao laughed, "You also didn't eat well at that time. It took you half a month to get better. You can get through this."
After drinking a cup of tea, third lady Zhao hesitated and asked, "No one in the outside knows... what exactly are you and Ah Yu planning to do?"
They only knew that Zhao Nanyu killed his wife and had a new lover who he spoiled to the bones, but they didn't know that Song Luan was the new lover protected at home.
Song Luan also couldn't help it. She acted coquettishly and begged, but Zhao Nanyu seemed not ready to give her an identity.
She was not a worm in his stomach. She couldn't guess what he was thinking.
"You know, he never listens to me. He makes all the decisions at home, and my hands are tied."
Third lady Zhao also thought that it was Zhao Nanyu who planned this.
But she had no name and no distinction. Zhao Nanyu shouldn't do this.
But even if she had the intention to help Song Luan, she couldn't.
She couldn't advise her stepson.
"I have wronged you." After a pause, the Third lady said, "In fact, he is willing to listen to you."
...
Song Luan was used to Zhao Nanyu's autocratic style, so she didn't feel aggrieved. She couldn't escape from his palm. She might as well live in peace and stability.
The third lady sighed, "Back then, Ah Yu was very despondent. I've never seen him so sorrowful. He wouldn't let anyone touch you. No one could even get into your room."
"Later, when the fire broke out, I saw his aspect. It was as if his heart was broken into pieces."
So even though she had ears to hear the rumors, Third lady Zhao did not believe that Song Luan was deliberately killed.
Song Luan listened with an empty heart. This should move her, but she only felt calm.
It was as if listening to other people's stories. She lowered her head, oh.
Third lady Zhao told Song Luan many things like the news that Zhao Wenyan's wife was pregnant with a child.
Song Luan was happy for them. She still remembered the kind-hearted girl named Sheng Sheng. She was dying of pain at that time and begged Sheng Sheng to secretly bring her a knife.
Song Luan thought of Huai Jin again, the beautiful boy. She didn't know how he was now. She never saw Huai Jin again after she fell ill.
Zhao Nanyu suddenly appeared behind her and asked, "Why are you so distracted?"
Song Luan turned and hugged his waist. "Do you remember Huai Jin?"
Maybe her love for Zhao Nanyu had been stripped away, so Song Luan couldn't empathize with his emotions. She wouldn't know if he was jealous.
Zhao Nanyu's body was slightly stiff, "Remember."
Song Luan then asked, "Do you know what he is like now?"
Zhao Nanyu answered "Yes."
After waiting for a long time, Song Luan looked at him and poked his hand, "Say it."
Zhao Nanyu suddenly grabbed her wrist, and there were thin blood threads in his eyes. He bit his teeth and said, "When you got sick, he went back to Nanman."
Nanman, that mysterious country.
Song Luan looked sad. She thought Huai Jin was probably aware of her illness and went back to find her medicine.
Her heart was a little blocked. She was afraid that Huai Jin would die in the snow like the original book.
Song Luan suddenly found that the man's face was a little heavy, because the corners of his mouth pursed into a straight line, and his facial features were cold and hard.
She was puzzled and asked, "What's the matter with you?"
She thought that Zhao Nanyu was unhappy because she mentioned other men.
She was quite helpless, this man had a strong desire for monopoly. She couldn't even mention others. It was tyrannical.
Zhao Nanyu said, "Ah Luan, I like you, you know that."
Song Luan drooped her eyelids and made a low sound.
Zhao Nanyu stroked her hair. "For your good, don't mention other men in front of me."
Zhao Nanyu was afraid of hearing Song Luan say that she likes another man one day.
Song Luan said, "He's alone. I'm just a little worried about him. I don't mean anything else."
Afraid that Zhao Nanyu would not believe her, she said, "You don't have to be afraid. I won't let you wear a green hat."
She couldn't even get out of the door!
Zhao Nanyu took a deep breath and forced down his inner irritability. There was a taste of rust in his throat. He gritted his teeth and said, "Okay."
***
After another five or six days, Song Luan was able to eat. She rarely vomited. 
After drinking the tonic for several days, she looked rosy and had more flesh on her cheek. Somehow, she was not so fragile anymore.
Zhao Nanyu led her into the palace, and Song Luan fell asleep unconsciously. They needed to walk in the inner palace, and couldn't ride a carriage. 
She had just stepped down from the carriage when Zhao Nanyu picked her up.
So many people were watching them, and Song Luan was embarrassed and blushed, "I can walk by myself."
"Don't you have a sore back?"
She couldn't sleep last night because it was so uncomfortable. Zhao Nanyu had to massage her back for half an hour.
Song Luan put her hand on his shoulder. "My back is fine now."
Zhao Nanyu didn't listen to her. He took her outside the main hall and put her down.
After fixing her clothes and hair, Song Luan remembered to ask, "Is there some reason you brought me to the palace?"
Zhao Nanyu clasped her fingers. "Here's the seal."
Song Luan suddenly realized. Her lips curled and laughed, "You're going to give me a name, right??"
"Yes."
"I thought you'd let me live in your backyard all your life."
"Don't talk nonsense. "
"Well, let's get in."
The emperor was not surprised to see her. He probably knew from Zhao Nanyu that she was still alive.
However, the new emperor still had some grudges about her helping Ayun hide.
"Miss Song, go and see Ayun. She misses you very much."
Song Luan thought that the new emperor's words were evil, but who cared about him being an emperor.
Song Luan was mentally prepared when Ayun was captured by Gu Yan that day. Her life would be difficult.
But when she saw Ayun locked up in a splendid palace, she was still shocked.
Ayun tucked her legs in the corner. When the door opened, and the light came in, she was frightened.
Ayun hugged herself, as if afraid of others coming in.
Song Luan called her name in a low voice.
When Ayun heard her voice, her tense body gradually relaxed, "Miss Song, it's you!"
"It's me, but how can you hide in the corner?"
"I'm afraid he'll come."
Every time Li Han comes, she hides. But where could she hide in such a big place? He could still find her every time, and he would mock her.
"He didn't hit you, did he?" Song Luan was afraid that the slag emperor would get up and fight Ayun.
"No, he never hit me."
Li Han's methods were much crueler than using his hands.
Ayun called out and found that Song Luan's stomach seemed to be bulging. She asked, "Do you have a baby?"
"Mm-hmm."
Ayun remembered that she had a baby with Li Han before.
Even if it wasn't her child, Ayun felt happy.
She carefully touched it and her eyes were bright. "Can I hold her after the baby is born?"
"Of course."
With a smile, Ayun said, "I thought you didn't like Zhao Nanyu."
She must have liked him well enough to give birth to him.
Song Luan was stunned and said, "Yes."
Ayun felt strange, "You want to stay with him even if you don't like it?"
"My life is consistently flat. He's handsome, and I will not suffer any loss if I stay. As for love, it's too vague, my heart won't be moved by him."
Li Han and Zhao Nanyu stood outside the house, listening silently, not a word didn't fall into their ears.
"Mr. Zhao turned out to be a little white face, and Miss Song was only interested in your skin." Li Han said coolly, seeing the excitement.
Zhao Nanyu looked cold, and sneered, "But your skin is not appreciated by others, unlike mine."
Zhao Nanyu thought it was not enough, so he added, "We have two children. How about you?"
Li Han's face suddenly changed, "Shut your mouth!"
=============== Chapter 84
Song Luan originally thought that she and Ayun were in the same situation. Now it seemed that Ayun was even more pitiful than she was, because she felt that the slag emperor was not so good to Ayun, otherwise this little girl would not be so afraid of him.
Ayun trembled at the sound of her opening the door and even looked for places to hide.
Song Luan held her hand and lowered her voice. "Do you still want to escape?"
Ayun nodded. "Yes, he is frightening. Life is worthless in his eyes..."
Song Luan used to be scared of Zhao Nanyu, but her fear of him did not grow, because she later found that as long as she would not provoke Zhao Nanyu's bottom line, he would treat her with gentleness.
But the slag emperor was not such a person.
Song Luan looked at her sympathetically and said, "If there is a chance in the future, I will help you."
Ayun replied gratefully, "Okay, thank you."
She gazed at Song Luan's stomach and touched it softly. 
Her eyes were filled with envy. "When will she be born?" 
Song Luan replied, "There are still several months to go."
"Oh, oh, do you feel uncomfortable?"
"I felt a little bit of discomfort before, but I'm better now."
Ayun bowed her head shyly and laughed, "I also want to have a baby."
She would like it if her child was fat and white. It would also be better if the baby was quiet and sensible.
Ayun said in a low voice, "But not for Li Hansheng, of course! I hate him."
She always dared to call the new emperor's name by his real name directly and had even called him more than a thousand times. If Li Hansheng wanted to kill her because of this, she would have died hundreds of times.
Song Luan covered her mouth. "Be careful. The walls have ears."
"I forgot."
Song Luan just arrived at Ayun's residence for less than an incense stick before she was respectfully told by the servants that it was time to leave. Ayun looked at her reluctantly, and her little handheld her sleeve. She said, "You must come and play with me in the future. I'm bored of being alone."
Song Luan nodded, "Okay."
Because she did not know whether she would have the opportunity to enter the palace in the future, she went to ask Zhao Nanyu. It shouldn't be difficult for him to enter.
Zhao Nanyu was waiting for her outside the hall. 
She did not know how long he had waited. 
She slowly moved to his side with her fluttering skirt and asked, "When did you come here?"
"Just arrived."
"Are we going back?"
"Yes." He said, "Do you want to stay in the palace?"
Song Luan shook her head and said, "No, I'm a little sleepy."
Zhao Nanyu took the initiative to hold her finger and led her outside slowly. 
When she passed the Wenhua hall, Song Luan's eyes were very quick, as she saw a man in a blue robe. His features were clean, and his eyes were quite clear, just like a clear spring.
The man was very fair, with a shallow smile on his face.
He also seemed to notice that there was a gaze closely following him. He raised his eyes and looked at them.
The man was slightly stunned. His eyes stayed on Song Luan's face for less than a moment, before he immediately moved to Zhao Nanyu, who was beside her. He bowed his hands and said respectfully to him, "Greetings, Lord Zhao."
Zhao Nanyu looked impatient. He thought about how many ways the man would die. He was very annoyed.
That's right. This man was Song Luan's new flower exploration, which she praised for his good looks.
Zhao Nanyu glanced at him coolly and looked at his appearance carefully. It was not better compared to his.
He didn't know what part of him Song Luan thought was good.
Zhao Nanyu, with an unsmiling and straight face, spewed out a noble word, "Well."
Song Luan gazed at the man with relish, and the more she looked at him, the more pleased she felt. He had the temperament of a scholar. He was like a gentle breeze and had a graceful demeanor.
Zhao Nanyu squeezed her wrist in silence. His voice was low, "Don't look."
Song Luan couldn't help but look even more. After staring at him, she still felt it wasn't enough. She sighed amidst her thoughts, "I don't know which girl in the future will be lucky enough to marry him."
Song Luan knew that she liked him not because of his appearance, but because of his temperament.
It seemed that many years ago, the kind of man that she liked was exactly like him–as graceful as the wind and snow.
Zhao Nanyu snorted, "Many girls in the capital want to marry him."
Song Luan of course knew that if she wasn't married and had no children, she would have liked to as well.
"Those girls are very discerning."
Zhao Nanyu was about to get angry at her, but her face was quite innocent as if she didn't realize that there was something wrong with what she said.
Zhao Nanyu was appalled and pinched her face. "It's useless to look at him. The emperor plans to send him away from the capital. It will take at least two or three years to return."
Song Luan asked, "Where does the emperor want him to go?"
"Yumen pass."
Song Luan's tone was rather pitiful, "It's far away. His life will be very hard."
Zhao Nanyu laughed, "So he has no plans to marry now."
Advertisements
This transfer order was the result of Zhao Nanyu's contribution. Young people should go out to experience more. What good would happen if they want to stay in the capital?
The farther he goes, the better. Song Luan would never see him again in her life.
"How old is he this year?" Song Luan couldn't help but be curious. Even knowing that Zhao Nanyu would be angry, she still asked.
"Twenty."
"Won't his family urge him to wake up early and get married?"
Zhao Nanyu stopped, pressed her shoulder, and pushed her to the red wall. He looked at her with a smile. "Are you so worried about his marriage that you want to introduce your sisters to him?"
Song Luan quickly waved her hand, "My sisters are not strong enough to wait for him."
Song Luan thought that Zhao Nanyu should not care about these things with her. He was stingy.
He was also a penny pincher. His heart was indeed very small.
"Don't talk about him. I won't see him again anyway. There's nothing to say about irrelevant people."
Song Luan also had good eyes for not touching his bottom line, "Okay."
Her eyes were round and bright, as she shrank in his arms obediently. Zhao Nanyu couldn't help but raise her chin and pecked her.
He only wanted to lightly taste her, but she was so sweet and attractive that he indulged himself several times.
Song Luan's lips were red and moist. Zhao Nanyu's bite was a little bit painful. Just as she was about to push away the man in front of her, there was a uniform footstep sound not far away. 
The person was heading in their direction, and it immediately saw them.
Zhao Nanyu had quick eyes, and he swiftly wrapped Song Luan in his arms.
The person heading their way was Gu Yan, the commander of Jin Wuwei. 
He didn't expect to meet Zhao Nanyu, his face was shocked, but he briskly recovered, "Lord Zhao."
"Commander Gu."
Song Luan showed half of her head, and her round eyes stared at Gu Yan. She didn't like the man who helped Zhao Nanyu find her.
She heard that this commander Gu was not young, but still hadn't negotiated marriage proposals with daughters of other families. She didn't know why.
However, for a fierce man like Gu Yan, she felt that it was normal that no woman would marry him.
When Song Luan thought about it, on that day that he called her a shrew, she had already held a grudge against him.
Gu Yan's eyes only glanced at her momentarily, before he hastily took it back. She had made a deep impression on him because she was the most aggressive and petty woman he had ever seen in his life.
"Commander Gu is really powerful."
"No." Gu Yan knew that she still hated him, but he didn't care.
He looked at Song Luan's slightly protruding stomach and congratulated them.
Song Luan wanted to say something, but Zhao Nanyu pressed her back. 
He smiled at Gu Yan, and said politely, "Thank you very much."
"I'm going to report to the emperor first. Goodbye." Gu Yan felt the annoyance that Song Luan was radiating. He endured the disgust in her eyes.
"Take your time."
After he left, Zhao Nanyu caressed Song Luan's hair twice and said with a smile, "I didn't know that you hate Gu Yan so much."
Song Luan said silently in her heart: If not for him, she would still be living a happy life with Ayun now!!!
She didn't talk and was just lost in her thoughts. She followed Zhao Nanyu for another two steps before she refused to go further.
"My legs are so sore that I can't walk."
The carriage was not allowed to enter the palace hall, and ordinary people were not allowed to use a sedan chair. Song Luan was deliberately making trouble with Zhao Nanyu.
From the Wenhua palace to the palace gate, there were more than a little step.
Zhao Nanyu did not say a word and directly picked her up. His strength was strong as he easily wrapped her arms around her waist. Song Luan was distracted and looked at his side face blankly.
Zhao Nanyu carried her to the carriage. After Song Luan got pregnant, her body was heavier than before. She found that he was sweating on his forehead.
Song Luan quietly took out a handkerchief from her sleeve and handed it to him, "Wipe your face."
Zhao Nanyu took the handkerchief, wiped off the sweat on his forehead, and immediately put away her handkerchief without giving it back to her.
It's just a handkerchief. Song Luan was not petty enough to demand it back. If he liked it, he could take it.
The pregnant woman was sleepy. Soon after she sat down, her eyelids couldn't hold on and her head was dizzy. Finally, her small head leaned against his chest, and when she smelled the familiar smell on his body, she soon fell asleep. 
When she woke up again, she saw the ceiling of her bed.
Song Luan's outer clothes had been taken off, and her socks had long been kicked to the corner. However, the quilt was warm, so she didn't feel cold.
Little Zhao sat in front of the desk by the window while doing his homework. When he heard her getting up, he put down his pen and went to his mother's bed.
His eyes were like two grapes, as he looked at her seriously, "You woke up."
Song Luan raised her hand and touched his head. Her mouth was still yawning. "Well, when did you come?"
He thought about it carefully and then replied, "I was there when you came back."
His mother slept soundly as she was brought back by his father. His father also told him not to wake up his mother.
Little Zhao kept it in mind. He barely made any sound when doing his homework, for fear of waking up his mother.
Song Luan looked out of the window and said, "It's getting dark. Did you have dinner?"
He shook his head.
Song Luan said, "Have dinner in my room."
Although he was very happy, his face did not change much. He hesitated for a moment and asked, "Mom, can I touch my sister?"
Song Luan said with a smile, "Of course."
In the past few days, the child was very troublesome. She often kicked her at night, but the strange thing was, every time Zhao Nanyu's hand touched it, the baby would not move.
After thinking about it, Song Luan thought that the child may dislike her father.
Little Zhao rubbed and warmed his hands before softly placing it on his mother's stomach. He touched it carefully two times, and suddenly laughed, "Mother, my sister just kicked me."
Song Luan thought that this baby would be a daughter. Zhao Nanyu and little Zhao also thought so.
"She's saying hello to you. Don't dislike your younger sister and play with her, okay?" Song Luan teased.
"Don't worry, I will take care of my sister."
Song Luan was very pleased that her son had this kind of consciousness. At least her two children would get along peacefully.
***
Two months had passed in a blink of an eye, Song Luan's stomach grew bigger and bigger, which made her even more petite. Her face looked smaller, and it was the size of a palm.
Song Luan did not sleep well at night. Her legs were cramped and her waist was sour. She was a little delicate. 
Whenever she slept badly, she would always be in a bad temper.
She would cry most of the time. Pregnant women are always more sentimental, so Song Luan's tears fell like a river.
Zhao Nanyu was hard-working, with full patience in coaxing her.
When Song Luan heard his voice, she would be even more annoyed. She kicked him mercilessly, "When will this baby be born?"
She didn't feel good after she got pregnant.
Zhao Nanyu rubbed her wrists. "Almost there. Give it a few months."
Song Luan seemed to be addicted to kicking him. She took the opportunity to kick him gently and turned her back to him. She looked a little cute after she had done bad things to him.
Just kicking him.
Zhao Nanyu didn't feel any pain. He took her leg, rolled up her inner-pants, and pressed his finger on her calf.
Song Luan thought he was going to settle accounts with her, so she turned her head angrily and glared at him. She tried to break his handoff.
Zhao Nanyu squeezed her wrist bone and said, "Don't move."
Song Luan was a bully but was also afraid of him. She immediately obeyed.
If he says don't move, then she wouldn't move!
But Zhao Nanyu massage technique was also very soothing, Song Luan's cramped legs were carefully pressed.
She hummed and went back to sleep.
***
In the ninth month of Song Luan's pregnancy, there was already a midwife living in the house.
Zhao Nanyu prepared everything in advance for fear of an accident. He often had nightmares in the past half month.
Always dreaming of Song Luan holding the bow and arrow, and standing in front of him with a smile. She would then stab the sharp tip of the arrow into his heart.
He was covered with blood, but her smile became deeper and deeper. She walked farther and farther away from him. When she was far away, she said with a smile that she would leave him forever.
Zhao Nanyu was awakened by this sentence. When he woke up, he looked at the woman who was sleeping on his side, and only half of her face was covered with the quilt.
She kicked the quilt away again. 
Zhao Nanyu skillfully helped her put her bare feet back into the quilt, and he put his arm around her waist. He was about to close her eyes and continue sleeping when he suddenly found that the person in his arms was crying.
Glittering and translucent tears covered her whole cheek, as she murmured to herself.
Zhao Nanyu's heartfelt like falling, his voice was shaking as he called to her, "Luan Bao, Luan Bao, wake up."
After a long time, Song Luan opened her eyes and looked at him.
Zhao Nanyu's face was pale and almost morbid. His smile was ugly and dubious. He asked, "What's wrong?"
Song Luan raised her hand and found her face wet. She said, "I dreamed of something strange."
Swords, spears, and corpses were everywhere.
["Little princess, someone can finally take you down."]
["Brother has seen him. He looks very handsome. You can rest assured."]
["My princess is so beautiful that no one can stand against you."]
["How fierce the princess is."]
["Go! Go! The southwest king has rebelled! Princess, let's go! Your brother has been cut down by the prince himself!"]
There were many sharp and harsh voices echoing in her ears.
Song Luan's eyes were blank. She only remembered a little, and couldn't remember most of it.
Zhao Nanyu held her tightly, as she cried out in pain. "Loosen your hold a little bit...it's painful."
When she looked at him, she found that his face was very strange. "You look so pale. Did you have a nightmare?"
"No. It's nothing." He said word by word.
Song Luan frowned. 
She gently put her hand on her heart. She thought it would hurt. After all, it hurt so much in her dream that she couldn't breathe.
But when she woke up, nothing happened.
She said, "I don't want to sleep."
"Then don't sleep."
Song Luan pushed him away. "I want you to relax. I feel so painful when you hold me."
His hands were like tongs, and she was miserable.
Zhao Nanyu wouldn't let her go for a while. He was flustered. 
He laughed hard and coaxed in a low voice, "Kiss me, and I'll let you go."
=============== Chapter 85
Song Luan only thought Zhao Nanyu was anxious again. She shrank into the quilt and said, "Childish."
Even when she reached the ninth month, Song Luan could only still sleep on her side, for fear that she might press the child. 
Zhao Nanyu opened the quilt where Song Luan was hiding. 
She looked at Zhao Nanyu and said helplessly, "I'm not afraid of burying my whole face in this quilt."
Song Luan's delicate face flushed red, "It's so warm."
Zhao Nanyu still refused to let her hide in the quilt. He touched her face and said, "Your mother and brother will come to see you at noon tomorrow."
Song Luan opened her eyes and said, "That's good."
After the emperor's imperial notice came down regarding Song Luan's identity, it startled almost everyone.
Aunt Lin and Song Heqing couldn't believe it. They were one of the few people who had seen Song Luan's corpse with their own eyes. Aunt Lin also sniffed her nose several times at that time. Her daughter was indeed dead and had no breath at all.
Besides, Aunt Lin's prejudice against Zhao Nanyu made her think he deliberately killed his wife.
But Aunt Lin herself was seriously ill, and she was not well. She could only get out of bed after a few days, so she never had a chance to see Song Luan.
After several months of recuperation, Aunt Lin's illness was completely cured. After thinking for several days, she was now ready to come to see what was going on.
The knife wound on her daughter's chest was very clear, and the wound was deep and heavy.
Song Heqing helped her into the carriage, and didn't forget to remind her, "No matter if you see Song Luan or not, don't speak evil words there."
Zhao Nanyu was different from the past. He was not someone that could be humiliated easily. Although Song Heqing did not like him, he couldn't be impulsive. He still had a big family to take into account.
Aunt Lin thought of Zhao Nanyu and gnashed her teeth. "I know."
After a while, the coach arrived at the gate of the residence, and the servants respectfully welcomed them in.
Song Luan was waiting for them at the gate of the courtyard. She felt that she had not seen her mother and brother for a long time. These two people treat her sincerely.
Aunt Lin looked at the replica of her daughter who stood at the door frame. 
Her eyes were filled with tears as she stared at the thin figure. She looked identical to her daughter!
She walked slowly forward, her fingers trembling as she caressed her cheeks. She couldn't help but cry, "It's really my Luan Bao."
Before seeing Song Luan, Aunt Lin always thought that Zhao Nanyu was scamming her. 
Song Luan was gently held in her arms by her mother, and her eyes were sour. "Mother, it's me."
Aunt Lin wiped away her tears, and didn't forget to ask, "Didn't you already..."
...died?
Song Luan lied to her with the reason she had already made up. "Do you remember that Ah Yu has a brother? It took him a long time to save me."
Aunt Lin was half convinced. Her face was heavy and she suddenly said, "But it was Zhao Nanyu who stabbed you, right?! That evil seed!"
How painful it was to be stabbed by a knife? Her baby daughter was so good, how could someone do it to her?
When Song Heqing heard the word "evil seed", his eyebrows jumped.
"Mother, he didn't do it."
It was because she was in so much pain, and begged him to kill her.
Aunt Lin didn't believe what she said. "He admitted it himself!"
Song Luan hugged her, poured a cup of tea for Aunt Lin, and said slowly, "Do you believe others more than me?" She then laughed, and continued, "You see, I am very well now."
Song Heqing also helped out, "Yes. Sister is doing very well now, so you can rest assured. As for the past, I believe only my sister knows."
Aunt Lin reluctantly pressed back all kinds of doubts in her heart and looked at her stomach, "How many months has it been? Is it coming soon?"
Song Luan rubbed her sore waist. "It seems I'm about to give birth this month."
She didn't know the specific date.
Aunt Lin sobbed again. "The situation wasn't very good when you gave birth to your eldest son. Now, I don't know what it's like, but don't let anything happen. If it's a critical moment, you must save your own life first."
When her daughter didn't show any love to her eldest son two years ago, Aunt Lin never persuaded her to correct her behavior.
Song Luan couldn't cry or laugh. "It should be okay, mother. Don't worry. I'll live well. Don't worry about me anymore."
"You're coaxing me." Aunt Lin sighed, "It would have been better if you had married a little white face."
Who would have expected Zhao Nanyu to have such a grand fate today? Aunt Lin once sincerely hoped that Zhao Nanyu would die early so that her daughter would have a chance to remarry.
She had observed people for decades and never missed anything. Zhao Nanyu was not a good person.
Song Luan nodded, echoing her words. She thought of little white's bright eyes. "I like white faces too!"
White, clean, gentle, and polite.
No power, no money, nothing.
The last thing her mother lacked was money.
Song Heqing's corner mouth twitched. He half-jokingly said, "Sister, you haven't changed."
"Brother, I just told you the truth."
"I didn't care about it in the past, but now, you don't talk about this at home."
"I'm not stupid."
"I'm afraid you'll be stupid."
Aunt Lin recovered from her serious illness, and now she felt tired after talking for a short time.
"Mother, are you tired?"
Advertisements
"I'm really tired."
"Otherwise you can just rest in my room for a while?" Song Luan suggested.
Aunt Lin originally wanted to agree, but when she thought about it, Zhao Nanyu seemed to return at this time. She didn't want to see her son-in-law at all. She was afraid that she couldn't stop herself from pointing at his nose while scolding and beating him.
She waved her hand. "I won't stay. I'll see you some other day."
Aunt Lin took out the silver collar that she had prepared early. The collar was inlaid with agate of excellent color. It looked very beautiful. "This is for the child in your stomach. I also gave it to you when you were a child. It does not only look good but could also keep you safe."
Song Luan also felt that the collar was very beautiful. She couldn't help touching it again and again, "It's beautiful!"
"If you like, you can get it from me. There are a lot of them, which will be given to you in the future."
Also, when Song Luan got married, she added a lot of gold and silver jewelry to her dowry, but after a few years, Song Luan must have spent the money already.
As an elder brother, Song Heqing naturally wouldn't say that he didn't bring any gifts. Before he came, he racked his brains to think about what to send. After picking out the best things, he couldn't find any satisfactory ones.
As always, he gave her a silver note directly.
Song Luan was reluctant to let go of the five thousand taels of silver. Her bright eyes seemed to be shining.
She never took so much money in her life. She laughed sweetly, "Thank you, brother."
Looking at his sister, Song Heqing thought that she was still the same as before. She liked money very much, but she was now much less daring. He asked jokingly, "Is Zhao Nanyu not giving you money to spend?"
Song Luan locked the silver note he gave in a small drawer and nodded, "How do you know?! He doesn't give me money. He's so stingy."
Song Heqing was dumbfounded, then he waved his hand, "It doesn't matter. If there is no money in the future, send someone to tell me, and I'll give it to you."
Although the Song family lost their power, they were still rich.
He could still take out a few thousand taels of silver.
"Good." She almost lost her smile.
Song Luan's body was heavy, it was not convenient to send them back, so she had to stand by the door and watch them leave. When she couldn't see their backs, she went back to the residence reluctantly.
On the table was still a silver collar that her mother had given her. She remembered that little Zhao didn't seem to have it, because she had never seen him wear it.
Song Luan had one hand on her waist and the other on her chin. She thought about it. For the sake of fairness, she also wanted to tie a collar for little Zhao, and a pair of silver bracelets for both of her children.
When her elbow moved, she accidentally touched the collar on the table. Song Luan couldn't bend down and pick it up.
All of a sudden, there was a hand in her line of sight, and it picked up the collar on the ground.
Zhao Nanyu asked, "Did your mother give it to you?"
"It's not for me, it's for the children." While he was here, Song Luan decided to say what she just thought. "But little Zhao doesn't seem to have this. I was afraid that he would feel sad when he knew about it, and wouldn't say anything."
Zhao Nanyu didn't seem to be listening to her. He lowered his head and fiddled with her fingers, and asked, "What do you want to do?"
"I want to find a better craftsman and make a pair of little Zhao."
Song Luan wanted to let her son know that she treats her two children the same, and there was no difference in treatment.
Zhao Nanyu casually said, "You have the final say."
He seemed to think of something particularly interesting and suddenly asked, "Did your mother scold me again today?"
Song Luan said truthfully, "Yes, you don't know how much she doesn't like you."
Because of this, Zhao Nanyu deliberately avoided Aunt Lin. He was not interested in irrelevant people.
***
After being pregnant, Song Luan's temper had changed a lot. She wanted to do a lot of things.
Zhao Nanyu was almost responsive to her every request and did everything according to her wishes. Although Song Luan loves spicy food and was craving it every day, Zhao Nanyu wouldn't give the final say when it came to her meals.
Song Luan also knew that he was doing it for her good. She always had a stomach ache after eating spicy food. But she couldn't control her temper, she just wanted to vent her anger at him, and the things he brought back were not pleasing to the eye.
She glared at Zhao Nanyu and pointed to the portrait on the table. "You deliberately didn't paint me well! You painted me ugly."
Zhao Nanyu had no choice but to put away the portrait, "It's not ugly."
"If I say it's ugly, it's ugly."
"Then should I throw the painting?"
"No."
Song Luan also knew that she was being troublesome, but she just couldn't help it. The closer she was to the birth date, the more flustered she was, and she wanted to find a sense of existence.
She heard that giving birth to a child would be very painful. What if there was an accident and she couldn't wake up? Or what if something happened to the child?
After thinking too much, Song Luan began to cry.
Zhao Nanyu hugged her waist, caressed her cheek with his fingers, and wiped the water from her eyes. "Don't be afraid. I won't let anything happen to you."
Song Luan had been having nightmares these days. She felt very unlucky. How could anyone dream of a knife and blood every day before giving birth to a child? How bloody!
She sobbed, "You said that, but why hasn't she come out yet?"
Zhao Nanyu laughed. "She's coming."
Song Luan's small face gradually turned white. Her hands tightened his sleeve, and her red lips opened slightly. "Ah Yu, my stomach hurts..."
Zhao Nanyu took her to the bed and said to the servant outside the house, "Please bring the doctor here."
Song Luan was sweating with pain. Lying in bed, her face was still full of pain, and her eyelashes were trembling. She slowly opened her eyes and lifted her hand to catch the corner of his clothes. Her lips turned white and her face was full of pain. "I feel like...I'm about to give birth."
Zhao Nanyu opened the quilt and found that her amniotic fluid broke. His face was tensed, as he held her upper body tightly, and said coldly, "Call the midwife."
It hurts to have a baby.
At the beginning of giving birth, Song Luan burst into tears and sobbed constantly.
The midwife, who had many years of experience in delivery, was not at all flustered. She first ordered the maids to go down and heat the hot water, and then said to Zhao Nanyu, "Your honor, you should go out first."
Zhao Nanyu took a handkerchief to wipe the sweat of Song Luan. "I'll wait."
The midwife didn't dare to urge him. When the servants brought in the hot water, she said again, "My Lord, the delivery room is filthy."
Zhao Nanyu didn't want to go. Song Luan pushed him with her little hand. "You go out. I don't want you to see this."
Zhao Nanyu kissed her eyebrow and sighed in a low voice, "I'm waiting for you outside."
Not long after he went out, there were shouts from the room.
...
Song Luan was still in pain, but it was normal to feel pain for a few hours while giving birth. 
Song Luan tried her best to stay awake. The midwife held her hand. "Madam, bear with me. The child will come out soon."
Song Luan bit her teeth and managed to overcome the pain.
She thought vaguely, what a pain to have a baby!
Another hour later, her vagina opened a bit, and she tried hard to push the baby out.
The midwife took her hand and cheered her on. "Madam, use more strength, and the child will soon come out."
Song Luan was sweating and panting. With her last effort, a cry broke through the sky, and the child finally came out.
Song Luan fainted, and the voice of the midwife sounded in her ears, "Congratulations, madam. It's a young master."
Many voices were squeezing in her ears.
Before falling to a night of deep sleep, Song Luan regretfully thought that her baby turned out to be a boy.
Song Luan's brain and ears were tingling as if there were many people around her speaking.
[Princess, are you not going?]
[Princess, don't be obsessed with him anymore!]
[The emperor and the empress were captured by the rebels at the exit of the secret road. Please run before you die!]
The princess's house was in a mess. The man in armor stroked her cheek with pity. "Sister, I'm going to kill all the disorderly officials and thieves. You hide first okay?"
"You go, I'll wait for you, brother."
The princess' brother took a group of soldiers in the capital who only obeyed his orders, and went to the gate without looking back.
The little princess sat on the steps with a blank face, her hair and clothes were a bit messy, and the sound of fighting outside reached her ears.
Her husband was a weak scholar who had no strength to bind a chicken. He only knew a little about military strategy.
The little princess was afraid that the cruel rebels would kill her husband.
Before the southwest king rebelled, he drew a line with the younger son and even said that the death of the son had nothing to do with him.
At that time, her husband stayed in the capital. It was that the king of Southwest asked him to be his aide.
At that time, he had already been abandoned by the southwest king.
Her husband had also told her father the emperor of the rebel army's march route before. If it had not been for this, her father and mother would have been killed at the first act of the southwest king's rebellion.
If the rebels caught her husband, they wouldn't let him go.
At dusk, a soldier with blood on his face rushed to her. "Little princess, please follow us quickly."
She shook her head obstinately. "I'm not going."
"The son of the southwest king rebelled. The head of your brother was cut off by the rebels and was taken as a flag."
What was he talking about? The little princess didn't understand.
Tears fell in a hurry, and when she came back to her senses, she had been caught by her wrist and was forced to run.
Along the way, she saw many scattered bodies, and the person who took her away seemed to have been seriously injured.
They were stopped by a team.
"Little princess, I'm sorry."
She recognized him. He was the commander of the guards.
The little princess laughed and pointed to the seriously wounded soldier. "You let him go. I'll go with you."
"Good." The commander wanted to tie her hand, and said, "Your husband also rebelled. I have to use your life for the peace of the palace."
At that time, the little princess thought that she had some weight in her husband's heart.
Her voice was very quiet, "Is my brother really dead?"
The commander replied, "The head of the prince was indeed used as a flag."
She nodded, with a cool look. "I see."
The little princess laughed at him, "Can I change my clothes before I go with you? It won't take long."
"You can."
The little princess changed into a red wedding dress that she had only worn once.
The commander could not completely put down his guard against her, so he tied her hands.
The rebels were about to hit the palace gate.
She was pressed up the tower. But even from afar, she could see her brother's head.
The head of the army was holding a lance, and her brother's head was picked above it.
Before leaving, her brother gently touched her face and told her it would be okay, but he was gone in a flash.
She was the most beloved woman in the world. Her father and mother treated her very well. Her royal highness, as her elder brother, responded to her every request.
When she was a child, her brother often let her sit on her shoulder and took her out of the palace to play.
The last bit of luck in her heart was gone.
She also knew that her father and brother couldn't govern the country, since the imperial court was already in a bad state.
The little princess had never seen her husband look like this. He was wearing black armor. His white face was stained with blood. His whole body exuded extreme murderous aura while he held a longsword in his hand, with blood dripping on it.
In her eyes, her husband was just a gentle young man who likes reading. He could only hold a fan instead of a sword.
He doted on her capricious temper, would take her to a lot of fun places, would accompany her mischievous behaviors, and then would stand by her side when her father and mother scolded her.
He shouldn't be like this.
Having been married for many years, the little princess did not even think that the husband who she shared a bed with would kill people.
She looked at the setting sun in the distance. The clouds in the sky seemed to be stained with blood, and some of them were bright red.
She remembered that they had never had children.
Thinking about it, he had already planned all of this.
The little princess had a sword on her neck. The commander behind her said to the man under the palace door in a loud voice, "Let us go, or I will kill her."
Her beloved husband didn't even say a word. Without hesitation, he shot an arrow at her and snorted. Her heart was full of intense pain.
The commander of the guard saw that she was useless, and in a panic, he pushed her directly under the palace gate.
The sound of horses' hooves and the sound of swords and spears echoed in her ears.
Before she died, the little princess felt that her husband had never fallen in love with her.
The country broke down and her family died.
Song Luan was woken up by the crying of the child. She raised her eyelids. Her eyes were still hazy. When the lamp was lit in the room, Zhao Nanyu held the child and whispered coaxingly.
She slowly sat up and looked at Zhao Nanyu in her eyes.
The man looked back and saw that she was awake and laughed. "You're tired."
Song Luan looked at his face.
Zhao Nanyu put the child on her side and pursed his lips. "It's a boy. Do you like it?"
Two tears fell in Song Luan's eyes, and she was a little puzzled. Although she remembered all the memories of her previous life, she did not feel sad.
It seemed like a distant thing to her.
Zhao Nanyu covered her hand and said, "What's the matter? Is it still painful?"
She shook her head. "No."
It didn't hurt much.
Song Luan thought that maybe because of her lack of love, even the hate for him would also be lacking.
She didn't feel sad because she didn't have a strong emotion for Zhao Nanyu.
Plain as water...it's actually good.
She bowed her head, laughed, and called out his name, "Zhao Nanyu."
The man froze slightly and listened to her next words.
Song Luan's tone was relaxed, and she winked at him mischievously. "I remember."
She even joked, "You are a little cruel."
=============== Chapter 86
Song Luan didn't have much strength since she just woke up. She was tired so she leaned against the pillow.
Her face was cold as she looked at Zhao Nanyu's stiff face. With a haggard look, the corner of her mouth curled upwards and chuckled, "Men are cruel, but I can understand. To become king, the means to an end is always cruel. The outcome is also unstable."
Therefore, killing his wife was nothing for him. She was just one of the stepping stones on his way to the top.
Song Luan didn't lie. Her heart was empty and at loss, but she was not sad or affected. It was like reading other people's stories.
Zhao Nanyu felt that every word in her mouth was gouging out his heart. She might as well curse him.
He opened his mouth and his throat was a little painful. At this moment, whatever he would say would not mean anything. Evading the truth was useless. There was no denying that it was indeed something he had done.
Song Luan lowered her head as if she didn't want to see his face any longer. Her long hair covered half of her face. She laughed and said, "But you were cruel to both my parents and brother."
Thinking of the noble and incomparable prince in her dream, Song Luan was a little uncomfortable. Her brother loved her very much and had been protecting her since she was born.
In the end, it ended up with their deaths, which was terrible.
Zhao Nanyu's throat was already so sore, now his eyes were getting red. He explained word by word. "I didn't kill your father, mother, and brother."
It wasn't him. It was the southwest king's army.
The secret passage from the palace was that he told the marching general that the head of the prince's highness was also cut off by his deputy general.
He disclosed the secret passage of the palace but it was the southwest king's army who attacked her parents. It was also the deputy general of the army who cut the prince's head.
But all these things had already happened.
Song Luan felt that he didn't have to lie to her. She nodded to show that she knew, and said, "Maybe they were afraid that I would come to you and would refuse to leave, so they lied to me."
Her parents and brother lied to her, but in the end, they still had to die in her husband's hands.
However, these were not important. Song Luan woke up thinking that she would hate him and would wish for him to die. However, her heart was calm like a spring of stagnant water.
She couldn't even hate him.
Song Luan said lightly. "So that we won't have any misunderstandings left...you shot the arrow yourself, didn't you?"
She just wanted to make sure that she didn't mean to settle accounts.
She only wanted to confirm that she really didn't mean to settle old accounts.
Zhao Nanyu's body suddenly froze. His limbs were cold. His fingertips trembled slightly under his wide sleeves. The blood color on his face faded and his lips turned white. He took a breath and tried to stabilize his figure. "It's me."
He killed her himself. There was no excuse.
When he held the bow and arrow, his hands didn't even tremble. He was resolute and decisive as he cut off her life quickly.
Song Luan said: "It's good that there is no misunderstanding."
Compare with achieving the throne, killing a wife was nothing.
If the princess survived, she would be forced to give up her husband. A woman with pride like the little princess would never live a life of shame.
She had no family left, even if Zhao Nanyu did not kill her, she couldn't live.
Song Luan thought this way. She felt she was magnanimous because she could still think things from Zhao Nanyu's standpoint.
The man in front of her seemed to want to touch her–as he was about to stretch out his hand, he retracted it right away. He asked, his voice was hard and slow, "Do you hate me?"
Song Luan a little confused, then shook her head, "Do not hate ah."
But she didn't love him.
Doesn't it take strength to hate someone?
After several years of entanglement, Song Luan felt tired. Love and hate were like floating clouds, and a light wind blew it away.
Song Luan pondered for a while, then slowly opened her mouth and said, "Zhao Nanyu, let me go."
It's boring.
She wanted to live alone, free, and unrestrained.
Zhao Nanyu's face suddenly paled. He buckled her wrist, and his eyes were cruel, "No."
Song Luan blurted out, "But I don't like you, and I won't like you even in the future."
She did not feel that her words could bring much pain to Zhao Nanyu.
What was it to spend the rest of her life with someone who would never like her? Song Luan did not understand, but she had never been able to understand Zhao Nanyu'sthinking.
It was he who killed his wife himself, and it was he who did not want to spend his life with her.
Man, it's so cheap.
Sharp pain crawled from the sole of his foot to his head. Zhao Nanyu murmured to himself, "It doesn't matter if you don't love me."
As long as she was around him, it was enough.
He didn't want anything else.
It's good to live like this for a lifetime.
It didn't matter if there was no afterlife.
He could take it.
The child grinned and cried out loud while he slept on the bed.
When Song Luan heard the child's cry, her heart softened. She gently held the child in her arms, coaxing him in a low voice, and completely ignoring the man in front of her.
After coaxing for a long time, the child's crying did not lessen, and his face gradually reddened.
Song Luan had never raised a child before. Now she was in a panic and didn't know what to do.
Zhao Nanyu said, "He may be hungry." and reached out to her. "Give me the baby, I'll take it to the nurse."
Advertisements
Song Luan hugged the child in her arms and said, "I'll feed him myself."
In front of Zhao Nanyu, Song Luan didn't know where her shame came from. Before taking off her clothes, she motioned him to look away, but Zhao Nanyu pretended he didn't understand and was cheeky enough to stay.
Song Luan was embarrassed as she untied the placket of her clothes, and began to milk the baby.
She turned over and was reluctant to let Zhao Nanyu see her.
Song Luan looked down at the baby lovingly. Although the little one had not opened his eyes yet, she thought that her baby was very beautiful.
The baby slept again after he was full.
Song Luan was reluctant to put him down so she held him for a long time. The shadow of the candle swayed. She gently put the child on the bed, then she raised her face and slowly said to Zhao Nanyu, "I want to go back to the Song family for a while. What do you think?"
Of course, after going to the Song family, she would never come back.
Zhao Nanyu lowered his eyes, and his knuckled fingers held her wrist tightly. His voice was hoarse as it sounded a little gloomy, "Don't even think about it."
His distorted character would not change just because of his previous mistakes. He had a strong desire to control and his character of not letting go until he dies would forever stay with him.
Paranoid and stubborn.
His guilt was far from letting her go.
Song Luan was not surprised to get such an answer from his mouth, "Whatever you want."
It didn't matter how Zhao Nanyu is.
She also had two children.
Song Luan silently thought–maybe she liked Zhao Nanyu before, or she would not be so sad when he chose to kill her.
It's not too bad to say that they had been sweet for those years, her deep love for him disappeared with that arrow.
Zhao Nanyu in this life was already an irrelevant person to Song Luan.
It would be great to leave him.
At first, little Zhao was very sad when he knew that it was a younger brother rather than a younger sister. After all, he had been looking forward to it for a long time, and always thought that his sister would look as lovely as his mother.
He would come to his mother's room every day after school, and watch his brother seriously.
Little Zhao curiously asked, "Mother, why didn't my brother's eyes opened yet, is he not fond of me?"
Song Luan smiled back. "No. When you were a child, you were also like this. Wait for two more days, your brother's eyes will open."
Little Zhao nodded, "I understand. I'll wait."
He wanted to play with his brother.
The child didn't have a name yet.
Song Luan rarely spoke with Zhao Nanyu, and when they talk, she would always talk about her children.
His stubbornness exceeded her imagination. Whenever Song Luan had time, she would occasionally remember the times he killed her.
She felt that she was miserable. She died again and again and fell into the hands of the same person.
She wanted to leave Zhao Nanyu. Why was she even thinking of this idea, she was still in Zhao Nanyu's tree.
Zhao Nanyu never let go of her, and desire to leave was fruitless.
At dusk, he came back from the palace. Song Luan was holding the child while humming in a low voice. After she lulled the child to sleep, she had time to ask him, "You haven't named him yet."
Zhao Nanyu returned: "Let's call him Zhao Shi."
Song Luan had no opinion. This name was not bad, so she nodded, "Okay."
Zhao Nanyu also said. "You give the child's nickname."
Song Luan was not a person who likes to use her brain. After a moment, she said, "Let's call him Er Bao ."
The second baby...it was nice to hear and was easy to remember.
Song Luan gently pinched the small face of Er Bao, "Eat, sleep, then eat. You live the most comfortable life in this house ah."
When Er Bao opened his eyes, the first person he saw was his father. His black eyes turned around. The baby with milk smell was still grinning before it suddenly cried out loud.
Little Zhao was mostly taken care of by Zhao Nanyu, so he knew how to take care of children.
He held the child in his arms skillfully and coaxed him gently.
Er Bao didn't seem to like his father very much. He didn't give any face and continued to cry loudly.
Hearing the sound, Song Luan ran to him and took the child from his hand.
As soon as Er Bao got to his mother's arms, he stopped crying and laid on her stomach obediently.
Zhao Nanyu couldn't help but curse in a low voice, "little brat."
Er Bao was white and clean. He was very cute. He had some small flesh on his face and big eyes. He seldom cries, but whenever he was held by his father, he would often cry.
Song Luan had no resistance to the lovely baby, but could not tolerate Zhao Nanyu's scolding.
"He is a brat because he got it from you," she said
Zhao Nanyu responded generously, "Well, I am."
Er Bao was only ten days old and slept for ten hours a day. When he was full, he would close his eyes. Only when he was in good spirits would he look at them nobly.
Zhao Nanyu's hand gently put on her shoulder, speaking slowly, "For our child's 100th day, who do you want to invite?"
Song Luan shook her head, "None."
She only knew a few people.
Zhao Nanyu then asked, "Then who do you not want to invite?"
Song Luan wasn't polite with him and said bluntly: "Your second aunt. I don't like her."
Zhao Nanyu said: "Then we won't invite her."
Er Bao was sleeping soundly in the cradle. Song Luan suddenly remembered something. She raised her eyes and looked straight at him. She asked, "In our previous life, I couldn't get pregnant. Did you do it?"
Her tone was casual and didn't seem to take it seriously.
Zhao Nanyu's heart suddenly was stabbed out by her words again.
He said in a hoarse voice, "Yes, it's me."
The southwest king's son and the little princess in a previous life were also childhood sweethearts. When she got married, she thought they were real lovers and never doubted her husband's sincerity.
Song Luan's eyes were a little hazy, she remembered that the girl in her dream seemed to cry many times because she could not bear a child.
Song Luan came back to her mind. She didn't even think much about it. "You are bad." 
Then she put her hands on her chin and asked, "It's not as bad as when you shot the arrow right?"
He had already killed her. Zhao Nanyu finally regretted it.
He endured the pain. "Let's not talk about this, okay?"
"Well, if you don't want me to talk about it, then I won't."
Song Luan had just given birth to a baby, and her chest was bulging. Her former clothes also seem to be a little small on her body, and her figure was vividly outlined.
For half a month, she had been eating some tonic ingredients. Song Luan looked rosy, and her body and bones looked more mellow than before.
Er Bao liked to sleep in her arms. Every time he slept, he always used his chubby little hands to pull the lapel of her chest. The baby didn't have much strength, and he curled up fingers opened gently.
Song Luan's whole attention was on the child, and her line of sight towards Zhao Nanyu was little.
And Zhao Nanyu now refused to swallow his anger in front of her, and couldn't help but tell the nurse to carry the baby to another room.
Song Luan's face was cold, and she met his gaze with an unhappy appearance, "What do you mean?"
Zhao Nanyu, who was dressed in black, stood more gloomy in the dark. He said slowly, "I'm afraid you're tired. You don't have to look after the child all day."
Song Luan almost rolled her eyes at him, "I'm happy."
Zhao Nanyu pinched her thin wrist bone, "I don't like it. You won't look at me."
He suddenly bent down, his thin lips close to her white neck, "It's fine that you don't like me, but you can't deliberately ignore me."
After alienating him, she would leave.
Song Luan shrank back, and gave him a sweet smile, "I did not."
She was indeed alienating him on purpose.
Song Luan even secretly wrote a letter to Aunt Lin while he was not at home. The letter clearly stated that she was going to bring two children back to Song's residence.
She spent a lot of money to hire a person to send her letter, risking everything.
She calculated very well. On the day of Er Bao's 100th day, she would escape under the crowds and Aunt Lin's cover. 
Zhao Nanyu didn't want to blame others.
However, two days later, Zhao Nanyu took her letter that was supposedly be sent to Aunt Lin.
Zhao Nanyu's face was still. He took out the envelope from his sleeve, put it on the table, and chuckled, "I taught you to write, you learned, and you used it."
Song Luan faced him and said, "You taught well."
Zhao Nanyu was calm and scary, "I will not let you leave."
Song Luan was a little annoyed and said, "You're so annoying. Is it interesting to force people out of their will? I've been killed several times, but I'm not you. Why don't you let me go!? One of your victims hasn't said anything, so can you spare me?"
Zhao Nanyu had probably turned crazy, his eyes flashing a dark light, and he step by step walked closer to her and said. "I will not let go."
He was selfish and stubborn.
Zhao Nanyu laughed, "If you want to go, you can leave the child behind."
Was she willing?
He knew she couldn't give them up.
Zhao Nanyu did not use this kind of means to her before, and it was also unambiguous to use these unworthy means.
"Zhao Nanyu, do you know?
"I don't hate you, I don't love you.
"You are a stranger to me.
"Do you want to keep me here?"
All these words turned into a sharp sword that killed him bloodlessly, and a silent knife that wedged into his body.
"I want." Zhao Nanyu said with a smile
=============== Chapter 87
Er Bao's full moon banquet was very lively. The guests were in high spirits. They never mentioned the past.
The second family of the Zhao family only sent a gift and didn't attend the banquet.
Song Luan didn't care whether they come or not. 
Er Bao had become a lot more lively compared to when he was just born. No one knew who the child got his looks from. He liked to smile and grin at people.
On the day of the full moon, Song Luan almost didn't let go of the baby. Er Bao babbled and made a little noise, and soon became sleepy.
Zhao Nanyu took the child from her and asked her to sit and have a good rest. She just covered from giving birth and should not be tired.
Song Luan obediently listened to his words and sat in the room for a while. The guests outside were entertained by him, so she didn't need to worry about it at all.
A lot of people came from the Song family, including her younger unmarried sister, her brother, and her sister-in-law. Aunt Lin sat in the room with her for a while.
When Aunt Lin saw that her daughter grew fatter, she was in a better mood, and her prejudice against Zhao Nanyu had lessened.
"Luan Bao, do you still want to go home?"
Song Luan shook her head, "Not going back."
Zhao Nanyu won't let her return! She was silently crying with anger.
Song Luan didn't hate Zhao Nanyu even when she remembered all the things he had done to her. She couldn't emphasize with the pictures in her dream. Those memories made her think that she was a passer-by.
Aunt Lin sighed, "I guess it's okay."
After long years, deep love and deep hatred can be resolved.
But Zhao Nanyu's possessiveness was not something she could shake in a few words.
Song Luan looks down at the sweet child sleeping in the cradle. So be it.
Zhao Nanyu treated her very well, and she had no other choice.
Later, the guests were almost gone.
Zhao Nanyu came back to the room with a faint smell of wine. He was not good at drinking. He was filled with two glasses of wine, and his brain was already a little dizzy.
He sat on the edge of the cradle, with a rattle in his hand, and swung it in front of Er Bao.
Song Luan rushed forward, held his hand, and not letting him move. She said angrily, "Er Bao is still sleeping. You will wake him up like this."
Zhao Nanyu's black eyes fixed on her and said, "I'm drunk."
She couldn't argue with a drunk person.
His white cheeks were tinged with red, and his eyes were a little misty.
Song Luan wanted to take off the rattle drum in his hand, but he was not willing to let go and held on tightly.
Song Luan was helpless. "You can't coax Er Bao back to sleep if he wakes up."
Zhao Nanyu reluctantly put down the rattle. Unfortunately, the child had already been woken up by him, but he didn't cry and only looked at his parents curiously with wide eyes.
Song Luan complained: "Listen to what I just said. Since you woke him up, you come to play with him."
Zhao Nanyu's drunkenness disappeared for a while. He picked up the child, gently pulled the corner of the child's mouth, and then felt wronged. He said to Song Luan: "He wouldn't smile at me."
Er Bao usually likes to smile.
Song Luan swallowed this sentence silently, "Er Bao may be tired."
Zhao Nanyu continued to talk unfailingly. He wouldn't give up until he reached his goal, "Except for eating and sleeping, how is tired? He obviously wouldn't smile at me."
"Then don't play tricks on him!"
Er Bao then cried after being held by his father. As soon as he cried, Song Luan didn't have a good face to Zhao Nanyu, "Don't make fun of him next time!"
When Er Bao came back to his mother's arms, he gradually stopped crying. At night, the three of them slept in the same bed. Song Luan was afraid that the child might fall so she let him sleep in the middle.
The child always got hungry in the middle of the night. Zhao Nanyu was reluctant to wake up Song Luan. When the child woke up, he went outside and asked the nurse to care for the baby. He also simply lets the nurse take him.
Song Luan was vaguely embraced by him. She didn't react very much in her sleep. She murmured some words and went to sleep again.
After days had passed, the child grew up and gradually became active. He couldn't crawl yet, but if he was put on the bed, he would try to turn over.
However, Er Bao often gets stuck in the middle of it. After several times of trying, he still couldn't turn over. Only when he cried could he attract the attention of adults.
Seeing his son crying, Zhao Nanyu didn't know how to coax him. He stood on the edge and looked at him with a smile. He waited until Song Luan came in.
She glared at him fiercely, before Zhao Nanyu pretended to hold the child up.
Song Luan also knew that the father and son didn't get along well.
Every time he was held by Zhao Nanyu, Er Bao would pull his hair with his little hand. Only at this time would Er Bao smile at his father.
Er Bao looked like Song Luan. He got his eyes from her. He would also smile sweetly that warmed people's hearts.
Although Zhao Nanyu was not very pleased with the child, he still liked his silly smile. Otherwise, he would not let him laugh at him.
However, since they were busy with their kids' affairs, the husband and wife had not been intimate for a long time. Zhao Nanyu was not a saint, he was ready to take the initiative, but he always couldn't find the right time.
He went home one day and saw Er Bao sleeping well in the cradle.
He took Song Luan's hand and brought her to bed. Her delicate body was locked in his arms.
Her face turned red and she faltered, "Let's change rooms. I think the child will wake up."
Zhao Nanyu gave a very disdainful smile, "He sleeps like a pig. He will not wake up."
After a long time of restraint, he couldn't wait. He untied her clothes rudely, clasped his hands around her neck, and lowered his head to bite her white neck, intentionally leaving little red marks on it.
Song Luan had long discovered that Zhao Nanyu likes to bite her. She was tired of it.
Just like what she said, her intuition was amazing because Er Bao suddenly cried. He seemed to be deliberately making trouble.
Advertisements
Song Luan couldn't help but push him away. Zhao Nanyu neatly pulled the belt and tied her wrist.
Song Luan's face was even hotter.
Tying her up, Zhao Nanyu wanted to do kinky play! 
Zhao Nanyu quickly got up, picked up the crying child, opened the door, and gave directions to the servant girl. He said in a cold voice, "Go and stay away from this room."
Troublemaker little brat.
Song Luan was absent-minded, still worried about Er Bao, "You let me go. Er Bao is crying so badly. He couldn't be coaxed without me."
Zhao Nanyu directly blocked her mouth.
He never asked whether the child was more important than him in Song Luan's heart because he already knew the answer.
He was only satisfied with this stable life.
Of course, Song Luan also thought the same.
In the blink of an eye, Er Bao was already six months old.
When Song Luan was pregnant, she seldom went out of the house, and when she had Er Bao, she didn't go out not even once. Zhao Nanyu didn't want her to focus all her attention on the child. That night, he wanted to take her to a restaurant to listen to opera.
Song Luan didn't want to go.. "Just the two of us?"
Zhao Nanyu buttoned up her clothes for her, "Don't think much about it. We won't bring the kids."
"All right."
If he didn't want to bring them, then okay.
The clothes Song Luan wore were all selected by Zhao Nanyu. If it wasn't for the married woman's hairstyle, people would mistake her for a 16 or 17 years old.
Good looking couples would attract people's attention when they go out.
Along the street, many girls blushed and whispered when they saw Zhao Nanyu.
Song Luan was standing beside him so she naturally couldn't avoid their stares. She said with a smile, "You are very popular with the ladies. They can't move their eyes when they look at you."
"They also look at you."
Song Luan smiled brilliantly, very proud, "Because I am beautiful."
After listening to the play, just when they got out of the restaurant, Song Luan's eyes flashed.
She felt as if she saw the Taoist priest, but she couldn't find him after seeing him for a moment.
Zhao Nanyu squeezed her hand and asked, "What's the matter?"
Song Luan shook her head and thought that maybe she had made a mistake, "Nothing. It was the wrong person."
"Then let's go back."
"Okay."
After that day, Zhao Nanyu suddenly fell ill.
Song Luan didn't take it seriously in the beginning. She thought it was a little cold and would get better after taking medicine for two days.
But Zhao Nanyu's face was getting worse and worse. If it not because he was breathing, Song Luan would probably think that he was dead.
Song Luan touched her heart as if it was blocked by something, making her stuffy and uncomfortable.
Zhao Nanyu did not allow her to go. She stayed in her room.
The new emperor sent a lot of doctors to see him. They all shook their heads and went out of the house, saying that there was no way.
If they couldn't see the symptoms, they couldn't start the treatment.
Song Luan was awakened by a nightmare in the middle of the night. She rashly got out of bed and had no time to put on her socks. 
She stepped on her shoes, and with disheveled hair, she rushed to the room where Zhao Nanyu lived.
The room was dark and had no light.
Song Luan dashed to his bed and looked at his pale and weak figure.
She asked, "Are you going to die?"
She seldom saw Zhao Nanyu so weak that she couldn't utter any more words.
"Maybe." Zhao Nanyu tried to smile and asked, "Luan Bao, will you cry for me once?"
Song Luan frowned, but her eyes were still dry. She wanted to cry, but she couldn't squeeze out tears.
She grabbed his hand. "Why are you going to die all of a sudden?"
Zhao Nanyu was dizzy, remembering that he had seen the mysterious Taoist priest when they came out of the restaurant that day.
They only talked in dreams before.
After sending Song Luan home, Zhao Nanyu saw the priest again.
The priest wanted to return Song Luan's complete soul.
And Zhao Nanyu would bear all the consequences.
He nodded in agreement.
Then he fell sick and was nearly dead.
Zhao Nanyu comforted her, "Luan Bao, I'll sleep for a while."
Song Luan felt very sad. She thought she wouldn't be moved, but when she saw Zhao Nanyu dying, she wanted to grab him and cry.
"No! You are not allowed to sleep."
Song Luan herself did not realize that her face was wet with tears. She wiped her face, "I'll go and find a doctor for you."
Zhao Nanyu held Song Luan down and kissed her on the corner of the mouth. His smile was beautiful as he looked at her with bright eyes, "Luan Bao, I'm very happy."
=============== Chapter 88
Song Luan knew that she didn't want Zhao Nanyu to die. She was reluctant to part with him.
Zhao Nanyu's sudden illness wasn't entirely true, part of it was his own pretend. He thought that she wouldn't care about his life and death.
It turned out that Song Luan would also be sad for him.
Whether she loved him or not wasn't important because what mattered was her own heart.
Song Luan saw that he was still smiling and couldn't help but beat him. "How can you still laugh?"
"I'm really fine."
"They said you were dying."
Song Luan was not someone who would believe everything so easily. After he fell ill, she only saw him a few times, but as time went by, she heard more people talk about his illness.
She could see that although she did not cry in front of him, her eyes were swollen and her expression was listless.
Although little Zhao only cried a few times in front of her, she saw how lifeless he was. His eyes were swollen, his expression was listless, and his figure got thinner. She could see how worried little Zhao was.
Gradually, Song Luan began to worry, just now she dreamed that Zhao Nanyu was dead and would never wake up.
With a folding fan in his hand, he stood far away from her, smiling at her. Song Luan watched his body disappear in his sight.
He smilingly stood far away from her with a folding fan in his hand. Song Luan watched his body disappear in her sight.
Then she was so frightened that after she woke up, she ran to Zhao Nanyu's room.
Song Luan was still very flustered that she grasped his hands so hard. She was afraid that he would never wake up if he fell asleep.
"Okay, okay. I won't sleep."
Zhao Nanyu sat up and looked at her, then he patted the bed beside him and asked, "Do you want to lie down?"
Song Luan shook her head, "No need."
Zhao Nanyu opened half of the quilt, "Come on."
Song Luan did not resist. She took off her shoes and climbed into the quilt. She shrank on his side and looked at him with grape-like eyes.
She was probably really scared.
Zhao Nanyu felt a little guilty and touched her face, "Really don't worry...I'm okay."
Song Luan opened her mouth and said, "Then they..."
Zhao Nanyu interrupted her in the middle of her sentence.
He directly pushed the pot away from him, "They spread rumors indiscriminately." How dare these people talked nonsense in front of Song Luan without his instruction?
Zhao Nanyu lightly lied to Song Luan.
Song Luan still didn't believe that he was fine. She pursed her mouth and frowned. "Little Zhao cried. He didn't dare cry in front of me so he wiped his tears secretly."
Zhao Nanyu's mouth pulled up and chuckled twice, "I am his father. He will naturally worry if I am ill."
"As for others, they're all talking hearsay. All of it is false."
Song Luan reluctantly believed his words, but she was still anxious. She had planned to watch over him this time, however, she couldn't help but feel sleepy in the middle of the night. Her eyelids were fighting to open but she fell asleep in the end.
Zhao Nanyu did not sleep the whole night. He was looking at her sleeping face in a good mood.
It took another month before Zhao Nanyu's illness receded. He had already lost a lot of weight after recovering.
Zhao Nanyu made up his mind not to ask her if she liked him or not. 
Song Luan felt that it was very good now. She was tired and only wanted to live a peaceful and smooth life.
When Er Bao got older, his waking hours were longer than when he was still a baby. He gave a full play of his lively temperament. The first thing he did when he woke up was to turn over in the bed.
When Er Bao couldn't turn over fully, he would babble.
Song Luan looked at his rolling appearance and also felt it was funny. She picked up the child with a smile and dressed him.
Er Bao was like a glutinous rice dumpling. Compared with his older brother, he had a more active personality.
The two brothers got along with each other fairly well. Little Zhao liked this younger brother very much. When he had free time, he would run to her mother's house every day. He took the initiative to look at his brother and play with him.
Er Bao could only babble and couldn't speak clearly yet, but little Zhao would still play with him.
Little Zhao was very generous to lend his former toys. He placed all of them on the bed.
Although the younger brother couldn't understand him, little Zhao still pointed to the toys on the bed and asked, "Do you want these?"
Er Bao: *Incoherent babbling*
"You want it? Brother will pick one for you." He picked an animal with bamboo weaves on it. He gently opened his brother's five fingers and put the bamboo toy into his hand. "You can take this small one."
Er Bao's hand had no strength. As soon as little Zhao placed it in his hand, he released his fingers and the toy fell to the ground.
Er Bao seemed to find it interesting and grinned happily.
Little Zhao's face was stern: "...."
After a while, he quietly picked up the toy on the ground and put it back to his younger brother, "This time you shouldn't drop it."
Er Bao thought that his brother was playing games with him. He pinched the toy and released it again.
Little Zhao's temper was quite good. He didn't show any impatience. He bent down and picked up the toy again, but this time he didn't put it in his younger brother's palm. "Let's change."
Er Bao was lying on the bed with his limbs facing up, smiling stupidly.
Because his younger brother was a bit dumb, little Zhao originally disliked him, but when he saw his silly smile, he didn't care now, his younger brother was adorable and lovely.
Little Zhao had a good memory. Instead of stuffing it in Er Bao's hand, he put it on him and let him toss it.
After playing with the toy he gave him for a while, Er Bao threw it aside and looked at his elder brother with his eyes.
Advertisements
Little Zhao dared not hold him since his younger brother was too heavy. He was also afraid that he would drop his younger brother to the ground.
He put down the book in his hand and his eyes turned to his younger brother. "Are you hungry?"
Er Bao: *Babbling*
"I'll go and get the nurse."
Little Zhao had just put down the book when he thought of a dilemma–if he went out, there would be no one to look after Er Bao. If the younger brother tumbled over and fell, what would he do?
Er Bao: *Babble babble Babble*
His voice became louder and louder. It seemed that he couldn't wait.
Song Luan lifted the curtain and went to the inner room. Her heart became soft after seeing her two children. 
She asked, "What's the matter? I heard Er Bao's cry outside."
Little Zhao replied: "Younger brother is hungry."
Song Luan squatted down and couldn't help but kiss little Zhao on the cheek. Seeing her son's red face, she was satisfied and asked, "How do you know that?"
Er Bao couldn't speak yet.
Little Zhao's cheek was burning slightly. He was already a big boy. His father said that he could not be kissed casually, but he could not tell this to his mother.
"I guessed."
"Little Zhao is so smart."
While Song Luan nursed Er Bao, he went outside to review his lessons.
Song Luan naturally untied her lapel, and Er Bao began to drink the milk happily.
Zhao Nanyu just went to her house. She never changed her clothes. She looked at her child and asked, "how can you eat it again?"
Zhao Nanyu came into her room as soon as his work in the court was finished. He hadn't changed his court clothes yet. He glanced at the child and asked, "Why is he still drinking again?" When he went out in the morning, the child was being breastfed. Still, drinking?
When he went out in the morning, the child was sucking. How could he still be drinking after he came back?
Song Luan was seen countless times by him, but she was still shy every time. Even her ears were red as she said: "He just drinks and sleeps the whole day."
Zhao Nanyu looked at his son's meaty face and refused to comment. He ridiculed: "Little fat man."
When Er Bao heard the two of them talking, he refused to be breastfed. He looked at them curiously and seemed like he wanted to listen to them.
Song Luan couldn't help but stretch out her finger and point to his nose, "You, you, how are you like a girl?"
Zhao Nanyu's eyes were too hot. Song Luan couldn't stand it anymore and Er Bao refused to eat anymore. She closed her lapel and thought he was evil. She said to him, "If you look again, I'll dig out your eyeballs."
She looked fierce.
Zhao Nanyu smiled disapprovingly, "Don't talk about eyeballs. I'll let you dig out my heart instead."
Song Luan stammered, her face flushed. How could Zhao Nanyu say such a nasty thing!? So terrible!!!
"Shut up."
Don't talk.
She was embarrassed.
Song Luan felt that he was too idle so she directly gave the child to him, "You coax Er Bao."
As soon as Zhao Nanyu took the child, Er Bao vomited on his neck. Seeing the situation, Song Luan wasn't kind enough and laughed out loudly.
When Er Bao saw his mother smile, he also laughed.
At that time, Zhao Yuli wanted to give birth to the baby.
At this time, Zhao Nanyu wanted to throw the baby that was in his arms. This little kid was born to go against him every time.
He gently slapped Er Bao on the butt, "Brat."
Er Bao was still smiling, but when he was beaten by his father, he immediately stopped.
There were grievances in his little eyes.
Zhao Nanyu was fierce towards the child, "Don't cry."
Song Luan stepped forward and squeezed the flesh on his waist. It didn't hurt much since Zhao Nanyu had clothes on.
She said, "He's only a few months old. You can't do that. The child should be spoiled."
Zhao Nanyu thought that this was a little nemesis, not a baby.
Little Zhao was very well-behaved when he was a few months old. He didn't cry or make trouble.
Song Luan scolded him and began to coax the child, "Er Bao, don't cry. You are still a baby. You get revenge when you grow up."
Although Er Bao couldn't understand what his mother was saying, he would still babble after her.
Zhao Nanyu coughed, "Wipe my neck for me."
There was the spilled milk that Er Bao vomited on his collar.
Song Luan handed her handkerchief to him, "Wipe it yourself."
"I'm still holding the baby," Zhao Nanyu said. "I don't have extra hands."
Her handkerchief seemed to carry the smell of her body. It had her faint fragrance.
Song Luan had no choice but to stand on tiptoe to wipe the milk stains on his neck.
Zhao Nanyu said with a smile, "You didn't wipe it clean."
Song Luan pursed her mouth and looked up at her neck, "No more."
His voice was a little hoarse. "You can see if you get closer."
Song Luan didn't move so Zhao Nanyu took the initiative to step forward. The two bodies were almost close to each other.
He bent over, leaned in her ear, and asked softly, "See?"
They're too close. Song Luan didn't know where to put her hands, and couldn't utter a word.
=============== Chapter 89
Zhao Nanyu's body had a clear smell, which reached the tip of her nose. Song Luan randomly wiped him twice with a handkerchief, "Okay."
Song Luan just chose the most peaceful life for both herself and her children.
It is part of a human's instinct to seek advantages and avoid disadvantages.
It was rare for Er Bao to be held by Zhao Nanyu. His mouth was slightly open as he looked at his parents foolishly. His saliva flowed out unconsciously and Song Luan took out a new handkerchief to clean the corners of Er Bao's mouth. Zhao Nanyu looked at him a little disgusted, "It's dirty."
Song Luan gave him a white look. "You must have drooled when you were a kid. Don't always say bad things about your son. Don't think he won't hate you just because he is still young."
"I was much better than him when I was a child."
When Zhao Nanyu was a little child, Er Bao was not like him–active and lively.
Song Luan stretched out her hands, "Then you give the child to me, you go out."
"I'll hold him. This child is a bit troublesome."
Er Bao leaned on his father's arms, peacefully resting. He only moved his eyes occasionally.
Song Luan took out the silver bracelet in the locked drawer and put it on the wrist of Er Bao. She looked at it with satisfaction, "It's beautiful."
The silver bracelet that was put on Er Bao's wrist was refined in a shop. Although the workmanship was superior, Song Luan felt that it was not exquisite enough.
Er Bao seemed to like this new bracelet very much. He moved his meaty hand and grinned foolishly.
Song Luan looked at the man in front of him, yawned, and said, "You can take him. Don't make him cry while I take a bath."
Zhao Nanyu had a serious problem. He liked to watch Er Bao cry. Every time the child cries, he wouldn't take the initiative to coax him, and instead, stares at him with interest.
Song Luan had just finished bathing and putting on her clothes when she heard Er Bao's cry.
Song Luan heard Er Bao's cry as soon as she finished putting on her clothes. She hurried out from behind the screen and said in a huff, "What's wrong with you?"
Zhao Nanyu was innocent. "I just put him on the bed, and he cried."
"You hold him."
"You spoiled him."
Song Luan helplessly said: "I didn't know you were enemies."
When this father and son were alone, they wouldn't get along.
Song Luan originally wanted to hold Er Bao up but was stopped by Zhao Nanyu. He raised his eyebrows and said slowly, "Let him cry. After he cries enough, you can coax him again."
Song Luan was a typical loving mother. She was reluctant to see her child suffer. Moreover, Er Bao was cute and good-natured. She said, "what if he cries so badly he will hurt his throat?"
"No way." Zhao Nanyu said with a little truth, "If every time he cries and you hold him, he will be used to it."
A boy should not be so coquettish.
***
Little Zhao also had things that Er Bao had.
Song Luan treated the two children equally. However, little Zhao was sensible and seemed reluctant to wear the silver bracelet. He hid his hand behind his back and looked unnatural as he said, "Mother, give it to younger brother. I don't need it."
Song Luan pulled his hand out. "Your brother has it. What's the matter? Don't you like this one?"
Little Zhao blushed red, "Mother, I'm five years old."
Song Luan was at a loss, "I know."
Little Zhao lowered his face and said in embarrassment, "I already stopped wearing them in a long time."
And silver bracelets were only worn by children.
Song Luan suddenly realized it and touched the top of his head, "It's mother's negligence. Does little Zhao have anything that he wants?"
He shook his head.
He didn't want anything.
Every month his father would give him money. If he wanted anything, he had the money to buy it.
When Zhao Nanyu returned home, Song Luan was playing with her two children. She got along well with the children. Little Zhao liked her, and Er Bao also liked her.
Hearing the sound of footsteps, Song Luan turned her head and whispered, "You are back."
Her face was pink and a few strands of hair fell on her cheek. She sat cross-legged on the soft bed while her clothes were pulled by Er Bao.
Zhao Nanyu went forward to put her hair back behind her ears and asked, "What are you playing that you are laughing so happily?"
Song Luan's face was a bit naive, delicate, and lovely, "We're not playing, little Zhao and I are teaching Er Bao to turn over."
Zhao Nanyu couldn't help but raise the corner of his mouth, glanced at Er bao, and mercilessly ridiculed, "Too stupid."
For such a long time, the silly kid still couldn't turn over by himself.
Little Zhao, from the bottom of his heart, felt that his younger brother was also stupid, but he did not say it out loud. His younger brother was stupid, there was nothing more pitiful than this, so he couldn't laugh at his brother.
His mother said that he should love his brother.
Song Luan poked his waist with her fingers, "Stupid. It's also your child."
Zhao Nanyu playfully squeezed her round fingers, "Yes, I have to raise him well." 
He clasped her palm, turned his eyes to little Zhao, and whispered, "Take your brother out. I have something to say to your mother."
Little Zhao carefully took away his babbling younger brother.
Song Luan thought Zhao Nanyu had something to say to her. She raised her ears and looked serious.
Zhao Nanyu suddenly pulled her over and let her sit on him, his one hand around her waist, and the other hand unkindly reached into her collar.
When Song Luan was about to react, she was eaten by his mouth. She was stopped completely.
Advertisements
When she could open her mouth to speak, the corners of her mouth were bitten red by him.
"You liar!"
After Zhao Nanyu succeeded, the smile in the corner of his eyes was deeper and his laughter was deep and pleasant.
His eyes were dark and his voice was hoarse, "It's been a long time since we had sex."
"It's only been four days!" Song Luan said, gnashing her teeth.
Zhao Nanyu's desire to control her in bed was 100 times greater than before. If she didn't follow his wishes, she wouldn't even be able to sleep for the whole night.
"You remembered clearly." He said with a rather smug smile
Song Luan couldn't do anything else and just stared at him. Zhao Nanyu grinned and rubbed her round little face. 
She asked knowingly, "You think four days is long?"
Song Luan was tightly embraced by him. She wanted to get up from him but couldn't. Her face was flushed red with anger, "You let me go. I'm thirsty, I want to drink water."
Zhao Nanyu pretended not to hear, and his fingers were uneasy as he tried to touch her belt. Song Luan patted off his hand, "What do you want to do?"
Zhao Nanyu's eyes were bright. He almost said the word 'you'.
He took back his hand and put his head on her shoulder dejectedly. "I'll listen to you. I won't touch you."
She listened to Zhao Nanyu's aggrieved tone.
Although he didn't touch her intimately, he pressed Song Luan on the soft bed and played with her for a long time.
Song Luan's face was powdery and her clothes were not neat. Zhao Nanyu's eyebrows were dyed with a smile.
It was almost evening when a visitor came.
It turned out that Gu Yan came to the door. According to reason, the two of them had nothing to do with each other. There was no conflict of interest and no friendship between them.
After fixing his clothes, Zhao Nanyu reluctantly went to the study. Gu Yan was dressed up as a commander with a long sword pinned to his waist.
Gu Yan was not bad in appearance. He radiated a fierce aura. He looked cold on the surface. If Zhao Nanyu was timid, he might be frightened by his aura. He was not young and still had not married yet.
Zhao Nanyu said with a smile, "Commander Gu. You rarely came to visit."
Gu Yan still had on his cold face as he arched his hand to Zhao Nanyu, "I came to ask you something."
Zhao Nanyu raised his eyebrows, "Commander Gu, please speak up."
Gu Yan was upright, old-fashioned, and seldom asked for help. This time, he was forced to say, "A few days ago, Dali Temple arrested a man named Xu Yuanqing. To tell you the truth, this man is my distant cousin. I have also inquired about it. What he committed was not a serious crime. I hope Lord Zhao will show mercy and release him."
Zhao Nanyu had a good memory. He had heard of Xu Yuanqing. He punished him only yesterday. Dali temple was a place where if you enter, you wouldn't easily come out.
He said with a smile, "Commander Gu, to be honest, your cousin has suffered a lot. It's fine to let him go. I just hope you don't blame us when you see him."
Gu Yan replied: "Of course not."
Zhao Nanyu pondered for a moment and said, "Tomorrow, I will send him to the gate of Gu's residence."
"Thank you very much."
Gu Yan was a commander. It's nothing for Zhao Nanyu to give a favor. Xu Yuanqing wasn't so important, so he could just let him go.
Gu Yan was about to leave when he saw Song Luan appear in front of the study door, holding the hand of little Zhao. She was wearing a long silk embroidered dress. Her body is graceful, her facial features are exquisite, her eyes and teeth are bright. 
At sunset, the dim yellow light evenly sprinkled on her fair-complexion, which could make people look stupefied for a moment.
Gu Yan stood in place and didn't move before he silently took back his eyes.
Zhao Nanyu's face changed. When he saw this, he was very jealous. He blocked Gu Yan's sight and asked her, "Why are you here?"
Song Luan pointed to little Zhao, "This child encountered an article in his homework that he did not understand. I took him to ask you."
She couldn't teach little Zhao.
Gu Yan, who stood on one side, heard it and frowned. He thought that Song Luan had nothing to offer except her beauty. She was shrewd and didn't listen to people.
Little Zhao was very polite. He respectfully greeted Uncle Gu whenever he meets him.
Gu Yan was a little embarrassed. He wasn't married yet and naturally had no children. He didn't know how to get along with children. He gave a cold hush which was considered his normal response.
Zhao Nanyu coughed twice, "You go inside first, I'll send him off, and then I'll come back and teach him."
Song Luan poked out her head and gave a fake smile to Gu Yan. She spoke, her words were like spears, "I thought Commander Gu came to my residence to search people!"
Even if it was a fake smile, Song Luan was still bright and beautiful.
Gu Yan pulled up the corners of his mouth and said, "Madam Zhao is much more polite today."
He was making a mockery of Song Luan's shrew behavior that day.
She was rarely called 'Madam Zhao', so Song Luan didn't respond when he addressed her.
Besides, Gu Yan's words were not very nice, and Song Luan wanted to have a good debate with him.
Can't wait for her to play mouth gun skills, Zhao Nanyu is already can't see down, pinching her wrist, "first take know brother son to go in, have what words to say later, not in a hurry for a moment."
When she was about to use her mouth-gun skills, Zhao Nanyu pinched her wrist, "Take little Zhao inside. If you have words, you can say it later. We're not in a hurry."
Little Zhao pulled her skirt, "Mother, the bookshelf in father's study is too high, I can't reach the books."
Song Luan had a keen intuition. Zhao Nanyu still didn't like her talking with other men just as before.
Tyrants do not change
She took little Zhao's hand and said, "Let's go."
After walking two steps, Gu Yan stopped, turned around, and said, "Madam Song is the same at home?"
"What?"
"Rude and disrespectful."
Zhao Nanyu's eyes were dim and said, "When did Commander Gu care so much about my family affairs?"
Gu Yan was usually not nosy with other people's affairs, but this time he didn't know why he couldn't help saying more. He said, "I just don't think Miss Song is very suitable for you."
What the hell?! Are you in charge?
Zhao Nanyu's smile gradually sank.
His voice fell to the ground, Gu Yan also noticed that he had made a slip of the tongue, "Sorry. Those were unintentional words. Lord Zhao, don't take it to heart."
"No harm."
Even if Gu Yan didn't say it, Zhao Nanyu knew that even if he saw Song Luan, he would know she had no feelings for him.
But he had already looked away. Song Luan had a knot in her heart, and he could wait for her slowly.
Song Luan stood on tiptoe in the study, helping little Zhao take the book, "Is this the one?"
Zhao Nanyu walked over, raised his hand, and easily took the book out and gave it to little Zhao.
He didn't seem very happy. The corners of his mouth were bent downward.
Song Luan did not want to coax him, and just pulled his sleeve, "Go and teach little Zhao."
Zhao Nanyu avoided her, instead began to tell her, "If you see Gu Yan, don't talk to him."
Song Luan thought it was funny, "What's the matter? Are you jealous?"
"He's not married. Shouldn't I be jealous?" Zhao Nanyu said with disdain: "He is older than I am, and no girl is willing to marry him. I can see that he is not very good."
Zhao Nanyu slandered other men in front of Song Luan. He was not honest at all.
Song Luan felt that Zhao Nanyu was very naive in this kind of thing. She said vaguely: "Maybe Commander Gu has high requirements."
"Oh."
Song Luan saw that Zhao Nanyu hated Gu Yan, so she didn't talk anymore.
Zhao Nanyu was sulking. If Song Luan took the initiative to coax him, he wouldn't be angry anymore. 
He took little Zhao's textbook and began to teach him lessons.
Song Luan didn't understand and didn't want to listen to classical chinese. She had nothing to do so she laid beside the window.
On the windowsill, there were small potted plants that she had carefully maintained.
Song Luan stared at it for a short time and fell asleep.
When Zhao Nanyu and little Zhao finished the last article, they raised their eyes and saw her sleeping face.
She was born extremely fair, and her serene face was more delicate in the afterglow. She slept soundly as her mouth pouted slightly. They could hear her steady breathing.
Zhao Nanyu walked over, his movements were very gentle, for fear of disturbing her. He held her in his arms and covered her with his clothes to block the wind coming through the window.
When little Zhao was about to speak, his father made a silent gesture to him.
【Don't wake your mother.】
=============== Chapter 90
Song Luan slept until it was dark before she woke up lazily. Her face was rosy and bright. Her sight turned around the room twice. It turned out that she was still in Zhao Nanyu's study.
She still remembered that she listened to her husband and son's discussion when she fell asleep. The sunshine, which was soft and warm, fell on her face. She had unconsciously put down her guard and fell into a good sleep.
Zhao Nanyu had taken off her clothes. 
Before she prepared to go out barefoot again, she slowly put on her clothes first.
Thinking of Zhao Nanyu's advice, she took back her feet in silence and put on her shoes before she went out.
The candle was extinguished, and the man was sitting under the lamp with a delicate outline of the jaw. The faint candlelight sprinkled on his shoulder as he looked down seriously.
Song Luan walked over and asked, "Where are the children? "
Zhao Nanyu raised his head. His dark eyes were covered with heavy light, and his voice was a little cold. "Grandma Lin took them both."
Song Luan, for a moment, seemed speechless.
Zhao Nanyu put down the pen in his hand and walked to her from behind the desk. His thin white finger gently touched his forehead and asked, "Are you hungry?"
She had been sleeping for an hour, and it was long after her dinner time. Zhao Nanyu had not asked the servants to put food. He was waiting for her to wake up.
Song Luan's finger was grasped by him. She seemed not quite awake yet and nodded in a muddle. "I'm hungry."
Zhao Nanyu then asked the servants to bring up the dinner that was prepared early. Song Luan began to eat with her head down and didn't care to talk to Zhao Nanyu. 
It was like being hungry for several days.
No one could blame Song Luan. She didn't eat much at noon and just woke up from hunger.
Otherwise, if she wasn't hungry, no one knows when she would wake up again.
After eating two bowls of rice, Song Luan put down her chopsticks, licked her lips, and asked, "I still want to eat some desserts."
"It's difficult to eat too much at night."
He was implicating that he wouldn't allow it.
Song Luan curled her mouth and looked unhappy.
Zhao Nanyu did not look soft-hearted.
Song Luan didn't like sweets very much, but she just wanted to have a taste today. She was not happy to be under such control. She looked at Zhao Nanyu angrily and found that the man's face was cold and indifferent.
She was even angrier and got up.
Zhao raised his eyes and asked, "Where will you go?"
Song Luan replied, "I'll go out for a walk to help digestion."
She gnashed her teeth at the last words she said.
Zhao Nanyu pretended that he didn't see her face. He held her small hands. "Let's go. I'll accompany you."
The garden of their new residence was very elegant. The path was covered with pebbles and green bamboos were planted on both sides.
The moon was bright, and it shined on the ground like a layer of phosphor. It was cool at night and the wind was a little breezy.
Song Luan looked at the man on her side–his adam apple, his full and soft lips, and his straight nose. His eyes were very beautiful. His lips were curled, and he seemed to have a shallow smile.
Song Luan knows that although Zhao Nanyu often smiles, he was still a ruthless man.
He didn't care much about anyone.
Zhao Nanyu suddenly stopped and lowered his gaze to look at her, smiling, "Are you looking at me?"
Song Luan withdrew her sight and tried to pretend that she was not looking at him at all. "No. I'm looking at the flowers behind you."
The smile on his lips grew deeper and deeper, trying to hold back his smile, "Is that right?"
Song Luan's ear tip was tinged with pink. She forgot that there was no flower blooming in this season.
She said stiffly, "Yes, the flowers are beautiful." and added," It's also nice even if they're not in full bloom."
Zhao Nanyu couldn't help rubbing her head. "Whatever you say."
***
After a few days, Ruan Sheng came to see her with her big stomach.
Song Luan was very happy to see her again. Ruan Sheng, who was pregnant, looked a little less chubby.
"Second sister-in-law."
"You are pregnant, why did you come here?"
Ruan Sheng came to find her because she had something to do. She couldn't speak because there were servants inside the room. Song Luan saw her dilemma, so she sent out all the servants in the room, closed the doors and windows, and then poured a cup of warm water to Ruan Sheng. "You can say it now."
Ruan Sheng hesitated while she held the cup. She didn't know whether to open her mouth or not. After the second brother and the second sister-in-law moved out, the original courtyard was vacated. But two days ago, she noticed some movements in the yard.
At first, she thought it was a thief and checked it carefully but found nothing had been stolen.
Ruan Sheng finished eating that day and walked in the yard for a while. Suddenly, a boy appeared on the wall, which shocked her.
As she was about to call someone, the beautiful boy asked, "Where is Aluan?"
He probably didn't know what happened in the capital. Seeing that his clothes were worn out and he had a good wound, Ruan Sheng asked, "What can I do for you?"
The boy pursed his mouth and didn't speak. He just squeezed the things in his hand.
"Is she okay?" After a long time, he suddenly asked.
Ruan Sheng nodded, "Second sister-in-law is very good."
"Oh. She's okay...then I'll go now."
Ruan Sheng felt very strange. After thinking about it, she came to tell her second sister-in-law.
Advertisements
Song Luan was silent for a long time after listening to it and looked stunned. He should be Huai Jin.
It was a good thing that he was still alive.
Song Luan laughed heartily, "I see. Thank you for telling me this."
Ruan Sheng was very restrained and didn't ask her much about it. They talked more before she went out.
Song Luan stood by the window for a long time. Her mind was wandering and no one could see what she was thinking.
Zhao Nanyu came into the room with the child in his arms. 
She looked at his bright eyes and curved mouth.
"What made you so happy?"
"I won't tell you."
If he didn't want to say it, she wouldn't ask.
The door was half open and the sunlight outside penetrated the room. The expression on the man's face was very gentle, his eyebrows and eyes were picturesque, and there were no flaws in his white and pure face.
"How can you have the patience to hold Er Bao today?"
"In a good mood."
Zhao Nanyu's willfulness was reflected in his trivial life. When he was in a good mood, he would tease his son and would hug him generously. If he was in a bad mood, he certainly wouldn't have any patience to coax the child.
"It's strange that he didn't cry when he was held by you."
In the past, whenever Zhao Nanyu held him in his arms, Er Bao would always cry at the top of his voice.
Zhao Nanyu's lips were crooked and he pinched his son's round cheek. "It seems that he is also in a good mood today. "
"My son is drooling again. You'd better wipe it for him first. "
Zhao Nanyu was half dead in disgust and immediately put Er Bao in the cradle. He was afraid that his son's saliva would stain his clothes. 
He frowned and wiped the corners of Er Bao's mouth. He gave the child to little Zhao and asked him to play with his brother.
Little Zhao didn't dislike his dirty younger brother.
The first thing he did whenever he came back from school was to go talk to his younger brother as if he could understand his brother's babbling voice.
Song Luan sat in front of the dressing table and took down all the hairpins on her bun. Her skin was very fair and looked even fairer after putting on her make-up. Her face was very beautiful.
Zhao Nanyu suddenly appeared behind her and said with his usual voice, "I saw you being absent-minded when I came back."
Song Luan opened her mouth and said, "Huai Jin seems to have looked for me."
"Well, I know."
Song Luan was surprised, "How can you know?"
Zhao Nanyu didn't hide it from her and said directly, "There are servants outside the yard." and said with a low smile, "He is also stupid. He climbs the wall every time. "
Song Luan nodded and agreed with him, "Yes, he's very naive."
She was encircled in his arms while she looked up at his chin. Her eyes gradually climbed up and fell into his cold and clear eyes. His eyes were deep as if there were much unspeakable sadness.
Song Luan raised her hand involuntarily and stroked his eyes. Zhao Nanyu did not stop her movement and stood still.
She thoughtlessly said, "This is fine now."
She did have small regrets but didn't want to dwell on it.
Zhao Nanyu understood what she said. He took her hand and said, "Yes."
Just like she said...it's good now.
They had decades more to go.
Zhao Nanyu's eyes curled up, and suddenly held her face and put a kiss on her watery lip. She was very careful and regarded it as a treasure.
Song Luan's face was buried in his neck socket, smelling the fresh fragrance from his body.
She held his clothes tightly with cool fingers and slowly said, "I never had a love affair with Huai Jin."
She did not know why she wanted to explain to Zhao Nanyu.
She just felt that Zhao Nanyu's sadness in his eyes was related to her.
Zhao Nanyu stopped for a moment and hugged her more forcefully, "Okay."
Song Luan raised her head, raised her chin, looked at his eyes stupidly, and asked, "Then you shouldn't be sad now, right?"
"No sad ah."
Song Luan nodded and said, "I like to see you smile."
Although she still didn't have much deep love for Zhao Nanyu, she just wanted to see this man smiling. It's as if he should be like this.
He should be a young man with a clear smile.
Song Luan thought that she probably had liked his smile before.
The two children on the soft bed were talking. Little Zhao worked hard to teach Er Bao to speak over and over again, but Er Bao only grinned at his brother foolishly.
Life was quiet and everything went well.
And she would stay with him forever in this life.
That's good.
Whether she loves him or not, Zhao Nanyu still had a lifetime to wait for her answer.
[FIN]
=============== Chapter 91
Er Bao's first word was "Brother"
Little Zhao loved his younger brother very much and naturally, spent more time by his side.
The two brothers were often together. Er Bao laid down while little Zhao sat beside him as he looked at his brother seriously.
The one-year-old child had learned to crawl long ago. Er Bao was lively and active again. He would sneak off behind people's back and would roll down the bed.
Little Zhao took his brother's small meaty leg, quietly and gently pulled him in. He looked at his brother carefully and said to him word per word, "You can't climb down. You will fall.."
When Er Bao heard his brother talking to him, he clapped his hands.
Little Zhao thought that the younger brother hadn't understood what he said, "It hurts if you fall."
Er Bao still smiled at him.
Little Zhao frowned as if he had encountered a big problem. He felt that his brother was too stupid.
After sighing, little Zhao thought that if something would happen in the future, he would just help him.
Er Bao seemed reluctant to lie on the soft bed. He pouted his fat buttocks and kicked with his short white legs. He tried to climb down when his brother didn't notice.
Er Bao tried his best to climb to the edge but was caught mercilessly by his brother.
He pinched his flesh face and said, "Why are you disobedient?"
As soon as Er Bao's eyes turned red, he opened his mouth as if he would start crying.
Little Zhao's fingers were still in Er Bao's hand. His tone was a little helpless, "Do you want me to play with you? But I can't accompany you for a long time, I still have homework."
His father would check his homework every night. He couldn't be vague or confused by this younger brother of his.
What could a one-year-old understand? Er Bao just wanted to play on the ground. If his brother didn't obey him, he would show signs of crying.
Song Luan brought rice paste into the room. Looking at her sons' two big and small eyes, she felt a little funny. She walked over with a soft voice, "What's the matter?"
Little Zhao took his finger out of his brother's hand. He said in a light tone that seemed to resemble a little like his father's."My brother wants to play on the ground."
She replied while smiling, "Then put him on the ground."
"....."
For the first time, he felt that his mother was a little unreliable. He said, "The ground is too dirty."
Song Luan laughed. "You don't have to worry about the floor blanket. I just washed it yesterday."
Little Zhao lowered his eyes, a little reluctant. When Song Luan had teased her eldest son enough, she laughed and touched his cheek with her warm fingers, "Mother is just teasing you."
Little Zhao's ears flushed pink and the skin touched by his mother felt a little hot, but he still seriously explained, "I don't want my brother to climb down. The ground is really dirty."
"Well, well, mother knows."
Song Luan picked up Er Bao and began to feed him rice paste.
However, the child liked to move around and babbled his mouth while being fed by the rice paste.
The spoon that Song Luan was holding was almost caught by his little hand. Although she had avoided it, the rice paste in the spoon accidentally got on her clothes.
Song Luan pointed at Er Bao's nose with her finger. "How naughty."
Little Zhao stood aside and carefully found a handkerchief. He wiped the rice paste on her sleeve and also did not forget to teach his brother, "No."
Er Bao didn't understand.
If he didn't understand, he could do whatever he wanted.
So when Song Luan fed him the rice paste for the second time, Er Bao's restless hand waved away again.
Little Zhao seemed to be angry and stared at his disobedient brother with a stinky face, "I told you no."
Song Luan silently reminded him, "Your little brother...still doesn't understand."
Little Zhao looked at Er Bao obstinately. Then, he grasped his brother's hand with little effort. "He understood."
Little Zhao felt that his brother could understand.
Er Bao seemed to see that his brother's face was a little fierce, so he pursed his lips and cried out loud.
Instead of coaxing him, little Zhao said fiercely, "Don't cry."
The pitch-black eyes of little Zhao stared straight at Er Bao.
Er Bao was frightened. His crying was held in his throat and swallowed it back.
Song Luan thought it's very interesting to see the two of them. She smiled and continued to feed Er Bao the rice paste.
The boy had patted the spoon off several times before all because he still wanted to drink milk and didn't want rice paste.
After a long time of tossing, she finally fed a small bowl of rice paste into the child's stomach.
She then put Er Bao on the floor blanket and let him crawl.
Little Zhao hesitated to speak, "Mother.."
Song Luan knew what he wanted to say. She rubbed his son's face and joked with him, "You know your brother is still young, and can only crawl on the ground."
Little Zhao pursed his mouth and did not speak.
Er Bao was crawling happily on the ground. When he fell, he did not cry and quietly recovered his previous posture, then arched his small body forward.
When little Zhao saw Er Bao's joyful appearance while playing, he had a headache. He didn't understand...he was smart, his father was smart, but why was his brother so stupid?
He thought, maybe it was because his younger brother was more like their mother, so he was naive.
When Er Bao climbed to his brother's leg, his pair of fleshy little hands suddenly hugged his wrists and looked back at him with his chubby face.
To be honest, little Zhao had a serious habit of cleanliness. When he looked at his brother's hands touching the carpet, a trace of disgust flashed in his eyes, which was only for a fleeting moment.
Advertisements
He took Er Bao's feet out lightly. His brother's hands were a little dirty and couldn't stand it.
With perseverance, Er Bao climbed forward with his buttocks pursed, and once again held his ankles with both hands.
Little Zhao looked at him and said, "Let go."
The younger brother refused to listen to him. He even took his wrists as a toy and had the impulse to gnaw.
Little Zhao's mood was not very good. He took back several steps because he couldn't throw him away.
He then raised his eyes and turned to look at his mother. "Mother, my brother is too dirty."
Song Luan squinted, "Don't be afraid."
Little Zhao was still not convinced. "Should I take my brother to wash his hands?"
Just as Song Luan was about to reply, Zhao Nanyu opened the bead curtain and came in. He looked at them and his silly son sitting on the carpet and asked, "Why is he sitting on the ground?"
Song Luan solemnly replied, "Children need to liberate their nature so that they will become smart in the future."
Zhao Nanyu raised his eyebrows and said, "Is that right?"
"Yes."
Er Bao's sight was immediately attracted by Zhao Nanyu's leg. He released his brother's wrist and climbed to his father's leg and hugged it.
Zhao Nanyu moved his leg but didn't kick him away.
"What's wrong?" As he said this, he picked up the baby. Er Bao didn't cry and even let him obediently hold him. He was lively, his slick eyes looked around while his hands were dancing in the air.
With a snap, Er Bao's little hand patted his father's lips.
Zhao Nanyu had no patience and lifted Er Bao's little hand.
Little Zhao's expression was complicated and hesitated to tell his father that his brother had just rubbed his hands on the floor blanket. He felt that after he would say it, his little brother would get punished.
When he was about to say it, his throat stopped.
Something was holding him from saying it.
However, Er Bao was addicted to playing with his hands on Zhao Nanyu's face, forcing him to put it into his mouth.
Zhao Nanyu slapped him lightly on the back, "Be obedient."
After he was hit, Er Bao was obedient.
Little Zhao thought that his brother would act naughty again, so he whispered, "Father, let me take my brother to wash his hands. He just rolled around on the ground and his hands are dirty."
Zhao Nanyu's face was gloomy.
Didn't this baby just touch his face??
Little Zhao could already hold his younger brother skillfully. He washed his younger brother's hand with warm water and used a handkerchief to wipe his fingers over and over again.
Little Zhao looked at Er Bao with satisfaction, and said in a happy mood, "You're not dirty any more! And even smell good."
Er Bao held his brother's neck and uttered some simple syllables.
He didn't know what he was muttering about.
Zhao Nanyu also had a smelly face. With a handkerchief, he wiped his face several times and the place that was touched by his son, but still felt he wasn't clear yet.
Song Luan silently handed him a wet handkerchief and said, "Tt's not so dirty."
Zhao Nanyu's throat strained, closed his jaw, and enunciated, "Little brat."
Zhao Nanyu, with a painful expression, said to her, "You wipe it for me. If you don't wipe it clean, my face will rot."
"......"
"If it rots, I won't look good."
"....."
"Are you willing?"
"...."
He's really good.
Song Luan took his handkerchief and wiped his face again. She sighed and asked, "Is it comfortable now?"
Zhao Nanyu tugged at her hand and let her sit on his legs. Their faces almost touched each other. 
He looked down at her. Song Luan's long curled eyelashes were like small fans fluttering, her skin was pale, her cheeks were pink, and her ears were tinged with red.
Zhao Nanyu's slender fingers rubbed around her neck. When he was ready to speak, little Zhao came back with Er Bao in her arms.
Song Luan got down from him and her small face was slightly hot. she didn't like letting her children see this.
Er Bao held out his hand as if wanting her to hold him.
Zhao Nanyu was sitting on the chair. Although his face was not worried, there was a trace of impatience in his dark pupils.
Er Bao was not discouraged and still stretched out his fleshy hand in the air, "Yah yah"
When Zhao Nanyu's body leaned forward, Er Bao's hand suddenly grabbed his hair decisively. It looked like he just caught an interesting toy and dragged it down.
"Hiss."
It hurt.
It really hurts.
He took a breath and wanted to kick this son out.
=============== Chapter 92
Although Zhao Nanyu's father didn't like his son very much, he was surprisingly good to his two children.
Er Bao was cute. He was the favorite of the elders. He had a round, fleshy face that could pinch water. When people saw it, they couldn't help but pinch it.
After a few years, no one knew when Zhao Sanye figured things out and accepted his fate. He didn't dislike Zhao Nanyu as much as before. However, it's hard to say how much he liked his son.
Occasionally, Er Bao would be brought back to Zhao's house by Zhao Sanye to meet his elders and recognize his relatives, so that the child would recognize his grandmothers and grandfathers in the future.
Naturally, Song Luan was reluctant for them to take her child back, but she couldn't open her mouth. After all, it was not too much.
Er Bao stayed there for one night.
Zhao Nanyu was eager for his father to take Er Bao away. The child only knew how to eat and sleep. As a one-year-old, he was ignorant and had learned to play tricks. He would stick to his mother away all the time.
At night, he would make a lot of noise so he could sleep with his mother.
Little Zhao didn't see his brother when he came home from school. He asked, feeling it was a bit strange, "Mother, where's brother?"
Song Luan was still tossing the bonsai on the windowsill. She saw little Zhao and narrowed her eyes, "Your brother was held by your grandfather to play."
Song Luan added, "If you were at home, grandfather would take you together with Er Bao."
He sat on the chair silently. After a while, he said in a very low voice, "I don't want to go back. "
Song Luan asked, "Don't you like grandfather?"
He shook his head and replied, "No."
He just didn't like the younger brother and sister of the second aunt's family. It's too noisy. They were not as cute as Er Bao.
Song Luan touched his face. "If you don't want to go back, no one will force you. It's okay."
After little Zhao finished his homework, he was still absent-minded and couldn't help asking, "Mother, when will brother come back?"
"He'll be back tomorrow."
"Oh." The expression on his face seemed to be disappointed.
To make him happy, Song Luan hugged him and placed him on her lap. She kissed him on his face again and again. You only have your brother in your heart and not your mother?"
The child had not been held by her for a long time. His ears were pink and his face was a little hot, "No. I like both of you."
Song Luan liked to tease his serious son who had a red face. She said, "I thought that you didn't like mother anymore."
Little Zhao said he couldn't and simply pursed his tight mouth. His small head gently laid on her shoulder.
***
Without Er Bao, the night wouldn't be so lively.
Song Luan's hair was half dry. She sat on the bedside, lazily looking at the paintings in her hand to pass time.
After taking a bath, Zhao Nanyu came out from the inside. His skin was very white, his dark hair fell lazily on his back, his eyes were slightly lifted, and his cool noble spirit showed a trace of magnificence.
Song Luan retracted her eyes and continued to look at the paintings in her hand.
The man went to her side, lifted his hand, and took away the painting. He chuckled, "Er Bao is not here. The room is much quieter. "
Song Luan also admitted that he was not wrong. Er Bao would toss and babble at night, always waking them up.
These past months, they would wake up in the middle of the night and would see Er Bao crying.
It seemed that his crying would not stop if his mother wouldn't come to hold him.
Song Luan stretched out, "I don't know if he is accustomed to sleeping there tonight."
Zhao Nanyu took off his clothes in front of her and went to bed. He laughed and said, "He should be accustomed. It's better to let him suffer a little bit."
At first, little Zhao didn't sleep with his parents for a few days after he was born. He slept in the same room with his father before he was two years old, but after he turned three, he slept by himself already.
Little Zhao was sensible and obedient, while the younger brother was mischievous.
Song Luan snorted, "Why do you care about this kind of thing for a child?"
Zhao Nanyu squinted, his expression was not good, "Who let him have all the good things?"
Cried for a whole day. He only knew how to cry.
If his father wouldn't come, he wouldn't cry, but when he would, Er Bao's tears would fly out, it's as if he lost all the money in the world.
The maidservant would always knock on their doors several times saying that Er Bao was crying again, making a fuss for his mother to hold him.
Zhao Nanyu got out of bed gnashing his teeth. He opened the door with a black face. After listening to the cry of the baby for a moment, his throat felt strained.
Zhao Nanyu had no choice but to carry him into the room.
As long as Song Luan appeared in the child's eyes, he would stop crying. She took Er Bao, put the baby in her arms, and gently coaxed him to sleep.
This had happened more than once.
It's no wonder that Zhao Nanyu had resentment.
"Let's not talk about the child." Zhao Nanyu said as he untied her belt and gently pulled it. He did not know where to throw the light ribbon in his hand.
Song Luan shrunk her shoulders and her eyes were full of worry. She was still thinking about her child and asked, "What if Er Bao bothers them?"
Zhao Nanyu did not know when he tore off her clothes. He clasped hands on the head of the bed and his lips were slightly hooked. He casually said, "Don't worry. He is very clever."
Zhao Nanyu gazed at her face, his adam's apple rolled, and his eyes were deep. He suddenly lowered his head and bit her white neck as he continued to coax her, "besides, he has a good brother over there."
Song Luan knew who he was talking about–Zhao Wenyan's child, who was born a few months ago, was also a boy. He didn't like to talk and only looked at people with his cute eyes.
After seeing this brother only twice, Er Bao was generous to share his toys with him. It could be seen that he liked this younger brother in his heart.
When a man is restrained for too long, once it's opened, they're out of control.
Song Luan didn't know what he had said in the middle of the night. She was tortured by Zhao Nanyu that even if she wanted to sleep, she couldn't.
Advertisements
Zhao Nanyu not only used more methods in bed but also added more dirty words. He also whispered in her ears several times and said shameless things.
The next day, of course, Song Luan got up late. She had back pain, her skin felt tender, and her shoulder had a lot of blue and purple marks.
Song Luan slowly got up from the bed, but the man who worked hard last night didn't feel anything. He looked refreshed, and Song Luan felt it was unfair.
It happened that on this day, little Zhao didn't need to go to school. He took his previous homework to his father and stood in front of him with his head down.
Zhao Nanyu turned page by page. After reading all of them, he said, "Very good."
Little Zhao was not arrogant and impetuous. Even when he got his father's praise, he did not show a smile while his small face was tensely tight as he straightened back.
Song Luan always felt that Zhao Nanyu was too strict with their eldest son. She couldn't bear it and took the child's hand and asked in a warm voice, "Is there anything you want to eat?"
She was free today, and it was just in time for their next meal.
Little Zhao subconsciously looked up at his father's expression and then dared to ask carefully, "Mom, I want to eat your glutinous rice cake."
Song Luan said with a smile, "Okay, I'll cook it for you this lunch."
She was a good cook, and little Zhao wasn't picky, so as long as it's something she made by herself, he'll eat it up.
Zhao Nanyu was half bathed in the sun and his beautiful eyes narrowed slightly. "Luan Bao, I want to eat dumplings."
Song Luan smiled at him and replied kindly, "If you want to eat, you can make it yourself.". After a pause, she said, "You don't have to make it yourself. If you go down, someone in the kitchen will bring it to you."
Although Song Luan scolded Zhao Nanyu, she still cooked a bowl of dumplings for Zhao Nanyu.
Little Zhao ate the glutinous rice cake cleanly, and not a piece of it was left.
Song Luan was afraid that eating a lot of food would not be good for the child, so she let him walk around the house two times.
In the afternoon, when the sun was at its best, Zhao Nanyu leaned lazily against the soft bed, holding a book in his hand, but hadn't turned a page for a long time.
Song Luan and little Zhao were sitting opposite each other, playing Go.
The woman's face looked troubled as she held the white piece in her hand. She then finally placed it on the top of the chessboard after a long time.
Her lower lip bled after she bit it.
Zhao Nanyu's heart moved. He got up lazily, walked behind her, and held her little hand to set the pieces down. "It should be here."
Song Luan was smiling at first but then stopped. She pushed him back with her elbow. "A true gentleman can watch people play chess without speaking."
Zhao Nanyu raised his eyebrows. "I am a hypocrite."
Song Luan choked. He said this so rightfully with confidence!
Little Zhao looked at his mother and sighed. His mother's chess skills had not improved much, he could win her without much effort.
Unlike every time he played chess with his father, he never won.
Little Zhao already secretly gave away several chess pieces, if the mother still loses, she would be very sad.
He said, "Mother, my eyes are a little sour. Can we play this next time?"
Song Luan refused without even thinking about it, "No, we have to finish this."
Little Zhao secretly looked at his father.
Zhao Nanyu put his hand on her shoulder and said in a slow voice, "The chess game can be saved. It's okay if you continue playing tomorrow."
By tomorrow, Song Luan might have forgotten already.
Song Luan didn't seem to hear him. She was completely immersed in her world. 
Her stare in the chessboard could make out a hole. She felt strange and murmured, "I've won against Zhao Nanyu. How can I not win against my own son?!"
This was not reasonable.
She suddenly realized something and turned around to glare at the 'innocent' man. "Did you deliberately let me win?"
Zhao Nanyu lied without changing his face, "I didn't."
=============== Chapter 93
The Zhao family sent Er Bao back the next evening.
Third lady Zhao got out of the carriage with Er Bao in her arms. The child leaned against her shoulder, his eyes were red, and he seemed to have cried a lot.
Er Bao could recognize people already. When he saw his mother, he immediately became active. He called out and his two small arms extended to his mother, demanding her to hold him.
Song Luan caught him in a hurry, so Er Bao stopped calling.
Third lady Zhao laughed. "The child cried so much last night that we originally planned for Zhao Sanye to send someone to return Er Bao, but Zhao Sanye didn't agree. Fortunately, Er Bao already fell asleep."
Song Luan pinched his son's face. "He's too noisy."
Third lady Zhao looked at Er Bao lovingly and said with a smile, "It's okay in the daytime. I had a good time with Er Bao. The old lady and the old master like Er Bao very much, saying that he looks smart."
After a while, she went on to say, "Zhao Sanye also asked about little Zhao."
After Zhao Sanye retired from court affairs, the whole person was more open-minded and was more interested in children than before.
Song Luan replied following her words: "Little Zhao could have gone with Er Bao, but he still had to go to school. He couldn't go there until his vacation."
Song Luan didn't want to force little Zhao if he wasn't willing.
"It must be very lively at home."
"Yes."
Third lady Zhao stayed and had dinner before returning. Zhao Nanyu didn't hate his stepmother now, not like before, but he also wasn't close to her.
Er Bao seemed to be afraid of leaving his mother. He grabbed her by the collar the whole night and dared not let it go. However, whenever anyone approached him and wanted to hold him, Er Bao would shake his head vigorously.
Little Zhao wanted to hug his younger brother, and after being rejected, he looked down and ate silently.
Song Luan asked, "What's wrong?"
"My brother doesn't like me anymore." He said softly, with deep sadness in his words.
His younger brother used to like being held by him, but tonight he wouldn't allow him to hold him.
Song Luan listened to his childish words and laughed.
Little Zhao's voice was very small. If she didn't listen carefully, she wouldn't be able to hear him. "I won't let him go back in the future."
He was no longer close to his brother.
Song Luan comforted him and said, "Your brother will want to play with you again tomorrow."
He said a bit aggrieved, "I'm going to school tomorrow."
He had to write his homework once he came back, so he couldn't play with his brother.
Song Luan touched his face. "It will be okay."
Little Zhao looked at her and his younger brother, "It doesn't matter. I can accompany my brother after I finish my homework. "
"When your brother is older, you two will be able to sleep together."
It's good for two brothers to be intimate.
In the future, if Er Bao would act naughty, little Zhao would be there to discipline him.
At night, Zhao Nanyu saw the child lying in his position. He raised his eyebrows, pointed to Er Bao, and asked, "Why is he in my bed?"
Song Luan came over with another quilt and said, "Er Bao is sleeping with us tonight. "
Zhao Nanyu said, "No way."
Song Luan thought for a moment and said, "Okay. I'll sleep with Er Bao. You can sleep alone."
Zhao Nanyu poked his son in the stomach and said, "Forget it. Let him sleep on his own tonight. Don't spoil him."
Er Bao was only over one year old.
And Zhao Nanyu could say such a thing.
***
On the first day of snow, the market streets of Daliang were very busy. All kinds of craftsmen appeared on both sides of the street.
Zhao Nanyu didn't want to see her around the child, so he took her out to play and gave the child to grandma Lin.
Song Luan wore a pink cloak outside. Her skin was fair and powdery. She had flower ornaments on her hair and when she took a step, the ornament would shake.
She looked like a maiden who hadn't been married yet.
Zhao Nanyu wore dark clothes and held her hand tightly for fear of losing her.
Song Luan was holding an oil paper umbrella in her hand.
Zhao Nanyu took the oil paper umbrella in her hand and said, "Come here."
He opened the oil paper umbrella and held it on her head.
After a short walk, Song Luan felt that someone was looking at them. She was shy and timid and gently tugged at his clothes.
Zhao Nanyu turned aside, lifted his lips, and asked, "What's the matter?"
Song Luan stood on tiptoe and whispered in his ear, "Put away the umbrella."
"You don't want the umbrella?"
"No."
Only the two of them were holding umbrellas in this whole street, which made them look strange.
Zhao Nanyu laughed, "Okay."
Song Luan was dazzled by all kinds of small things in the street. She didn't feel tired while she was wandering around the stalls.
Advertisements
All of a sudden, Song Luan saw the figure not far away. She poked Zhao Nanyu's waist with her finger and asked, "Is that Commande Gu?"
With a long sword pinned to his waist and a cold line on his side face, Song Luan could feel the chill radiating off his body.
Zhao Nanyu looked in the direction of her fingers. After a glance, he could already recognize him, "Well, it's him."
Song Luan was going to pretend that she didn't see, while Zhao Nanyu walked away in a lowkey manner. However, Commander Gu seemed to notice them. He turned around and his eyes were shining. Then no one knew what he said to the girl in front of him because they saw the beautiful girl leaving with tears.
Gu Yan hesitated for a moment, then walked forward a few steps, "Lord Zhao." 
Seeing Song Luan beside him, he didn't know what to call her.
Gu Yan heard that Song Luan didn't like to be called Madam Zhao. When the emperor was still alive and her father was very popular, others called her Third lady Song in private.
Now, the Song family was gone, but Gu Yan was not sure whether she would get angry if he would address Mrs. Zhao in front of her?
On second thought, what does Song Luan have to do with him?
Gu Yan said to Song Luan without expression, "Madam Zhao."
Song Luan thinks that she is very curious. She smiles at Gu Yan for the first time. "Gu Tongling, is that girl just now? "
Song Luan considered herself a very curious person. She smiled at Gu Yan for an unprecedented time, "Commander Gu, who is that girl just now?"
Gu Yan frowned, and before he made a voice, Zhao Nanyu took the initiative to answer for him, "That's Commander Gu's fiancee."
When Song Luan saw Gu Yan last time, he didn't seem to have a girl. At that time, Zhao Nanyu laughed at him with a very ironic tone, saying that Gu Yan was nearly 30 years old and had not yet married.
She didn't expect that the selfless commander would have finished his life in a few months.
She didn't expect that this iron-faced and the selfless commander could finish the important milestones of life within a few months.
"Congratulations to Commander Gu."
It seemed that Gu Yan was not very satisfied with the marriage. He was cold faced to the beautiful girls and he left them all crying.
Gu Yan's face was light. "I'd like to thank Mrs. Zhao first."
Holding her finger, Zhao Nanyu said to Gu Yan, "Commander Gu, don't forget to invite us if the marriage date is fixed."
Gu Yan tightened his back and no one could see the expression on his face. He said in a cold voice, "Naturally."
"I have something else to do. Goodbye."
Song Luan looked at Gu Yan's back in silence and said, "In fact, Commander Gu's appearance is also every girl's favorite."
He was tall.
Zhao Nanyu thought deeply, "Is that right?"
"Hiss." her fingers were pinched by him. It hurt a little.
"You let go of my hand. It hurts."
Zhao Nanyu loosened his strength but did not let her go. Instead, he continued, "Gu Yan is very fierce. The little girl is afraid of seeing him. No wonder no one has been willing to marry him for so many years."
All of these were Zhao Nanyu's bullshit.
Although Gu Yan was a bit fierce and cold tempered, many girls wanted to marry him in these years. He had a distinguished family and a high position, so there was nothing to dislike.
Song Luan pondered, "Maybe. I feel sorry for his fiancee now. It seems that Gu Yan doesn't like her very much."
And Gu Yan was not the type of man that would love girls. His words were few and his personality was dull.
Zhao Nanyu asked curiously, "How do you know?"
Song Luan winked at him, "Is it necessary to ask? I can tell whether someone likes a person or not."
They couldn't hide it if there was love in their eyes.
Zhao Nanyu was stunned for a moment. Then he gave her a brilliant smile. His dark pupils looked at her straight, and his voice was rusty. "Do you see anything in my eyes?"
She was the only one left in his eyes.
No one could resist Zhao Nanyu's affectionate eyes. The temperature on Song Luan's face slowly rose. She was embarrassed and avoided his sight. "I, I, I can't see."
"I am blind!
"Yes, yes, yes, I am blind!"
Zhao Nanyu pulled her into his arms. The white snow fell on her. He lifted his hand to brush the snow from her body, almost biting her ear. "You're in my eyes."
She was not only in his eyes but also in his heart.
Song Luan blushed and stammered, "I, I, I am also deaf."
What he said...she couldn't hear.
Zhao Nanyu rarely said these words. Although it was sweet, it was also very shameful.
Fortunately, Zhao Nanyu didn't intend to go on, "Come on, don't you want to eat Xuji's chestnut? You won't be able to buy it later."
Song Luan was led forward by him in a trance. She looked up at the man in front of her. He has excellent facial features and every part of his body is her favorite.
Perhaps, there was her presence in his eyes.
Song Luan followed him like a little tail. His body covered more than half of the falling snow for her. 
She said, "I still want to eat rose cakes."
"Let's buy it back together."
Song Luan licked her lips and said, "Let's buy more. Little Zhao loves it."
"He can't eat too many sweets. His teeth will hurt."
Song Luan murmured in a low voice, "When can I eat them all alone..."
"Yes, I will only give it to you."
Zhao Nanyu was very stingy. He refused to let his son have it.
=============== Chapter 94
When Er Bao was three years old, he was already a very naughty child. His mouth was as sweet as honey, unlike his elder brother. He was so sweet and charming whenever people met him. The elders all liked him. Besides, Er Bao was fat and white. He was very cute when he laughed. People could not help but love him.
Song Luan was also very fond of Er Bao. The child was very clingy to her. If she didn't coax him at night, Er Bao could never sleep well.
Zhao Nanyu was used to his stinky habit. Er Bao's tears may be useful to others, but they did not affect the front of his cold-blooded and merciless father.
When Er Bao couldn't see his mother, he would cry. At this time, Zhao Nanyu would just sit by and watch him cry.
After crying and howling for a long time and noticing that he hadn't attracted his mother, Er Bao would then stop. He immediately stopped crying. He didn't squeeze a drop of tears and climbed into bed with his buttocks pursed. He took off his clothes, covered himself with a quilt, turned his back on his father, and snorted with disdain.
Zhao Nanyu walked over and pinched his ear mercilessly, smiling."Why didn't you keep crying? How can you be willing to stop when the drama is only half-finished?"
Er Bao was caught by his collar and his neck was very uncomfortable. He tried to kick him with his short legs. However, his legs were too short to hurt Zhao Nanyu. He was very angry and looked very fierce. "I want to tell my mother wuwuwu..."
Song Luan already went to bed early. If not, Zhao Nanyu would not dare to blatantly clean up his son.
He laughed. "Go ahead and see if your mother can hear you?"
Er Bao was very hard to coax when he got angry. He stared at his father furiously with his black and white eyes! "Help! It's murder!"
"Mother, help me!!"
As soon as Zhao Nanyu's hand released him, the little fat man was left on the bed. He lazily watched his son's performance. "Even when your voice gets hurt, no one will come to save you."
Er Bao was nestled in the quilt, only the upper half of his face was exposed. "I must not be your child. You don't love me at all. "
Zhao Nanyu didn't know what was going on in his mind. He glanced at the child and said, "I did not give birth to you. You came out of your mother's stomach."
Er Bao said, "Then go away and give me my father who will love me and tolerate me."
Zhao Nanyu pinched the quilt carefully for him and said with a smile, "Go to bed early and don't think about sleeping with your mother in the future. It's impossible."
Er Bao whispered to himself, "That's not possible."
Zhao Nanyu heard it but he didn't care.
***
Besides Song Luan, Little Zhao was probably the second who loved Er Bao the most
He not only taught him to read and write but also brought him pastries every day after school. But, the three-year-old Er Bao didn't seem to like playing with his brother very much.
Little Zhao was still a little sad to see that his brother was reluctant to get close to him, but his emotions had always been very restrained and did not show it.
After returning home from school, he saw his brother holding the tree stump in the yard and tried hard to climb up. His white face was somehow rubbed with dirt.
He walked over and took his brother down from the tree. He gently patted the dust off his body and said in a gentle tone, "How can you make yourself so dirty?"
Er Bao moved in his arms and said, "Let me go down, brother."
He patted his little head and said, "Go ahead and wash your dirty face."
Er Bao also knew that his brother liked being clean, so he said, "Okay."
When they entered the house, little Zhao let his servants draw water. After wiping Er Bao's face, he was satisfied.
"You look good this way."
"Brother, you let me down."
Little Zhao pursed his lip and loosened Er Bao. Before he could say anything, his younger brother pedaled his short legs to run to the courtyard again.
When Song Luan entered the room, little Zhao was doing his homework. He seemed to be in a low mood, lowering his eyes and saying nothing.
Song Luan went over and asked, "Little Zhao, why is the sky so unhappy today? Was it scolded by its husband?"
Song Luan rarely saw him showing his emotions.
He put down his pen and looked up at his mother. There was a trace of injustice in his voice. "I don't think my brother likes me very much."
His brother refused to let him hug him and didn't want to play with him.
"Why doesn't Er Bao like you? He's just a little playful." Seeing that he was depressed, Song Luan continued to comfort him, "You are five years older than him. You have to go to school on weekdays, and there is no one in the family to play with him."
Little Zhao was silent for a long time, "It's not really because he doesn't like me?"
Song Luan knew that he was sensitive in mind. If she didn't make it clear, it would get into the top of his head. 
She said, "Of course not. He is afraid to sleep alone at night. If you accompany him, he will not be afraid."
Little Zhao was moved by his words and he felt less uncomfortable, "I will tell him a story tonight."
When he was very young, his father used to tell him stories.
Maybe tomorrow Er Bao would let him hug him again.
As the mother and son were talking, Er Bao was carried by the neck into the room by Zhao Nanyu.
The child's hands were full of mud. He was very uncomfortable as he was thrown into the house. His face was full of anger, "Mother, father bullied me again."
Song Luan exclaimed, "How can you make your hands so dirty?"
Er Bao's eyes turned quickly. His dark eyes turned around as he hid his hand behind his back. "There's an ant nest under the big tree. I can't help but dig it out. I didn't mean to...".
As soon as he finished speaking, he turned his angry eyes to Zhao Nanyu, and pretended to cry twice, "Dad wants to strangle me. Yes, he just wanted to strangle me."
Young master Zhao was also a good accuser. He dared to open his eyes and talk nonsense in front of his father. Er Bao wanted to go up and hold his mother's legs and look. 
He silently stepped back two steps and thought he had made a good suggestion: "Mother, let's throw away father. He is too bad."
Zhao Nanyu's eyebrows leaped, and with a cold smile, he said darkly, "If you have the ability, you can say it again."
Er Bao raised his face without fear, "I and my mother don't want you anymore."
His little white hand then pointed to the door, "You go on your own, don't let us drive you out. "
Song Luan and little Zhao couldn't help but look at him.
Advertisements
Zhao Nanyu sneered and said, "I think I owe you a beating."
Er Bao hid behind his mother since his father was still a little fierce.
Little Zhao took a few steps forward, pinched his brother's wrist, and whispered, "I'll take you to wash your hands. "
At this time, Er Bao was very obedient and followed behind his brother. He didn't dare to say any unnecessary words. He was afraid that his father would beat him up.
Zhao Nanyu sighed softly, "If only it had been a daughter."
Song Luan pretended to be stupid and looked down. "Well, both sons and daughters are good."
In recent years, Zhao Nanyu had said this more than once. Zhao Wenyan, his younger brother, had a daughter last year. Zhao Nanyu never stopped thinking of having a daughter.
Zhao Nanyu said, It doesn't matter. We follow what we want and don't force it."
Song Luan was stupid to believe his words. However, in her heart, Song Luan also wanted a daughter. When she held Ruan Sheng's daughter last time, her heart melted. The little girl yawned lovely and was very fragrant.
When Er Bao saw her holding the sister, he lost her temper. The child's heart was as small as his father's, and his family and outsiders were separated.
In the evening, the husband and wife were lying in bed talking. Zhao Nanyu took her shoulder and said slowly, "Ah Yan's daughter started calling people by their names a few days ago."
Song Luan was a little sleepy and her eyes were half squinting. She reluctantly regained her spirits and said, "I remember that the child is very beautiful and her smile is sweet. "
Zhao Nanyu looked at her delicate and smooth skin, his fingers gradually went downward, as he said, "Yes."
Song Luan then said, "When I'm free, I'll go to see her and give her a set of jewelry that my mother gave me before. Although she's still young and doesn't know beauty or ugliness, if this lovely little girl was my daughter, I'd dress her up pretty every day."
Zhao Nanyu had quietly untied her dress belt. With his hands on her waist, it seemed that he was not listening to her, "Well, you can make your own decision."
The atmosphere seemed to become ambiguous.
Song Luan couldn't go on anymore, her ears were already hot. "I'm... I'm sleepy."
Zhao Nanyu couldn't force her, "Then go to sleep."
The two of them slept together.
In the middle of the night, Song Luan hugged his waist and naturally went into his arms and fell asleep
Zhao Nanyu woke up at dawn. He got out of bed swiftly, opened the window, and looked at the sky. There were still snowflakes floating outside. He didn't know when the snow would stop.
The yard had turned white from snow.
Zhao Nanyu remembered how excited she was to see snow every year. Like a child, she went back to make a snowman with little Zhao.
After a while, he closed the window.
When the servant girl heard the noise, she came in with water to serve. Zhao Nanyu waved his hand and lowered his voice. "Go out, you don't have to wait for us."
He went back to bed again, looked down at the sleeping woman, and pressed her to his arms in silence. Whether the sleeping woman could hear her or not, he whispered in her ear with a smile, "I'll take you to make a snowman later."
Song Luan moved for a moment. He almost thought she was going to wake up. It turned out that she just wanted a more comfortable position. She muttered two words before falling asleep again.
Zhao Nanyu continued in a low voice, "When you wake up and see that it's still snowing, you will be very happy."
He was very happy.
=============== Chapter 95
The little princess and the prince of Southwest had known each other since childhood. Every year when the Southwest king sends people back to the capital to pay tribute, the little prince would go back with the tribute team. He was beautiful ever since he was a child. When he was five or six years old, he met the princess. When he was seven or eight years old, he began visiting the capital alone.
The princess had a delicate temper because growing up, she had been raised in the palm of the emperor's hand. The scene where she and the Southwest prince met for the first time was not very good. The little white cat that her prince brother gave her disappeared somehow.
The little princess liked the cat very much. If the queen didn't scold her, she would sleep with the white cat every day. The people in the palace had looked up and down, but they hadn't found it.
It was winter at that time. The weather was cold, so she was afraid that the cat would freeze to death, and that some palace ladies and eunuchs with short eyes would kill the cat.
The little princess sneaked out of the palace and went to the royal garden to look for the cat. She couldn't find the cat, however, she saw a young boy with red lips and white teeth in the royal garden. He stood wearing a pure white cloak like a fairy in the snow.
The little princess stared at him as she asked, "Who are you? Why haven't I seen you in the palace before?"
The young master seemed reluctant to pay attention to her. The little princess guessed that he didn't know her identity, otherwise he would not dare to ignore her words.
She was a little annoyed. "Why don't you talk!?"
The boy still did not say a word, his lips slightly pursed up, as if reluctant to pay attention to her, and even after hearing her voice, he turned to the opposite side.
Because of this, the little princess was angrier. No one dared to do this to her.
"Do you know who I am?! I tell you, I am..."
The boy didn't even listen to her. He left and didn't turn his head.
The little princess didn't know what she was doing, but she knew that she didn't want to see him leave. She carried her skirt and dashed up. The road was slippery because of the snow. When her feet slipped, she instantly fell to the ground. Her posture looked very embarrassing since her hands subconsciously hugged his legs.
The boy in front of her stopped, looked down at her with his two eyes in silence, and then took out his legs in silence.
The little princess thought he was mocking her. Was he laughing at her?
She was strong enough to get up from the ground. She patted the snow on her body twice and three times before saying, "You're intolerable." Then she grabbed his arm and said angrily, "Stop! Where are you going?! Are you laughing at this princess?"
"Princess?" He was a little surprised, but the expression on his face was a little light.
The little princess raised her neck and looked up, "Yes, I'm not a person that anyone dares to offend. If you offend me, I'll let the prince take care of you tomorrow."
She was just talking nonsense with her mouth, bluffing, to scare him.
"What? You're scared, aren't you?" The little princess looked at him and said, "Tell me who you are, and I will let my brother let you go."
The boy tightly pursed the corners of his lips. Even though he knew she was a princess, his mood did not change much.
In the past, others rushed to flatter this little princess, but this time, she had given up her face and even failed to ask his name.
Before leaving, the boy pointed to the hairpin on her head, his voice was shallow when he said, "Your hairpin is crooked."
She blushed hard and bashfully panicked. She did not expect to lose such a big face in front of a person she did not know.
The people in the palace were looking for her. When they saw her coming back safe and sound, they kneeled on the ground with a thump and trembled, "Princess, where have you been?"
"I went out for a walk."
The old servant's face was white. Fortunately, the princess came back safely. If something happened, they would all lose their heads.
"Your cat was found, but when Grandpa Li found it..."
The little princess asked, What's wrong with the cat?"
The old servant gnawed her teeth and said, "It froze to death behind the rocks."
Although the cat had not been with her for a long time, the little princess still felt very sad. Her eyes were red. "I want to see."
***
The old servant replied, "The prince has asked the servants to bury the cat."
After hearing this, the little princess was sadder. She wiped away her tears and ran to find her prince brother.
The elder brother was several years older than her. He was a tall and straight young man with slender stature and a beautiful appearance. He looked at his sister who was crying and lowered his voice and asked, "What's the matter?"
The little princess sobbed, "My cat is dead."
The prince touched her head and lovingly said, "Don't cry. Tomorrow brother will give you a more obedient one."
But she didn't want it anymore. She shook her head and said, "I don't want it anymore."
The little princess grabbed her brother's wide sleeve and wiped away her tears. She hiccuped and asked, "I saw a boy as old as me in the imperial garden today. He is so beautiful, but he won't even tell me his name. Do you know him, brother?"
The prince pondered for a moment, "A boy?"
She nodded heavily, "Mm-hmm, taller than me, and very fair as if he was shining. He didn't like to talk and didn't pay attention to me."
The prince thought about it carefully, and already knew who she was referring to. Earlier today, the queen of Southwest took her son into the palace. He had seen the little prince several times before. He was young and had a calm personality. He didn't like to talk much and was cold-blooded.
He looked at his sister complicatedly, "I know."
The southwest king's son and his sister's engagement had been made since childhood. The marriage was proposed by his mother. Naturally, the southwest king did not dare to disagree.
If the prince was not controlled, it would bring a great disaster in the future.
The little princess looked at her elder brother. There was a sense of urgency in her voice. "Who is he?"
The prince said, "The youngest son of the Southwest king. He will go back tomorrow."
The little princess had heard of the Southwest king. He guarded the border area and hadn't returned to the capital for a long time.
The proud boy she saw was the son of Southwest king.
No wonder he ignored her.
***
The next afternoon, the emperor and queen personally sent the Southwest queen to the gate of the city. The little prince stood upright beside his mother with no expression.
The queen led the little princess to her and said with a smile, "Have these two children met yet? In a few years, Ah Yu will come again to the capital. This time, he came and will leave in a hurry. There was no time to introduce the two children to each other. "
Advertisements
The little princess was also a little embarrassed. Today, the queen dressed her up beautifully and her jewelry was shining with gold.
The Southwest prince looked at her and said, "We have seen each other."
The queen was surprised, "Is that right? When did you see each other?"
"She fell down and threw herself at my feet."
It was short and concise. There were no redundant words.
When the little princess's embarrassing scene was told in public, she naturally became angry. She wanted to smile at him, but when it became like this, she refused to laugh. 
She complained to her mother, sobbing. "I fell and he didn't even help me..."
The Southwest queen laughed awkwardly, touched her son's head, and whispered, "Don't do this in the future."
The youngest son in the palace had such a temperament.
He wouldn't help his cousin when he fell, let alone the little princess whom he had never met.
The Southwest prince hummed.
The queen laughed and said, "How can there be anger among the children? There's no harm."
The carriage arrived early. The little princess watched the beautiful boy climb on the horse's back with her own eyes. He seemed to look back at her coldly.
The little princess reacted quickly–she glared at him and made a big face.
"Childish."
***
It had been several years since the little princess saw the boy again. She grew from a little girl to a beautiful lady. Her greatest joy every day was to sneak out of the palace in her brother's clothes.
Her brother's clothes on her, of course, would be very big. She would be found out by the guards. Later, the little princess learned to be clever. She stole the prince's token instead of her brother's clothes.
If she took the token, she could get out of the palace.
The 14-year-old princess was very beautiful. She had bright eyes and bright teeth. She had a sweet smile and her eyes were full of freshwater.
Her engagement with the Southwest prince had been announced to the public. People in the capital also knew that the Southwest prince had set out from the Southwest border to get married.
The little princess was the apple of the emperor's eye. Since she grew up in a honey jar, everyone guessed that the marriage would be very grand.
But the little princess, who was about to become a bride, was not very happy and felt very dejected.
Her prince brother met her and asked, "Why are you so depressed these days? Who has provoked our royal highness?"
She bowed her face and kicked the pebble under her feet and said, "Father and mother are so bad. They didn't ask me for my opinion and found me a husband of whom I have never seen before."
She was worried about what to do if her husband was ugly and fat?
The prince laughed, thinking that his sister's memory was really bad. "You have seen him."
The little princess glared with her round her eyes. "When?"
"Have you forgotten? It's the young boy who ignored you."
Only when she was reminded by her brother did she remember that there was such a person.
In the capital, many people doted on her–her uncles, cousins, and her father had never neglected her.
She vaguely remembered that he seemed to be a good-looking boy.
"Oh. "The tip of his ear was pink. "I remember him."
He was beautiful, delicate, and full of dignity at a young age.
The prince was also very reluctant to part with his sister. "He arrived in the capital a few days ago and lives in the post house. I went to see him and he looked very good."
The little princess poked her finger. "But he doesn't like me."
If she remembered correctly, that person would not even talk to her.
Stinky.
The prince laughed. "Ah Luan is so lovely that no one will not like you."
When they get married in the future, the Southwest prince would stay in the capital. He would let him bully his sister.
Over the years, the southwest King's power gradually expanded, and he refused to hand over his military power. If it were not for the serious hidden danger, the marriage between the Southwest king's son and his sister wouldn't happen.
The little princess was easily flattered and thought the same way.
She was such a good person. After he lived with her for a long time, this future husband of her would surely love her.
The smile on the little princess's face suddenly brightened up, "Brother, I'll go find him now!"
=============== Chapter 96
The little princess ran out like a gust of wind. The prince couldn't stop him. He told the guards to follow her closely behind her to protect her safety.
After leaving the palace, the little princess found that she didn't know which post station the Southwest prince lived in. She was in such a hurry that she forgot to ask her brother.
But she had already run out of the palace. If she went back so disheartened, she wouldn't feel fulfilled. After wandering around the street two times, she still couldn't find out his whereabouts. She was a little frustrated.
As it was getting late, the bodyguard who was hiding behind her appeared and warned, "Princess, it's late."
She stamped her foot. "I don't want to go back now. I just want to stay out a little longer!" Then she added, "You are still here so I will not have any accidents."
She was determined to see the man today, although the little princess had not yet figured out what she was going to see him for.
Maybe just to see if he was as good-looking as he used to be? Was he as cold as before?
It was an ordinary day, the bridge was full of people and there were floating lanterns above the river.
The little princess wore a set of scarlet skirts and her appearance was outstanding. She wanted to cross the bridge, but suddenly, her back was pushed. The little princess screamed out in terror and her body shook. Finally, she fell off the bridge.
With a "plop" sound, she was splashed in the river.
The little princess couldn't swim. Her limbs were constantly fluttering in the water. She choked several glasses of water in her throat. It's the month of April and the weather was cold, the piercing cold river water ran into her skin, and her face turned white immediately.
Her wet hair clung to both sides of her cheek. The guards hiding in the dark had noticed that something was wrong when she fell. When they had reacted and wanted to save her, someone had already jumped into the river first.
When the little princess was picked up by a man, she almost thought she was going to die.
With her eyes half-closed, she shivered and said, "Cold."
It was really cold. She curled up and felt it was warmer.
But after a while, she still felt very cold, her teeth were shaking uncontrollably, "Cold...I'll freeze to death."
For a moment of silence, the man that held her took off his cloak and covered her.
The little princess opened her eyes, shook her body, and looked at the man in front of her stupidly. The man was more beautiful than her brother. The corners of his lips narrowed into a straight line, his eyebrows were straight out from the paintings, his eyes were like snow frost.
She was dumbfounded.
The bodyguards reacted and rushed to the front. Some of them knew the Southwest prince. When they saw him, they were stunned for a moment, then they retreated in silence.
The little princess thought for a while before she recognized him. Her eyes suddenly brightened. After she found that she was tightly held in his arms, her ears burned. Although she was shy in her heart, she still boldly held his waist more tightly with both hands. She was not shy at all. She was also tightly buried in his chest as she said, "It's still very cold."
"......"
"Didn't you hug me first?"
"....."
"Woohoo, I'm freezing to death. Hold me tight. "
"...."
Although she did not know what it was like to like a person, she did not hate to be held by this Southwest prince. She felt a little sweet.
I hope he would hold her a little more tightly~
Although Ah Yu sighed, he was still calm. He had never seen such a shameless woman.
Even in the southwest frontier where people were open to the outside world, they had never seen such a thing as this.
Without saying a word, he simply wrapped her up in his cloak and wrapped her tightly. Then he whispered, "Don't talk."
"I'll take you to the inn."
The little princess was so stupid that she thought he didn't recognize her. When he was about to lift her, she said, "I can't get up. Hold me."
"...."
Taking an inch...
Although the little princess was freezing and almost couldn't talk from the cold, her legs were still working fine. She just wanted to be held by him and used it as an excuse.
Seeing that the man did not speak, she deliberately fell on top of him, "Save me until the end. I am a weak woman, I have no strength and can't walk on the road wuwuwu."
He sighed, seemingly helpless.
The little princess thought that he was no different from when he was a child. He was cold and resistant to people.
She pretended to continue: "Forget it, young master. Don't care about me, let this poor woman die outside. I'm fine, I'm really fine."
He couldn't stand it. "Shut up."
The two words that popped out of his mouth were cold and cruel, but they still satisfied her. He held her in his arms and took her to an inn.
The little princess secretly wrote down the name of the inn.
The Southwest prince ordered a bucket of hot water and said to her, "I'll send a set of clothes in a moment. You can change your clothes and go home after."
The little princess stood behind the screen and leaned out half of her body. She looked at him with dark eyes and asked subconsciously, "Where are you going?"
He raised an eyebrow, "It has nothing to do with you."
The little princess hadn't seen him for several years, so she was reluctant for him to leave.
She said pitifully, "Can you stay? I'm afraid."
The Southwest prince sneered, thinking that the saint of a princess was a pig head.
How dare she say that to a strange man?
"Stay? "He asked coldly.
The little princess nodded and explained, "Stand at the door until I have finished changing my clothes and come out. I'll be fine soon."
After she comes out, she must not let him run away easily.
His face softened. "You go in, I'll be outside."
Advertisements
The little princess smiled sweetly at him, "Okay."
The Southwest prince was in a complicated mood. He knew from a young age that he had a marriage contract with the daughter of the emperor, but he didn't want this marriage deep in his heart.
The emperor and queen lived extravagantly. How could the little princess, who was adored by these two people, be better?
In his heart, he even disdained this marriage.
Before entering the capital, his father had already told him that they only had one chance.
He came to the capital ahead of time only to dispel the suspicion of the emperor.
And the Southwest prince had also sent people to check the little princess. These two words: naive and ignorant were enough to summarize her.
This kind of person was easy to control.
Just now, the reason why the little princess fell into the river was actually that the Southwest prince deliberately pushed her.
It's just his trick to save the beauty.
He was cold-blooded. The love between men and women was worthless. Besides, he never thought that he would like anyone.
Instead of going out, he sat in the room and poured himself a cup of tea, savoring it.
The sound of the water behind the screen penetrated his ears, mingled with the singing of the little girl.
She seemed very happy. He didn't know what she was happy about.
The little princess was afraid that he would run away, so she quickly took a bath, put on her clothes, and walked out with her wet hair.
Her little face was tender, white, and pink.
He did not expect her to suddenly run out, still barefoot on the ground.
The little princess's heart was filled with stones. "It's good that you haven't left yet. By the way, I don't know your name yet? Since you are my savior, I will repay you in the future."
"Ah Yu." He put down his cup and stood up."Call me Ah Yu "
The little princess flushed red, "Well then...you call me Ah Luan!"
The little princess found that he didn't like to talk, but it didn't matter, she didn't mind!
Not at all!
Her mother also didn't talk much, but every day her father would change his ways to amuse her mother.
She could do this too. If he didn't like to talk, then she would initiate first!
"Where are you from? Do you live in this inn?"
Instead of answering her, he said, "It's time for you to go home."
It was already getting dark and the sky reflected a gloomy appearance as if it was going to rain.
As if she didn't hear him, the little princess moved beside him, chirping like a little sparrow. "I think you live in this inn. You are not from the capital, are you? Do you still eat when you come from other places? By the way, how can I find you in the future? The capital is so big. If I lose my savior, the Bodhisattva will not let me go."
The Southwest prince felt it was refreshing and did not find it annoying to listen to her constant rumbling words.
He casually swept her pretty face and her glossy lips. His adam's apple rolled up and down, and his heart moved. Suddenly, he felt that his voice was very dry.
The Southwest prince licked his lips, did not say a word and continued to listen to her talking.
Although the little princess did not get a response, she still persevered. Once she opened her mouth, it seemed that she could not stop.
"How old are you this year? Where do you live? Do you have a girl you like? Has your family arranged a girl for you?"
The prince stopped, turned aside, looked at her from above, and sighed, "Aren't you thirsty?"
After all that talk, wasn't she thirsty?
She nodded. "A little bit."
The prince said, "Since you are thirsty, you should speak less."
The little princess looked at him eagerly and said, "I want to drink water."
"Go get it yourself."
She hid her hands behind her and blinked, "I don't have hands."
"....."
=============== Chapter 97
Since the little princess knew the inn where he stayed, she came to him happy every day.
The Southwest prince had never shown his dissatisfaction with this, but he still had an expressionless face towards the princess.
She didn't feel strange at all, and every time, she would call his name sweetly.
Ah Yu's attitude towards her gradually changed quietly, and the tone of his speech was much better than before.
The little princess ran to him again that day. She was dressed in a man's clothes and her sleeves and neckline were a little too big. It was obvious that it didn't fit her.
Her long hair was pulled up high, revealing a clean face.
No one knew whether she was deliberate or she just didn't care about the defense between men and women, because when she came up, she grabbed his sleeve, shook his hand, and said, "My brother told me that there is a cockfight in the capital tonight. Do you like to see it? I'll accompany you."
The little princess's thought process was very simple. Since they would eventually get married sooner or later, they should cultivate their feelings now. She also wanted to see what kind of person her husband was.
After this period of observation, she found that although he was cold, he was still very kind-hearted. It was nothing bad.
The prince stepped back two steps in silence and pulled out his hand.
The little princess winked at him. "You don't want to go? You must have never seen a cockfight from other places!?"
The Southwest prince smiled silently, cockfight? They didn't have one.
Seeing that he was not moved, the little princess said to him, "I tell you, I chose a fierce rooster, and I'm sure mine will win. Are you sure you don't want to have a look?"
Deep in her heart, she wanted him to have a look and see the scene where she picked out a majestic rooster.
But this person seemed to have no interest in cockfighting. The little princess didn't expect this before she came. She was a little depressed and didn't know what to do for a moment.
The little girl lowered her head. It seemed that her soul was immediately taken away.
He rubbed his brows, knowing where his inexplicable softness came from, or perhaps he didn't want to think about it.
"Let's go."
The little princess's face immediately became vivid, and she raised a big smile at him and said, "Let's walk now! Otherwise, it will be too late."
When the two of them arrived, there was a circle of people outside. The little princess grabbed him tightly by the cuff and made a way out of the crowd to take him to the innermost circle.
The little princess went to the edge of the stage and found a small man. She took the cage from him.
In it was the rooster she had bought.
She carried the cage, pushed it to his side, and said triumphantly, "See? This is the big rooster I bought."
"Yes."
Suddenly she asked, "Do you have any money?"
The man quietly took out his pocket bag from his waist, handed it to her, and asked, "What do you want money for?"
The little princess got his money bag impolitely, and then took out all the silver she had on her body and said, "Gamble!"
The Southwest prince always thought that she was very good and lively, but was not brave. Who knew she liked to participate in fighting roosters and even gambling? It really impressed him.
"How to bet?"
"We put all our money on my rooster. As long as he wins this game, the other party's money will be ours, and the owner of the venue will also compensate us!"
What she said was very clear. It seemed that she had done this kind of business before. Although the emperor was cruel and had killed numerous ministers if he was not satisfied, he still had a good daughter.
Or he didn't know whether to say she was good when the daughter was cultivated to have this kind of temperament.
The Southwest prince nodded, "Okay."
He didn't think the little princess's rooster would be the best, but he still threw all the money in.
The princess opened the cage, and the rooster in it flapped its wings and ran out. After it stared at its bigger and fiercer opponent, his momentum faded completely.
"Cluck cluck" The rooster clucked as it ran in full circles.
The little princess was worried to death. Her money and Ah Yu's money were all on the chicken. If she lost, she would have no face.
After all, she vowed to win in front of Ah Yu.
Before half a stick of incense, her rooster was defeated.
The little princess was so angry in her heart that her mouth pursed unhappily. She turned her eyes and when she saw the man on her side, she immediately retracted her sight.
After a long time, she slowly moved a few steps closer to him, bowed her head, and apologized, "I'm so sorry, I lost all your money. "
The Southwest prince didn't seem to take it seriously. "Well, I didn't think it would win at the beginning."
The rooster was big, but it didn't have any fighting spirit.
The little princess was surprised, "Then why did you throw all the money in!?"
The Southwest prince pursed his lips and made no noise.
When she was far away from the cockfighting ground, the little princess suddenly realized that this person was the Southwest prince! He must have a lot of money.
Unlike her, although she was a princess of a country, her brother only gave her little silvers every month.
She's worse than him.
Ah Yu couldn't guess what was in her heart at all. It was already getting late after they walked around the street. In a twinkling of an eye, it was time for the little princess to return to the palace.
The Southwest prince seldom took the initiative to say, "I'll take you home."
The word "okay" whirled around her mouth and was abruptly swallowed by her.
She had been lying to him these days. She said her family lived in a certain alley in the capital.
If she let him take her home, he would find out?
She was not very good at lying. Facing his deep eyes, the little princess stuttered and said, "No, no. I can go back by myself."
Advertisements
The Southwest prince didn't know that teasing her was fun. He looked at her with a smile and said, "This is not good. If something happens, I will feel regretful."
"I'm afraid to delay your time."
"No problem, I'm not busy."
"I like to walk alone."
He replied, "I'll be five steps away from you."
Now...what could the princess do!
She remembered that she could go into an alley and just go back to the palace after he leaves.
Then she said, "Well, take me to the entrance of the alley."
Ah Yu opened his mouth but was interrupted by her, "If you take me home directly to the gate of my house and let the neighbors see, then my reputation will be broken. I'll have to marry you. If you will not, my reputation will not be clean, and my parents will live in shame all their lives."
"....."
After a silence, the Southwest prince laughed, "Okay."
The little princess has been wandering in the streets of the capital for so many years. It was not difficult to choose an alley where there were no people around.
The two people walked slowly on the silent road. The end of the lane couldn't be seen by a naked eye because it had already gotten dark.
The little princess was suddenly afraid. She stopped, turned to him, and said, "I'm here. Go back. Thank you."
"You live here?"
She nodded, for fear that he would not believe it, "Yes!"
"Well, you go in first before I'll go."
The little princess's scalp was numb. She walked ten steps inside. When she felt that he was no longer there, she decisively turned back.
But she felt that someone was staring at her in the dark. The more she thought about it, the more afraid she was, and the faster she stepped up her feet, almost running.
Before running three or two steps, her wrist was pulled from behind.
She was pinned against a wall, and she was too scared to move.
In the dark alley, she couldn't see the clear outline of the person in front of her. The little princess just smelled his body and felt it was very familiar.
The man, who was covered by the dark, raised his hand and lifted her chin. He lowered his head and took a bite on her lovely earlobe.
His lips and teeth lingered on her soft lips.
The little princess stiffened, and the man's deep voice whispered in her ear, "Then marry me."
The little princess said unkindly, "You, you, are you in love with me?"
The man said with a low smile, "Yes."
Who knew whether these words were true or not.
She was so gullible that she believed whatever he said and never doubted.
The little princess hesitated for a moment, thinking that they had not been honest with each other. She said, "But I already have a fiance. What should I do?"
The Southwest prince touched her face and it was as delicate as he imagined. He said softly, "Okay, I will help you."
Ah? No way! Why was it like this!
In a hurry, the little princess put her arms around his neck. "No, no, no, it doesn't matter. I can quit this marriage. He should also be a good man and won't force me in this marriage."
She made the Southwest prince laugh.
At this time, he did not realize how happy his smile was.
In the beginning, he seduced her and went everywhere with her, all to make her fall into this big net of love and use her. 
Now, he had also unconsciously fallen into the trap he designed.
=============== Chapter 98
On the day of her marriage, the little princess felt that she was the happiest person in the world.
In her eyes, her husband was the best man in the world.
She was wearing a wedding dress that her mother had sewn for her. Her face was covered with a gorgeous make-up. Her smile and eyes were bright.
The queen looked at her daughter with tears in her eyes, then she wiped the water from the corners of her eyes with a veil, and said, "This is from your mother's heart...if your husband does anything wrong, you should go back to the palace and live with your mother instead of him."
When the little princess saw her mother crying, she also wanted to cry, "No, he is very nice and won't bully me."
Although he talked less, he was very considerate.
This marriage was political. At first, the queen had a quarrel with the emperor over this matter.
Her daughter was a precious pearl in the world. Why should she be married to the son of a barbarian in the Southwest?!
When the emperor saw that his daughter was married, he felt bad. His loving eyes followed her closely and said slowly, "My beloved daughter, do not be afraid. He is under the eyes of your father. You can marry him and enjoy happiness. If you don't like him, you can raise another man you like outside."
The little princess couldn't do this kind of thing. She knew from an early age that if she liked a person, she must be purely devoted to him. She couldn't be indifferent because this would hurt her husband's heart.
After a long time, the little princess was finally sent into a red sedan chair.
Her eyes were blocked by the red veil, and the little princess could not open it with her hand.
When the sedan chair was carried to the front of the prince's residence, she could not help but open it and peeped out through the window.
Her husband was riding on a tall horse with a straight posture. He was handsome. This was the first time that the little princess saw this cold and light man wearing red clothes and a belt with cloud pattern flower rolls. The whole person looked beautiful.
His jaw was cold and hard, and his lips were slightly upturned. He looked straightforward with his beautiful eyes.
The little princess felt that he was probably very happy. After all, before he recognized her identity, he said he would marry her.
She thought silently, he must also like her very much.
That's good. They're in love.
When the man got off the horse, the little princess quickly put the cover down and continued to sit in the sedan chair.
After a while, the man approached the sedan chair, lifted the curtain, and took her out of the sedan chair.
The little princess couldn't see his face, but she could smell the fragrance of him. It was very comfortable.
She was blocked by the red veil, but she still took the initiative to hook his neck with her hands and put her small head in his chest.
They saluted and toasted with the guests.
After that, the little princess was sent to her new residence by a large group of people.
She sat uneasily on the bed, her buttocks felt a little painful. After thinking about it, the little princess thought that her husband wouldn't come back for a while, so she lifted the cover again, looked down, and saw there were peanuts under the quilt.
No wonder it hurt her butt.
The little princess didn't eat much the whole day, so now she was hungry and her stomach felt a little empty.
She reached out to touch a few red dates.
She was eating happily when the door of her new residence was opened at this time. Her face was slightly red. 
The man with the light-alcohol smell walked in steadily and looked at her with burning eyes.
The little princess also held a red date in her hand. Was it good to eat this right now or not? She then eventually put the red date back into the quilt and pretended nothing happened. She asked, "Why are you coming so soon?"
When her brother got married, his cousins took him to drink for a long time before they returned him very late to his new residence.
Why was Ah Yu's turn different?
The prince poured himself a cup of tea and drank it slowly to relieve his thirst. He replied, "All the guests have gone back."
Today those guests should have been informed in the advance. The emperor would not let them drink, so naturally, they did not dare to do such a thing.
Before entering the capital, he had heard how the emperor and empress doted on their daughter. At that time, he didn't take them all seriously and thought it was an exaggeration.
In the past few months, he was with her, he also realized that the parents doted on this precious pearl.
The only glass of wine he drank tonight was from his royal highness. The prince, who was as warm as jade, looked very gentle. Unfortunately, his character was too soft to be an emperor.
He was not ruthless enough, not cruel enough, and there many things he couldn't do. The country would be doomed if he sits on the throne. He could not save the declining country.
The little princess took off her shoes and socks and sat on the bed with her bare feet and legs crossed. A red candle was lit at the head of the bed. The candlelight was bright and dim.
There was a slight smile on the crown prince's eyes. He said, "It turns out that girls lift their bridal veil by themselves."
The little princess was flushed with shame. She picked up the red veil on the edge of her leg and put it on herself. "Now it's good!"
"How clever the little princess is." He laughed and clapped his hands, seemingly very supportive.
She was angry. "I am a royal princess, if you continue to bully me like this, I will let my brother take care of you."
She bared her teeth and claws, but still looked very soft.
Just like the kitten he raised before.
With a flick of the finger, the man fell.
He pretended, "The little princess is so fierce."
"I'm scared."
When Ah Yu teased enough, he took a bath and changed clothes. After the bath, he came out without even wearing a coat. His long black hair fell on his back at will, his dark eyes were slightly wet, and his smile was loosely casual.
The little princess was not ashamed now. She was staring at his naked upper body. After seeing enough, she moved her buttocks to make room for him. She patted her side position very generously, "Come here."
"....."
Ah Yu's mood was complicated. Was she too naive to understand or she just didn't know, or maybe she knew everything but thought it was nothing?
Advertisements
The little princess had never experienced the love between men and women, but she had heard of it from others.
If the person you love, loves you back, it must be something that makes people very happy.
She couldn't wait!
The Southwest prince went to bed, and when he raised his hand, the candle went out.
The little princess laid on her side holding her breath. Her heart pounded. She waited nervously for a long time, but the man didn't seem to move.
Oh, yes, he should be shy.
Her little hands crawled way up to his body like an ant and reached his waist.
With a 'hiss', he took a deep breath. His cool palm covered the back of her hand, and his hoarse voice sounded, "What do you want to do?"
The little princess looked at him and said, "Have you forgotten something?"
The Southwest prince did not forget. She must be tired today so he didn't make a move. It was rare that the prince showed kindness.
But what she had done now was clearly saying that she did not need pity!
The little princess winked at him, and then cried, "Don't you like me anymore? uwuwu..."
"....."
He did not answer.
The little princess continued, "It doesn't matter. Ah Luan can still suffer this kind of injustice. You don't have to worry about me."
"....."
"Ah Luan doesn't need your hug and kisses. She can be alone."
The man laughed and his hoarse laughter spread from the quiet air.
The little princess looked at him with a good smile. When she came back to her senses, she completely left her heart of shame. "Ah Luan is sad. She's still a little cold. Can you hold her?"
The Southwest prince sighed and took her into his arms as she wished.
"Ah Luan wants a kiss."
The man patted her back patiently, then he clasped her wrist and pressed her under his body. 
His eyes showed a dark light and whispered, "You did this yourself.."
He gave her a chance, but since he was provoked by her, he wouldn't be a man if he could bear it.
The little princess said with a smile, "I'm not afraid."
However, before the next day, the little princess regretted her words.
Pain, sore, and tired.
She was still uncomfortable.
***
In a twinkling of an eye, they were already married for more than three months.
The two people mixed the oil with honey, and their relationship looked very good.
His position in the Taichao hall was a little idle. He had no real power and had nothing to do. When he was free, he would take the little princess to play everywhere.
This winter, it snowed early in the capital.
The little princess especially liked snowy days. She liked to laugh loudly while running in the snow in bright clothes.
The little princess saw him and called him out loud, "Ah Yu! Come here. I've just made a big snowman. My hands are freezing off. "
The Southwest prince held her cloak for her. After hearing this, he could not help laughing, and his eyes narrowed with laughter.
The servant behind him looked at him anxiously. 
It seemed that as long as the little princess said something to her husband, he would be happy. He stepped forward two steps, his warm voice reminded, "Southwest prince, the letter from the Lord arrived yesterday."
At that moment, he saw the smile on the Southwest prince's face stiffened, "I know."
He looked up at the snow.
He knew that maybe he had already loved the little princess.
But in the face of the grand plan, his feelings were insignificant.
He closed his eyes and said in a cold voice, "Let my father rest assured that I will not let him down."
Ah Yu opened his eyes and looked at the smiling woman in the snow. He thought that he might have to kill her himself when the time of the reign changes.
The little princess was naive and romantic.
At that time, a clean death was her best ending.
However, Ah Yu didn't know what was the cause of the pain in his heart.
=============== Chapter 99
They had been married for more than four years. The little princess's life was happier than when she was in the palace. Her parents, brother, and husband love her very much.
Although her husband talked less, he was caring and obedient to her.
The princess was not arrogant even though she grew up spoiled by her father and mother. She was just coquettish.
In the past four years, despite the little princess having a good life, she was unable to conceive. Fortunately, her husband did not seem to be in such a hurry. He even tried to console her, "It's okay. We're not in a hurry to have children."
The little princess was not very happy and said, "But my brother's daughter is already two years old. I also want a daughter."
She likes children very much. His brother's wife had given birth to an adorable lovely daughter.
The little princess felt that she could not listen to Ah Yu's foolish consoling on this matter. She was full of expectation and said, "Tomorrow I will go to the temple with my mother and ask for a divination."
He paused and said, "Okay." then he did not forget to remind her, "The weather is cold tomorrow. Remember to wear thicker clothes."
The little princess put her arm around his neck and kissed him on the face. "You should wear thicker clothes too."
Then she looked at him eagerly and said, "The red plum in the palace will soon bloom. Can you pick one for me when you come back tomorrow?"
He stroke her face softly, his voice hoarse, "Okay."
***
It was the last time the little princess saw her mother when she went to the temple to ask for deviation. She didn't know that her husband had already started to deploy a large army to rebel.
Looking at her innocent daughter, the queen was in a complicated mood. She did not know whether it was a good thing or a bad thing to cultivate her daughter into this kind of temperament.
She was not very satisfied with the Southwest king's family, but as the mother of a country, she hid her emotions very well, even her daughter couldn't see it.
"It's not useful to ask Bodhisattva for a child. If the husband refuses to work hard, you can't have a child even if you kneel and break your knees." The queen spoke quite frankly in front of her daughter.
The little princess blushed and took the incense from her mother's hand and said, "He...he's working hard. I don't know if the problem is with my body...or.."
The empress coldly interrupted her, "You are my baby ever since you are young. No one in the world is more valuable than you. In my opinion, the problem still lies in him."
"Mother, what do you mean?" Asked the little princess, after a moment's silence.
"You know it."
The little princess turned her mouth and said, "He wouldn't be like this."
"You're just stupid."
Now the chaos had started. The border had been repeatedly violated, and there were changes in the Southwest king's side. However, the queen couldn't tell their daughter that they were in both internal and external trouble, and she didn't know how long they could last.
She just hoped that her daughter would have more time to live.
The queen was ready to die. Even if the world would eventually be taken away by the Southwest king, she only hoped to save her daughter's life.
Before returning from the temple, the queen held her daughter tightly, her eyes slightly sour.
"Mother, do you miss me? I'll go into the palace tomorrow and stay with you for a while."
Before the little princess got married, she often slept with her mother.
The queen wiped the water from the corner of her eyes with her handkerchief, and looked at her deeply, "Okay. "
The little princess wasn't able to get her husband's red plum flower, nor was she able to sleep with her mother.
As soon as she woke up, it seemed that the sky had changed.
The Southwest prince sent someone to give a message from the palace–he couldn't come back for a while. The princess's residence was surrounded by soldiers. They all refused to let her go out, let alone enter the palace.
The little princess didn't know what had happened, so she lost her temper and scolded the soldiers.
The little princess couldn't sleep all night. The next night, when her husband was finally released from the palace, the little princess was relieved. Since her father and mother let him go, the rebellion must have nothing to do with him.
Besides, Ah Yu was not a cruel person. He was kind and gentle. He treated everyone nicely.
"You are back at last."
His face was a little white, and some stubble appeared on his chin. His eyes which looked at her seemed to contain an indescribable melancholy.
He nodded. "I'm back."
The little princess held on to his waist."You don't have to worry. It will be okay. "
The Southwest prince was silent.
The rebels were so strong that they had infiltrated the capital in less than half a month.
That day, the Southwest prince wore a crescent colored robe. Before he left, he hugged very tightly, and said, "I will go into the palace and take the emperor and queen out."
The little princess pulled his sleeve. Because she trusted him so much, she said, "There is a secret passage under the bed of my mother's bedroom. Turn the little lion at the head of the bed twice to open the secret passage. The exit of the secret passage will lead to a wasteland five miles away from the capital."
She gave him a kiss on the corner of the lip. "Go ahead and save my parents."
The Southwest prince turned pale as his hands trembled slightly.
The palace guards had been killed by his men a long time ago. Now all the guards outside the princess's residence were all his army.
The Southwest prince went out of the princess's residence and stood in front of his confidant expressionlessly. He said in a cold voice, "Go to the exit of the secret passage."
"What should I do after I catch them?"
"Just kill them."
His confidant was taken aback and was stunned for a moment before he immediately accepted the order, "Yes!"
His heart was made of stone.
At that time, the Southwest prince thought that his love for the little princess was not deep.
There was no hesitation in a moment's decision.
When it was time to kill, he didn't even think twice.
Advertisements
He felt that the little princess was the same as the kittens he had raised before, and he would not be sad for long.
In his eyes, love was not worth mentioning.
Ah Yu led a group of people to the gate of the city. He killed the general who was guarding the city himself and immediately opened the gate to welcome the troops of the southwest into the capital.
The Southwest troops who killed numerous people were unstoppable.
The Southwest prince did not expect that the prince would go to battle in person while wearing armor and holding a longsword in his hand.
"Prince, you can't stop this."
"I am the crown prince and I will never surrender to the unruly officials and thieves."
There were so many people in the East Palace, and his sister was also there.
He couldn't run away and he couldn't back down, even if he's dead, he had to meet him.
His murderous spirit was raging.
The Southwest prince raised his sword, and the bloody tip of the sword pointed straight at the prince's heart. "That's good. My people won't have to search for your whereabouts."
The prince rarely lifts the sword. He was naturally not on par with him in terms of sword skills. After more than ten moves, the prince couldn't hold on and was struck several times.
There was a strong smell of blood in the air.
The Southwest prince stabbed his knee, and the prince's warm face distorted in pain.
The prince's highness was half-kneeling on the ground and tried to prop up his body with his sword. The corners of his mouth overflowed with blood and suddenly he whispered, "Please spare my sister's life."
It was the first time the prince asked for help.
Before he could get a reply, his head was cut off by the deputy general on the side of the Southwest prince. 
The head of the prince was regarded as a trophy. They hung his head on the flag to boost their pride.
"Southwest prince! This subordinate caught two more people outside the secret passage."
A very beautiful woman and a shivering little girl in her arms.
The little girl knew the Southwest prince. When she saw a familiar person, she dared to speak, "Uncle."
These were the prince's wife and his two-year-old daughter.
He remembered that the little princess liked this child very much and even wanted to give her a lot of things on New Year's Day.
He took the child out of the princess's arms and touched her face, "Are you afraid of me?"
"I'm not afraid to see my uncle."
"Well." He pulled up a smile and gave the child behind him. The princess fell on her knees and cried.
Before long, the cry gradually faded until it stopped completely.
The Southwest prince couldn't remember how many corpses and bones of mountains he had piled up.
***
Unless she saw her husband, the little princess would not believe any word that the commander of the guard said.
She was forced to follow the commander to run from the back lane to the palace. The corpses on the way made her sick and nauseous. She couldn't run. Her feet were soft and she fell to the ground. 
Her delicate body trembled violently as her eyes stared at the bodies on the ground.
It was her sister-in-law and her only two-year-old niece.
The little princess crawled over, shaking her hands to wipe the blood on their faces. She looked down at the two familiar faces, and the sound of her wailing and weeping overflowed her throat.
Her voice was hoarse.
The commander pulled her up. "Princess, come with me." After a pause, he said, "All these people were killed by the Southwest prince."
Although he did not kill them personally, it was his command.
How could he have the heart to kill a two-year-old child!? How could he??
The little princess's voice was hoarse for a long time. When she was tied to the wall, she saw the unfamiliar and terrible man. She looked at the indifferent expression on his face, watched him take the bow and arrow with his own hands, and watched him point the arrow at her heart.
Then she watched him kill her without any hesitation.
The little princess had a clear distinction between love and hate.
The moment it struck her, she smiled.
Even if he didn't kill her, she wouldn't be able to survive.
It was just really painful to be killed by the man she thought loved her.
The pain she experienced in this life...she wished she would never love him in the next life or forever.
***
The Southwest troops successfully captured the country. The Southwest king announced that the fatuous emperor was dead and the extravagant royal family was all cut by the sword.
The Southwest king changed the country name to Liang, and Ah Yu granted the title of the crown prince of the country.
(T/N: Ah Yu was the prince of the Southwest border then later became the prince of the nation as the Southwest border took down the monarchy in the capital.)
After the bloodbath in the palace, the Southwest prince went to see her body. Even if she fell from a height, her face was still peaceful, it was no different from when she was sleeping.
He touched her face and laughed. "You are still beautiful."
His heart was numb. He couldn't tell what's wrong.
He gently put down her body, "I'll bury you. After a hundred years, I'll be buried with you."
***
On the day he sealed the crown prince title, the red plum in the palace had bloomed again.
It seems that he had not smiled for a long time. After gaining power, he had never really smiled. There was no happiness in his life.
The people who served in the palace were very discerning. No one dared to mention the little princess in front of him.
When he came out of the hall, the eunuch desperately flattered him, "The plum blossom in the imperial garden had just bloomed. Would you like to go and have a look?"
He said, "Let's go and have a look."
The plum blossom was beautiful. He folded a branch and looked at it silently for a long time. 
He remembered that night, the little princess asked him to break the branch and give it to her.
When he blinked, two drops of water quickly flowed from his cheek to his dark robe.
The Southwest prince wept.
The eunuch was so surprised that he lowered his head and pretended that he didn't see anything.
He held the plum blossom, and his voice was hoarse. "I don't like plum blossoms. Remove all of them in the palace."
"Yes."
No one dared to disobey his orders.
The eunuch thought to himself that this prince didn't like a lot of things.
He didn't like plum blossoms, didn't...like winter, and especially girls who liked to act coquettish.
"Let's go." But after only a moment, he returned to normal, and there was no trace of sadness on his face.
The eunuch was anxious to go back to the hall, but after two steps, the man in front of him suddenly vomited a mouthful of blood.
=============== Chapter 100
After a year, winter had arrived and it snowed heavily for several days in the capital.
Sitting outside the hall, eunuch Liu watched the emperor cough and sighed heavily. He bowed slightly and opened his mouth. "Your highness, the medicine will be cold if you don't drink it."
The emperor often gets typhoid fever in winter, but he never likes to drink medicine. The medicine that was made for him was always thrown away.
Even eunuch Liu, who was waiting on the emperor's side, couldn't understand the emperor clearly and couldn't guess his thoughts.
As the beloved youngest son of the late emperor, acquiring the throne was simple. Many people knew that the emperor had been married to the princess of the previous dynasty for nearly four years.
Eunuch Liu was very clear about the old story. The emperor killed the princess of the previous dynasty with his own hands. He also never let anyone mention her name.
However, the first thing he did when he ascended the throne was to confer a posthumous title to the princess of the previous dynasty as queen and to move her remains to the imperial mausoleum.
The remains of the princess of the previous dynasty had long been gone. What laid in the imperial mausoleum was nothing but her ashes.
Everyone thought that the new emperor was pretending, for fear that he would be scolded for a hundred years by the citizens, and that he would have a bad reputation for killing his wife.
However, eunuch Liu felt that the cold-hearted emperor seemed to have some true feelings for the little princess.
In the year that the southwest king had just won the throne and the southwest prince had just become the crown prince, eunuch Liu had seen him cry with his own eyes.
However, he would keep this secret to his grave.
Eunuch Liu still remembered that day the emperor looked at the red plum tree and suddenly vomited blood.
He looked for a doctor to see the emperor's condition, but when he came back, the emperor was gone.
When the eunuch came to the princess' hall, he heard a slight sound, like a low sob, more like a cry of regret and sorrow.
The eunuch felt that he had become crazy and his ears had started to hear weird things. How could the emperor cry? To the point that he was really in pain?
He couldn't help but walk over slightly and opened a crack in the door and looked in.
He saw the noble and cold emperor half kneeling on the ground, holding a pile of books in his hand. The emperor's eyes were at a loss as if his soul had taken away from him.
It was the first time that the eunuch Liu saw the emperor's grievance face. The emperor's tears couldn't stop falling from his eyes. He seemed to be unable to stand upright then he slowly bent down, sobbing.
He was horrified and backed a few steps, not daring to look any further as he secretly left the princess' hall.
Later, eunuch Liu learned that the books were written by the emperor and the princess when they were husband and wife.
The eunuch sympathized with the little princess in his heart, but ah, the cruelest fate was the emperor.
He walked the bloody path.
And had discarded his love.
Eunuch Liu stayed for a whole night until the sound of coughs in the hall gradually stopped at dawn.
He brought hot water into the room to wait for the new emperor to wash and change his clothes. Yu Guang glimpsed the medicine bowl at the head of the bed. The bowl full of medicine was not passive.
He brought hot water into the room and waited for the emperor to wash and change his clothes. The eunuch caught a glimpse of the medicine bowl at the bedside. It had never been touched.
The emperor was pale and haggard.
The snow hadn't stopped outside.
Looking at the snow, the emperor said, "It's snowing again."
Eunuch Liu said with a smile, "Yes, it had snowed all night and hasn't stopped yet. The pure color of the snow is so beautiful."
"She loves snowy days."
Eunuch Liu didn't know who the "she" in the emperor's mouth was, so he pretended to be stupid and said, "You can make a snowman in the snow."
"Yes."
The emperor was silent again.
She not only likes snowy days but also likes building a snowman. She likes to run barefoot in the snow while laughing as she shouts his name.
She would never give up until he left the room.
His heart was dead.
He had already died after he killed the little princess himself.
The emperor was in a rare mood to go out for a walk. There was no red plum in the palace for a long time and there were no flowers in his sight that time/
He stood by the pond for a moment when he suddenly heard the sound of weeping from behind the rockery.
The emperor stood with his hands on his back, frowned, and said coldly to the eunuch behind him, "Go and see what's going on."
"Yes."
After eunuch Liu took a look, he saw a girl curled up on the ground with red eyes.
Eunuch Liu's eyes were sharp. He could see what kind of plant the girl was playing with. He sighed, "Who are you? How can you be here?"
The little girl stood up. "I came out of the Empress Dowager's palace. The snow was so heavy that I was trapped here. I hope you can help me."
Eunuch Liu didn't want to talk nonsense with her so he said, "Lady, you'd better go back."
The emperor hates seeing naive and coquettish girls.
And the lady in front of him is extremely fake
The girl didn't give up. She passed eunuch Liu, got out of the rockery, and saw a man who was like the wind and the moon.
Her face turned red, and before she opened her mouth, she heard the man in front of her said coldly, "Eunuch Liu, send this person out of the palace, and also, find out who sent her. "
"Yes."
The lady's face turned white as she heard this sentence.
Advertisements
Eunuch Liu didn't even sympathize with her. The emperor was able to deal with his wife who he shared the same bed. He would not be soft-hearted to others.
***
The emperor had not been back to the princess's hall for a long time. It had been preserved as it was. He had never set foot once in these years.
He always dreamt of the little princess. He dreamed that she was smiling happily as she called his name.
Then he would wake up with tears.
He knew that he could never forget her.
In these four years of marriage, he had a very happy life. He stayed with her, even if he didn't do anything special, he was very happy.
He destroyed it with his own hands.
He got up from the bed and lifted his hand to wipe the tears from his cheek.
He really couldn't stand it. It seemed that he was not as happy as he imagined he would be after having acquired the throne. It was boring.
He didn't even have time to put on his shoes when he went outside to the princess's hall. He could even remember the interior layout with his eyes closed.
He didn't care even when there was dust on the bed as he laid on it and covered himself with a quilt.
There was a letter under the quilt, he pulled the letter out, and saw the familiar handwriting.
The little princess's handwriting was not good. He taught her for several years before she could correct her mistakes.
The little princess's handwriting was somewhat like his, but hers was more beautiful.
He tremblingly opened the envelope. The paper inside already had a yellowish hue.
After reading the letter, tears welled up in his eyes while he sobbed.
He laughed like crazy as the moonlight poured into the room. He swept the sword on the desk, got up from the ground, and moved forward.
He held the hilt of the sword–his pale face could be reflected from how smooth the blade was.
The man knelt on the ground as he stabbed the sword into his heart. It was painful. The pain was as if his heart was being torn.
A huge amount of blood trickled from his chest while his body fell in a blink of an eye.
He, himself, destroyed his happiness.
He killed the person he loves the most.
He couldn't blame anyone.
It was him who was vicious.
It would be nice if there was the next life.
The man's sour eyes could no longer shed tears and his neat clothes were already covered by his blood.
The man slowly closed his eyes, his head filled with her smiling face.
He wanted...
He wanted to reach out and touch her.
He really wanted to.
***
The emperor didn't die. Even if the sword exhausted his whole strength, even if the sword stabbed straightly into his heart, he still did not die.
He couldn't die.
***
When he opened his eyes, he found himself lying in the bedroom of the imperial palace. He could not even find any traces of wounds in his body.
"How did I get back?"
Eunuch Liu knelt and said, "Your highness, you went out alone?!"
The emperor seemed to be drained of all his strength at once.
He couldn't die even if he wanted to.
From this day on, every night the emperor would dream of the past–the smile of the little princess and the words she had said.
In the dream, they would still be husband and wife, those events had not happened.
But when he opened his eyes, he would return to reality.
Cold palace, cold people.
People believed he didn't love his wife.
Yes, deep love couldn't be determined easily by the naked eye.
She had become an indispensable part of his life.
She was the only star in his dark world.
He thought of her every day, and every time he remembered, he would be torturing himself.
As for what was written in that letter?
It was probably a letter written by her a long time ago. He lied to her by saying he had to go back to the Southwest to visit his grandmother, but in fact, he went back to the Southwest to deploy troops and prepare for rebellion.
It took months.
She didn't complain. Even though she had written a letter, she didn't send it to him.
The silly little princess said in the letter, "Ah Yu, I miss you."
The merciless person was fatally moved.
Death would be a luxury for him.
His heart was already bloody.
When the little princess died, she had probably felt pain more than him.
=============== Chapter 101
Eunuch Liu was already very old. In two years, he would be resigning from the palace's duties to recuperate.
He dozed off as he guarded outside the hall. As soon as he narrowed his eyes, he heard the sound of anger coming from inside. The emperor's voice was a little hoarse. Eunuch Liu felt that his voice revealed despair.
A big fire last night burned the princess's house cleanly.
There was nothing left.
The emperor was in his prime, but there was not much life in his eyes. On the contrary, he looked as if he was tired of the world. He was not in good health and was ill for half a year.
Sometimes, eunuch Liu thought that the emperor was very pitiful. He was lonely and didn't even smile for all the years he was with him. It seemed that there was nothing worthy that could attach him to this world.
But whenever eunuch Liu had this idea, he felt that he was crazy. The emperor was the noblest person in the world. What could he not get? It was funny, he was a eunuch who dared to sympathize with the emperor.
It was late at night, and the snow that had formed and gathered on the ground two days ago turned into water. The cold air came in and hurt his knee.
When the door of the temple was opened, eunuch Shangshu came back from the hall with a sad face and sighed.
Eunuch Liu said, "The road is slippery. You must be careful when you go back to your house."
"Thank you for reminding me."
Eunuch Liu asked in a low voice, "How is the emperor?"
Upon hearing this, eunuch Shangshu's face was even more ugly, and his brows tightened. "It's not so good. You should be careful when you go in to serve."
"Naturally, I will."
"Why did the princess's hall burn up? It's strange." eunuch Shangshu couldn't help complaining.
Eunuch Liu also felt it was strange. He nodded and said, "Yes, I haven't seen such a strange thing in my life for so many years."
Since there were guards stationed outside the princess hall, people couldn't enter. 
The fire was even more raging. It was too strange. It didn't wait for people to put it out, and so, the whole princess' hall was burned, leaving only the ashes.
Eunuch Liu had been serving the emperor for more than ten years. He had not seen the emperor so sad for a long time. The emperor was cold-blooded and heartless and it seemed that he would never be sad in his lifetime.
But yesterday, when he saw the emperor's grievous eyes, it distressed him.
Eunuch Liu had known for a long time that the princess who died early had a different place in the emperor's heart. Sometimes when the emperor was asleep, eunuch Liu could hear him calling the name of the little princess in his dream.
If he wanted to live in the palace, he had to learn to keep his mouth shut.
Eunuch Liu never said this to anyone else.
The emperor didn't have any intention to accept a concubine. Even the empress dowager, who was devoted to Buddhism, began to be anxious. She convinced the emperor several times but had no way to change him.
Only then did the empress dowager send someone to invite eunuch Liu over, inquiring secretly and wanting to know something from him. But eunuch Liu never mentioned the things he knew to the empress dowager.
Eunuch Liu squinted his eyes and sighed heavily as he looked at the distant figure of eunuch Shangshu.
***
He wanted to forget the little princess.
The sweet memory of the past had become a source of pain in his heart. The past that he dreamed of every night dream seemed to gouge his heart like a knife that had ripped it to pieces.
He couldn't make a sound of pain.
He didn't even have something from her to mourn over. The calligraphy and every possession she had was burned to ashes.
God didn't leave anything for him.
He felt that this seemed to be god's punishment for him. He got the kingdom he wished, but he was no better than a corpse.
He had no wife, no son, and lived a lonely life.
Now the past that he shared with her had been completely burned by a fire.
He had been driven mad and exhausted by all means to collect all the masters in this world, just to get the next life with her.
The emperor dreamed again.
But in the dream, it was not the years when he married her. It seemed to be a strange dynasty.
He saw the domineering little princess and that she despised his other-self. He saw that they got married unwillingly and saw him kill her.
He knelt on the ground, his eyes seemed to be dripping blood, sobbing, "No, no, no..."
There seemed to be an ethereal voice in the distance. The man asked him, "Do you want to have an afterlife with her?"
He nodded.
"Even if you'll kill her?"
"I will. "
He wants her. He won't kill her.
"Even if she never falls in love with you?"
The man said obstinately, "Yes."
The voice seemed to smile. "Remember, after three generations, you will never meet again. You will only live with all your memories, even if it is, are you willing?"
The man chuckled in a low voice. His voice was hoarse. "I'm willing."
He had to taste all the pain in the world over and over.
The emperor was heartless. He had acted every vicious means alone. He should taste all the mistakes made by his ruthless self before himself.
The emperor woke up, opened his eyes, and was still lying in his bedroom.
Eunuch Liu went into the palace and reported, "Prince Anding and his princess daughter have asked to see you."
Advertisements
Prince Anding was his elder brother, and he only came to the capital to meet the saint every year before the new year's Eve.
"Let them wait in the side hall."
The emperor changed his clothes and went to the side hall to meet prince Anding's family.
Prince Anding brought his daughter into the palace for the first time. The five-year-old girl was held in the arms of his father. Her face was round and fleshy, and her features were beautiful.
He watched the little girl in the arms of prince Anding for a while, but his heart felt empty. He smiled for an unprecedented time, fearing he would scare the little girl. He squatted down and asked, "How old are you?"
He remembered that at that time when she was still alive, she wanted a child very much. If he didn't use means for her not to conceive, their children would have been so lovely.
The little girl seemed to be a little afraid of him. She shrank into her father's arms, hid her face, struck, and did not dare to speak.
Prince Anding answered this question on behalf of her daughter, "My daughter is five years old."
The emperor looked at her and said, "This child fits my eyes. She can stay in the palace in the future."
Prince Anding naturally did not want to, this was their beloved little daughter. How could they be willing to leave her in the palace? But since the emperor had spoken, the prince didn't discuss it with him.
The little girl in his arms understood what the adults were saying and cried out loud.
Prince Anding was heartbroken by his daughter's crying. He summoned up his courage to look at the emperor and said slowly, "My daughter is naughty. If she stays in the palace, she may cause trouble, or..."
Before he finished speaking, he was interrupted by the emperor.
"If she does something wrong, I will not punish her."
Prince Anding also saw that his younger brother was determined to keep his daughter.
The emperor didn't know what he was going to do. After the little girl was left in the palace, he sent many maids to serve her, but he didn't come to see her.
He knew that what he was doing was meaningless.
He didn't know when his death, which he had longed so much, would come. It would probably be a long time.
When the emperor had free time, he would always stand on the wall and look into the distance. Eunuch Liu stood behind him, often not knowing what he was looking at.
What was he looking at?
The emperor just wanted to see how he killed her with his own hands. Standing on the tower, she could be seen from below very clearly.
That day, the little princess desperately looked at him. Watching her beloved husband take the arrow without hesitation and killed her.
The emperor opened his mouth and chuckled twice. Looking at the boundless night, the emperor suddenly asked eunuch Liu standing behind him, "Can you shoot arrows?"
Eunuch Liu replied, "I am not skilled and can't shoot arrows."
As a eunuch, he had no other ability except to read people's behavior.
He couldn't do archery.
The emperor seemed disappointed and sighed, "What a pity."
He wanted to let eunuch Liu stand under the tower and kill him with an arrow.
Eunuch Liu didn't understand what the emperor planned to do.
At night, the wind was strong and it made the weather cold.
The emperor turned around and said, "Let's go."
Eunuch Liu followed him. For a moment, he felt that the emperor wanted to jump from above. He was shocked by his absurd idea.
The emperor was ill again after he spent hours outside at night. He slept for a long time, but he never dreamed again. His mind was blank.
When he woke up, his eyes were at a loss and he tightened the sheets under his body. His clean and handsome face could be described as ferocious.
Seeing that he looked pale, eunuch Liu went up to him and asked, "What's the matter, your highness? Should I call the imperial physician to have a look?"
The emperor shook his head. "No need."
He still didn't dream after sleeping again at night.
The past that was once firmly imprinted in his mind was gone. The sweet smile of the little princess that haunted him every time gradually faded away.
Even though he tried hard to remember those few sweet times, he couldn't do it.
Those memories were like flowing water. They were suddenly gone.
His memory of her that was slowly fading scared him.
He only remembered those times when he deceived her and killed her with his hands.
He had to think over and over again how he had decisively killed the one he loved.
Killing her requires punishment.
He striked little princess's heart with his own hands, and now his own heart was being dug out by himself.
He tasted it every day.
Those painful memories made the emperor lose weight quickly.
The palace was often filled with the smell of medicine. The emperor who once had excellent facial features laid on the emperor's bed with a weak breath.
Even during his serious illness, the picture of killing her flashed through his mind repeatedly.
Eunuch Liu heard the whimper deep in the emperor's throat. Thinking that he was too ill, he was about to call the imperial physician. 
He unintentionally swept the water droplets that fell from the corner of the emperor's eyes.
Eunuch Liu thought the emperor was in sorrow.
He didn't know what the emperor dreamed of to make him miserable.
Eunuch Liu heard the emperor's weak voice in bed.
The emperor's throat felt heavy as he whispered, "I want to die."
"I want to die."
=============== Chapter 102
It had just rained last night, the muddy water splashed the wheels as it drove by the path.
With a sound, the carriage almost hit the big rock in front of it, and Ayun woke up from sleeping all night behind the carriage. Her back was aching and she couldn't help but let out an ouch.
Shen Yan's eyes went cold as he quietly put the dagger around his waist, and then ordered the coachman to stop the carriage.
Ayun was bewildered. Her heart beat very fast. She thought that the carriage was stopped by Li Han. She shook her body and tried her best to shrink herself into a small ball, closed her eyes, and dared not to look out.
If Li Han caught her this time, she really wouldn't be able to live.
Shen Yan appeared quietly behind the carriage. He pulled the drive board and saw a person curling up.
He frowned. The person turned out to be a woman.
Shen Yan's hand that was holding the dagger gradually relaxed. His tone was cold as he asked, "Who are you?"
Ayun tremblingly opened her eyes and looked up at the tall and lean man in front of her. She stuttered, "I, I accidentally climbed up. I just want to sleep...you can rest assured that I will leave immediately."
She hugged the bag in her arms, which contained silver. She climbed out of the carriage and bowed deeply to the man. "Then I'm going."
Shen Yan said coldly, "Where are you going?"
Ayun thought that any place was better as long it was far away from the capital. But, she decided to lie to the man since she had just met him. She coughed twice and said, "I plan to go to the south of the Yangtze River. I heard that there are outstanding people there."
Shen Yan glared at her, "Do you know where it is now?"
Ayun didn't know where it was.
She shook her head honestly.
Shen Yan looked at her face and felt that he had seen her before, but he pressed down his doubts and said, "It's almost at Yumen pass."
Ayun looked up at him with a silly face and asked, "Where is the Yumen pass?"
"..."
***
Shen Yan didn't know why he wanted to bring this unknown woman with him. Maybe it was because she looked familiar.
Although Ayun didn't know where it was, she thought this man looked very reliable and had a face that won't harm people.
However, she did not let go of her guard. She was still carrying the bag of silver when she went to bed at night, for fear that the money would be robbed by others.
If she had no silvers, she had to go back to the palace.
The first night she escaped the palace smoothly, Ayun had a good sleep.
After she stayed with Shen Yan, Ayun found that Shen Yan seemed very busy and often disappeared. Ayun heard people call him with respect.
It turned out that this man was an official.
Ayun usually did not dare to go out casually, for fear of repeating her previous mistakes.
Shen Yan came back before the sky went dark.
Ayun had never seen him come back so early. She showed up in front of him with a cheeky face and asked, "Is the Yumen pass far away from the capital?"
Shen Yan looked at her with complicated eyes and said, "Far."
Ayun couldn't wait to ask, "How far is it?"
"Very far."
"Good, good."
Since it was far away, Li Han should not be able to find her.
Shen Yan lowered his eyes and said, "If there's nothing else, I'll go back to my room first."
Ayun waved her hand. "Then you go back first. Don't worry about me."
The man walked two steps before he turned around and stood in front of her. "Don't run around and you'll be safe."
Ayun was at a loss. Shen Yan never cared about her or even asked about her affairs. Why did he begin to care about her today?
She did not know that her portrait was spread across the country, and not just in the capital. Even Shen Yan received her portrait this morning.
No wonder he thought she was familiar.
Shen Yan just stared at the portrait in silence and returned from the government officials ahead of time.
***
Ayun thought that Shen Yan didn't like her very much since he didn't even talk to her.
As long as he didn't drive her out, it didn't matter if he didn't like her.
Ayun also wanted to move out, but she vaguely felt that it was safer to live in Shen Yan's yard.
She had stayed two months in total without going out. She had been very careful.
After a long time of not going out, she now felt bored.
Ayun remembered that Shen Yan said that this place was far away from the capital. And it had been so long, Li Han might have stopped looking for her.
Ayun wanted to go out, even if it's just to breathe and feel the wind from outside.
That day, she took out a piece of silver from her bag and prepared to go out for a walk.
However, as soon as she got to the gate, her collar was caught. The man stood behind her, glanced at her, and said, "Where are you going?"
Ayun pointed to the door and replied truthfully, "I want to go out and have a look. I haven't been out for two months."
She was obedient, cautious, and as timid as a mouse.
Advertisements
But if she held it any longer, she would suffocate.
Shen Yan sighed, loosened her collar, and said, "I'll go with you."
Ayun replied with a smile, "That's also okay."
Shen Xun found her a face towel and handed it to her, "Cover yourself."
Ayun didn't think deeply of it and covered her face obediently.
The city was very small, with only a slightly lively street. After a short visit, Ayun felt bored and followed Shen Yan into a restaurant.
The people living outside the capital area were a bit sturdy.
People here drink more refreshingly than those in the capital. Ayun held a bowl and stuck out her tongue to lick a small amount. The strong taste of wine made her mouth ache.
Shen Yan frowned. "If you can't drink, don't drink."
Ayun replied, "Since I can't drink, I have to learn it."
She raised her neck and gulped down half a bowl of wine. Her round eyes looked at the man sitting opposite her, "Why don't you ask my identity?"
After a moment's silence, he pursed his lips and said, "I know who you are."
Ayun was dumbfounded for a moment and thought that the wine was wrong. She opened her mouth, "What do you mean?"
Shen Yan thought that this little girl was very similar to his youngest sister. She was a bit stupid.
He said, "Your portrait has long been pasted on the wall." After a pause, he said, "But you are clever since you can slip out of the palace."
Ayun pointed her fingers towards herself and said, "Are you sure it's me?"
Shen Yan murmured, pursed his lips, and said, "I don't know how long you can hide here, but I'll remind you that this world is full of his men. Sooner or later, you had to go back."
Ayun herself knew that the world belonged to Li Han. Since childhood, what could this person not do?
But she was not reconciled, why did she need to listen to him in everything?
Ayun bit her lips and said, "I know you're telling me this for my good, but I don't want to surrender to him."
Now that he had reminded her, Shen Yen did not intend to say more.
Ayun was also too lazy to talk to him. She held the wine jar and started drinking.
Knowing that she was angry, Shen Yan let her drink and watched her fill her stomach with wine. Her cheeks were reddish and her ears were pink.
She was lying on the table, delirious and saying, "I like him."
She giggled. After a while, the smile on her lips gradually fell back, and suddenly patted the table heavily. She said in a loud voice, "But he is too vicious!"
"Li Han is a bastard! Son of a bitch!"
Shen Yan listened quietly, reached out, and pulled her up from the table. After thinking about it, he carried her limp body on his back. "You're drunk."
"Oh, Lord Shen, will you marry me? Shall we kill Li Han together?" Ayun deliriously said.
Shen Yan's eyes didn't even move as he said slowly, "No, I don't like you."
Ayun said, her words were elongated, "Yeah, I'm not a good enough person."
She completely closed her eyes. "But in the future, I must ask Li Han to kneel and apologize to me. I need him to cry and beg to me so that he would never dare to do anything bad to me again."
Shen Yan smiled lightly, she was still dreaming.
But she was probably the only one who dared to call the emperor's name.
Shen Yan carried her to the residence. He was also a young master and had grown up with a silver spoon. He was unfamiliar with making the beds.
After struggling for a long time, he only took off her shoes and managed to tuck her into the quilt. He put out the candle fire and was just about to withdraw when he heard the person behind him say, "Is the gate tightly closed?"
He left the bedroom, closed the doors, and stood under the eaves before he looked up at the cool moon, and sighed.
The sleeping woman in the room did not know that the man was already on his way.
=============== Chapter 103
The reason why Ayun could escape the palace was that she learned to be smart.
She was obedient for some time before finally convincing Li Han to let her go out of the palace with him.
Her obedience was just a facade. In the middle of the night, she sneaked away while Li Han was sleeping. As soon as she got up from the bed, she didn't even have time to put clothes on before Li Han opened his eyes, looked at her with a sneer, and said, "I knew you were pretending."
His tone was filled with mockery. He had the confidence that was telling her she couldn't jump out from his palm no matter what plans she used.
Ayun glared with her round eyes and clapped his hands angrily, "You think I'm pretending just so you can bring me out?"
Li Han said with a smile, "So you still plan to lie to me?"
He looked at her with sharp eyes, as if eager to eat her.
Ayun raised her chin, gritted her teeth, and said, "It's amazing."
She used to be a quick-witted person, but when she was cheated by Li Han's gentle image, she had turned into a person that couldn't speak so well.
Ayun was getting ready to get out of bed, but her ankle was pinned by him and was pulled back mercilessly. The man's voice was heavy as he asked in a cold voice, "Where do you want to go?"
Ayun's courage grew stronger outside the palace and her eyes shot wide open. "Why do you care where I want to go? I want to go somewhere where I can't see you, a big hypocritical liar."
Whenever she was angry, she could scold him viciously. The hypocritical liar was the lightest one from the list of scoldings she did.
Li Han hated her swearing the most. Once she said it, he would clean her up.
"Where else do you think you can go? Next time if you try to fool me with your pathetic appearance, this emperor will not let you go."
Ayun sneered, "You're an animal. You're not an emperor."
Li Han was angry in his heart, but his face was expressionless. He held her wrist tightly and pushed her to the bed. "Do you think I am an animal?"
Ah Yun was so angry that she said everything in her heart. "You lied to my family, cheated me, and killed so many people. The worst person I've ever seen is you. I was a fool. If I knew you would be such a person when I was a child, I should have sold you to the slave traders. Then I will be able to save all the people that you harmed!"
Li Han, with a cold face, clasped her pair wrist and held it upon her head. He knelt on her waist and looked at her from above. His face was a bit twisted. "Your mouth still doesn't remember all the lessons I taught you."
Ayun knew what he was going to do. She kicked him hard, got up from the bed, and pointed to him, "Don't come over."
Li Han looked at her icily and approached her step by step.
When she was then caught by him, she mercilessly struggled, scratching and pinching him. Finally, Li Han became fiercer and pressed her directly on the bed, so she was unable to move.
Ayun touched the vase beside the bed after a long time. After knocking the vase on his head, he was fine for a while before he fell over unconsciously.
Ayun breathlessly threw him on the ground, calmly robbed all the money on his body, and took advantage of the moonlight to covertly climb over the wall.
After tossing and turning, it was already dawn. Ayun hid in the gate of the capital and dared not to move around. Without a guide, she couldn't get out even if she wanted to.
A carriage stopped at the corner. While the coachman went down to eat, she crept up to the back, shrunk into a small ball, and covered her body with a pile of rags.
The carriage swayed all the way, and she was between asleep and awake.
It was only two months since she had settled.
Li Han himself came to the door, and the moment Ayun saw him, she was not scared.
Li Han still strangely spoke to her, and his handsome face seemed a bit vicious. "You are more promising than I thought."
"You tried to kill me. You felt better thinking I was long dead."
When her voice fell, Li Han's face suddenly sank. He sneered several times before he slowly uttered word by word, "I want you to die?"
***
Ayun lowered her head and didn't even want to look at him. She just stared at her toes and didn't say a word.
Li Han's cold fingers pinched her wrist bone. "Interestingly, you crossed the Yumen border."
Ayun warned herself that she must hold back. Li Han talked nonsense as if he was mocking her. She didn't want to listen to him nor give any replies to his sharp words.
She raised her face. "It's really good. The men here are much better than those in the capital. You don't know how happy I have been in these two months!"
She lowered her voice and said in silence, "I will not go back with you."
The man was silent for a long time and squeezed her wrist. "Do you hate me so much?"
"Yes, you're disgusting."
She used to like him very much, but Li Han was too vicious to her, and those injuries had penetrated her bones.
Li Han suppressed the pain in his heart and said, "Even if you hate, you still have to stay with me."
"I'm already married to someone else." Ayun curled her lips and lied to him.
Li Han's eyes became cold. His tone was also cold by three points, "Who did you marry?"
Ayun didn't change her face and lied, "A very young businessman. It's good enough for me that he has money at home."
Li Han stared at her, "You talk well."
Ah Yun was smiling as she looked at him with a smile. She looked like she was in a good mood and pretended to be surprised. "What's the matter? Don't you like it? Do you think I can't marry?"
She looked at Li Han's face that became more and more ugly. Her heart was not flustered but felt a little relieved.
Without blinking her eyes, she opened her mouth and began to talk nonsense. She touched her stomach with an affectation. "Two months is long. I am not only married to him, but the baby in my stomach is already a month old."
Li Han listened in silence, his fingers curled up slightly and then burst out laughing. "You've only been here for a few months. Do you think I'll believe this?"
Ayun just wanted to be angry with Li Han. She didn't have any hope that he would believe her made up lies anyway.
"Oh, then don't believe it."
***
Ayun thought that Li Han would be the same as countless times before, and would take her back fiercely. If she dared to go on a hunger strike, he would starve her for a few days. If she still dared to run around, he would be locked up.
Li Han's means were never new.
Advertisements
Ayun waited for several days and found that he was like a changed person. Since he appeared, he had not mentioned taking her back. Even the number of times he appeared in front of her decreased.
Ayun felt that Li Han was brewing a big plan and had no good intentions.
Li Han also lived in Shen Yan's courtyard, but Shen Yan, the original owner of the yard, moved to live in the government office.
Shen Yan asked her a meaningful question before leaving. "Do you remember what you said after you were drunk that night?"
Ayun was at a loss, trying to recall the events, but still didn't have any clue.
Shen Yan stood by and waited. Knowing that she couldn't remember, he sighed, "You want me to marry you."
"..."
Before Ayun could take a breath, Shen Yan said, "If you really want to marry me, I can marry you."
The first thought that flashed through Ayun's mind was that Shen Yan was crazy
She blurted out, "I was trying to use you, you know?"
"..." Shen Yan said, "I know that you don't like me."
Ayun said with a smile, "I thought you were serious."
Shen Yan's clear eyes fell on her face. Suddenly, he reached out to touch her cheek. He was still sensible, knowing that making a move on her was not good, so he endured it.
He also answered truthfully, "He asked me to come and test you."
"..."
"He said that if you really want to marry, he is willing to fulfill you."
Ayun asked incredulously, "Really?"
Shen Yan smiled, "Of course it's fake."
"...."
After she was startled, Shen Yan said in a joking tone, "If you agree, he will kill me."
So it was hopeless to think that Li Had had become pure and good.
"He has always been like this," Ayun said in a low voice.
Shen Yan had never been nosy so he didn't ask any questions.
That night, Li Han quietly appeared in her bedroom. There was no light in the room. She could not see anything.
The man stood in front of the bed and said, "Do you like it here?"
"Yes."
Li Han said, "Don't you want to go back to the capital with me?"
He was an emperor. He couldn't stay outside for a long time. He would have to go back in these two days.
Ayun shook her head. "I don't want to go back."
Li Han nodded, "Okay. If you don't want to go back, don't go back."
That night, Ayun was still asleep when she was carried to the carriage back to the capital.
This man says one thing but does another.
She was the only woman in his life who had ever moved his heart.
His way of loving was wrong, and he had to learn to compensate.
What he did before was just to keep her.
On the carriage, the woman who fell asleep was lying on his legs unguarded. Li Han's fingers caressed her cheek, "We're back."
It was like when they were still young. She would take his hand and smile at him, "It's dark. If we don't go home, mother will scold us both."
"Let's go home together."
=============== Chapter 104
Li Han didn't like Ayun when he first saw her. That time in winter, she had worn several padded jackets that made her look like a rolling fat ball.
She was held in the arms of her mother, and her face was tightly buried. She was coaxed by her mother for a long time before she raised her face to look at him, her eyes were arrogant.
He could tell at a glance that this girl was thinking.
After he moved into her house, Ayun gave him trouble at first. She was not much bigger than him, but when she spoke, she used the tone of disciplining younger generations, which was annoying.
Li Han thought that she was a smart person at first, but she was so easy to cheat. If he just smiles at her, he can easily deceive her.
The night before he went back to the capital, he stayed in her house.
The next morning, he appeared in front of her room. There was silence for a long time before he asked, "Would you like to come back to the capital with me?"
When her family died in an accident, she cried so much that her eyes turned red. 
After thinking for a long time, she nodded and agreed.
After arriving in the capital, she had fully relied on him. Her dependence on her family seemed to disappear overnight.
She became timid and cowardly. The death of her parents left a big blow to her heart. Although he knew he should not feel this way, Li Han still felt lucky.
She was deeply dependent on him.
Li Han also had her in his heart. Although they quarreled more and more as time went by, he had never been attracted to other women in his life.
Ayun stayed in the capital for a long time, and her courage gradually grew stronger. She also gradually became cheerful and wanted to go out and make new friends every day.
And Ayun was a person who couldn't defend against other men. Because of her beautiful appearance, she always attracted some eye-catching men around her.
He was small-minded and didn't want to let Ayun go out, but he couldn't find any reason to limit her.
After all, at that time, he was just a less favored prince. He couldn't make his own decisions about his marriage, let alone marry her.
Every day, the maidservant would always report that the girl climbed over the wall again to play.
Li Han was able to endure it at first until he came back from the palace and saw her shy and timid appearance hiding in the corner of the wall with other men.
Li Han stood in the back door impatiently waiting. When Ayun reluctantly entered the room and saw him hiding behind the door, she was frightened.
She patted her chest, her cheeks flushed, "Why are you standing there? You scared me."
Li Han sneered, "You only have other people in your eyes. How can you notice me?"
"You saw that?" She looked at him anxiously then expectantly asked, "What do you think of him?"
Li Han smiled uncertainly at her, "He's not so good. If he really likes you, how can he do something privately with you? It's because you just lost your parents that you're vulnerable."
He shouldn't have mentioned Ayun's parents, which were a scar in her heart.
Whether she wanted to cry or not, she just held back her tears. "You're the only one who thinks of others so badly."
"Do you like him enough to the point you can protect him? Girls in the capital never meet men in private."
"I'm not from the capital. I just talked to him. What's the matter? I didn't do those shameless activities."
After returning to the capital, Li Han rarely had the time to have such childish quarrels with her. However, they neither agree with each other nor could convince one another.
Each quarrel intensified the distance between them.
Later, the man Ayun liked got married. Her eyes were red and swollen and she was very sad.
It was at that time that the relationship between the two became better.
After becoming the emperor, Ayun seldomly talked to him and she was even afraid every time she saw him.
***
Ayun's head was dim throughout the journey, and she didn't know what Li Han had given her. She couldn't open her eyelids and couldn't wake up.
She consciously slept the whole ride, and when she was sober enough, she had already arrived in the capital.
Li Han's approach to her wasn't surprising. Doing this despicable thing wasn't his first time.
She came back to her palace again. Li Han seemed to know that she would be angry and didn't visit her for three days.
Not seeing Li Han motivated her to eat two more bowls of rice every day.
It was a pity that Li Han would not let her live a long and free life. If this man had nothing to do, he would go and make trouble with her. insist on having dinner with him, or just say a few words.
However, Li Han's tone of voice was not very good every time he talked. When they sit together for dinner, and after only a few three words from him, Ayun would get angry and throw her chopsticks.
"Do you know that Song Luan praised you for your ability after hearing your escape?"
Ayun said, "Did you tell her that you brought me back after you knocked me out? If she knew, she would praise you for your ability."
"I'm just repaying a tooth for a tooth."
She knocked him out before she ran away.
Ayun was blocked by his words and couldn't eat. She had no appetite.
Li Han was in a good mood. His eyes narrowed slightly, and the corners of his eyes were crescent-shaped. "Why did you throw away your chopsticks and stop eating? I just told you the truth. Why did you dare to do it?"
He took a sip of the soup and pretended to continue, "I haven't settled with you on this matter yet. Are you afraid?"
Ayun said that she was not afraid, but that was just a bluff. Li Han was cold-hearted and ruthless and could do anything.
Maybe he wouldn't torture her, but he would surely torture the people around her.
She was anxious for several days until heavy snow arrived in the capital. Li Han became busier than usual since it was approaching the end of the year.
Song Luan went into the palace with her baby in her arms that day. Ayun knew that she came to pick up Lord Zhao.
Ayun looked at the child in her arms and her heart softened. She couldn't help but poke the child's cheek with her fingertips and asked, "How old is he?"
Song Luan smiled. "Five months, very naughty."
Advertisements
Ayun took the rattle drum in his hand and held the child, saying, "But I know little Zhao very well. He doesn't like to talk."
"So it's okay for this younger brother to be naughty." Song Luan squinted.
The child seemed to like the rattle in her hand very much. He cried with his mouth wide as it drooled with his crystal clear saliva.
Ayun took out a handkerchief to clean the corners of his mouth and showed him a kind smile.
Song Luan coaxed the child and asked her, "I heard you escaped again?"
Ayun blushed and nodded, "This time I've escaped far."
"How far is it?"
"I don't know." She thought about it carefully and then asked, "Do you know where the yumen gate is? That's where I went."
Song Luan pondered for a long time, "It's really far away."
Two people who hadn't seen each other for a long time talked for less than half an hour before Ayun saw a man with an umbrella coming to pick up Song Luan.
Ayun looked at the picture of the three of them walking in the snow in the same umbrella and felt envious.
She had always been afraid of the cold and was reluctant to go out when it snows. She liked to stay in the house, holding a hand stove filled with hot water, lazily lying on the soft bed, while reading books.
After dinner time, Ayun thought Li Han would not come over tonight so she took off her shoes, socks, and clothes and climbed into bed.
With a bang, the door was pushed open.
The man's collar was covered with snow, and his whole body was covered with cold air. He walked towards the bed with a big stride. Without saying hello, he lifted the quilt and pulled her out of the bed, saying, "I'll take you out to make a snowman. "
Ayun quietly took back the quilt and said impatiently, "I am cold, I want to sleep."
He pulled her out of the quilt, found a cloak to wrap her up, and then he grabbed her hand and went out.
The snow outside had accumulated a thick layer, Ayun's feet were slow and reluctant to follow him. Her heart suddenly moved then she grabbed a snowball and smashed it boldly on his back.
Li Han was smashed by a snowball but he didn't react much.
Ayun then hit him with a lot of snowballs from one to another, and then she covered her mouth and laughed secretly.
Li Han suddenly turned around, clasped her wrist, and pressed her in the snow, his pair of black eyes staring at her.
Ayun blinked, and almost at the same time, the man lowered his head, held her face in his hands, and imprinted a trace on her lips.
After her mouth was bitten by him, she pushed him away unwillingly, panting and blushing, "Don't kiss me."
"I haven't forgiven you yet."
"I don't want to continue liking you."
Without saying a word, Li Han pressed her on the ground again, pinched the tip of her chin, and deliberately chuckled in her ear. "So sweet and delicious. I don't want to quarrel with you in the future. I just want to kiss you."
"It doesn't matter if you don't agree. It doesn't matter. "
Li Han's strong and domineering style would not change. Ayun kicked him with her toes and murmured, "Oh, you're nothing to me."
She couldn't beat him. She couldn't fight him nor could she run away.
But it would be good if she could kill this man.
=============== Chapter 105
When Zhao Nanyu married Song Luan back then, he didn't think too much about it when the struggle between the daughters of the Song family included him. In fact, at that time, his mind was still vaguely conscious, and he was not completely delirious.
On the contrary, it was the woman under him, with flushing complexion and tears in the corners of her eyes, and her weak and boneless hands tightly wrapped around his neck as she rubbed against him vigorously, saying that she was very uncomfortable.
At that time, Zhao Nanyu felt that if he had to get married, it seemed that the woman in front of him seemed to be pretty good.
He didn't feel that he was taking advantage of others, and Zhao Nanyu even thought that the most arrogant young lady of the Song family was also interested in him.
After their affair, her sisters led people in to see the scene. Zhao Nanyu dressed calmly, covered Song Luan with quilts, and earnestly said that he would be responsible.
At the moment when he turned his head, Zhao Nanyu saw the woman in the quilt crying, and her tears constantly slipped from her eyes. She cried so hard that it seemed like she couldn't live anymore.
Zhao Nanyu sighed in his heart. It turned out that he had guessed wrong. The young lady of the Song family didn't like him. Maybe she had a lover in her heart, which made her very sad.
But they already did the deed, even if she was reluctant in her heart, it was useless.
Back then, Zhao Nanyu thought that if they got married in the future, he would treat her very well and make her forget her lover.
On the day of marriage, Zhao Nanyu was happy in his heart, but his mood had always been restrained, and no one could see much emotional change on his face.
She was beautiful and gorgeous.
Her face was hidden in the red cap. Zhao Nanyu led her out of the carriage, and the faint fragrance reached the tip of his nose.
After the wedding ceremony, Song Luan was sent to the new house.
The younger generation of the Zhao family originally wanted to visit the bridal chamber, but Zhao Nanyu stopped him.
Zhao Wenyan secretly pulled him aside and asked him in a low voice, "Second brother, shouldn't you be happy?"
Zhao Nanyu nodded, with an imperceptible smile hidden in the corner of his eyes. Because he had been filled with several glasses of wine, his original jade white face was slightly red. He said, "I am in a good mood."
Zhao Wenyan also obviously drank a lot of wine and was drunk when he spoke. He then said with a smile, "They all said that you don't like the bride. They say that you are forced to get married, but only I know that you like her."
The drunk brother lowered his voice and whispered to him, "I've seen my sister-in-law. She's so beautiful. The girls in the capital are not as good-looking as she is."
Zhao Nanyu pursed his lips and said, "Yes."
When he entered the new house, the woman on the bed had already taken off the red veil by herself. Unlike the beautiful girl that day, she had a cold face as she looked at him faintly.
Zhao Nanyu's heart seemed to have been thrown into a basin of cold water. He stabilized his mind, walked slowly over, and asked in a soft voice, "What's wrong?"
Song Luan glanced at him, and her words were harsh. "I don't like you. It's not my wish to marry you. Don't touch me, and we will have our own separate lives."
Anger, resentment, and jealousy.
The anger in his chest almost couldn't be suppressed, and his heart kept falling.
Zhao Nanyu had not been so sad for a long time.
He said with a cold face, "Okay."
Zhao Nanyu also has self-respect. He didn't want to force others who acted difficultly. Now it didn't matter. It's not unbearable to treat each other as guests.
However, shortly after their marriage, Song Luan found that she was pregnant. At that time, Zhao Nanyu was very happy. He thought that the ice-cold relationship between them could finally be eased.
Song Luan, who became pregnant afterward, began to treat him better.
It was rare that Song Luan gradually began to ask about him.
Song Luan was born spoiled and was loved by her family since she was a child. She was very charming and had little temperament. Zhao Nanyu was just a nobody in the imperial court at that time and didn't have much power or money.
He was still not willing to treat her unfairly. In terms of food, clothing, shelter, and transportation, he had given the best he could give.
Song Luan's stomach got bigger every day, and her temper got worse. She threw things easily. One time when she fell, she cried because of how dirty the ground was.
Zhao Nanyu squatted down and collected all the dirt on the ground. Standing in front of her, he listened patiently to all her sobs. After a long silence, he took out a handkerchief from his sleeve and gently lifted her tearful face, and wiped away the tears on her face.
"Okay, okay...don't be sad."
Zhao Nanyu had never coaxed people before. He was still a bit stiff when he said this.
Song Luan suddenly threw herself into his arms, hiccuping as she talked, "I'm so miserable that I don't want to have more children in the future."
"Good. No more."
Even after a long time, Zhao Nanyu still recalled that the time when Song Luan was pregnant was the most peaceful time they spent.
She became a little dependent on him, and they were not as strange as before.
At that time, Zhao Nanyu thought that they could live such a stable life.
In the blink of an eye, the day Song Luan gave birth had come. As soon as he returned from the court, he heard the servant girl say, "Madame has started."
Both the room and the midwife were prepared for Song Luan to give birth at ease.
Zhao Nanyu stood outside the house quietly listening to the cry inside. He squeezed his fingers as his face turned white gradually.
It was only when the sun was shining that Zhao Nanyu heard the cry of a baby coming from the room. He took a deep breath before his heart fell steadily in the air.
After Song Luan fell asleep, the midwife took the baby and said with a smile, "Congratulations, it's a healthy young boy."
He just glanced at the baby and didn't reach out to hold it. "I see"
The child was still too young to see what he looked like.
Other than looking like a crumpled ball, it's ugly.
After giving birth, Song Luan's full attention was focused on the child. But she couldn't take care of herself, how could she take care of a child?
Every day, Zhao Nanyu was in a hurry to look for a maidservant to watch over the baby, but Song Luan didn't like the idea.
That day, he went into the palace for a banquet. When he came back, it was already the evening. The maidservant ran to him in a hurry and said, "Madam, she...madam fell into the water today!"
"How is she?" He asked eagerly.
The housekeeper gasped and said, "Fortunately, she was rescued in time. The doctor had seen her and said she will wake up soon, but it's been almost an afternoon, and madam still has not woken up."
Advertisements
Zhao Nanyu had no time to blame others. When he saw her pale face lying on the bed, his heart suddenly felt pain.
He watched over her all night. Song Luan seemed to have a nightmare and kept talking nonsense, all of which he could not understand.
The next morning, Zhao Nanyu waited until she woke up.
His voice was very hoarse and not very pleasant, "You woke up."
Song Luan slowly sat up from the bed, looking at him strangely with a hint of hatred.
In a trance, Zhao Nanyu felt that he was wrong.
Song Luan raised her hand and touched her face, as she all of a sudden, burst into tears.
Zhao Nanyu was startled, took her hand, and asked, "What's wrong?"
Song Luan stopped her tears and looked at him colder than that night of her wedding. She pointed to the door, "I don't want to see you now. You go out."
Zhao Nanyu was silent for a moment. "Then you have a good rest. I'll go out first."
He thought that Song Luan was just making trouble for a while, but in the following days, she would not hide her hatred towards him at all.
Song Luan's eyes wrote her hatred for him.
She didn't even want to take care of the child and gave the baby to the maidservant to take care of.
It was not that Zhao Nanyu hadn't lowered himself to seek peace and coaxed her, but it was Song Luan who didn't appreciate his efforts at all.
Zhao Nanyu thought, maybe if she didn't like him now, she could like him in the future.
Song Luan's change intensified, and before long, she began to hook with other men outside.
One after another, she humiliated him with bitter words.
Zhao Nanyu endured all of this and when she was cruel to their child, he stayed silent.
His hatred that had accumulated over the years broke out at the moment he saw her hugging other men.
Zhao Nanyu poisoned her. 
When he got the poison, his heart was numb and calm. He laughed but didn't know what he was laughing at.
Well, maybe he was laughing at this thought–how did they become like this?
Zhao Nanyu was sitting in his study, half of his face covered in the dark. There was no light in the room. The maidservant knocked at the door and lowered her voice for fear of disturbing him. "Madam went out again."
Zhao Nanyu snorted coldly, "Stop her, don't let her go."
The maidservant wiped the sweat from her forehead, "But... But..."
The maid servant's words were not finished when Song Luan rushed into the room, "Why won't you let me go? Huh?"
"I am your husband."
"I want to go out. What can you do for me?"
"Try it. I won't allow you to go out."
"Zhao Nanyu, don't go too far."
"Song Luan." He looked at her, and then said, "You should be restrained."
Don't take advantage of his remaining feelings to hurt him so unscrupulously.
Song Luan was stunned for a moment but then burst into a smile. "I'm not."
Zhao Nanyu shook his head slightly. It had been a long time since she had smiled at him.
He looked down and murmured, "I won't let you go."
=============== Chapter 106
Glossary:
Zhao Zhi – Official name of Little ZhaoZhao Shi – Official name of Er Bao
In a twinkling of an eye, Zhao Zhi was nearly 14 years old.
He and his younger brother were the only two children in the family. Over the years, his father would try to persuade his mother to have another daughter, but his mother wouldn't agree.
Over the years, Zhao Zhi remembered that his father rarely acted against his mother's will.
His parents looked like they were in love, but as the eldest son, Zhao Zhi could see clearly that his mother did not seem to have much affection for his father.
Every day, his father would go straight to his mother's house. They looked very close to each other, but he always felt that his father wasn't in his mother's eyes.
However, he didn't tell anyone about this matter, even his younger beloved brother.
He was eight years older than his younger brother, and Er Bao was only six years old this year.
Zhao Zhi went to the academy and bought some cakes that he liked to eat before returning to his house. After looking around, he did not see Er Bao and only saw her mother sitting in her yard playing with her bonsai plant.
Zhao Zhi looked at his mother's back for a while, walked over slowly, and called softly, "Mother. "
Song Luan put down her scissors. "Oh, you came back from school."
Zhao Zhi nodded, "Yes." Then he pointed to the withered bonsai on the ground and asked, "Are these flowers dead again?"
Song Luan was a little depressed. "Yes, I take care of them every day. Why are they still dead? I can't save them.."
Zhao Zhi snickered a smile. His mother didn't know how many pots of flowers she had raised and her technique of raising flowers in these years had never changed.
He said, "Otherwise, leave these things to the maidservants."
Although Song Luan said that she would never raise flowers again, she acted more honestly than anyone else. She shook her head and refused, "I don't want that. Mother thinks it can still be raised well."
"Good." He put down his cake and asked, "Where's brother?"
Song Luan pointed to the poplar tree in the yard, "Your brother is in the tree."
Zhao Zhi was amused and helplessly said. "Why did he go to the tree again?"
Song Luan also wanted to laugh when she mentioned Er Bao. "Didn't that tree bear a lot of fruit last year? Your brother climbed and said he will stay in the tree until next year. He said he will eat those fruits and grow as tall as you."
Zhao Zhi couldn't help laughing. "I'll go and take my brother down."
Song Luan shook her head, "it's no use. I can't call him down."
But Zhao Zhi said I'll go and have a try."
At the age of 14, Zhao Zhi was already a boy with an excellent appearance and lean figure. His facial features are more like his father's, and his silent and cold nature is also like Zhao Nanyu.
Zhao Zhi walked slowly to the tree and looked up at his brother, who was holding the branch. "Er Bao, come down."
The little boy hugged the branch, curled his mouth, and said, "I can't come down. I want results! With fruit, I can be as tall as my brother. "
After listening to his childish words, Zhao Zhi was still very helpless. "If you hang on that branch even for ten years, it will not bear fruit."
"How do you know?" Er Bao asked.
Zhao Zhi said, "I just know."
After thinking about it, Er Bao asked, "Did you also hang in the tree when you were a child?"
"..." Zhao Zhi raised his eyebrows and said, "I didn't."
"You haven't tried it. How do you know you can't? Brother, you are so stupid. Don't teach me badly."
"...."
Zhao Zhi thought that his younger brother would be as lovely as he was when he was a child. The only thing that worried him was that he was too naughty.
Zhao Zhi raised his hand and waved the cake to the boy hanging high in the tree. "If you don't come down, you can't eat it."
Er Bao licked his lips as if moved by the cake Zhao Zhi brought. When he was about to speak, a cold voice came from afar.
The man was dressed in a dark imperial suit and his face was cold. He probably had just returned from the palace. He looked at the boy in the tree with a sneer and said, "Don't come down until the year has passed. I'd like to see what kind of fruit you will produce."
Zhao Zhi called respectfully: "Father."
"Well, have you finished your homework?"
"Finished."
When Song Luan heard that he was cruel to their son again, she went over and pinched Zhao Nanyu's waist. "Don't be so cruel to him every time. He won't like you."
"I don't need him to like me."
A little brat who only knew how to give him trouble.
Er Baotian was not afraid of anything except for his father.
He sucked his nose and wouldn't dare to come down. "Father is going to kill me, wuwuwu."
Zhao Nanyu sneered, "I really want to beat you once you come down."
Song Luan sighed, "What's the matter?"
In recent years, this father and son often fought. They didn't treat each other as family, but more like enemies in a previous life.
Zhao Nanyu's voice softened a lot when he spoke to his wife. He said to her, "He pissed off all the students in the academy."
Song Luan was stunned for a moment, and then immediately laughed sweetly, "Er Bao is talented."
Zhao Nanyu: "...."
Zhao Zhi: "...."
Er Bao was finally pulled down from the tree. He took a careful look at his father and hid behind his brother as he said, "I will never dare to do it again."
Zhao Zhi silently blocked him and said, "Father, since younger brother knows that he is wrong, don't punish him."
Advertisements
Song Luan nodded, "If a person knows their wrongs, they can correct it. "
Zhao Nanyu glanced at Er Bao and said, "Do you know what you did was wrong?"
"Mm-hmm." Er Bao looked like garlic, his eyes were insincere.
Zhao Nanyu snorted coldly and said, "Go to the study and copy the scriptures ten times. If you can't finish, you can't have a bowl of rice."
"Oh."
Er Bao grieved while he entered the study. Zhao Zhi was with his younger brother in the room, and then remembered that he left his book in the yard.
As soon as he went out, he saw his father take his mother's hand and whisper in her ear. He didn't know what he whispered that made her blush and speechless.
Zhao Zhi consciously avoided his sight and did not dare to see more.
Sometimes he would think, was it his illusion? He felt that his mother didn't love his father.
If she didn't love him, how could she stay with him for so many years?
In terms of love, Zhao Zhi felt that her mother was indifferent towards his father.
Only he and Er Bao were the only ones she cared about. His mother seldom cared about his father's affairs and did not concern herself much about what he had done and where he had gone.
Although Zhao Zhi had not married yet, he also understood the relationship between men and women, so he shouldn't be like his father and mother.
Song Luan turned her back to Zhao Nanyu with anger and slapped his hand away. "Our son must have seen it."
Zhao Nanyu wanted to hold her hand but was mercilessly thrown away. He coaxed her by lying, "No, he couldn't have seen it."
Song Luan stamped her feet, "Can you not do it in broad daylight next time!"
Zhao Nanyu said, "Okay."
He didn't know how many good words he had said.
But it didn't work at all.
Song Luan was still very angry. She knew little Zhao in her heart. He was already 14 years old and almost reaching adulthood. How bad would it be for the child to see this kind of scene!?
"Didn't you always want to see fireworks? There will be fireworks on the tower tonight."
Song Luan had already made up her mind not to talk to him anymore today. Hearing this, she couldn't help but move her mouth: "What day is today? Why did they set off fireworks?"
Zhao Nanyu was silent before he said, "Maybe because the emperor is in a good mood, so he decided to release some fireworks."
Song Luan said, "Well, I will go by myself. I don't want to go with you."
Zhao Nanyu grabbed her little palm, chuckled, and said, "This is not good."
Song Luan chuckled dryly. "I'm going with my son. I don't want you anymore."
"Luan Bao has a cruel heart."
Song Luan pinched him fiercely but didn't have any strength. Zhao Nanyu didn't feel any pain at all. She blushed with shame, "Speak well."
"Don't you like what I call you?"
"No."
Zhao Nanyu poked her in the forehead and chuckled, "You're lying."
You like it.
He also liked it. Every time he spoke her name like this, there would always be the smell of sweet and honey.
Luan Bao, Luan Bao, she was his Luan Bao.
***
When Zhao Zhi went to his father to ask about his homework, he ran into the scene where his parents were very close together. In the past years, he had met them in these kinds of positions many times by accident, and he had been able to deal with it indifferently, without his face getting red.
His mother sat on his father's lap, with a brush in her hand, and asked the man behind her, "Is this how you paint?"
His father looked at the woman in his arms with lingering eyes, Yes."
Zhao Zhi heard his mother complain in a low voice as if getting angry coquettishly.
"My hands are tired and I don't want to draw anymore, and painting is really hard to learn."
"Then don't learn."
Every word in the room reached Zhao Zhi's ears. He walked forward two steps, raised his hand, and knocked on the door, "Father."
"Come in."
Song Luan stood up and looked at his son, who was already taller than her. She laughed and said, "I'm going to pour you a glass of water. "
After consulting about his homework, Zhao Zhi turned around and found that her mother had fallen asleep while lying on the table. The warm sunlight fell on her face appropriately. She looked serene and beautiful.
Zhao Nanyu lowered his voice and whispered to his son, "Go out. Be careful and don't disturb your mother."
"Yes."
While closing the door, Zhao Zhi saw his father gently holding his mother from the chair and into his arms, caressing her cheek with his fingers, and dropping a kiss between her eyebrows.
Zhao Zhi knew that no one could match his father's love for his mother.
=============== Chapter 107
Even if it was winter, it didn't feel cold at all because the stove kept burning.
Whenever this season came, Song Luan would be reluctant to go out, preferring to lazily shrink inside her room and not go anywhere else. But when the weather was good, she would go out of the yard to bask in the sun.
Zhao Nanyu became busier after being transferred. Sometimes when he comes back, Song Luan would have already fallen asleep and wouldn't even know that he had come home.
Song Luan wakes up and remembers that Ruan Sheng is coming. Near noon, Ruan Sheng leads her little son into the room.
Song Luan woke up, remembering that Ruan Sheng was coming over. 
Ruan Sheng took her youngest son to Song Luan's residence at near noon.
The little boy stood by his mother's side obediently. His face was very delicate, fair, and clean.
Song Luan squatted down, took his hand, and asked, "Why didn't you bring your sister here?"
"My sister is still sleeping."
Song Luan couldn't help touching his head. "Then why didn't you wake up your sister? Maybe she wants to come and play. "
The child's mouth slightly bulged up and didn't speak.
Song Luan found that the child's temperament didn't resemble Zhao Wenyan's. His father's temper was not good. He was arrogant and domineering.
How could his children be so sensible and obedient?
Maybe Ruan Sheng taught them well.
Ruan Sheng was four months pregnant again.
Song Luan looked at her flushed face and thought that she must be so happy to have two adorable children. Although Ruan Sheng's husband sometimes had a child's temper, he was still very good to her.
"Do you want a daughter or a son?" She asked. 
Ruan Sheng replied, "Daughter."
Song Luan laughed and her eyes narrowed, "I like a daughter, too."
Ruan Sheng didn't think much about it. She just looked at her and asked strangely, "Since second sister-in-law likes a daughter, why don't you have another one?"
Er Bao was already eight years old. Even if second sister-in-law wants to take care of her own children, she still would have the energy to do so.
Song Luan was in a daze for a moment before she regained her consciousness. She lowered her head and fiddled with her finger. "Ah, I just thought about it...I'm afraid of pain. "
She was not afraid of pain. She just couldn't say the exact reason.
Ruan Sheng nodded and agreed, "It's really painful to have a baby."
The more Song Luan saw little Jun, the more she liked him. She held him in her lap and told the servant girls to prepare snacks for the child. She asked, "Do you like to eat these? If you don't like it, I'll ask them to prepare something else. "
Little Jun looked at it and nodded, "I like it."
Song Luan hadn't held such a clever child for a long time, so her heart softened. She kneaded a piece of cake and handed it to his mouth.
The child didn't resist as he let her feed him two pieces.
The house was very happy. Soon, Zhao Nanyu came back from the palace.
Song Luan was still holding little Jun with a smile and asked, "Why did you come back so early today?"
Zhao Nanyu looked at her, then his eyes fell on the child in her arms, and said in a low voice, "I have to go to the palace again for dinner."
"Oh."
Zhao Nanyu pinched her soft face and laughed, "You're going too."
Little Jun felt that the second uncle's eyes were not very kind when he looked at him, so he unconsciously went down.
Song Luan still wanted to hold little Jun, but the child already hid behind his mother's back.
Seeing his appearance, she couldn't force him.
Turning around, she said to Zhao Nanyu, "I don't want to go."
What could he do with her? She had nothing to do with Zhao Nanyu's affairs.
At the moment, Song Luan didn't want to talk to him. She continued to tease little Jun and played with him for a while.
Zhao Nanyu seemed to see her thoughts and kindly reminded her, "You can't let Er Bao see you holding other children, or he will get angry with you for several days."
The child's temper was more stubborn than the donkey's. If he gets really angry, no one could coax him.
Er Bao doesn't cry if he's in a bad temper. He just wouldn't smile and would ignore them.
Ruan Sheng was also embarrassed to disturb them for too long. It was enough to be able to meet and talk. 
She wanted to take her child back.
No matter how long had passed, Ruang Sheng was still scared whenever she saw her second brother-in-law.
Er Bao went straight home after school and saw little Jun. But seeing that they were about to go home, Er Bao reluctantly said goodbye to little Jun.
Song Luan just wanted to laugh and asked, "Er Bao, do you like your older brother*?"
[T/N: *She's talking about Little Jun]
"Yes."
"Why do you like him?"
"He is obedient." Without waiting for Song Luan to speak, he continued, "He does whatever I ask him to do. Very good!"
"..." After thinking about it, Song Luan felt she had to say something to him, "Don't bully your older brother."
Advertisements
"Mother, don't worry, I won't."
"I have never bullied anyone! I'm so good, aren't I!"
"..."
Song Luan couldn't laugh or cry. She was afraid that he had forgotten. Because his cousin snatched one of his brushes, he fiercely pressed his cousin, who was taller than him, on the ground and beat him.
At that time, both children were injured.
Er Bao's injury was lighter, while his cousin's face had scratches.
***
No matter how Zhao Nanyu coaxed Song Luan, she still refused to go to the palace for a banquet.
"Isn't one of your little sisters in the palace?"
"I saw her last month."
"I'm afraid it will take longer for the banquet to finish."
"Then you go. Why do you want me to go?! It's cold outside."
Zhao Nanyu sighed and asked, "Are you really not going?"
"No, It's better to play chess with my little Zhao at home."
"But you can't beat him"
Little Zhao's chest skill is very good. Song Luan couldn't match him as an opponent. He often would make a deliberate mistake so the match would take longer.
Song Luan was not very happy to hear this even though she knew Zhao Nanyu was right.
"What's important is not whether I win or lose, but if I had fun or not."
"Good."
What's good?
Without waiting for Song Luan to react, Zhao Nanyu directly picked her up and took his cloak to cover her body. "Let's go."
Song Luan remembered that Zhao Nanyu had not done such shameless things to her for a long time.
She was so angry that she was forced to go into the palace with him. She didn't have a good face standing by his side.
Zhao Nanyu's teases were all useless, "Really angry?"
Song Luan frowned and said, "I'm not."
Zhao Nanyu had intentions as to why he forced her to go, but couldn't tell her now.
After a while, Song Luan's anger almost dissipated.
After turning around twice, she found a familiar figure.
The young man has a long and slender body. It felt lonely and cold by just looking at his back. 
He was surrounded by two young women, both staring at him eagerly.
When the young man moved a step, the two young women would also move a step.
Song Luan looked at the interesting scene and couldn't help laughing. Zhao Nanyu suddenly appeared behind her and asked, "What's the smile about?"
Song Luan pointed to the other side. "You see, little Zhao is surrounded by two young women. Our child is old enough to experience this love."
Little Zhao was already 16 years old, but there was still no woman around him.
Song Luan would never arrange marriages for her son. Fortunately, she knew that her son is pure-hearted and didn't seem to want a woman.
Zhao Nanyu smiled helplessly, "If he wants to, no one will stop him."
Song Luan sighed, "Although I can't count how many girls like our son, I still haven't seen a woman that he likes. What should he do if he goes on like this?"
The mother was very worried.
Zhao Nanyu saw that Song Luan was worried about this thing. He thought that little Zhao seemed more obedient and sensible these days...
However, words of comfort still need to be said, so that Song Luan would not think about it for several days.
"Don't worry. He's just a little more reserved. He doesn't necessarily like it. "
"Okay."
Song Luan reluctantly believed his words.
Little Zhao also seemed to notice the sight behind him. He turned around and saw his mother looking at him with a smile in her eyes.
He was a little embarrassed and did not know how much his mother saw and heard.
Zhao Zhi's ears were all red.
The girl standing on his left called out and pointed to him, "Why are your ears red? Don't be shy. I won't say that I like you next time."
The little girl who spoke had a round face with bright features and vivid expression.
Zhao Zhi frowned and walked in the direction of his mother.
Song Luan took his hand and asked him with a smile, "Who are those two young women?"
Zhao Zhi replied truthfully, "The youngest daughter of King Anning, and the other is the Imperial Concubine's daughter."
Song Luan looked at him with a smile, and then asked, "Then the one you were talking to?"
After thinking for a moment, Zhao Zhi replied, "King Anning's daughter "
Song Luan said meaningfully, "That child looks beautiful and outstanding."
His son probably had good affections for that girl, otherwise, he wouldn't mention her.
Zhao Zhi lowered his eyes and said, "Well, it's not bad."
She's just a little noisy.
Too much talking made his ears hurt.
Song Luan saw the younger daughter of King Anning looking at this side eagerly, but she did not dare to move at will. She looked a bit aggrieved while she stood in the same place.
Song Luan patted her son on the shoulder. "Go ahead."
Zhao Zhi blushed, "I'll go and make it clear to them."
"If you like her, don't hide it. Tell her."
"I don't like her."
Song Luan didn't believe it. "You can lie to me, but don't lie to yourself. "
Zhao Zhi didn't know if he likes the little daughter of King Anning. He disliked her noisiness, but he thought it's good to have a woman like her around him.
But his heart was empty, and he always felt something was missing.
He lacked feelings.
He didn't want to force it.
Zhao Zhi walked up to her and said so many words to her for the first time, "Little princess, I have no love for you."
It's straightforward.
The little princess got angry at him and cried. The Imperial Concubine's daughter was no better. 
She could see that this outstanding young man did not have eyes for as well.
After Zhao Zhi finished speaking, the stone in his heart finally fell. When he returned to the hall, his eyes searched for his mother's figure.
All of a sudden, she heard people standing in the dark talking.
"Why did Lord Zhao's wife just pass out?"
"I don't know."
"I just came over there. Of course, Lord Zhao's face was pale, and was very scared. After seeing the doctor, what did you think happened?"
"What's the matter?"
"She seems to be pregnant."
What did they say next? Zhao Zhi couldn't hear clearly.
His tense expression eased a little.
That seems to be good news.
At that moment, Zhao Zhi felt that his mother also had some love for his father.
=============== Chapter 108
The house was as cold as an ice cellar in the deep winter.
Huaijin was beaten again since he was not obedient and tactful enough. He couldn't bear those disgusting hands every time.
It felt greasy and disgusting.
Huaijin shrunk on the bed, his brows were lifeless, his face was pale, and there was no blood color on his lips.
He had been hungry for several days. His thin clothes barely covered his bruises. 
There was a sharp dagger on the head of the bed, which he had stolen.
Huaijin shook his hand and held the dagger. He wanted to end his life himself.
But before he could do that, the wooden door slammed and was kicked away.
The visitor looked at him contemptuously, and said to the people behind him, "Wash his face and show him to the third lady of the Song family."
Huaijin had no strength and could only let them dictate at their disposal. He quietly put the dagger into his sleeve.
It was the first time Huaijin saw Song Luan. She was the most beautiful woman he had ever seen since he was sold to the capital from Nanman.
Song Luan had a faint fragrance, unlike the smell of other Rouge powder, which made him want to vomit.
She was wearing a bright red dress as she looked at him from above. Her eyes were light. She squatted down, her jade white fingers gently pinched his chin and lifted it. Huaijin heard her say, "I want this little boy."
That year, he was only 16 years old. Huaijin knew that he was beautiful and delicate, otherwise those people would not force him to serve others.
The leader of this slave building never touched his face when he hit him because many people like his face.
Although Huaijin had always hated his face, it was the first time that he thought he looked good. 
It was also a good thing.
If not, Song Luan would not like him.
Huaijin later knew that Song Luan had been married for a long time. She spent three thousand liang of silver to buy him out and gave him a courtyard.
Song Luan was very kind to him. Huaijin could also see that she has no love for him. She might be very lonely and just wanted to find someone to relieve her boredom.
Huaijin couldn't do anything. He suffered a lot because he couldn't read. Song Luan saw that he was cheated often because of this, so she suddenly said with a smile that she wanted to teach him to write and read.
Outsiders say that she was arrogant and domineering, but Huaijin didn't think so.
Song Luan was gentler than those he had ever met, especially when she was teaching him to read and write.
Huaijin learned very quickly. She taught him how to write by herself. Song Luan looked at his calligraphy gloomily as she laughed, "Little Huiajin, you are so clever. You are so much smarter than me."
There was one time that Huaijin hugged her waist and wanted to kiss her.
But he was pushed away by Song Luan.
He could see that Song Luan was not happy. 
She was not happy every day that he saw her. Her eyebrows were covered with faint sadness. 
Only when they were drunk would Song Luan smile at him.
Huaijin heard that Song Luan and her husband had a bad relationship, and they treat each other like strangers. He didn't understand how anyone could be indifferent to a woman like Song Luan?
She was so beautiful when she laughed.
Huaijin endured for a long time, but finally said the question from the bottom of his heart, "Do you like your husband?"
Others told him that Song Luan didn't like her husband at all.
Others told him that Song Luan had more than one man and also raised a lot of chicks outside.
Many high-ranking officials and dignitaries in the capital were her guests. She would hook up with anyone who had power.
Huaijin didn't believe a word of these rumors.
There was one time that Song Luan's husband came to the door in a rage. When he looked at them, their eyes were almost frozen to death.
He heard the man say, "Song Luan, it doesn't matter if you hurt me, but you should always be careful about our children."
Song Luan raised her head and said scornfully, "I will not."
The man finally walked away in anger. Huaijin found that she looked at the man's back with sorrow and joy. It didn't look like she didn't care.
Huaijin even felt that she had her husband in her heart.
Song Luan did not come to him after a long time. He was worried and thought something was wrong with her.
He hurried to the Zhao residence to find her but was beaten by the Zhao's servants before he could even enter.
Huai Jin found out after inquiring about it that she fell sick and had not woken up after sleeping for several days.
Huaijin was a very stubborn person. He waited for several days in the corner of Zhao's backyard and finally found the opportunity to climb over the wall.
He met Song Luan as he wished, but he felt that there was something different about the person in front of him.
Song Luan was alienating him.
Huaijin was a little sad but didn't say it.
He went to the corner every day as if waiting for a chance to see her.
In Huaijin's heart, she saved his life. Without Song Luan, he would have killed himself with a dagger that winter.
Before, Huaijin wanted to take Song Luan back to Nanman. He thought she would like the place.
Huaijin watched Song Luan's relationship with her husband get better every day. He also knew that Zhao Nanyu's murderous intentions towards him were getting worse.
Song Luan never came to his yard again. Even the gold and silver jewelry hidden in his house was not taken back. It seemed that she was really going to abandon the past and live a good life with Zhao Nanyu.
Advertisements
Huaijin was happy for her, but he thought that being with Zhao Nanyu was unreliable.
A few months later, he went to the pub to buy wine and heard other guests whisper.
They said that the Zhao family spent a lot of money to find a doctor.
Huaijin only found out from others that Song Luan was ill. Her illness was so serious that even the imperial doctor could not treat it.
In his eyes, Song Luan had always been bright and charming, like a beautiful flower.
Huaijin watched her tiredly lying on the bed as if she would never open her eyes again. He hid secretly and heard her low cries.
He heard that Song Luan was angry with Zhao Nanyu. She said she was in pain and was begging Zhao Nanyu to kill her.
Huaijin listened to her painful cry and unconsciously shed a few tears.
After a long time, the sound inside gradually subsided.
He saw the man retreat from the room. While hiding in the dark, Huaijin watched Zhao Nanyu raise his hand to wipe the corners of his eyes.
When he came out of Zhao's residence, he had only one thought in his mind, that is, he could not let Song Luan die.
Huaijin packed his bags and left the capital. He went back to Nanman without telling her.
It was a dangerous journey, and he didn't know if he could survive.
He hadn't suffered so much for a long time. Since he was redeemed by Song Luan, he had always enjoyed good food and drink, and no one had wronged him.
They had a magic medicine. It was said that no matter what kind of disease the person had, they would get better. Huaijin didn't know whether the legend was true or not, but he still wanted to try.
It didn't matter if he died on the road.
He wanted Song Luan to live. He only held her once in his life. His arms felt very warm. He could smell the fragrance from her back neck when he lowered his head.
Huaijin just wanted to hold her again.
No one in his life would be as good to him as she was.
Only Song Luan would ask him whether he was in pain or not, or whether it was cold or not. 
Only she could touch his heart.
Huaijin suffered a lot of injuries along the way. He once fell in the snow and was almost frozen to death.
Before he fainted, his ears were full of Song Luan's sobbing cries.
Huaijin got up again, even though he was shivering with cold.
After several months, Huaijin returned to the capital with the hard-won medicine.
When he went to the Zhao residence again, he couldn't find Song Luan and that someone else already lived in the courtyard. The girl asked him, "Who are you looking for?"
"Song Luan."
"She moved out."
"Is she okay?"
"Good."
Huaijin nodded and left silently.
He stayed in the capital and could always hear news about her, but he never appeared in front of her again.
Zhao Nanyu was very kind to her. They both had two children.
Song Luan occasionally goes out, so Huaijin would secretly follow behind her. At that time, Huaijin looked at her with some vacant look and felt that she had not been so happy.
When Zhao Nanyu came to pick her up, she would lightly look at him.
Huaijin wanted her to be happy. He didn't want to see Song Luan shed tears.
Over the years, he never liked anyone.
When he first met Song Luan, her bright and gorgeous posture deeply moved his heart. Huaijin was stubborn, only willing to like her alone.
The young boy who needed her care at the beginning was already an adult.
***
Huaijin dreamt of her, and when he woke up, his cheeks were a little moist. He sat on the bed blankly, looking at the thick snow outside the window. 
All of a sudden, it felt very sad.
It was on a snowy day that he confessed to Song Luan.
Huaijin thought with joy that he could stay with her all his life...
***
T/N: Here's the lyrics of Janet Suhh – In Silence:
In silence, no one answers
But I still hear your voice
If you'd only come hold me
Tears flow
Sorry I'm late again
Let them fall
Sorry I'm late again
In darkness, it's getting hard
Getting hard to stand
If you hear me, if you see me
Won't you come closer
Tears flow
Sorry I'm late again
Let them fall
Sorry I'm late again
Can you just tell me once
You'll never leave me
(I'm) afraid of losing you
Will you just lay with me
There will be no fears
If you only stay with me.
Bare your soul to me
Here I stand for you
Stop crying your heart
Days will come for you, for us
In silence, no one answers
But I still hear your voice
=============== Chapter 109
When Zhao Zhi was 16, his father had a daughter.
The younger sister became the treasure of the family. Not only did her mother and father spoiled her, but her grandmother and uncle loved her very much.
His sister had a nice name, Zhao Huan.
Her temper was also very good. She wouldn't cry but would smile at people. 
Many people liked to hold her, but Zhao Zhi, the elder brother, seldom touched her. Most of the time, he would just stand aside and look at her silently with his hands on his back.
Over time, Song Luan also found that the eldest son did not seem to be very close to the younger daughter.
After coaxing her daughter to sleep, Song Luan looked at her son who was already taller than her. She said with a smile, "Do you not like your sister?"
Zhao Zhi shook his head, "No."
Song Luan then asked, "Why didn't I see you holding your sister?"
Zhao Zhi just felt that his sister was too soft and too small. He was just afraid that he would damage her.
He pursed his lips and replied uneasily, "I don't know how to hold the baby. I'm afraid it will make her uncomfortable."
Song Luan blinked and said, "But when Er Bao was young, you loved to hold him."
Younger brother and younger sister were of course different.
But it was not easy for Zhao Zhi to say this sentence in front of his mother. He could never tell his mother, so he simply closed his mouth.
Song Luan likes to tease her eldest son. While growing up, he became calmer and didn't talk much. Fortunately, he is obedient and never worries about her.
Song Luan reluctantly cheered up, remembering that it seemed she hadn't spoken to her son for a long time.
She looked at her son with a smile and asked, "Do you have a girl you like? Would you like your mother to help you?"
She still remembered the two girls around him at the Palace Banquet at the beginning of the year.
Zhao Zhi's face blushed red, "No."
Song Luan was a little disappointed. "Okay. If you don't want to, then I will not. You can always meet them in the future."
Zhao Zhi breathed a sigh of relief as he asked thoughtfully, "Hmm...Is mother sleepy?"
Song Luan yawned. "Yes, I'm a little sleepy. Go back. I'll sleep with your sister for a while."
"Good."
"Do you want to see your sister again?"
"No."
Others might particularly spoil their younger sisters when they become older brothers, but little Zhao seemed to do better with younger brothers. 
Over the years, he had treated Er Bao very well. He had given him many things and solved many problems for him.
No matter how mischievous his brother was, he never really got angry.
As soon as his son left, Song Luan went to bed and took her little daughter to sleep.
They slept straight from afternoon tonight. When they woke up again, the sky outside the window was already dark.
Song Luan's hazy eyes gradually cleared. She saw the man in front of the window holding the child, coaxing her in a low voice.
She didn't know when Zhao Nanyu came back. 
Their daughter was carefully held in his arms, and when the little girl saw a familiar person, her smile was particularly brilliant.
Song Luan put on her shoes and walked behind him. "When did you come back?"
Zhao Nanyu looked back. "It's been a while."
"When did our daughter wake up?"
She was so asleep that she didn't notice.
Zhao Nanyu replied, "She just woke up."
When he came back, his daughter had already woken up, her pair of dark eyes were opened as she laid obediently on her mother's side, and did not cry. She just chewed her fingers to play.
Zhao Nanyu saw it at that time and felt that his heart was going to melt.
Zhao Nanyu picked her up from Song Luan's arms and kissed her on her forehead and whispered, "Shall we not wake up your mother?"
Although she did not understand, the little girl was happy as soon as she saw someone playing with her.
After Zhao Nanyu played with her daughter, Song Luan woke up.
"You give the baby to the wet nurse. I'm afraid the baby is hungry."
"Okay."
Zhao Nanyu then reluctantly gave the baby to the nurse.
In this family, Zhao Nanyu was the one who loves the little girl the most. When he comes back from the palace, he refuses to give the baby up. 
Song Luan once said in a half-joking way, "What if our daughter wants to marry when she grows up?"
After thinking about it carefully, Zhao Nanyu replied, "I'll make him give up. There is nothing to worry about."
"...."
Song Luan was helplessly held in his arms, "Why didn't you spoil your son like this so much?"
"How can a daughter and a son be the same?"
The son could be raised at will.
"You will spoil her in the future."
Advertisements
"It doesn't matter if she is bad or willful. This is better so she won't be cheated." 
***
Huanhuan would neither call her mother or father first. Although Zhao Nayu took the trouble to teach her more than 800 times every day, her first word was "brother"
The child's pronunciation was not good, it instead sounded milky. She crawled around the ground, grabbed Zhao Zhi's leg, looked up at him with a milky smile, and shouted, "Brother."
Zhao Zhi stood stiffly in the same place and did not dare to move. He felt that he could crush his sister by lifting his feet.
When the little girl didn't get a response, she called with great strength, "Brother, brother, brother."
Zhao Zhi held his sister a handful of times, but he was not willing to hold her during the daytime, but in this situation, it seemed that right to hold her.
Just when he was about to lift his sister from his legs, Zhao Nanyu took his first step and picked up the little girl.
Zhao Nanyu looked at his eyes and said, "Don't come to your mother's house if you have nothing to do."
Song Luan secretly smiled. Zhao Nanyu was probably gloomy because the first person that his daughter called was not him.
Song Luan stepped forward and did not have a good face to Zhao Nanyu. He gently pinched his waist, "You talk to your son well."
"Oh."
Zhao Zhi also smiled. He didn't want to get in the way of his father when he was in a bad mood. "I'll take my brother home. "
Er Bao was very spoiled. He was still young, but he was already a famous little prankster in the capital.
It's hard for him not to cause trouble for a day.
Song Luan said, "Come back early"
Zhao Nanyu was no longer in charge of his two restless sons. The eldest son was well-behaved and quiet, but he had already robbed the hearts of half the ladies in the capital.
As for the younger son, he was arrogant and domineering. Fortunately, he still had a little bit of brain and had not suffered much in these years.
In this family, only Song Luan naively thought that the two children were good.
It's better to have a daughter.
This daughter would look like her. She would also be soft and sweet.
"Tomorrow I'm going to take Huanhuan back to my mother's house. I haven't been back for months. Some children don't recognize their grandmother and uncle if they can't meet them often." Song Luan said.
"I'll go with you."
"Aren't you busy?"
"I'm not busy."
"You spoil her too much."
Zhao Nanyu laughed and didn't speak. 
This time he didn't follow because of his daughter.
After all, Song Luan is the only one he loves the most in his life.
[FINALE]
